Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5619.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 ARTICLE 1 department of agriculture and rural development part 1 line-item appropriations FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of agriculture and rural development for the fiscal year ending 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 September 30, 2027, from the following funds: DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND RURAL DEVELOPMENT APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 483.5 ï¿½ï¿½ Full-time employees 495.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Limited-term employees 4.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Noncareer/per diem employees 25.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Part-time employees 0.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Permanent-intermittent employees 3.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Seasonal employees 0.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 132,213,600 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 306,600 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 131,907,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 15,292,000 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 42,392,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 74,222,200 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 29.3 Unclassified salaries--FTEs 6.0 $ 760,900 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Accounting service center 1,177,400 Commissions and boards 15,000 Emergency management--FTEs 8.0 2,774,100 Emerging contaminants in food and agriculture--FTEs 6.0 1,141,600 Executive direction--FTEs 15.3 2,532,200 Property management 832,500 Departmentwide economic adjustments 1,454,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 10,688,500 Appropriated from: IDG from LARA (LCC), liquor quality testing fees 2,000 Federal revenues: Deferred federal revenue funding 15,000 HHS, multiple grants 525,300 USDA, multiple grants 600,000 Special revenue funds: Agriculture licensing and inspection fees 86,500 Dairy and food safety fund 479,800 Feed control fund 600 Freshwater protection fund 52,600 Gasoline inspection and testing fund 102,500 Industry support funds 58,300 Private forestland enhancement fund 19,600 State general fund/general purpose $ 8,746,300 Sec. 103. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY Information technology services and projects $ 1,193,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,193,200 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Dairy and food safety fund 124,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,068,700 Sec. 104. FOOD SAFETY AND ANIMAL HEALTH Full-time equated classified positions 197.3 Animal disease prevention and response--FTEs 58.7 $ 10,844,800 Animal feed safety--FTEs 9.2 1,670,000 Food safety and quality assurance--FTEs 100.6 19,407,500 Indemnification - livestock depredation 15,000 Milk safety and quality assurance--FTEs 28.8 5,658,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 37,596,100 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: HHS, multiple grants 2,761,400 USDA, multiple grants 1,211,100 Special revenue funds: Agriculture licensing and inspection fees 73,300 Animal welfare fund 150,000 Consumer and industry food safety education fund 242,500 Dairy and food safety fund 7,545,400 Feed control fund 562,400 Industry food safety education fund 114,100 Marihuana regulatory fund 50,600 State general fund/general purpose $ 24,885,300 Sec. 105. ENVIRONMENT AND SUSTAINABILITY Full-time equated classified positions 97.5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Environmental stewardship - MAEAP--FTEs 16.9 $ 6,726,500 Local conservation districts 3,500,000 Pesticide and plant pest management--FTEs 69.1 13,032,000 Right-to-farm--FTEs 6.5 1,012,300 Soil health/Regenerative agriculture--FTEs 5.0 2,024,900 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 26,295,700 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from MDEGLE, biosolids 65,800 Federal revenues: Department of Interior 96,300 EPA, multiple grants 1,093,100 USDA, multiple grants 2,097,700 Special revenue funds: Agriculture licensing and inspection fees 3,186,600 Fertilizer control fund 1,569,800 Freshwater protection fund 4,310,500 Horticulture fund 70,000 Industrial hemp fund 592,300 Industry support funds 228,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 12,985,500 Sec. 106. AGRICULTURE DEVELOPMENT Full-time equated classified positions 58.4 Agricultural preservation easement grants $ 1,900,000 Agricultural support--FTEs 3.7 1,000,000 Agriculture development--FTEs 11.4 4,179,000 Fair food network - double up food bucks 4,000,000 Farm to family--FTEs 3.0 3,000,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Farmland and open space preservation--FTEs 8.0 1,210,600 Food and agriculture investment program 2,449,300 Fruit and vegetable inspections--FTEs 8.0 960,500 Intercounty drain--FTEs 4.7 883,800 Migrant labor housing--FTEs 8.0 1,244,400 Producer security/grain dealers--FTEs 5.6 685,500 Qualified forest program--FTEs 4.0 1,080,100 Office of rural prosperity--FTE 1.0 2,299,400 Rural development fund grant program--FTE 1.0 2,009,500 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 26,902,100 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: USDA, multiple grants 3,615,900 Special revenue funds: Agricultural preservation fund 3,110,600 Agriculture licensing and inspection fees 5,100 Commodity inspection fees 352,700 Grain dealers fee fund 526,700 Industry support funds 193,600 Private forestland enhancement fund 1,080,100 Rural development fund 2,009,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 16,007,900 Sec. 107. LABORATORY AND CONSUMER PROTECTION Full-time equated classified positions 101.0 Consumer protection program--FTEs 39.0 $ 6,929,000 Integrated solutions--FTEs 22.1 1,540,000 Laboratory services--FTEs 31.0 7,218,700 USDA monitoring--FTEs 8.9 1,518,100 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 17,205,800 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from LARA (LCC), liquor quality testing fees 238,800 Federal revenues: EPA, multiple grants 180,600 HHS, multiple grants 1,576,300 USDA, multiple grants 1,519,300 Special revenue funds: Agricultural preservation fund 44,600 Agriculture licensing and inspection fees 440,000 Dairy and food safety fund 390,400 Feed control fund 157,000 Fertilizer control fund 23,500 Freshwater protection fund 78,900 Gasoline inspection and testing fund 291,900 Grain dealers fee fund 8,400 Industrial hemp fund 322,200 Migratory labor housing fund 29,900 Refined petroleum fund 3,250,700 Testing fees 361,700 Weights and measures regulation fees 763,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 7,528,500 Sec. 108. FAIRS AND EXPOSITIONS County fairs, shows, and expositions $ 3,000,000 Fairs and racing 201,600 Purses and supplements - fairs/licensed tracks 4,073,600 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Standardbred breeders' awards 345,900 Standardbred purses and supplements - licensed tracks 991,100 Standardbred sire stakes 720,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 9,332,200 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Agriculture equine industry development fund 9,332,200 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 109. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Michigan Animal Agriculture Alliance $ 3,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,000,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 3,000,000 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations for fiscal year 2026-2027 general sections Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is $116,615,000.00 and total state spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $10,900,100.00. The following itemized statement identifies appropriations from which spending to local units of government will occur: DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND RURAL DEVELOPMENT Agriculture preservation easement grants $ 1,900,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Environmental stewardship/MAEAP 4,100,000 Local conservation districts 3,500,000 Qualified forest program 100 Rural development fund grant program 1,400,000 TOTAL $ $10,900,100 Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. As used in part 1 and this part: (a) "Department" means the department of agriculture and rural development. (b) "Director" means the director of the department. (c) "Fiscal agencies" means the Michigan house fiscal agency and the Michigan senate fiscal agency. (d) "FTE" means full-time equated. (e) "IDG" means interdepartmental grant. (f) "MAEAP" means the Michigan agriculture environmental assurance program. (g) "MDEGLE" means the Michigan department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy. (h) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house appropriations committees, the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on agriculture and rural development, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office. (i) "Subcommittees" means all members of the subcommittees of the house and senate appropriations committees with jurisdiction over the budget for the department. (j) "TB" means tuberculosis. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (k) "USDA" means the United States Department of Agriculture. Sec. 204. If the state administrative board, acting under section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount appropriated under part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and serving in each house, intertransfer funds within part 1 for the particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution. Sec. 205. (1) The department shall use the internet to fulfill the reporting requirements of this part and shall make each report readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each required report in a single archivable location on the department's website not later than the due date required for each report. (2) In addition to placing all reports required in the current fiscal year on the department's website, the department shall maintain on its website all reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years posted by fiscal year in the same single archivable location. (3) The department shall transmit all required reports for the current fiscal year to the standard report recipients and any other required recipients by email. The email shall include a copy of the report and a link to access the report online. Sec. 206. The department shall receive and retain copies of all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department shall follow federal and state law and guidelines for short-term and long-term retention of records. The department shall electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required by federal and state guidelines. Sec. 207. (1) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to maintain a 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following for the department: (a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category. (b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit. (c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor, including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and payment description. (2) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to update the searchable website on a quarterly basis. Sec. 208. Not later than December 15, the state budget office shall prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses by major departmental program or program areas. Sec. 209. Not later than 14 days after the release of the executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate with the state budget office to provide an annual report on estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the previous 2 fiscal years. Sec. 210. Not later than November 15, the department shall report on private and other third-party funds received by the department in the previous fiscal year. The report must include the amount of funding received, the specific source of funding received, the purpose for which funding was expended, and the amount of any remaining funds. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 211. Consistent with section 217 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, the department shall prepare a report on out-of-state travel expenses by not later than January 1. The report must list all travel outside this state by classified and unclassified employees in the previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or in part with funds appropriated in the department's budget. The report must include all of the following information: (a) The dates of each travel occurrence. (b) The total transportation and related costs of each travel occurrence and the proportions funded with state general fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal revenues, local revenues, and private revenues, including specific sources of state restricted, federal, local, and private revenues. (c) The destination of each travel occurrence. (d) The specific purpose and description of each travel occurrence, including the specific name of the event or meeting. Sec. 212. On a quarterly basis, the department shall report on all of the following: (a) The number of full-time equated positions in pay status by civil service classification. (b) A comparison by line item of the number of full-time equated positions authorized from funds appropriated in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated positions employed by the department at the end of the reporting period. (c) The number of active employees in each of the following statuses: (i) Full-time salary. (ii) Full-time hourly. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (iii) Part-time. (iv) Permanent-intermittent. (v) Limited-term. (vi) Seasonal. (vii) Worker's compensation. (viii) Noncareer/per diem. (ix) Job share. (x) Special personal services/contractual. (d) The number of overtime hours worked by employees, by classifications. Sec. 213. Not later than April 1, the department shall report on each specific policy change made to implement a public act affecting the department that took effect during the previous calendar year. The report must include reference to the public act that necessitates the policy change. The department shall submit the report to the standard report recipients, to the senate and house standing committees responsible for addressing issues affected by the public acts, and to the joint committee on administrative rules. Sec. 214. (1) Not later than April 1, the department shall maintain, on a publicly accessible website, a department scorecard that identifies, tracks, and updates on a quarterly basis key metrics that are used to monitor and improve the department's performance. (2) The department shall notify the standard report recipients when the quarterly updates to the department scorecard are available on a publicly accessible website. Sec. 215. (1) Unless specifically authorized elsewhere in this part or part 1, funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 pay for a state obligation that exceeds $200,000.00 for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim without prior legislative approval. (2) If a state obligation for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim results in a change from current statute, the department shall notify the legislature. (3) This section does not apply to compensation and other relief to individuals wrongfully imprisoned as required under the wrongful imprisonment compensation act, 2016 PA 343, MCL 691.1751 to 691.1757. Sec. 216. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $3,000,000.00 for federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $2,000.000.00 for local contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 217. Total authorized appropriations from all sources under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 are estimated at $6,633,500.00. From this amount, total appropriations for pension-related legacy costs for the department are estimated at $6,633,500.00. Total appropriations for retiree health care legacy costs for the department are estimated at $0.00. Sec. 218. To the extent possible, the department shall not 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted. Sec. 219. The department shall submit reports that summarize all work project accounts not later than December 31, March 30, June 30, and September 30. The reports must include all of the following: (a) A list of all work project accounts. (b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each account. (c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously designated work project accounts, the name and description of the work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed amounts. Sec. 220. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1: (a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are available. (b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. (c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. Sec. 221. The department shall not take disciplinary action 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 against an employee of the department because the employee communicates with a member of the legislature or legislative staff unless the communication is prohibited by law and the department is exercising its authority as provided by law. Sec. 222. (1) The department shall maximize the efficiency of the state workforce and utilization and occupancy of office space, leased or owned, for each division within the department. Employees with job responsibilities that require employees to serve in their capacities outside of an office shall be monitored each pay period to ensure all work hours reported on timesheets are actually worked. (2) The department shall comply with requirements set forth by the office of the state employer on in-person work and utilization and occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure at least 80% of employees are in person and building occupancy and utilization rates are at least 80% or higher. (3) The department shall submit reports not later than January 15 and April 15 on all of the following: (a) Remote work policy by division. (b) Building occupancy by address. (c) Whether the building is state-owned or leased. (d) Aggregate badge scanning information by employee. (4) As used in this section, "occupancy" means the actual number of employees physically present in a workplace. Sec. 223. (1) The department shall require as a condition of each contract or subcontract that the prequalified contractor or prequalified subcontractor agree to use the E-Verify system to verify that all persons hired during the contract term by the contractor or subcontractor are legally present and authorized to 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 work in the United States. (2) The department may verify this information directly or may require contractors and subcontractors to verify the information and submit a certification to the department. The department shall submit a report not later than March 1 that describes the processes it has developed and implemented under this section. (3) The department shall not contract with any foreign entities that are known or suspected to be enemies of the United States or known foreign adversaries. Foreign adversaries include all of the following: (a) The People's Republic of China. (b) The Russian Federation. (c) The Islamic Republic of Iran. (d) The Democratic People's Republic of Korea. (e) The Republic of Cuba. (f) The Venezuelan regime of Nicolï¿½s Maduro. (g) The Syrian Arab Republic. (h) An agency or other entity under significant control of a country described in subdivisions (a) to (g). (4) As used in this section, "E-Verify" means an internet-based system operated by the Department of Homeland Security, United States Citizenship and Immigration Services in partnership with the Social Security Administration. Sec. 224. (1) Within 30 days of enactment of this act, the state budget office shall post a list of legislatively directed spending items funded in part 1 as defined in sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. The list must include all information and documents pertaining to the funded items as publicly disclosed in accordance 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 with sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. (2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency administering the grant shall submit a report not later than November 1. The department or agency shall update the report and shall submit updated reports not later than March 15 and September 15 of the current fiscal year. The department or agency shall include in the report the most comprehensive information the department or agency has available at the time of posting for grants awarded, including, but not limited to, project milestones, percent completed, funding expended, and funding encumbered. (3) Before executing a grant agreement, all grant recipients must provide a spending plan that specifies the scope of service, the program goals, the measurement for meeting program goals, and how all grant funds will be used, and must indicate if any grant funds will be provided to a third party or subrecipient. (4) Each department or agency responsible for awarding or disbursing grant funds must annually audit the entity's use of the grant funds for each fiscal year in which the grant is active. Each entity must submit information requested by the department or agency to confirm compliance. (5) Each department or agency shall work with the office of the auditor general to conduct an audit of the grant according to generally accepted accounting practices and audit standards. The office of the auditor general must be given access to all internal and external records. All contracts or agreements between a department or agency and a grant recipient or between a grant recipient and a third party must include a clause granting the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 office of the auditor general access to all internal and external records. (6) Grant recipients and their immediate family members are prohibited from being employed by the executive branch or legislative branch of this state. In addition, grant recipients are prohibited from serving on any state board that has direct or indirect responsibility for approving or auditing grant funds awarded or disbursed by any department or agency. (7) Full and complete audits of grant funds issued by the department or an agency of this state, without redaction unless required by law, must be posted to the department's or agency's website in a conspicuous place for public review. (8) On a quarterly basis, the department or agency shall submit a report on legislatively sponsored grant funds that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) The name of each grant recipient and the status of each grant. (b) The amount distributed to each grant recipient. (c) Any changes to scope or costs of program. (9) The report under subsection (8) must include the following statements made by the department or agency: (a) A statement that confirms the department or agency reviewed and affirmed compliance by each grant recipient with program scope and expenditure of grant funding. (b) A statement that confirms the department or agency reviewed applicable program reports and requests for reimbursement. Sec. 225. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall do the following: (a) Report on any amounts of severance pay for a department 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 director, deputy director, or other high-ranking department official not later than 14 days after a severance agreement with the director, deputy director, or official is signed. The name of the director, deputy director, or official and the amount of severance pay must be included in the report required by this subdivision. (b) Not later than February 1, report on the total amount of severance pay remitted to former department employees during the previous fiscal year and the total number of former department employees that were remitted severance pay during the previous fiscal year. (2) As used in this section, "severance pay" means compensation to which both of the following apply: (a) The compensation is payable or paid upon the termination of employment. (b) The compensation is paid in addition to wages or benefits earned during the course of employment or generally applicable retirement benefits. Sec. 226. Funds appropriated in part 1 from state or federal sources are prohibited from being used to provide services, grants, or programming to an individual who is not a citizen of the United States unless the individual is a qualified alien as that term is defined in 8 USC 1641. This section does not prohibit the department, political subdivision, state university, or other state agency from expending funds for the purpose of detaining individuals who are not citizens of the United States, including any costs associated with housing such individuals in county jails or state correctional facilities. Sec. 227. State funds must not be used for diversity, equity, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 and inclusion, or diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives or programs, as outlined in federal Executive Order No. 14151, 90 Fed. Reg. 8339 (January 29, 2025) "Ending Radical and Wasteful Government DEI Programs and Preferencing", federal Executive Order No. 14168, 90 Fed. Reg. 8615 (January 30, 2025) "Defending Women from Gender Ideology Extremism and Restoring Biological Truth to the Federal Government", or federal Executive Order No. 14173, 90 Fed. Reg. 8633 (January 31, 2025) "Ending Illegal Discrimination and Restoring Merit-Based Opportunity". Sec. 228. The department shall use the same precontract risk assessment program utilized by the department of technology, management, and budget to evaluate financial compliance, security risks, and insurance requirements prior to contract execution. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Sec. 301. (1) The department may establish a fee schedule and collect fees for the following work activities and services: (a) Pesticide and plant pest management propagation and certification of virus-free foundation stock. (b) Fruit and vegetable inspection and grading services at shipping and termination points and processing plants. (c) Laboratory support analyses of food, livestock, and agricultural products for disease, foreign products for disease, toxic materials, foreign substances, and quality standards. (d) Laboratory support test samples for other state and local agencies and public or private organizations. (2) The department may receive and expend revenue from the fees authorized under subsection (1), subject to appropriation, to recover expenses associated with the work activities and services 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 described in subsection (1). Fee revenue collected by the department under subsection (1) does not lapse to the state general fund at the end of the fiscal year but carries forward for appropriation by the legislature in the subsequent fiscal year. (3) The department shall notify the standard report recipients 30 days before proposing changes in fees authorized under this section or under section 5 of 1915 PA 91, MCL 285.35. (4) On or before February 1 of each year, the department shall provide a report to the subcommittees, the fiscal agencies, and the state budget office detailing all the fees charged by the department under the authorization provided in this section, including, but not limited to, rates, number of individuals paying each fee, and the revenue generated by each fee in the previous fiscal year. Sec. 302. (1) The department may contract with or provide grants to local units of government, institutions of higher education, or nonprofit organizations to support activities authorized by appropriations in part 1. (2) The department shall notify members of the legislature of grants or contracts awarded to recipients located within a member's legislative district. (3) As used in this section: (a) "Contracts" includes, but is not limited to, contracts for delivery of groundwater/freshwater programs, MAEAP technical assistance, forest management, invasive species monitoring, and wildlife risk mitigation. (b) "Grants" includes, but is not limited to, grants promoting proper pesticide disposal and research grants for the purpose of enhancing the agricultural industries in this state. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 303. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for emerging contaminants in food and agriculture the department shall support efforts to identify and respond to the impacts of emerging contaminants to the food and agriculture sector, help address and mitigate current issues caused by emerging contaminants, and work to prevent and minimize future impacts. The department shall coordinate these efforts with other state agencies, federal agencies, tribal governments, local governments, institutions of higher learning, and the food and agriculture sector. Emerging contaminants include but are not limited to pesticides, dioxins, and per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances. (2) The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for emerging contaminants in food and agriculture are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds do not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and are available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a(1) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to support efforts to identify and respond to the impacts of emerging contaminants to the food and agriculture sector, help address and mitigate current issues caused by emerging contaminants, and work to prevent and minimize future impacts. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The estimated cost of this project is $1,141,600.00. (d) The tentative completion date for the work project is September 30, 2029. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 BUREAU OF FOOD safety and animal health Sec. 401. Not later than April 1, the department shall report on the previous calendar year's activities of the bureau of food safety and animal health. The report must include the following: (a) Information on activities and outcomes of the dairy safety and inspection program, the food safety inspection program, the foodborne illness and emergency response program, and the food service program. (b) Significant foodborne outbreaks and emergencies, including any significant enforcement actions taken related to food safety. (c) All indemnification payments for livestock depredation made, including all of the following: (i) The reason for the indemnification. (ii) The amount of the indemnification. (iii) The person for whom the indemnification was paid. Sec. 402. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall pay for all whole herd bovine TB testing costs and individual animal testing costs in the modified accredited zone and buffer counties as referenced in the current memorandum of understanding between the department and the USDA to maintain split-state status requirements. These costs include indemnity and compensation for injury causing death or downer to animals. Sec. 403. The department shall collaborate with the USDA to monitor bovine TB, consistent with the current required memorandum of understanding between the department and the USDA. Sec. 404. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for animal disease prevention and response, the department shall use $200,000.00 to cover costs associated with testing of registered 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 privately owned cervid facilities as follows: (a) Required surveillance testing for chronic wasting disease. (b) Infected herd bovine TB testing. Sec. 405. (1) Not later than October 15, the department shall provide to the standard report recipients a report on bovine TB status and department activities. (2) For each fiscal quarter following the report required in subsection (1), the department shall provide an update that identifies the following: (a) Significant impacts to the program, including new incidence of bovine TB in this state, department activity associated with specific new incidence of bovine TB, any changes in USDA requirements or movement orders, and information and data on wildlife risk mitigation plan implementation in the modified accredited zone. (b) Implementation of a movement certificate process. (c) Progress toward annual surveillance test requirements. (d) Efforts to work with slaughter facilities in this state, as well as those that slaughter a significant number of animals from this state, and educational programs and information for this state's livestock community. Sec. 406. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for Michigan animal agriculture alliance, the department shall work with animal industry representatives and state research universities for an animal research grant program. BUREAU OF ENVIRONMENT AND SUSTAINABILITY Sec. 501. The department shall report on the previous calendar year's activities of the bureau of environment and sustainability 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 on or before April 1. Sec. 502. (1) The purpose of the part 1 appropriation for soil health/regenerative agriculture is to advance the adoption and implementation of best regenerative agricultural practices and new environmentally sustainable technologies, promoting soil health and regenerative agriculture principles throughout the state. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for soil health/regenerative agriculture, the department shall do both of the following: (a) Promote the principles of soil health and regenerative agriculture through at least the following: (i) The maintenance of soil cover. (ii) The minimization of soil disturbance. (iii) The maximization of plant and crop diversity. (iv) The maximization of the presence of living roots. (v) The integration of livestock into the cropping systems. (b) Ensure that program outcomes include at least the following: (i) The increase of soil organic matter content. (ii) The improvement of soil water infiltration capacity. (iii) The increase in soil water holding capacity. (iv) The improvement of soil biological capacity to break down plant residue and other substances and to maintain soil aggregation. (v) The improvement of soil nutrient sequestration and cycling capacity. (vi) The reduction of nutrient losses. (3) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for soil health/regenerative agriculture, the department shall promote 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 practices of soil health and regenerative agriculture, including the use of no-till farming, intercropping, cover crops, multispecies cover crops, roller crimping, managed rotational grazing, and other practices identified that utilize natural biological processes to advance the goals of soil health and regenerative agriculture. (4) No funds appropriated in part 1 for soil health/regenerative agriculture may be used for applied research into the precision application of fertilizer, pesticides, or herbicides. (5) It is the intention of the legislature that the department engage with program partners to achieve the purposes of the soil health/regenerative agriculture programs through research, education, and outreach. Agreements with program partners receiving funds through soil health/regenerative agriculture appropriations must describe intended outcomes and how intended outcomes will be measured and require the provision of a report to the department on uses of funding received and a progress report on outcomes. (6) In the report required under section 501 of this part, the department shall provide information on the program described in this section, including department activities, uses of program funds by activity or project, contractors, grantees, and a summary of projects and project results. (7) Of the funds appropriated in part 1 for soil health/regenerative agriculture, not less than $1,000,000.00 must be used by the department to partner with the state land grant university through MSU Extension and AgBioResearch to develop, implement, and evaluate a soil health/regenerative agriculture program. The partnership described in this subsection must be 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 focused on researching and assisting the agricultural industry in implementing soil health/regenerative agricultural principles and techniques. Partnership goals must include, but are not limited to, establishing program priorities, developing metrics, implementing goals, evaluating outcomes, and engaging with stakeholders. Sec. 503. Not later than April 1, the department shall prepare a report to be posted on the department's website and provided to the relevant house and senate standing committees and appropriations subcommittees as well as to the fiscal agencies and state budget office. The report must contain the following information for agriculture nutrient best management voluntary practices program: (a) The number and location of acres enrolled in nutrient management or other best management practices. (b) The number of acres enrolled that were not previously verified under the MAEAP. (c) A summary of practices implemented and available incentive programs. (d) The starting and ending balances of the program. (e) A summary of outreach and training efforts. (f) Testing results. Sec. 505. The funds appropriated in part 1 for environmental stewardship/MAEAP must be used to support department agriculture pollution prevention programs, including groundwater and freshwater protection programs under part 87 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.8701 to 324.8717, and technical assistance in implementing conservation grants available under the federal farm bill. Sec. 506. The department may receive and expend federal 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 revenues up to a total of $1,000,000.00 in excess of the federal revenue appropriated in part 1 for environmental stewardship and MAEAP activities. The department shall notify the subcommittees, the fiscal agencies, and the state budget office prior to expending federal revenues authorized under this section. Sec. 507. (1) From the appropriations in part 1 for local conservation districts, $3,500,000.00 must be distributed through a grant program to local conservation districts in this state that were in operation in the previous fiscal year based upon criteria established by the department. (2) On or before April 1, the department shall report on the previous calendar year's activities of local conservation districts. The report must include descriptions of local conservation district activities and the use of funding. In preparing this report, the department shall coordinate with representatives of local conservation districts. AGRICULTURE DEVELOPMENT BUREAU Sec. 601. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for the food and agriculture investment program, the department shall operate a food and agriculture investment program. (2) The food and agriculture investment program shall do all of the following: (a) Expand the Michigan food and agriculture sector. (b) Promote food security. (c) Develop local and regional food systems. (d) Grow Michigan exports. (e) Promote the development of value-added agricultural production. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (f) Support urban farms, food hubs, food incubators, and community-based processing facilities with a focus on new and expanding protein processors. (g) Promote the expansion of farm markets, flower markets, and urban agriculture, including hoop houses. (h) Increase food processing activities within this state by accelerating investment projects and infrastructure development that support growth in production agriculture and food and agriculture processing, expand opportunity to new agricultural producers and processors, promote agriculture tourism and agricultural heritage, and develop agricultural education and interpretation activities. (3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the department may receive and expend funds received from outside sources for the food and agriculture investment program. (4) Before the allocation of funding, all projects must receive approval from the Michigan commission of agriculture and rural development, except for projects selected through a competitive process by a joint evaluation committee selected by the director and consisting of representatives that have agriculture, food security, local and regional food systems, business, and economic development expertise. Projects funded through the food and agriculture investment program are required to have a grant agreement that outlines milestones and activities that must be met in order to receive a disbursement of funds. Projects must also identify measurable project outcomes. (5) The department shall include, in the agriculture development annual report, a report on the food and agriculture investment program for the previous fiscal year that includes a 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 listing of the grantees, award amounts, match funding, project locations, and project outcomes. (6) The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for the food and agriculture investment program are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds do not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and are available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a(1) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to promote and expand the Michigan food and agriculture sector, grow Michigan exports, and increase food processing activities within the state. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The estimated cost of this project is identified in the appropriation line item. (d) The tentative completion date for the work project is September 30, 2028. (7) The department may expend money from the funds appropriated in part 1 for the food and agriculture investment program, including all of the following activities: (a) Grants. (b) Loans or loan guarantees. (c) Infrastructure development. (d) Other economic assistance. (e) Program administration. (f) Export assistance. (8) The department shall expend no more than 3% from the funds 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 appropriated in part 1 for the food and agriculture investment program for administrative purposes. (9) In awarding grants under the food and agriculture investment program, the department shall identify and encourage applications from women, veterans, and beginning farmers and ranchers. In awarding grants under the food and agriculture investment program, the department must also prioritize Michigan-based small businesses, nonprofits, and organizations promoting agriculture and food security activities. Sec. 602. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for fair food network ï¿½ double up food bucks, the department shall work with the fair food network to ensure that at least 95% of the funds allocated to the double up food bucks program are directly used for the payments to participating vendors. (2) The department shall work with the department of health and human services to do the following: (a) Notify recipients of food assistance program benefits that food assistance program benefits can be accessed at many farmer's markets in this state with bridge cards. (b) Notify recipients of food assistance program benefits about the double up food bucks program and that it is administered by the fair food network. Food assistance program recipients shall receive information about the double up food bucks program. (3) The department shall work with the fair food network to expand access to the double up food bucks program in each of this state's counties with grocery stores or farmer's markets that meet the program's eligibility requirements. (4) Not later than June 1, the department shall submit a report on activities and outcomes of the double up food bucks 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 program. The report must contain the following: (a) Counties in this state with participating double up food bucks vendors, the number of vendors by county, and the name of location of vendors, as of May 1, 2027. The report must identify counties and vendors added to the program or removed from the program since May 1, 2026. (b) Number of individuals participating in the program, by county. (c) A description of efforts to expand the program, including new grocers and farm markets added to the program during the previous calendar year. Sec. 603. (1) By not later than April 1, the department shall report on the previous calendar year's activities of the agriculture development bureau. (2) The report described in subsection (1) must include the following information on any grants awarded during the prior fiscal year: (a) The name of the grantee. (b) The amount of the grant. (c) The purpose of the grant, including measurable outcomes. (d) Additional state, federal, private, or local funds contributed to the grant project. (e) The completion date of grant-funded activities. (3) The report must include the following information on the Michigan craft beverage council established under section 303 of the Michigan liquor control code of 1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL 436.1303: (a) Council activities and accomplishments for the previous fiscal year. (b) Council expenditures for the previous fiscal year by 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 category of administration, industry support, research and education grants, and promotion and consumer education. (c) Grants awarded during the previous fiscal year and the results of research grant projects completed during the previous fiscal year. Sec. 604. Unexpended industry support fund revenues at the end of the fiscal year may be carried forward into the industry support fund in the succeeding fiscal year and do not lapse to the general fund. Sec. 605. (1) The appropriations in part 1 for the qualified forest program are for the purpose of increasing the knowledge of nonindustrial private forestland owners regarding sound forest management practices and increasing the amount of commercial timber production from those lands. (2) The department shall work in partnership with stakeholder groups and other state and federal agencies to increase the active management of nonindustrial private forestland to foster the growth of this state's timber product industry. Sec. 606. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall maintain coordination with the department of treasury to improve the timely processing and issuance of tax credits under section 36109 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.36109, for the Michigan's farmland and open space preservation program under parts 361 and 362 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.36101 to 324.36116 and 324.36201 to 324.36207. The improvement of timely processing and issuance, as described in this section, includes, but is not limited to: (a) Timely review of mailed applications and paperwork. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) Timely and proactive communications to applicants on the status of their application. (c) The provision of a clear and understood timeline for the issuance of any tax credits. Sec. 607. The department shall collaborate with the department of labor and economic opportunity's office of rural prosperity on the rural development fund grant program as part of the state's coordinated strategy for achieving rural prosperity across the state. LABORATORY AND CONSUMER PROTECTIOn BUREAU Sec. 701. The department shall report by April 1 on the previous calendar year's activities of the laboratory bureau. Sec. 702. No funds from the appropriations in part 1 may be used for the purpose of consolidating state-run laboratories. FAIRS and EXPOSITIONS Sec. 801. All appropriations from the agriculture equine industry development fund must be spent on equine-related purposes. No funds from the agriculture equine industry development fund may be expended for non-equine-related purposes without prior approval of the legislature. Sec. 802. From the funds appropriated in part 1 from agriculture equine industry development funds, available revenue must be allocated in the following priority order: (a) To support all administrative, contractual, and regulatory costs incurred by the department and the Michigan gaming control board. (b) Any remaining funds collected through September 30, 2026, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 after the obligations in subdivision (a) have been met, must be prorated among the county fairs, supplements, breeders' awards, and sire stakes awards to eligible race meeting licensees in accordance with section 20 of the horse racing law of 1995, 1995 PA 279, MCL 431.320. Sec. 805. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for county fairs, shows, and expositions, the department shall establish and administer a county fairs, shows, and expositions grant program. The program must have the following objectives: (a) Assist in the financing of building improvements or other capital improvements at county fairgrounds of this state. (b) Provide financial support, promotion, prizes, and premiums of equine, livestock, and other agricultural commodity expositions in this state. (2) The department shall award grants on a competitive basis to county fairs or other organizations from the funds appropriated in part 1 for county fairs, shows, and expositions grants. Grantees will be required to provide a 50% cash match with grant awards and identify measurable project outcomes. A county fair organization that received a county fair capital improvement grant in the prior fiscal year must not receive a grant from the appropriation in part 1. (3) From the amount appropriated in part 1 for county fairs, shows, and expositions, up to $25,000.00 must be expended for the purpose of financial support, promotion, prizes, and premiums of equine, livestock, and other agricultural commodity expositions and festivals in this state. (4) All fairs receiving grants under this section must provide a report to the department on the financial impact resulting from 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the capital improvement project on both fair and nonfair events. These reports are due for 3 years immediately following the completion of the capital improvement project. (5) The department shall identify criteria, evaluate applications, and provide recommendations to the director for final approval of grant awards. (6) The department may expend money from the funds appropriated in part 1 for the county fairs, shows, and expositions for administering the program. (7) The unexpended portion of the appropriation in part 1 for county fairs, shows, and expositions grants are designated as a work project appropriation and any unencumbered or unallotted funds do not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and are available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a(1) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to support building improvements or other capital improvements at county fairgrounds of this state. (b) All grants will be distributed in accordance with this section and the grant guidelines published prior to the request for proposals. (c) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (d) The estimated cost of the project is $3,000,000.00. (e) The tentative completion date for the work project is September 30, 2029. (8) The department shall provide a year-end report on the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 county fairs, shows, and expositions grants no later than December 1, 2027 that includes a listing of the grantees, award amounts, match funding, project outcomes, and department costs of grant administration. ARTICLE 2 department of corrections part 1 line-item appropriations FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of corrections for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, from the following funds: DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 16.0 Full-time equated classified positions 12,302.9 ï¿½ï¿½ Full-time employees 10,365.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Limited-term employees 48.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Non-career/per diem employees 22.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Part-time employees 6.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Permanent-intermittent employees 2.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Seasonal employees 0.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,122,408,400 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,122,408,400 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 5,222,600 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 275,000 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 30,108,900 State general fund/general purpose $ 2,086,801,900 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Full-time equated unclassified positions 16.0 Full-time equated classified positions (41.1) Unclassified salaries--FTEs 16.0 $ 1,898,900 Administrative hearings officers 4,070,200 Budget and operations administration--FTEs 317.0 45,272,300 Budgetary savings--FTEs (455.1) (79,585,200) County jail reimbursement program 14,564,600 Departmentwide economic adjustments 35,693,600 Employee wellness programming--FTEs 9.0 2,570,600 Equipment and special maintenance 603,400 Executive direction--FTEs 28.0 5,060,500 Judicial data warehouse user fees 3,300 New custody staff training 23,566,700 Prison industries operations--FTEs 60.0 10,309,100 Property management 2,473,000 Prosecutorial and detainer expenses 1,922,900 Worker's compensation 8,770,900 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 77,194,800 Appropriated from: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Federal revenues: DOJ, prison rape elimination act grant 674,700 Federal education revenues 11,000 Federal revenues and reimbursements 7,900 Special revenue funds: Correctional industries revolving fund 10,449,400 Correctional industries revolving fund 110 737,100 Jail reimbursement program fund 5,900,000 Resident stores 99,900 State general fund/general purpose $ 59,314,800 Sec. 103. OFFENDER SUCCESS ADMINISTRATION Full-time equated classified positions 330.9 Community residential services $ 13,376,100 Criminal justice reinvestment 1,448,400 Education/skilled trades/career readiness programs--FTEs 249.9 38,396,100 Enhanced food technology program--FTEs 11.0 1,454,000 Higher education in prison 1,250,000 Offender success community partners 18,925,000 Offender success federal grants 751,000 Offender success programming 15,742,200 Offender success services--FTEs 70.0 15,905,400 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 107,248,200 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: DOJ, prisoner reintegration 751,000 Federal education revenues 1,632,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 104,864,400 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Sec. 104. FIELD OPERATIONS ADMINISTRATION Full-time equated classified positions 1,701.5 Field operations--FTEs 1,670.5 $ 229,249,100 Parole board operations--FTEs 31.0 3,361,600 Parole/probation services 940,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 233,550,700 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Community tether program reimbursement 275,000 Reentry center offender reimbursements 10,000 Supervision fees 6,630,500 Supervision fees set-aside 940,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 225,695,200 Sec. 105. CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES ADMINISTRATION Full-time equated classified positions 678.0 Body-worn cameras--FTEs 8.0 $ 3,821,800 Central records--FTEs 43.0 4,911,100 Contraband prevention 2,750,000 Correctional facilities administration--FTEs 37.0 6,910,000 Housing inmates in federal institutions 511,000 Inmate legal services 224,100 Intelligence unit--FTEs 30.0 4,068,700 Prison food service--FTEs 324.0 77,370,600 Prison store operations--FTEs 32.0 3,645,400 Transportation--FTEs 204.0 35,932,600 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 140,145,300 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 DOJ-BOP, federal prisoner reimbursement 411,000 SSA-SSI, incentive payment 272,000 Special revenue funds: Correctional industries revolving fund 110 886,400 Resident stores 3,645,400 State general fund/general purpose $ 134,930,500 Sec. 106. HEALTH CARE Full-time equated classified positions 1,475.3 Clinical complexes--FTEs 1,000.8 $ 181,705,900 Health care administration--FTEs 18.0 3,765,900 Healthy Michigan plan administration--FTEs 12.0 890,400 Hepatitis C treatment 6,081,200 Interdepartmental grant to health and human services, eligibility specialists 120,200 Mental health and substance use disorder treatment services--FTEs 444.5 68,080,200 Prisoner health care services 117,540,700 Vaccination program 691,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 378,875,700 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal revenues and reimbursements 427,400 Special revenue funds: Prisoner health care co-payments 257,200 State general fund/general purpose $ 378,191,100 Sec. 107. CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES Full-time equated classified positions 8,158.3 Alger Correctional Facility - Munising--FTEs 259.0 $ 32,805,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Baraga Correctional Facility - Baraga--FTEs 279.8 37,589,000 Bellamy Creek Correctional Facility - Ionia--FTEs 414.1 54,570,100 Carson City Correctional Facility - Carson City--FTEs 422.4 55,294,600 Central Michigan Correctional Facility - St. Louis--FTEs 385.0 53,477,300 Charles E. Egeler Correctional Facility - Jackson--FTEs 374.6 52,918,000 Chippewa Correctional Facility - Kincheloe--FTEs 443.6 58,868,600 Cooper Street Correctional Facility - Jackson--FTEs 254.6 31,111,800 Earnest C. Brooks Correctional Facility - Muskegon--FTEs 248.2 35,196,300 G. Robert Cotton Correctional Facility - Jackson--FTEs 375.0 47,549,700 Gus Harrison Correctional Facility - Adrian--FTEs 285.4 41,677,200 Ionia Correctional Facility - Ionia--FTEs 286.3 39,964,900 Kinross Correctional Facility - Kincheloe--FTEs 222.0 33,852,800 Lakeland Correctional Facility - Coldwater--FTEs 272.4 38,226,700 Macomb Correctional Facility - New Haven--FTEs 313.3 43,326,900 Marquette Branch Prison - Marquette--FTEs 319.7 39,729,700 Muskegon Correctional Facility - Muskegon--FTEs 217.3 31,806,000 Newberry Correctional Facility - Newberry--FTEs 200.1 28,319,600 Oaks Correctional Facility - Eastlake--FTEs 289.4 40,701,900 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 Parnall Correctional Facility - Jackson--FTEs 262.5 33,877,400 Richard A. Handlon Correctional Facility - Ionia--FTEs 268.3 37,046,700 Saginaw Correctional Facility - Freeland--FTEs 268.6 38,521,700 Special Alternative Incarceration Program - Jackson--FTEs 26.2 3,639,000 St. Louis Correctional Facility - St. Louis--FTEs 302.9 43,821,100 Thumb Correctional Facility - Lapeer--FTEs 295.6 41,526,300 Women's Huron Valley Correctional Complex - Ypsilanti--FTEs 494.8 67,125,200 Woodland Correctional Facility - Whitmore Lake--FTEs 287.2 42,564,300 Deferred maintenance at correctional facilities 39,464,000 Northern region administration and support--FTEs 42.0 4,594,100 Southern region administration and support--FTEs 48.0 18,469,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,167,635,700 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: DOJ, state criminal assistance program 1,034,800 Special revenue funds: State restricted fees, revenues, and reimbursements 102,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,166,498,800 Sec. 108. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Correctional facility count and callout process automation $ 1,946,400 Information technology services and projects 15,811,600 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 17,758,000 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Correctional industries revolving fund 110 91,500 Supervision fees set-aside 359,400 State general fund/general purpose $ 17,307,100 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations for fiscal year 2026-2027 general sections Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is $2,116,910,800.00 and total state spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $106,471,500.00. The following itemized statement identifies appropriations from which spending to local units of government will occur: DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS Community residential services $ 13,376,100 County jail reimbursement program 14,564,600 Field Operations 76,607,900 Prosecutorial and detainer expenses 1,922,900 TOTAL $ 106,471,500 Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 to 18.1594.Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1: (a) "Administrative segregation" means confinement for maintenance of order or discipline to a cell or room apart from accommodations provided for inmates who are participating in programs of the facility. (b) "Department" means the department of corrections. (c) "Director" means the director of the department. (d) "DOJ" means the United States Department of Justice. (e) "DOJ-BOP" means the DOJ Bureau of Prisons. (f) "Evidence-based" means a decision-making process that integrates the best available research, clinician expertise, and client characteristics. (g) "FTE" means full-time equated position in the classified service of this state. (h) "Jail" means a facility operated by a local unit of government for the physical detention and correction of individuals charged with or convicted of criminal offenses. (i) "OCC" means the office of community corrections. (j) "Offender success" means that an offender has, with the support of the community, intervention of the field agent, and benefit of any participation in programs and treatment, made an adjustment while at liberty in the community such that the offender has not been sentenced to or returned to prison for the conviction of a new crime or the revocation of probation or parole. (k) "Recidivism" means that term as defined in section 1 of 2017 PA 5, MCL 798.31. (l) "Serious emotional disturbance" means that term as defined in section 100d(3) of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1100d. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (m) "Serious mental illness" means that term as defined in section 100d(4) of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1100d. (n) "SSA" means the United States Social Security Administration. (o) "SSA-SSI" means SSA supplemental security income. (p) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house appropriations committees, the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on corrections and judiciary, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, the legislative corrections ombudsman, and the state budget office. Sec. 204. If the state administrative board, acting under section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount appropriated under part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and serving in each house, intertransfer funds within part 1 for the particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution. Sec. 205. (1) The department shall use the internet to fulfill the reporting requirements of this part and shall make each report readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each required report in a single archivable location on the department's website not later than the due date required for each report. (2) In addition to placing all reports required in the current fiscal year on the department's website, the department shall maintain on its website all reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years posted by fiscal year in the same single archivable location. (3) The department shall transmit all required reports for the current fiscal year to the standard report recipients and any other 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 required recipients by email. The email shall include a copy of the report and a link to access the report online. Sec. 206. The department shall receive and retain copies of all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department shall follow federal and state law and guidelines for short-term and long-term retention of records. The department shall electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required by federal and state guidelines. Sec. 207. (1) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to maintain a searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following for the department: (a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category. (b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit. (c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor, including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and payment description. (2) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to update the searchable website on a quarterly basis. Sec. 208. Not later than December 15, the state budget office shall prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses by major departmental program or program areas. Sec. 209. Not later than 14 days after the release of the executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 with the state budget office to provide an annual report on estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the previous 2 fiscal years. Sec. 210. Not later than November 15, the department shall report on private and other third-party funds received by the department in the previous fiscal year. The report must include the amount of funding received, the specific source of funding received, the purpose for which funding was expended, and the amount of any remaining funds. Sec. 211. Consistent with section 217 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, the department shall prepare a report on out-of-state travel expenses by not later than January 1. The report must list all travel outside this state by classified and unclassified employees in the previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or in part with funds appropriated in the department's budget. The report must include all of the following information: (a) The dates of each travel occurrence. (b) The total transportation and related costs of each travel occurrence and the proportions funded with state general fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal revenues, local revenues, and private revenues, including specific sources of state restricted, federal, local, and private revenues. (c) The destination of each travel occurrence. (d) The specific purpose and description of each travel occurrence, including the specific name of the event or meeting. Sec. 212. On a quarterly basis, the department shall report on all of the following: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) The number of full-time equated positions in pay status by civil service classification. (b) A comparison by line item of the number of full-time equated positions authorized from funds appropriated in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated positions employed by the department at the end of the reporting period. (c) The number of active employees in each of the following statuses: (i) Full-time salary. (ii) Full-time hourly. (iii) Part-time. (iv) Permanent-intermittent. (v) Limited-term. (vi) Seasonal. (vii) Worker's compensation. (viii) Noncareer/per diem. (ix) Job share. (x) Special personal services/contractual. (d) The number of overtime hours worked by employees, by classifications. Sec. 213. Not later than April 1, the department shall report on each specific policy change made to implement a public act affecting the department that took effect during the previous calendar year. The report must include reference to the public act that necessitates the policy change. The department shall submit the report to the standard report recipients, to the senate and house standing committees responsible for addressing issues affected by the public acts, and to the joint committee on administrative rules. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 214. (1) Not later than April 1, the department shall maintain, on a publicly accessible website, a department scorecard that identifies, tracks, and updates on a quarterly basis key metrics that are used to monitor and improve the department's performance. (2) The department shall notify the standard report recipients when the quarterly updates to the department scorecard are available on a publicly accessible website. Sec. 215. (1) Unless specifically authorized elsewhere in this part or part 1, funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to pay for a state obligation that exceeds $200,000.00 for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim without prior legislative approval. (2) If a state obligation for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim results in a change from current statute, the department shall notify the legislature. (3) This section does not apply to compensation and other relief to individuals wrongfully imprisoned as required under the wrongful imprisonment compensation act, 2016 PA 343, MCL 691.1751 to 691.1757. Sec. 216. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $2,500,000.00 for federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 217. Total authorized appropriations from all sources under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 are estimated at $133,039,600.00. From this amount, total 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 appropriations for pension-related legacy costs for the department are estimated at $133,039,600.00. Total appropriations for retiree health care legacy costs for the department are estimated at $0.00. Sec. 218. To the extent possible, the department shall not expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted. Sec. 219. The department shall submit reports that summarize all work project accounts not later than December 31, March 30, June 30, and September 30. The reports must include all of the following: (a) A list of all work project accounts. (b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each account. (c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously designated work project accounts, the name and description of the work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed amounts. Sec. 220. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1: (a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are available. (b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. (c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. Sec. 221. The department shall not take disciplinary action against an employee of the department or a prisoner because the employee or prisoner communicates with a member of the legislature or legislative staff unless the communication is prohibited by law and the department is exercising its authority as provided by law. Sec. 222. (1) The department shall maximize the efficiency of the state workforce and utilization and occupancy of office space, leased or owned, for each division within the department. Employees with job responsibilities that require employees to serve in their capacities outside of an office shall be monitored each pay period to ensure all work hours reported on timesheets are actually worked. (2) The department shall comply with requirements set forth by the office of the state employer on in-person work and utilization and occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure at least 80% of employees are in person and building occupancy and utilization rates are at least 80% or higher. (3) The department shall submit reports not later than January 15 and April 15 on all of the following: (a) Remote work policy by division. (b) Building occupancy by address. (c) Whether the building is state-owned or leased. (d) Aggregate badge scanning information by employee. (4) As used in this section, "occupancy" means the actual number of employees physically present in a workplace. Sec. 223. (1) The department shall require as a condition of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 each contract or subcontract that the prequalified contractor or prequalified subcontractor agree to use the E-Verify system to verify that all persons hired during the contract term by the contractor or subcontractor are legally present and authorized to work in the United States. (2) The department may verify this information directly or may require contractors and subcontractors to verify the information and submit a certification to the department. The department shall submit a report not later than March 1 that describes the processes it has developed and implemented under this section. (3) The department shall not contract with any foreign entities that are known or suspected to be enemies of the United States or known foreign adversaries. Foreign adversaries include all of the following: (a) The People's Republic of China. (b) The Russian Federation. (c) The Islamic Republic of Iran. (d) The Democratic People's Republic of Korea. (e) The Republic of Cuba. (f) The Venezuelan regime of Nicolï¿½s Maduro. (g) The Syrian Arab Republic. (h) An agency or other entity under significant control of a country described in subdivisions (a) to (g). (4) As used in this section, "E-Verify" means an internet-based system operated by the Department of Homeland Security, United States Citizenship and Immigration Services in partnership with the Social Security Administration. Sec. 224. (1) Within 30 days of enactment of this act, the state budget office shall post a list of legislatively directed 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 spending items funded in part 1 as defined in sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. The list must include all information and documents pertaining to the funded items as publicly disclosed in accordance with sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. (2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency administering the grant shall submit a report not later than November 1. The department or agency shall update the report and shall submit updated reports not later than March 15 and September 15 of the current fiscal year. The department or agency shall include in the report the most comprehensive information the department or agency has available at the time of posting for grants awarded, including, but not limited to, project milestones, percent completed, funding expended, and funding encumbered. (3) Before executing a grant agreement, all grant recipients must provide a spending plan that specifies the scope of service, the program goals, the measurement for meeting program goals, and how all grant funds will be used, and must indicate if any grant funds will be provided to a third party or subrecipient. (4) Each department or agency responsible for awarding or disbursing grant funds must annually audit the entity's use of the grant funds for each fiscal year in which the grant is active. Each entity must submit information requested by the department or agency to confirm compliance. (5) Each department or agency shall work with the office of the auditor general to conduct an audit of the grant according to generally accepted accounting practices and audit standards. The 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 office of the auditor general must be given access to all internal and external records. All contracts or agreements between a department or agency and a grant recipient or between a grant recipient and a third party must include a clause granting the office of the auditor general access to all internal and external records. (6) Grant recipients and their immediate family members are prohibited from being employed by the executive branch or legislative branch of this state. In addition, grant recipients are prohibited from serving on any state board that has direct or indirect responsibility for approving or auditing grant funds awarded or disbursed by any department or agency. (7) Full and complete audits of grant funds issued by the department or an agency of this state, without redaction unless required by law, must be posted to the department's or agency's website in a conspicuous place for public review. (8) On a quarterly basis, the department or agency shall submit a report on legislatively sponsored grant funds that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) The name of each grant recipient and the status of each grant. (b) The amount distributed to each grant recipient. (c) Any changes to scope or costs of program. (9) The report under subsection (8) must include the following statements made by the department or agency: (a) A statement that confirms the department or agency reviewed and affirmed compliance by each grant recipient with program scope and expenditure of grant funding. (b) A statement that confirms the department or agency 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 reviewed applicable program reports and requests for reimbursement. Sec. 225. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall do the following: (a) Report on any amounts of severance pay for a department director, deputy director, or other high-ranking department official not later than 14 days after a severance agreement with the director, deputy director, or official is signed. The name of the director, deputy director, or official and the amount of severance pay must be included in the report required by this subdivision. (b) Not later than February 1, report on the total amount of severance pay remitted to former department employees during the previous fiscal year and the total number of former department employees that were remitted severance pay during the previous fiscal year. (2) As used in this section, "severance pay" means compensation to which both of the following apply: (a) The compensation is payable or paid upon the termination of employment. (b) The compensation is paid in addition to wages or benefits earned during the course of employment or generally applicable retirement benefits. Sec. 226. Funds appropriated in part 1 from state or federal sources are prohibited from being used to provide services, grants, or programming to an individual who is not a citizen of the United States unless the individual is a qualified alien as that term is defined in 8 USC 1641. This section does not prohibit the department, political subdivision, state university, or other state agency from expending funds for the purpose of detaining 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 individuals who are not citizens of the United States, including any costs associated with housing such individuals in county jails or state correctional facilities. Sec. 227. State funds must not be used for diversity, equity, and inclusion, or diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives or programs, as outlined in federal Executive Order No. 14151, 90 Fed. Reg. 8339 (January 29, 2025) "Ending Radical and Wasteful Government DEI Programs and Preferencing", federal Executive Order No. 14168, 90 Fed. Reg. 8615 (January 30, 2025) "Defending Women from Gender Ideology Extremism and Restoring Biological Truth to the Federal Government", or federal Executive Order No. 14173, 90 Fed. Reg. 8633 (January 31, 2025) "Ending Illegal Discrimination and Restoring Merit-Based Opportunity". Sec. 228. The department shall use the same precontract risk assessment program utilized by the department of technology, management, and budget to evaluate financial compliance, security risks, and insurance requirements prior to contract execution. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Sec. 301. For 3 years after a felony offender is released from the department's jurisdiction, the department shall maintain the offender's file on the offender tracking information system and make it publicly accessible in the same manner as the file of the current offender. The department shall immediately remove the offender's file from the offender tracking information system upon determination that the offender was wrongfully convicted and the offender's file is not otherwise required to be maintained on the offender tracking information system. Sec. 302. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department shall submit a report not later than March 1 on the department's staff retention strategies. The report must include, but not be limited to, all of the following: (a) Mechanisms by which the department receives employee feedback and how the department considers suggestions made by employees. (b) Steps the department has taken, and future plans and goals the department has for retention. Sec. 303. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall submit a report not later than March 1 on the number of employee departures. The report must include all of the following: (a) The number of corrections officers that departed from employment at a state correctional facility in the previous fiscal year and the number of years they worked for the department. (b) A chart that shows the normal distribution of employee departures in the positions described under subdivision (a) based on years of service. Years of service must be grouped into the following ranges: 1 to 3 years, 3 to 5 years, 5 to 10 years, 10 to 15 years, 15 to 20 years, and 20 and more years. (c) A section that shows the distinction between all of the following: (i) Recruits who are in training at the academy that depart employment. (ii) Recruits who are in training at a facility that depart employment. (iii) Employees who have been on the job that depart employment. (d) A summary of the primary reasons for departure for each of the ranges of years of service described under subdivision (1)(b) 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 based on the available responses. Sec. 304. Funds appropriated in part 1 for prosecutorial and detainer expenses must be used to reimburse counties for housing and custody of parole violators and offenders being returned by the department from community placement who are available for return to institutional status and for prisoners who volunteer for placement in a county jail. Sec. 305. The department shall provide fiduciary oversight of funds received under the local corrections officers training act, 2003 PA 125, MCL 791.531 to 791.546. Sec. 306. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall issue a report not later than March 1 for all vendor contracts with a value of $500,000.00 or more and include all of the following: (a) The original start date and the current expiration date of each contract. (b) The number of available option years. (c) The number, if any, of contract compliance monitoring site visits completed by the department for each vendor in the previous fiscal year. (d) The number and amount of fines in the previous fiscal year for service-level agreement noncompliance for each vendor broken down by area of noncompliance. Sec. 307. The department must ensure that a prisoner telephone system is maintained. The prisoner telephone system must meet ongoing operational needs of the department while maintaining the lowest per-minute rate possible. The department must provide notice at least 45 days in advance of each of the following taking effect: (a) Changes to telephone rates. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) Extending the telephone contract, including the department exercising the option to extend the contract. (c) Rebidding the telephone contract. Sec. 308. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall provide for the training of all custody staff in effective and safe ways of handling prisoners with mental illness and referring prisoners to mental health treatment programs. Mental health awareness training must be incorporated into the training of new custody staff. Sec. 309. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall issue a report on all correctional facilities not later than January 1 that includes all of the following information for each facility: (a) The name, street address, and date of construction. (b) The current maintenance costs. (c) Any maintenance planned. (d) The current utility costs. (e) The expected future capital improvement costs. (f) The current unspent balance of any authorized capital outlay projects, including the original authorized amount. (g) The expected future useful life. Sec. 310. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall provide a report on the Michigan state industries program not later than December 1. The report must include, but is not limited to, all of the following information: (a) The locations of the programs. (b) The total number of participants at each location. (c) A description of job duties and typical inmate schedules, and the products that are produced. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (d) How the program provides marketable skills that lead to employable outcomes after release from a department facility. Sec. 311. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for employee wellness programming must be used for post-traumatic stress outreach, treating mental health issues, peer support programs, and providing mental health programming for all department staff, including former employees. (2) Not later than December 15, the department shall submit a report on programs the department has established, the level of employee involvement, and expenditures made by the department for employee wellness programming. Sec. 312. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for new custody staff, the department shall work to hire and train new corrections officers to address attrition of corrections officers and to decrease overtime costs. The department shall submit quarterly reports on new employee schools. The reports must include all of the following information for the immediately preceding fiscal quarter, and as much of the information as possible for the current and next fiscal year: (a) The number of new employee schools that took place and the location of each. (b) The number of recruits that started in each employee school. (c) The number of recruits that graduated from each employee school and continued employment with the department. (2) Third quarter reports must outline steps the department has taken to obtain the highest number of recruits possible for each new employee school. A report prepared under this subsection must include, but is not limited to, all of the following 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 information: (a) Internal sources of recruitment, including transfers and promotions. (b) External sources of recruitment, including advertisements. (c) Job portals, social networking platforms, placement agencies, job fairs, campus placements, or professional entities used for recruitment. (d) Whether the department's website was used to advertise vacancies. Sec. 313. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall submit a quarterly report on the number of overtime hours worked by all custody staff, by facility. The report must include, for each facility, the reasons for overtime hours worked and the average number of overtime hours worked by active employees. Sec. 314. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department may establish agreements and exchange offender data with local, state, and federal agencies, law enforcement, community service and treatment providers, and research partners in order to improve offender success, reduce recidivism risk, and enhance public safety. This data sharing may include, but is not limited to, efforts to support all of the following: (a) Providing continuing access to behavioral health, physical health, and medication needs through community-based providers. (b) Establishing assistance program eligibility and participation. (c) Collaborating with community service providers for continued care and access to services for offenders. (d) Providing ongoing cognitive and behavioral treatment 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 programming in the community. (e) Providing substance abuse testing and referrals for counseling services and treatment. (f) Providing vocational skill training, job placement support, and monitoring employment attainment. (g) Determining educational attainment and needs. (h) Establishing accurate offender identification, criminal histories, and monitoring new criminal activity. (i) Measuring and evaluating treatment programs and services in support of evidence-based practices. Sec. 315. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall submit 3-year and 5-year prison population projection updates not later than April 1, including explanations of the methodology and assumptions used in developing the projection updates. Sec. 316. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall provide an annual statistical report for the preceding calendar year not later than June 30 that includes, but is not limited to, the types of information as provided in the 2022 statistical report. Sec. 317. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall report the reincarceration recidivism rates of offenders based on available data. Sec. 318. (1) The department shall administer a county jail reimbursement program from the funds appropriated in part 1 for the purpose of reimbursing counties for housing in jails certain felons who otherwise would have been sentenced to prison. (2) The county jail reimbursement program must be used to reimburse counties for convicted felons in the custody of the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 sheriff if the conviction was for a crime committed on or after January 1, 1999 and 1 of the following applies: (a) The felon's sentencing guidelines recommended range upper limit is more than 18 months, the felon's sentencing guidelines recommended range lower limit is 12 months or less, the felon's prior record variable score is 35 or more points, and the felon's sentence is not for commission of a crime in crime class G or crime class H or a nonperson crime in crime class F under chapter XVII of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 777.1 to 777.69. (b) The felon's minimum sentencing guidelines range minimum is more than 12 months under the sentencing guidelines described in subdivision (a). (c) The felon was sentenced to jail for a felony committed while the felon was on parole and under the jurisdiction of the parole board and for which the sentencing guidelines recommended range for the minimum sentence has an upper limit of more than 18 months. (3) State reimbursement under this section must be $70.00 per diem per diverted offender for offenders with a presumptive prison guideline score, $60.00 per diem per diverted offender for offenders with a straddle cell guideline for a group 1 crime, and $45.00 per diem per diverted offender for offenders with a straddle cell guideline for a group 2 crime. Reimbursements must be paid for sentences up to a 1-year total. (4) County jail reimbursement program expenditures must not exceed the amount appropriated in part 1 for the county jail reimbursement program. Payments to counties under the county jail reimbursement program must be made in the order in which properly documented requests for reimbursements are received. A request is 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 properly documented if it meets departmental requirements for documentation. Not later than October 15, the department shall distribute the documentation requirements to all counties. (5) Any county that receives funding under this section for the purpose of housing in jails certain felons who otherwise would have been sentenced to prison shall, as a condition of receiving the funding, report not later than September 30 an annual average jail capacity and annual average jail occupancy for the previous fiscal year. (6) Not later than February 1, the department shall report all of the following information: (a) The number of inmates sentenced to the custody of the sheriff and eligible for the county jail reimbursement program. (b) The total amount paid to counties under the county jail reimbursement program. (c) The total number of days inmates were in the custody of the sheriff and eligible for the county jail reimbursement program. (d) The number of inmates sentenced to the custody of the sheriff under each of the 3 categories: presumptive prison, group 1 crime, and group 2 crime in subsection (3). (e) The total amount paid to counties under each of the 3 categories: presumptive prison, group 1 crime, and group 2 crime in subsection (3). (f) The total number of days inmates were in the custody of the sheriff under each of the 3 categories: presumptive prison, group 1 crime, and group 2 crime in subsection (3). (g) The estimated cost of housing inmates sentenced to the custody of the sheriff and eligible for the county jail reimbursement program as inmates of a state prison. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (7) As used in this section: (a) "Group 1 crime" means a crime in 1 or more of the following offense categories: arson, assault, assaultive other, burglary, criminal sexual conduct, homicide or resulting in death, other sex offenses, robbery, and weapon possession as determined by the department based on specific crimes for which counties received reimbursement under the county jail reimbursement program in fiscal year 2007 and fiscal year 2008, and listed in the county jail reimbursement program document titled "FY 2007 and FY 2008 Group One Crimes Reimbursed", dated March 31, 2009. (b) "Group 2 crime" means a crime that is not a group 1 crime, including larceny, fraud, forgery, embezzlement, motor vehicle offenses, malicious destruction of property, controlled substance offense, felony drunk driving, and other nonassaultive offenses. (c) "In the custody of the sheriff" means that the convicted felon has been sentenced to the county jail and either is housed in a county jail, is in custody but is being housed at a hospital or medical facility for a medical or mental health purpose, or has been released from jail and is being monitored through the use of the sheriff's electronic monitoring system. Sec. 319. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall provide all of the following information on the offender population in a monthly report: (a) Prison population by facility and security level, including the population of prisoners under the department's jurisdiction housed in county jails. (b) Net operating capacity according to the most recent certification report. (c) Electronic monitoring populations. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (d) Parole populations. (e) Probation populations, with identification of the number of offenders in special alternative incarceration. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall provide all of the following information on the offender population in a quarterly report: (a) The number of closed housing units and beds in those units, including the security level of closed beds. (b) The number of prisoners serving life sentences. (c) The number of prisoners classified as past their earliest release date. (d) The number of prisoner intakes during the previous quarter. (e) The number of prisoner exits, including paroles, maximum discharges, and other exits during the previous quarter. (3) If the department knows it will not meet the reporting requirements under this section, the department shall immediately issue a report that states that fact and that lists the reasons for not meeting the reporting requirements. Sec. 320. On a quarterly basis, the department shall report on all of the following: (a) A detailed accounting of all correction officer positions at each correctional facility, including positions that are filled and positions that are vacant by facility. (b) A detailed accounting of all vacant positions that are health care related. Sec. 321. The department may charge fees and collect revenues in excess of appropriations in part 1 not to exceed the cost of offender services and programming, employee meals, parolee loans, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 academic/vocational services, custody escorts, compassionate visits, union steward activities, and public works programs and services provided to local units of government or private nonprofit organizations. The revenues and fees collected are appropriated for all expenses associated with these services and activities. Sec. 322. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall work with the necessary employee groups and the office of the state employer to implement 12-hour shifts at all correctional facilities. Not later than July 1, 2027, the department shall report on progress the department has made in implementing this section. Sec. 323. (1) The negative appropriation for budgetary savings in part 1 must be satisfied through savings and reductions identified by the director and approved by the state budget director. (2) Adjustments to appropriation authorizations necessary to implement the requirements of subsection (1) must be made only after approval of transfers under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (3) The state budget director is authorized to reduce federal, local, private, and state restricted appropriation amounts in part 1 to reflect savings from those fund sources associated with reductions made to state general fund/general purpose appropriations under subsection (2). Sec. 324. According to the terms of payment section of contract number MA240000000326 with the State of Michigan, the provider services director at VitalCore Physicians Group of Michigan, PLLC, is responsible for ensuring that all approved claims are submitted, paid within 45 days, and that all collection 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 notices are resolved within 90 days of notification of the collection notice. As a condition of receiving the full amount of funding appropriated in part 1 for budget and operations administration and health care administration, the department shall ensure VitalCore Physicians Group of Michigan, PLLC, approves claims submitted, pays claims within 45 days, and resolves all collection notices within 90 days of notification. OFFENDER SUCCESS ADMINISTRATION Sec. 401. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall provide a report not later than March 1 on offender success expenditures, allocations, and performance. The report must include, but not be limited to, details on prior-year expenditures, including amounts spent on each project funded, itemized by service provided and service provider. Reported performance factors must be reported by region and must include, but not be limited to, all of the following: (a) The number of individuals who received transitional housing services. (b) The average length of stay in transitional housing. (c) The number of individuals who received a referral for economic stability assistance and the number of referred individuals who secured employment or enrolled in education/training to increase economic stability. (d) The number of referred individuals who maintained employment for 12 months or more. (e) The total amount of leveraged services secured by the contractor. (2) As used in this section, "leveraged services" means 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 services that benefit clients that are not directly paid for by the department, such as educational scholarships or grants, workforce training grants, or housing choice vouchers. (3) The department may accept cash or in-kind donations to supplement funds for prison education training, supplies, and materials necessary to complete the academic and jobs skills related programs. All funds received are appropriated and may be expended by the department. Any unexpended or unencumbered donations at the end of the fiscal year shall not lapse to the general fund but shall be carried forward to the subsequent fiscal year. Sec. 402. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for offender success services, the department, when reasonably possible, shall ensure that inmates have potential employer matches in the communities to which they will return prior to each inmate's initial parole hearing. Sec. 403. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall design services for offender success and vocational education programs, collaborating with the department of labor and economic opportunity and local entities to the extent deemed necessary by the director. The department shall ensure the program provides relevant professional development opportunities to prisoners that are high quality, demand driven, locally receptive, and responsive to the needs of communities where the prisoners are expected to reside after their release from correctional facilities. (2) Not later than March 1, the department shall provide a report detailing the results of the workforce development program. Sec. 404. Funds awarded for community residential services in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 part 1 must provide for all of the following: (a) An initial client assessment reimbursement of $200.00. (b) A per diem reimbursement of not more than $70.00. Sec. 407. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall establish and maintain policies and procedures that assist prisoners with obtaining a birth certificate, duplicate Social Security card, if eligible, DD Form 214 or other military documentation, state identification card, and operator's license before parole or discharge. Sec. 408. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for higher education in prison must be used by the department in collaboration with accredited universities or colleges to provide incarcerated individuals the opportunity to participate in comprehensive bachelor's degree programs at no cost to the incarcerated individual. The funds must be used for eligible expenses including staffing, supplies, and tuition. (2) Universities and colleges that receive funding under this section must report not later than July 1 on all of the following, by correctional facility: (a) Expenditure of funds. (b) Number of participants served. (c) Enrollments, by race and gender. (d) Number of participants who completed the program. Sec. 409. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for enhanced food technology program, the department shall maintain a program that provides on-the-job training in prison kitchens that provides prisoners the opportunity to earn food service training credentials recognized by the restaurant industry. The department shall use the funds appropriated in part 1 for enhanced food technology program 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 to collaborate with the Michigan Restaurant and Lodging Association and other restaurant industry stakeholders to provide job placement assistance to individuals on probation or parole. Sec. 410. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall ensure that any inmate with a diagnosed mental illness is referred to a local mental health care provider that is able and willing to treat the inmate upon parole or discharge. Upon referral, the department shall ensure that the provider is informed of the inmate's current treatment plan including any medications that are currently prescribed to the inmate. Sec. 411. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall report not later than March 1 on academic and vocational programs, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (a) The number of instructors and the number of instructor vacancies, by program and facility. (b) The number of prisoners enrolled in each program, the number of prisoners completing each program, and the number of prisoners on waiting lists for each program. (c) The racial demographics of prisoners enrolled in each program. (d) The steps the department has undertaken to improve programs, track records, accommodate transfers and prisoners with health care needs, and reduce waiting lists. (e) The number of prisoners paroled without a high school diploma or a high school equivalency. (f) The number of prisoners not paroled at their earliest release date because of a lack of a high school equivalency and the reason those prisoners have not obtained a high school equivalency. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 412. From the funds appropriated in part 1, priority may be given to funding reentry or rehabilitation programs, including faith-based initiatives, that have been demonstrated to reduce prison violence and recidivism. Sec. 413. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for criminal justice reinvestment must be used only to fund data collection and evidence-based programs designed to reduce recidivism among probationers, parolees, and prisoners. (2) The department shall report on programs described under this section not later than March 30. The report must include all of the following: (a) The reincarceration recidivism rate of program participants. (b) The employment rate of participants who complete the program. (c) The cost of the program per participant. Sec. 414. Revenues appropriated and collected for program and special equipment funds must be considered state restricted revenue. Funding must be used for prisoner programming, special equipment, and security projects. Not less than 75% of funding must be used for prisoner programming. Unexpended funds remaining at the close of the fiscal year must not lapse to the general fund but must be carried forward and made available for appropriation in subsequent fiscal years. Sec. 415. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall report on the department's plans to eliminate programming for prisoners. The report must be provided as soon as reasonably possible before program elimination. As used in this section, "programming for prisoners" means a department core 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 program or career and technical education program funded in part 1. FIELD OPERATIONS ADMINISTRATION Sec. 501. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall review and revise as necessary policy proposals that provide alternatives to prison for offenders being sentenced to prison as a result of technical probation violations and technical parole violations. To the extent the department has insufficient policies or resources to affect the continued increase in prison commitments among these offender populations, from the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall explore other policy options to allow for program alternatives, including department or OCC-funded programs, local level programs, and programs available through private agencies that may be used as prison alternatives for these offenders. (2) Not later than April 1, the department shall provide a report on the number of all parolees returned to prison and probationers sentenced to prison for either a technical violation or new sentence during the previous fiscal year. The report must include the following information for probationers, for parolees after their first parole, and for parolees who have been paroled more than once: (a) The numbers of parole and probation violators returned to or sent to prison for a new crime with a comparison of original versus new offenses by major offense type: assaultive, nonassaultive, drug, and sex. (b) The numbers of parole and probation violators returned to or sent to prison for a technical violation and the type of violation, including, but not limited to, zero gun tolerance and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 substance use disorder violations. For parole technical rule violators, the report must list violations by type, by length of time since release from prison, by the most recent violation, and by the number of violations occurring since release from prison. (c) The educational history of those offenders, including the number of offenders who had a high school equivalency or high school diploma before incarceration in prison, the number of offenders who received a high school equivalency while in prison, and the number of offenders who received a vocational certificate while in prison. (d) The number of offenders who participated in the reentry program versus the number of those who did not. (e) The unduplicated number of offenders who participated in substance use disorder treatment programs, mental health treatment programs, or both, while in prison, itemized by diagnosis. Sec. 502. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall issue quarterly reports for the previous 4 quarters detailing outcomes of prisoners who have been reviewed for parole. The report must include all of the following: (a) The number of prisoners in each quarter who were reviewed. (b) The number of prisoners who were granted parole. (c) The number of prisoners who were denied parole. (d) The number of parole decisions that were deferred. (e) The distribution of the total number of prisoners reviewed during that quarter grouped by whether the prisoner had been interviewed for the first, second, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, or more than sixth time. (f) The number of paroles granted, denied, or deferred for each of the parole guideline scores of low, average, and high. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (g) The reason for denying or deferring parole. Sec. 503. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall submit a report not later than March 1 on the medically frail parole process for the previous fiscal year. The report must include, but not be limited to, the following: (a) A de-identified list of incarcerated individuals who were considered for medically frail parole the previous year, including the following: (i) Demographic data, including race or ethnicity, gender, and age. (ii) The controlling offense of the individual. (iii) A categorization of the medical condition that resulted in the individual being considered for medically frail parole. (iv) If the individual was granted medically frail parole or not, and if not, the reason why medically frail parole was denied. (b) The number of individuals who were previously granted medically frail parole that were returned to prison for a new offense or technical violation of parole. (c) The number of individuals who were previously granted medically frail parole that were discharged from further parole supervision. HEALTH CARE Sec. 601. Not later than April 1, the department shall provide a report on all of the following: (a) Physical and mental health care, pharmaceutical services, and durable medical equipment for prisoners. A report under this section must detail previous fiscal year expenditures itemized by vendor, allocations, status of payments from contractors to 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 vendors, and projected year-end expenditures from accounts. A report under this section must include a breakdown of all payments to the integrated care provider and to other providers itemized by physical health care, mental health care, pharmaceutical services, and durable medical equipment expenditures. (b) Pharmaceutical prescribing practices, including a detailed accounting of expenditures on antipsychotic medications, and any changes that have been made to the prescription drug formularies. (c) A status report on efforts to develop measurable data and outcomes for physical and mental health care within the prisoner population. Sec. 602. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall provide prisoners with a brochure that explains the purpose and importance of signing a medical release of information form. The department shall ensure that all prisoners, upon any health care treatment funded from appropriations in part 1, are given the opportunity to sign a medical release of information form designating a family member or other individual to whom the department shall release records and information regarding the prisoner upon the request of the prisoner. The prisoner may elect to withdraw or amend the medical release of information form at any time. (2) The department shall ensure that a signed medical release of information form follows a prisoner upon transfer to another department facility or to the supervision of a parole officer. (3) The medical release of information form must be placed online on a public website managed by the department. Sec. 603. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall provide a report not later than April 1 on 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 prisoner health care utilization in the previous fiscal year, by facility, that includes all of the following: (a) The number of inpatient hospital days. (b) The number of outpatient visits. (c) The number of emergency room visits. (d) The number of prisoners receiving off-site inpatient medical care. Sec. 604. Funds appropriated in part 1 for Hepatitis C treatment must be used only to purchase specialty medication for Hepatitis C treatment in the prison population. In addition to the above appropriation, any rebates received from the medications used must be used only to purchase specialty medication for Hepatitis C treatment. Not later than February 15, the department shall issue a report for the previous fiscal year that includes all of the following: (a) The total amount spent on specialty medication for the treatment of Hepatitis C. (b) The number of prisoners who were treated for Hepatitis C. (c) The amount of any rebates that were received from the purchase of specialty medication, and what, if any, outstanding rebates are expected to be received. (d) The Hepatitis C status of all incoming prisoners and the number of prisoners who are reinfected while incarcerated and require retreatment for Hepatitis C. (e) The number of those treated and released and then retreated upon reincarceration. Sec. 605. Not later than March 1, the department shall provide an annual report on the utilization of Medicaid benefits for prisoners. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 606. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall support medication-assisted treatment clinics at designated correctional facilities that allow the department to treat prisoners with opioid and alcohol use disorder while incarcerated. The department shall collaborate with substance use disorder treatment providers and community-based clinics to provide postrelease assessment and treatment. Funding must be used by the department to support costs of staff, including nurses, qualified mental health professionals, recovery coaches, and corrections officers, and costs of medication and supplies. Participating prisoners must be encouraged to receive 1 injection of nonaddictive medication, if clinically appropriate, before being released from prison into the community. (2) The department shall submit quarterly reports on the operation of medication-assisted treatment clinics. A report under this subsection must include, but not be limited to, all of the following: (a) Clinic site locations. (b) A listing of medications used in medication-assisted therapies at each clinic site. (c) The number of prisoners prescribed each medication under subdivision (b), including if the medication is an oral or injectable treatment. (d) Total expenditures on clinic medications, including oral and injectable medications. (e) The number of prisoners who received treatment in the community for a duration of at least 3 months. Sec. 607. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall submit a report not later than March 1 that 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 includes for the previous fiscal year the total amount of all medical co-payments collected by prisoners under section 67a of the corrections code of 1953, 1953 PA 232, MCL 791.267a. Sec. 608. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall submit a biannual report, by not later than March 1 and September 1 of each year, that contains a de-identified list of prisoner deaths that occurred in the previous 6 months within correctional facilities. This report must include, but not be limited to, all of the following: (a) The date of death. (b) The correctional facility or other location at which the death occurred. (c) The official cause of death, as documented on the death certificate. (d) In cases where the cause of death is determined to be a drug overdose, the type of drug used, if known. CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES AND ADMINISTRATION Sec. 701. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for prison food service, the department shall report not later than January 15 on the following: (a) Average per-meal cost for prisoner food service. Per-meal cost includes all costs directly related to the provision of food for the prisoner population, including, but not limited to, actual food costs, total compensation for all food service workers, including benefits and legacy costs, and inspection and compliance costs for food service. (b) Food service-related contracts, including goods or services to be provided and the vendor. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (c) Major sanitation violations. Sec. 702. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall calculate the cost per prisoner per day for each security custody level. This calculation must include all actual direct and indirect costs for the previous fiscal year. To calculate the cost per prisoner per day, the department shall divide the prisoner-related costs by the total number of prisoner days for each custody level and correctional facility. For multilevel facilities, costs that cannot be accurately allocated to each custody level may be included in the calculation on a per-prisoner basis for each facility. A report summarizing these calculations must be submitted not later than January 15. Prisoner-related costs included in the cost per prisoner per day calculation must include all expenditures for the following, from all fund sources: (a) New custody staff training. (b) Prison industries operations. (c) Education/skilled trades/career readiness programs. (d) Enhanced food technology program. (e) Higher education in prison. (f) Offender success programming. (g) Central records. (h) Correctional facilities administration. (i) Housing inmates in federal institutions. (j) Inmate legal services. (k) Prison food service. (l) Prison store operations. (m) Transportation. (n) Health care. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (o) Correctional facilities. (p) Northern and southern region administration and support. Sec. 703. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for deferred maintenance at correctional facilities, the department shall prioritize planned maintenance and basic facility improvement projects consistent with, but not limited to, those projects listed in the department's most recent 5-year capital assessment plan summary report. Funds must be utilized for projects at the following facilities: (a) Chippewa Correctional Facility. (b) Women's Huron Valley Correctional Facility. (c) Charles E. Egeler Correctional Facility. (d) Richard A. Handlon Correctional Facility. (e) Lakeland Correctional Facility. (f) Earnest C. Brooks Correctional Facility. (2) The department shall report by facility on all expenditures made and projects completed. The report must be submitted not later than April 1. Sec. 704. The department shall allow the Michigan Braille transcribing fund program to operate at designated locations. The department shall continue to encourage the Michigan Braille transcribing fund program to produce high-quality materials for use by the visually impaired. Sec. 705. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall report all of the following regarding critical incidents by facility: (a) Within 72 hours of occurrence, any critical incident occurring at a correctional facility. The report must identify the facility at which the incident occurred. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) Not later than March 1, the number of critical incidents occurring each month at each facility during the previous calendar year, categorized by type and severity of each incident. (2) As used in this section, "critical incident" includes a prisoner assault on staff that results in a serious physical injury to staff, an escape or attempted escape, a prisoner disturbance that causes facility operation concerns, the implementation of a phase plan or similar significant restriction on activity within a facility, a drug overdose or suspected overdose that results in inpatient hospitalization, and an unexpected death of a prisoner. Sec. 706. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall report not later than March 1 on all of the following ratios for each correctional facility: (a) Corrections officers to prisoners. (b) Shift command staff to line custody staff. (c) Noncustody institutional staff to prisoners. Sec. 707. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall focus on providing required programming to prisoners as early as possible during the prisoner's sentence to impact the prisoner's behavior while incarcerated and prioritize individuals who are past their earliest release date and have not been paroled because of not having received the required programming. Programming includes, but is not limited to, violence prevention programming, sexual abuse prevention programming, substance use disorder programming, thinking for a change programming, and any other programming that is required as a condition of parole. Nothing in this section makes parole denial appealable in court. (2) The department shall submit a quarterly report detailing 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 enrollment in sex abuse prevention programming, violence prevention programming, and thinking for a change programming. At a minimum, the report must include all of the following: (a) A full accounting, from the date of entrance to prison, of the number of individuals who are required to complete the programming but have not yet done so. (b) The number of individuals who have reached their earliest release date, but who have not completed required programming. (c) A plan of action for addressing any waiting lists or backlogs for programming that may exist. Sec. 708. If a pregnant prisoner in a facility funded from appropriations in part 1 consents to a visitor being present, the department shall allow 1 person to be present during the prisoner's labor and delivery, in addition to a doula being present if the pregnant prisoner wants to work with a doula. The person allowed to accompany the prisoner must be an immediate family member, legal guardian, spouse, or domestic partner. The department is authorized to deny access to a visitor if the department has a safety concern with that visitor's access. The department is authorized to conduct a criminal background check on the visitor. Sec. 709. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall evaluate all prisoners at intake for substance use disorders, serious developmental disorders, serious mental illness, and other mental health disorders. Prisoners with serious mental illness or serious developmental disorders must not be removed from the general population as a punitive response to behavior caused by their serious mental illness or serious developmental disorder. A prisoner with serious mental illness or serious developmental disorder that is unresponsive to treatment who presents a 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 persistent high violence risk or engages in severe disruptive behavior may be placed in secure residential housing programs that facilitate access to institutional programming and ongoing mental health services funded from appropriations in part 1. A prisoner with serious mental illness or serious developmental disorder who is confined in these specialized housing programs must be evaluated or monitored by a medical professional at a frequency of not less than every 12 hours. Sec. 710. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall report not later than March 1 on the number of prisoners during the previous fiscal year in administrative segregation and, of those, the number who at any time during the current or previous prison term were diagnosed with serious mental illness or have a developmental disorder and the number of days each of the prisoners with serious mental illness or a developmental disorder have been confined to administrative segregation. (2) The report required in subsection (1) must include a chart listing the number of prisoners housed in administrative segregation for each of the following time periods: (a) A continuous period exceeding 3 months but less than 6 months. (b) A continuous period exceeding 6 months but less than 12 months. (c) A continuous period exceeding 12 months or longer. (3) For any prisoner housed in administrative segregation for 12 months or longer, an explanation of the circumstances surrounding the prisoner's placement in administrative segregation. Sec. 711. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department shall do all of the following: (a) Ensure that any inmate care and control staff in contact with prisoners less than 18 years of age are adequately trained with regard to the developmental and mental health needs of prisoners less than 18 years of age. Not later than April 1, the department shall report on the training curriculum used and the number and types of staff receiving annual training under that curriculum. (b) Provide appropriate placement for prisoners less than 18 years of age who have serious mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or a serious developmental disorder and need to be housed separately from the general population. Prisoners less than 18 years of age who have serious mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or a serious developmental disorder must not be removed from an existing placement as a punitive response to behavior caused by their serious mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or a serious developmental disorder. A prisoner who is less than 18 years of age with serious mental illness or a serious developmental disorder that is unresponsive to treatment who presents a persistent high violence risk or engages in severe disruptive behavior may be placed in secure residential housing programs that facilitate access to institutional programming and ongoing mental health services. A prisoner less than 18 years of age with serious mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or a serious developmental disorder who is confined in these specialized housing programs must be evaluated or monitored by a medical professional at a frequency of not less than every 12 hours. (c) Implement a specialized offender success program that 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 recognizes the needs of prisoners less than 18 years of age for supervised offender success. Sec. 712. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall submit quarterly reports on the number of youth in prison. The report must include, but not be limited to, all of the following information: (a) The total number of inmates less than 18 years of age who are not on Holmes youthful trainee act status. (b) The total number of inmates less than 18 years of age who are on Holmes youthful trainee act status. (c) The total number of inmates between the ages of 18 and 23 who are on Holmes youthful trainee act status. Sec. 713. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department must submit a report on the number of prisoners who lost visiting privileges. The report required under this section must be submitted not later than November 15 and include data for the previous fiscal year. The report must include all of the following information: (a) The number of prisoners who lost visiting privileges by race and by violation type. (b) The number of prisoners who applied to have visiting privileges restored. (c) The number of prisoners who had visiting privileges restored. (d) The number of prisoners who had visiting restrictions extended. Sec. 714. Funds appropriated in part 1 for intelligence unit must be used by the department to maintain an intelligence unit to conduct investigatory and intelligence operations for the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department. Intelligence operations must include, but not be limited to, intelligence operations for prisoner phone services. Savings that result from transferring responsibility for intelligence operations from the contractor to the department must be passed on to prisoners and prisoners' families as the department continues to negotiate lower phone call rates in all future contracts. The department must continue to pursue all opportunities for reducing further the cost of phone calls for prisoners and prisoners' families. Sec. 715. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department must submit a preliminary report on the department's plans to close, consolidate, or relocate any correctional facility in the state. The preliminary report must be provided as soon as reasonably possible before program closure, consolidation, or relocation. The preliminary report must include the projected savings to the state from closure, consolidation, or relocation of the facility and must include a projection of the potential impact on staff positions. (2) After a prison closure, consolidation, or relocation, the department must submit a report on the actual savings achieved by the department and the impact on staff positions. Savings amounts and impact on staff positions must be itemized by facility. The report required under this subsection must be submitted as soon as reasonably possible after the prison closure, consolidation, or relocation. Sec. 716. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall consult with the legislature and other appropriate state agencies to develop a framework to provide investment in communities that have formerly operational state correctional 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 facilities that have been closed. This framework must include plans to ensure that vacant state correctional facilities do not become a nuisance or danger to the community. Sec. 717. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall make an information packet for the families of incoming prisoners available on the department's website. The information packet must be reviewed not later than February 1 and updated as necessary. The department may partner with external advocacy groups and actual families of prisoners in the packet-writing process to ensure that the information is useful and complete. The packet must provide information on topics including, but not limited to, all of the following: (a) How to put money into prisoner accounts. (b) How to make telephone calls or create Jpay email accounts. (c) How to visit in person. (d) Proper procedures for filing complaints or grievances. (e) The rights of prisoners to physical and mental health care. (f) The purpose and importance of prisoners signing a medical release of information form. (g) How to utilize the offender tracking information system (OTIS). (h) Truth in sentencing and how it applies to minimum sentences. (i) The parole process. (j) Guidance on the importance of the role of families in the reentry process. Sec. 718. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department must pursue all opportunities to reduce costs for 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 prisoners and prisoners' families for financial deposit fees and commissary fees when the department negotiates or renews any contract to provide these services. Sec. 719. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for contraband prevention must be used by the department to enhance a multifaceted approach to contraband prevention that combines technology, rigorous policies, vigilant staff, intelligence gathering, and a commitment to addressing the root causes of contraband, all of which are necessary for preventing contraband introductions and maintaining safe and secure correctional facilities. (2) Funds appropriated in part 1 for contraband prevention must be used by the department to support the prevention of contraband in correctional facilities, including increasing the frequency and enhancing the methods of screening all items and all individuals entering into correctional facilities. Under this section, individuals who must be screened include, but are not limited to, all department employees, contractors, and third-party vendors. Emergency response personnel are exempt from being screened when arriving at correctional facilities in response to emergent emergencies. (3) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall develop and implement contraband prevention policies that are uniform across all correctional facilities. (4) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for contraband prevention, the department must submit a report not later than March 1 on contraband and prevention efforts in correctional facilities. The report must include, but not be limited to, all of the following: (a) Prevention efforts and strategies utilized by the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department. (b) Challenges faced by correctional staff and other staff in addressing contraband. (c) Ideas and recommendations on how the legislature can better assist the department with contraband prevention efforts and strategies. Sec. 720. The department shall ensure that Policy Directive 04.01.110 "Access to Correctional Facilities" does not require active legislative members in good standing to provide prior notice before being granted access to a department facility when conducting official legislative business. ARTICLE 3 department of EDUCATION part 1 line-item appropriations FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of education for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, from the following funds: DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 458.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Full-time employees 405.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Limited-term employees 21.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Noncareer/per diem employees 8.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Part-time employees 0.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Permanent-intermittent employees 3.0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 ï¿½ï¿½ Seasonal employees 39.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 139,976,400 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 139,976,400 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 76,010,700 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 4,884,400 Total private revenues 877,700 Total other state restricted revenues 10,052,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 48,151,600 Sec. 102. STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION/OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 9.0 Unclassified salaries--FTE positions 6.0 $ 1,114,500 Education commission of the states 120,800 State board of education, per diem payments 24,400 State board/superintendent operations--FTEs 9.0 2,534,100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,793,800 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal revenues 304,100 Special revenue funds: Private foundations 80,000 Certification fees 832,700 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 State general fund/general purpose $ 2,577,000 Sec. 103. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Full-time equated classified positions 37.0 Central support operations--FTEs 34.0 $ 6,823,100 Federal and private grants 75,300 Grant and contract operations--FTEs 3.0 1,902,400 Property management 3,956,800 Terminal leave payments 188,600 Training and orientation workshops 141,900 Worker's compensation 6,800 Departmentwide employee economic adjustments 1,366,900 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 14,461,800 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal indirect revenues 2,318,900 Federal revenues 4,101,300 Special revenue funds: Local cost sharing (schools for deaf/blind) 53,100 Gifts, bequests, and donations 4,500 Private foundations 26,100 Certification fees 705,000 Teacher testing fees 81,200 Training and orientation workshop fees 141,900 State general fund/general purpose $ 7,029,800 Sec. 104. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY Information technology services and projects $ 2,466,600 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,466,600 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal indirect revenues 1,722,700 Federal revenues 48,600 Special revenue funds: Certification fees 695,300 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 105. SPECIAL EDUCATION SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 40.0 Special education operations--FTEs 40.0 $ 7,640,100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 7,640,100 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal revenues 7,505,600 Special revenue funds: Private foundations 93,000 Certification fees 41,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 106. MICHIGAN SCHOOLS FOR THE DEAF AND BLIND Full-time equated classified positions 55.0 ASL literacy resources $ 500,000 Camp Tuhsmeheta--FTE 1.0 604,500 Low incidence outreach program 382,700 Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind operations--FTEs 54.0 11,299,800 Private gifts - blind 68,000 Private gifts - deaf 1,600 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 12,856,600 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal revenues 6,299,300 Special revenue funds: Local cost sharing (schools for deaf/blind) 4,831,300 Gifts, bequests, and donations 674,100 Low incidence outreach fund 382,700 Student insurance revenue 169,200 State general fund/general purpose $ 500,000 Sec. 107. EDUCATOR EXCELLENCE Full-time equated classified positions 35.0 Educator excellence operations--FTEs 34.0 $ 7,369,500 Educator recruitment and preparation programs--FTE 1.0 1,089,900 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 8,459,400 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal revenues 3,083,100 Special revenue funds: Certification fees 4,088,500 Teacher testing fees 197,900 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,089,900 Sec. 108. SYSTEMS, EVALUATION, AND TECHNOLOGY Full-time equated classified positions 19.0 Office of systems, evaluation, and technology operations--FTEs 19.0 $ 3,275,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,275,200 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal indirect revenues 138,100 Federal revenues 2,018,700 Special revenue funds: Certification fees 10,400 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,108,000 Sec. 109. STRATEGIC PLANNING AND IMPLEMENTATION Full-time equated classified positions 6.0 Strategic planning and implementation operations--FTEs 6.0 $ 1,190,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,190,800 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal revenues 637,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 553,100 Sec. 110. ADMINISTRATIVE LAW SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 2.0 Administrative law operations--FTEs 2.0 $ 1,154,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,154,200 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal revenues 500,900 Special revenue funds: Certification fees 653,300 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 111. ACCOUNTABILITY SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 45.0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Accountability services operations--FTEs 45.0 $ 11,867,900 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 11,867,900 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal revenues 11,867,900 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 112. SCHOOL SUPPORT SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 73.0 Adolescent and school health $ 334,400 Office of health and safety--FTEs 9.0 3,048,800 Office of nutrition services--FTEs 64.0 13,073,100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 16,456,300 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal revenues 13,265,200 Special revenue funds: Commodity distribution fees 150,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 3,041,100 Sec. 113. EDUCATIONAL SUPPORTS Full-time equated classified positions 72.0 Educational supports operations--FTEs 72.0 $ 16,867,200 School board member training 150,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 17,017,200 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal revenues 13,285,600 Special revenue funds: Certification fees 1,602,400 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 State general fund/general purpose $ 2,129,200 Sec. 114. CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION Full-time equated classified positions 17.0 Career and technical education operations--FTEs 17.0 $ 5,052,400 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,052,400 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal revenues 3,550,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,501,900 Sec. 115. LIBRARY OF MICHIGAN Full-time equated classified positions 33.0 Library of Michigan operations--FTEs 31.0 $ 5,122,200 Library services and technology programs--FTE 1.0 5,248,000 Michigan eLibrary--FTE 1.0 1,849,600 Renaissance zone reimbursements 1,830,000 State aid to libraries 16,567,700 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 30,617,500 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal revenues 5,248,000 Special revenue funds: Library fees 300,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 25,069,500 Sec. 116. PARTNERSHIP DISTRICT SUPPORT Full-time equated classified positions 15.0 Partnership district support operations--FTEs 15.0 $ 3,666,600 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,666,600 Appropriated from: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Federal revenues: Federal revenues 114,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 3,552,100 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations for fiscal year 2026-2027 general sections Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is $58,203,600.00 and state spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $18,547,700.00. The following itemized statement identifies appropriations from which spending to local units of government will occur: DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION Renaissance zone reimbursements $ 1,830,000 School board member training 150,000 State aid to libraries 16,567,700 TOTAL $ 18,547,700 Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1: (a) "Department" means the department of education. (b) "DHHS" means the department of health and human services. (c) "District" means a local school district as that term is defined in section 6 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.6, or a public school academy as that term is defined in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 section 5 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.5. (d) "FTE" means full-time equated position in the classified service of this state. (e) "HHS" means the United States Department of Health and Human Services. (f) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house appropriations committees, the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on the department, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office. Sec. 204. If the state administrative board, acting under section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount appropriated under part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and serving in each house, intertransfer funds within part 1 for the particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution. Sec. 205. (1) The department shall use the internet to fulfill the reporting requirements of this part and shall make each report readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each required report in a single archivable location on the department's website not later than the due date required for each report. (2) In addition to placing all reports required in the current fiscal year on the department's website, the department shall maintain on its website all reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years posted by fiscal year in the same single archivable location. (3) The department shall transmit all required reports for the current fiscal year to the standard report recipients and any other required recipients by email. The email shall include a copy of the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 report and a link to access the report online. Sec. 206. The department shall receive and retain copies of all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department shall follow federal and state law and guidelines for short-term and long-term retention of records. The department shall electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required by federal and state guidelines. Sec. 207. (1) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to maintain a searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following for the department: (a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category. (b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit. (c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor, including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and payment description. (2) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to update the searchable website on a quarterly basis. Sec. 208. Not later than December 15, the state budget office shall prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses by major departmental program or program areas. Sec. 209. Not later than 14 days after the release of the executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate with the state budget office to provide an annual report on 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the previous 2 fiscal years. Sec. 210. Not later than November 15, the department shall report on private and other third-party funds received by the department in the previous fiscal year. The report must include the amount of funding received, the specific source of the funding received, the purpose for which funding was expended, and the amount of any remaining funds. Sec. 211. Consistent with section 217 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, the department shall prepare a report on out-of-state travel expenses by not later than January 1. The report must list all travel outside this state by classified and unclassified employees in the previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or in part with funds appropriated in the department's budget. The report must include all of the following information: (a) The dates of each travel occurrence. (b) The total transportation and related costs of each travel occurrence and the proportions funded with state general fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal revenues, local revenues, and private revenues, including specific sources of state restricted, federal, local, and private revenues. (c) The destination of each travel occurrence. (d) The specific purpose and description of each travel occurrence, including the specific name of the event or meeting. Sec. 212. On a quarterly basis, the department shall report on all of the following: (a) The number of full-time equated positions in pay status by 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 civil service classification. (b) A comparison by line item of the number of full-time equated positions authorized from funds appropriated in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated positions employed by the department at the end of the reporting period. (c) The number of active employees in each of the following statuses: (i) Full-time salary. (ii) Full-time hourly. (iii) Part-time. (iv) Permanent-intermittent. (v) Limited-term. (vi) Seasonal. (vii) Worker's compensation. (viii) Noncareer/per diem. (ix) Job share. (x) Special personal services/contractual. (d) The number of overtime hours worked by employees, by classifications. Sec. 213. Not later than April 1, the department shall report on each specific policy change made to implement a public act affecting the department that took effect during the previous calendar year. The report must include reference to the public act that necessitates the policy change. The department shall submit the report to the standard report recipients, to the senate and house standing committees responsible for addressing issues affected by the public acts, and to the joint committee on administrative rules. Sec. 214. (1) The department shall maintain, on a publicly 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 accessible website, a department scorecard that identifies, tracks, and updates on a quarterly basis key metrics that are used to monitor and improve the department's performance. (2) The department shall notify the standard report recipients when the quarterly updates to the department scorecard are available on a publicly accessible website. Sec. 215. (1) Unless specifically authorized elsewhere in this part or part 1, funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to pay for a state obligation that exceeds $200,000.00 for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim without prior legislative approval. (2) If a state obligation for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim results in a change from current statute, the department shall notify the legislature. (3) This section does not apply to compensation and other relief to individuals wrongfully imprisoned as required under the wrongful imprisonment compensation act, 2016 PA 343, MCL 691.1751 to 691.1757. Sec. 216. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $5,000,000.00 for federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $400,000.00 for state restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $250,000.00 for local contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,500,000.00 for private contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 217. Total authorized appropriations from all sources under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 are estimated at $6,940,300.00. From this amount, total appropriations for pension-related legacy costs for the department are estimated at $6,940,300.00. Total appropriations for retiree health care legacy costs for the department are estimated at $0.00. Sec. 218. To the extent possible, the department shall not expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted. Sec. 219. The department shall submit reports that summarize all work project accounts not later than December 31, March 30, June 30, and September 30. The reports must include all of the following: (a) A list of all work project accounts. (b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 account. (c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously designated work project accounts, the name and description of the work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed amounts. Sec. 220. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1: (a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are available. (b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. (c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. Sec. 221. The department shall not take disciplinary action against an employee of the department because the employee communicates with a member of the legislature or legislative staff, unless the communication is prohibited by law and the department is exercising its authority as provided by law. Sec. 222. (1) The department shall maximize the efficiency of the state workforce and utilization and occupancy of office space, leased or owned, for each division within the department. Employees with job responsibilities that require the employees to serve in their capacities outside of an office shall be monitored each pay 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 period to ensure all work hours reported on the timesheet were actually worked. (2) The department shall comply with requirements set forth by the office of the state employer on in-person work and utilization and occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure at least 80% of employees are in person and building occupancy and utilization rates are at least 80% or higher. (3) The department shall submit reports not later than January 15 and April 15 on all of the following: (a) Remote work policy by division. (b) Building occupancy by address. (c) Whether the building is state-owned or leased. (d) Aggregate badge scanning information by employee. (4) As used in this section, "occupancy" means the actual number of employees physically present in a workplace. Sec. 223. (1) The department shall require as a condition of each contract or subcontract that the prequalified contractor or prequalified subcontractor agree to use the E-Verify system to verify that all persons hired during the contract term by the contractor or subcontractor are legally present and authorized to work in the United States. (2) The department may verify this information directly or may require contractors and subcontractors to verify the information and submit a certification to the department. The department shall submit a report not later than March 1 that describes the processes it has developed and implemented under this section. (3) The department shall not contract with any foreign entities that are known or suspected to be enemies of the United States or known foreign adversaries. Foreign adversaries include 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 all of the following: (a) The People's Republic of China. (b) The Russian Federation. (c) The Islamic Republic of Iran. (d) The Democratic People's Republic of Korea. (e) The Republic of Cuba. (f) The Venezuelan regime of Nicolï¿½s Maduro. (g) The Syrian Arab Republic. (h) An agency or other entity under significant control of a country described in subdivisions (a) to (g). (4) As used in this section, "E-Verify" means an internet-based system operated by the Department of Homeland Security, United States Citizenship and Immigration Services in partnership with the Social Security Administration. Sec. 224. (1) Within 30 days of enactment of this act, the state budget office shall post a list of legislatively directed spending items funded in part 1 as defined in sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. The list must include all information and documents pertaining to the funded items as publicly disclosed in accordance with sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. (2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency administering the grant shall submit a report not later than November 1. The department or agency shall update the report and shall submit updated reports not later than March 15 and September 15 of the current fiscal year. The department or agency shall include in the report the most comprehensive information the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department or agency has available at the time of posting for grants awarded, including, but not limited to, project milestones, percent completed, funding expended, and funding encumbered. (3) Before executing a grant agreement, all grant recipients must provide a spending plan that specifies the scope of service, the program goals, the measurement for meeting program goals, and how all grant funds will be used, and must indicate if any grant funds will be provided to a third party or subrecipient. (4) Each department or agency responsible for awarding or disbursing grant funds must annually audit the entity's use of the grant funds for each fiscal year in which the grant is active. Each entity must submit information requested by the department or agency to confirm compliance. (5) Each department or agency shall work with the office of the auditor general to conduct an audit of the grant according to generally accepted accounting practices and audit standards. The office of the auditor general must be given access to all internal and external records. All contracts or agreements between a department or agency and a grant recipient or between a grant recipient and a third party must include a clause granting the office of the auditor general access to all internal and external records. (6) Grant recipients and their immediate family members are prohibited from being employed by the executive branch or legislative branch of this state. In addition, grant recipients are prohibited from serving on any state board that has direct or indirect responsibility for approving or auditing grant funds awarded or disbursed by any department or agency. (7) Full and complete audits of grant funds issued by the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department or an agency of this state, without redaction unless required by law, must be posted to the department's or agency's website in a conspicuous place for public review. (8) On a quarterly basis, the department or agency shall submit a report on legislatively sponsored grant funds that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) The name of each grant recipient and the status of each grant. (b) The amount distributed to each grant recipient. (c) Any changes to scope or costs of program. (9) The report under subsection (8) must include the following statements made by the department or agency: (a) A statement that confirms the department or agency reviewed and affirmed compliance by each grant recipient with program scope and expenditure of grant funding. (b) A statement that confirms the department or agency reviewed applicable program reports and requests for reimbursement. Sec. 225. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall do the following: (a) Report on any amounts of severance pay for a department director, deputy director, or other high-ranking department official not later than 14 days after a severance agreement with the director, deputy director, or official is signed. The name of the director, deputy director, or official and the amount of severance pay must be included in the report required by this subdivision. (b) Not later than February 1, report on the total amount of severance pay remitted to former department employees during the previous fiscal year and the total number of former department 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 employees that were remitted severance pay during the previous fiscal year. (2) As used in this section, "severance pay" means compensation to which both of the following apply: (a) The compensation is payable or paid upon the termination of employment. (b) The compensation is paid in addition to wages or benefits earned during the course of employment or generally applicable retirement benefits. Sec. 226. Funds appropriated in part 1 from state or federal sources are prohibited from being used to provide services, grants, or programming to an individual who is not a citizen of the United States unless the individual is a qualified alien as that term is defined in 8 USC 1641. This section does not prohibit the department, political subdivision, state university, or other state agency from expending funds for the purpose of detaining individuals who are not citizens of the United States, including any costs associated with housing such individuals in county jails or state correctional facilities. Sec. 227. State funds must not be used for diversity, equity, and inclusion, or diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives or programs, as outlined in federal Executive Order No. 14151, 90 Fed. Reg. 8339 (January 29, 2025) "Ending Radical and Wasteful Government DEI Programs and Preferencing", federal Executive Order No. 14168, 90 Fed. Reg. 8615 (January 30, 2025) "Defending Women from Gender Ideology Extremism and Restoring Biological Truth to the Federal Government", or federal Executive Order No. 14173, 90 Fed. Reg. 8633 (January 31, 2025) "Ending Illegal Discrimination and Restoring Merit-Based Opportunity". 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 228. The department shall use the same precontract risk assessment program utilized by the department of technology, management, and budget to evaluate financial compliance, security risks, and insurance requirements prior to contract execution. department-specific general sections Sec. 301. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall provide through the internet the state board of education agenda and all supporting documents, and shall notify the state budget director and the senate and house fiscal agencies that the agenda and supporting documents are available on the internet, at the time the agenda and supporting documents are provided to state board of education members. Sec. 302. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department may assist DHHS, other departments, intermediate school districts, and local school districts to secure reimbursement for eligible services provided in Michigan schools from the federal Medicaid program. The department may submit reports of direct expenses related to this effort to DHHS for reimbursement. Sec. 303. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall do both of the following: (a) Post on its website a link to the federal Institute of Education Sciences' What Works Clearinghouse. (b) Disseminate knowledge about the What Works Clearinghouse to districts and intermediate school districts so that it may be used to improve reading proficiency for pupils in grades K to 3. Sec. 304. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall coordinate with the other departments to streamline state services and resources, reduce duplication, and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 increase efficiency, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (a) Working with the department of treasury to coordinate with the financial independence team and overseeing deficit districts. (b) Working with DHHS and the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential to coordinate with early childhood programs and overseeing child care providers. Sec. 305. (1) As a condition of receiving appropriations in part 1, the department shall, in collaboration with DHHS, promote and support initiatives in schools and other educational organizations that include, but are not limited to, training for educators, teachers, and other personnel in school settings for all of the following: (a) Using trauma-informed practices. (b) Age-appropriate education and information on human trafficking. (c) Age-appropriate education and information on sexual abuse prevention. (2) If requested by the department, the department of state police and the department of attorney general shall consult with the department in the promotion and support of initiatives in schools and other educational organizations under subsection (1). Sec. 306. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall ensure that the most recently issued report of regional in-demand occupations issued by the department of technology, management, and budget is distributed in electronic or paper form to all high schools in each school district, intermediate school district, and public school academy, to the standard report recipients, and to the members of the senate and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 house standing committees on education. Sec. 307. Funds appropriated in part 1 are prohibited from being provided to the Michigan Organization on Adolescent Sexual Health. STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION/OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT Sec. 351. (1) The department may use the appropriations from the state board of education, per diem payments in part 1 for per diem payments to the state board members for meetings at which a quorum is present or for performing official business authorized by the state board. The per diem payments are set at the following rates: (a) State board of education - president - $110.00 per day. (b) State board of education - member other than president - $100.00 per day. (2) The department shall not pay a state board of education member a per diem for more than 30 days per year. SPECIAL EDUCATION SERVICES Sec. 401. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for special education operations, the department shall use $100,000.00 to design and distribute to all parents and legal guardians of a student with a disability information on federal and state mandates regarding the rights and protections of students with disabilities, including, but not limited to, individualized education programs to ensure that parents and legal guardians are fully informed about laws, rules, procedural safeguards, and problem-solving options. MICHIGAN SCHOOLS FOR THE DEAF AND BLIND 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 451. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the employees at the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind who work on a school-year basis are considered annual employees for purposes of service credits, retirement, and insurance benefits. Sec. 452. For each student enrolled at the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind, the department shall assess the intermediate school district of residence 100% of the cost of operating the student's instructional program, excluding room and board related costs and the cost of weekend transportation between the school and the student's home. Sec. 456. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind may promote its residential program as a possible appropriate option for children who are deaf or hard of hearing or who are blind or visually impaired. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind shall distribute information detailing its services to all intermediate school districts in this state. (2) If an intermediate school district knows that a child in the district is deaf or hard of hearing or blind or visually impaired, the intermediate school district shall provide to the parents of the child the literature distributed by the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind to intermediate school districts under subsection (1). (3) Parents will continue to have a choice regarding the educational placement of their deaf or hard-of-hearing children. Sec. 457. Revenue received by the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind from gifts, bequests, and donations that is unexpended at the end of the state fiscal year may be carried over to the succeeding fiscal year and does not revert to the general 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 fund. Sec. 458. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for the low incidence outreach fund are appropriated from money collected by the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind and the low incidence outreach program for providing qualified services and may be used for any expenses necessary to provide the qualified services. Any money that is unexpended at the end of the current fiscal year does not revert to the general fund and may be carried forward into the succeeding fiscal year. (2) As used in this section, "qualified services" means any of the following: (a) Document reproduction and services. (b) Conducting conferences, workshops, and training classes. (c) Providing specialized equipment, facilities, and software. Sec. 459. When conducting a due process hearing resulting from a parent's appeal of that parent's child's individualized education program team's decision on the child's educational placement, a state administrative law judge shall consider designating the Michigan School for the Deaf as 1 of the options for the least restrictive environment under federal law for the parent's child who is deaf, deafblind, or hard of hearing. Sec. 460. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for ASL literacy resources, the department shall expend the funds to comply with all requirements in section 1705 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1705. EDUCATOR EXCELLENCE Sec. 501. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for educator excellence, the department shall maintain certificate revocation 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 and felony conviction files of educational personnel. Sec. 503. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall, if requested by the Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute, consult with the Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute and external stakeholders in connection with the department's implementation and administration of professional development training described in section 35a of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1635a, including, but not limited to, the online training of educators of pupils in grades K to 3 described in that section. Sec. 504. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for educator recruitment and preparation programs, the department shall award $1,000,000.00 to districts and nonpublic schools for both of the following: (a) Educator preparation program tuition, program fees, testing fees, and substitute permit costs for any individual employed in grades pre-K to 12 working toward certification or an additional endorsement. (b) Program costs associated with hands-on learning experiences for students in grades 6 to 12 interested in the field of education, with supervision and mentoring from educators who are champions of, and committed to, the success of the profession. (2) Not later than September 30, the department shall prepare and submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes the districts and nonpublic schools that received funds awarded under this section and how much each district or nonpublic school received. Sec. 505. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for educator recruitment and preparation programs, not less than $190,000.00 and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 not fewer than 1.0 FTE position is allocated for educator recruitment and preparation programs. Not later than September 30, the department shall prepare and submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes how funds allocated under this section were spent. Sec. 506. Revenue received from teacher testing fees that is unexpended at the end of the current fiscal year may be carried over to the succeeding fiscal year and does not revert to the general fund. Sec. 507. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall adopt a teacher certification test that ensures that all newly certified elementary teachers have the skills to deliver evidence-based literacy instruction grounded in the science of reading. The department may use teacher certification or teacher testing fee revenue to the extent allowable under law to implement this section, or may pass along increased testing fees to teachers as allowable and appropriate. SCHOOL SUPPORT SERVICES Sec. 601. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for adolescent and school health, the department shall use the funds to replace federal funding reductions from the HHS - Centers for Disease Control and Prevention to the department and section 39a(2)(a) of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1639a. Sec. 602. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for school board member training, there is appropriated $150,000.00 for school board member training. The department shall approve 1 or more training programs for school board members that include courses of instruction for school board members in 1 or more of the following 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 topic areas: (a) Conflicts of interest, including, but not limited to, the application of section 1203 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1203. (b) Labor relations, including, but not limited to, a school board's role in collective bargaining agreements in 1947 PA 336, MCL 423.201 to 423.217, and in other laws related to employment. (c) Education law, including, but not limited to, the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1 to 380.1852, the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1601 to 388.1896, the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275, and 1937 (Ex Sess) PA 4, MCL 38.71 to 38.191, dealing with teacher tenure. (d) School finance, including, but not limited to, the creation and management of school district budgets. (e) Board governance, including, but not limited to, roles and responsibilities, parliamentary procedure, and best practices. (f) Rater reliability training. (g) Teacher training requirements related to the science of reading and numeracy. (2) On completion of an eligible training program, a school board member may apply for reimbursement for the cost of the eligible training program through the board member's local district, up to $100.00 per course. The department may determine the form and manner of the application to reimburse the district for the cost. (3) The department shall create a process for the provider of a course in a topic listed in subsection (1) to apply to the department to have the course approved and be eligible for a school board member to be reimbursed for completing that course as 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 provided under subsection (2). (4) As used in this section: (a) "Eligible training program" means a training program that is approved under subsection (1). (b) "School board member" means a member of the board of a school district or intermediate school district or a member of the board of directors of a public school academy in this state. Sec. 604. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, not less than $159,500.00 and not fewer than 1.0 FTE position shall provide technical assistance to all eligible districts to make them effective at using Medicaid dollars for mental health. (2) As used in this section, "eligible district" means a school district or intermediate school district that receives funding under section 31n of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1631n. EDUCATIONAL SUPPORTS Sec. 701. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for educational supports, the department shall produce a report detailing the progress made by districts with grades K to 12 receiving at-risk funding under section 31a of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1631a, in doing both of the following: (a) Implementing multi-tiered systems of supports in the previous school fiscal year for grades K to 12. (b) Providing reading intervention services described in section 1280f of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1280f, for pupils in grades K to 12. (2) The department shall include, at a minimum, all of the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 following in the report described in subsection (1): (a) A description of the training, coaching, and technical assistance offered by the department to districts to support the implementation of effective multi-tiered systems of supports and reading intervention programs. (b) A list of districts determined by the department to have successfully implemented multi-tiered systems of supports and reading intervention programs. (c) A list of districts determined by the department that have the need to implement multi-tiered systems of supports and reading intervention programs. (d) A list of best practices that the department has identified that may be used by districts to implement multi-tiered systems of supports and reading intervention programs. (e) Other information the department determines would be useful to understanding the status of districts' implementation of effective multi-tiered systems of supports and reading intervention programs. (3) The department shall provide the report described in subsection (1) to the state budget director, the house and senate subcommittees that oversee the department and school aid budgets, and the house and senate fiscal agencies by September 30 of the current fiscal year. Sec. 702. From the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not less than $1,000,000.00 for implementation costs associated with programs for literacy funded under section 35a of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1635a. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION Sec. 750. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for career and technical education operations, the department shall develop and implement a reporting mechanism for school districts to report on career and technical education participation and workforce development participation. The department shall prepare and submit a report to the standard report recipients detailing all of the following: (a) The number of students participating in career and technical education programs. (b) The number of students in the graduating class of the current school year that took at least 1 career and technical education course while in high school. (c) The number of students in the graduating class of the previous school year that enrolled in a postsecondary workforce development program in the current school year. LIBRARY OF MICHIGAN Sec. 801. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for library fees are appropriated from money collected by the library of Michigan for providing qualified services and may be used for any expenses necessary to provide the qualified services. Any money that is unexpended at the end of the current fiscal year does not lapse to the general fund and may be carried forward into the succeeding fiscal year. (2) As used in this section, "qualified services" means any of the following: (a) Document reproduction and services. (b) Conducting conferences, workshops, and training classes. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (c) Providing specialized equipment, facilities, and software. Sec. 804. (1) The department shall use the funds appropriated in part 1 for renaissance zone reimbursements to reimburse public libraries under section 12 of the Michigan renaissance zone act, 1996 PA 376, MCL 125.2692, for taxes levied in 2026. The department shall allocate the funds not later than 60 days after the department of treasury certifies to the department and to the state budget director that the department of treasury has received all necessary information to properly determine the amounts due to each eligible recipient. (2) If the amount appropriated under this section is not sufficient to fully pay obligations under this section, the department shall prorate payments on an equal basis among all eligible recipients. ARTICLE 4 department of environment, great lakes, and energy part 1 line-item appropriations FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, from the following funds: DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT, GREAT LAKES, AND ENERGY APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 1,514.8 ï¿½ï¿½ Full-time employees 1,514.0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 ï¿½ï¿½ Limited-term employees 49.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Noncareer/per diem employees 49.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Part-time employees 1.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Permanent-intermittent employees 9.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Seasonal employees 0.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 470,613,600 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 4,099,300 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 466,514,300 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 148,639,000 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 1,750,600 Total other state restricted revenues 213,954,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 102,169,900 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 93.6 Unclassified salaries--FTEs 6.0 $ 952,900 Accounting service center 1,480,600 Administrative hearings officers 553,800 Departmentwide employee economic adjustments 7,609,200 Environmental investigations--FTEs 12.0 2,432,800 Environmental support--FTEs 52.0 9,623,300 Executive direction--FTEs 17.1 4,480,800 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Facilities management 1,000,000 Financial support--FTEs 12.5 6,091,400 Michigan geological survey 2,700,000 Property management 7,694,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 44,618,800 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from department of licensing and regulatory affairs 700 IDG from department of state police 112,700 IDG from state transportation department 169,500 Federal revenues: Federal funds 1,241,600 Special revenue funds: Private funds 1,199,900 Air emissions fees 1,202,200 Aquatic nuisance control fund 81,000 Asbestos inspection fund 17,300 Campground fund 27,800 Cleanup and redevelopment fund 5,136,300 Coal ash care fund 19,600 Electronic waste recycling fund 27,600 Environmental education fund 239,900 Environmental pollution prevention fund 456,800 Fees and collections 18,100 Financial instruments 6,103,100 Great Lakes protection fund 550,600 Groundwater discharge permit fees 183,100 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Infrastructure construction fund 4,200 Laboratory services fees 777,500 Land and water permit fees 225,400 Medical waste emergency response fund 39,200 Metallic mining surveillance fee revenue 5,300 Mineral well regulatory fee revenue 13,600 Nonferrous metallic mineral surveillance 19,300 NPDES fees 378,000 Oil and gas regulatory fund 514,200 Orphan well fund 21,900 Public swimming pool fund 58,200 Public utility assessments 221,900 Public water supply fees 398,000 Refined petroleum fund 3,032,100 Renew Michigan fund 4,815,600 Sand extraction fee revenue 5,200 Scrap tire regulatory fund 395,100 Septage waste program fund 54,500 Settlement funds 898,400 Sewage sludge land application fees 77,500 Soil erosion and sedimentation control training fund 10,400 Solid waste management fund - staff account 651,000 Stormwater permit fees 187,300 Technologically enhanced naturally occurring radioactive material 56,600 Underground storage tank cleanup fund 286,200 Wastewater operator training fees 49,900 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Water pollution control revolving fund 200 Water quality protection fund 7,100 Water use reporting fees 23,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 14,603,500 Sec. 103. WATER RESOURCES DIVISION Full-time equated classified positions 387.1 Aquatic nuisance control program--FTEs 6.0 $ 939,000 Federal - Great Lakes remedial action plan grants 289,500 Fish contaminant monitoring 316,100 Great Lakes restoration initiative--FTEs 9.0 9,240,500 Nonpoint source pollution prevention and control project program 2,873,900 Technology advancements for water monitoring 500,000 Water quality programs--FTEs 211.8 31,120,600 Water quality protection grants 49,700 Water resource programs--FTEs 160.3 27,854,700 Watershed council grants 51,400 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 73,235,400 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from state transportation department 2,056,400 Federal revenues: Federal funds 31,592,800 Special revenue funds: Aquatic nuisance control fund 939,000 Environmental response fund 590,000 Groundwater discharge permit fees 2,246,900 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Infrastructure construction fund 52,000 Land and water permit fees 4,007,400 Refined petroleum fund 456,000 Sewage sludge land application fees 918,900 Soil erosion and sedimentation control training fund 143,500 Stormwater permit fees 1,428,000 Wastewater operator training fees 317,400 Water pollution control revolving fund 152,500 Water quality protection fund 49,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 28,284,900 Sec. 104. AIR QUALITY DIVISION Full-time equated classified positions 206.5 Air quality programs--FTEs 206.5 $ 34,729,100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 34,729,100 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 7,762,700 Special revenue funds: Air emissions fees 7,289,200 Asbestos inspection fund 2,000,000 Fees and collections 214,300 Oil and gas regulatory fund 148,700 Public utility assessments 150,000 Refined petroleum fund 2,138,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 15,025,700 Sec. 105. REMEDIATION AND REDEVELOPMENT DIVISION Full-time equated classified positions 329.0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Contaminated site remediation and redevelopment programs--FTEs 329.0 $ 58,713,400 Emergency cleanup actions 223,200 Environmental cleanup and redevelopment program 17,395,700 Superfund cleanup 482,100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 76,814,400 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 8,241,300 Special revenue funds: Cleanup and redevelopment fund 17,200,000 Environmental response fund 1,442,100 Laboratory services fees 14,392,000 Public water supply fees 330,700 Refined petroleum fund 33,108,300 State brownfield redevelopment fund 2,100,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 106. UNDERGROUND STORAGE TANK AUTHORITY Full-time equated classified positions 8.8 Underground storage tank cleanup program--FTEs 8.8 $ 22,129,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 22,129,000 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Underground storage tank cleanup fund 22,129,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 107. RENEWING MICHIGAN'S ENVIRONMENT Full-time equated classified positions 115.7 Information management--FTEs 22.0 $ 3,913,400 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Renew Michigan program--FTEs 93.7 27,004,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 30,917,400 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from department of state police 8,800 IDG from state transportation department 13,600 Federal revenues: Federal funds 5,800 Special revenue funds: Air emissions fees 92,900 Aquatic nuisance control fund 7,000 Campground fund 2,600 Cleanup and redevelopment fund 60,700 Coal ash care fund 1,900 Electronic waste recycling fund 2,300 Environmental pollution prevention fund 28,800 Fees and collections 1,700 Financial instruments 6,100 Great Lakes protection fund 3,600 Groundwater discharge permit fees 14,900 Infrastructure construction fund 400 Laboratory services fees 55,700 Land and water permit fees 21,200 Medical waste emergency response fund 3,200 Metallic mining surveillance fee revenue 500 Mineral well regulatory fee revenue 1,000 Nonferrous metallic mineral surveillance 1,500 NPDES fees 29,600 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Oil and gas regulatory fund 43,300 Orphan well fund 1,500 Public swimming pool fund 5,300 Public utility assessments 18,900 Public water supply fees 37,600 Renew Michigan fund 27,187,100 Sand extraction fee revenue 500 Scrap tire regulatory fund 36,500 Septage waste program fund 4,300 Sewage sludge land application fees 6,400 Soil erosion and sedimentation control training fund 1,000 Solid waste management fund - staff account 46,300 Stormwater permit fees 15,500 Technologically enhanced naturally occurring radioactive material 5,400 Underground storage tank cleanup fund 26,100 Wastewater operator training fees 4,100 Water quality protection fund 700 Water use reporting fees 2,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 3,111,000 Sec. 108. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY Information technology services and projects $ 5,219,900 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,219,900 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from department of state police 12,800 IDG from state transportation department 22,200 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Federal revenues: Federal funds 1,031,200 Special revenue funds: Air emissions fees 129,400 Aquatic nuisance control fund 8,000 Campground fund 3,800 Cleanup and redevelopment fund 909,100 Coal ash care fund 2,700 Electronic waste recycling fund 1,200 Environmental pollution prevention fund 1,000 Fees and collections 2,100 Financial instruments 302,200 Great Lakes protection fund 4,200 Groundwater discharge permit fees 23,800 Infrastructure construction fund 600 Laboratory services fees 58,600 Land and water permit fees 30,900 Medical waste emergency response fund 3,600 Metallic mining surveillance fee revenue 600 Mineral well regulatory fee revenue 300 Nonferrous metallic mineral surveillance 1,700 NPDES fees 31,700 Oil and gas regulatory fund 54,600 Public swimming pool fund 7,200 Public utility assessments 42,800 Public water supply fees 50,400 Refined petroleum fund 402,500 Renew Michigan fund 712,100 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Sand extraction fee revenue 1,000 Scrap tire regulatory fund 75,000 Septage waste program fund 5,200 Sewage sludge land application fees 7,300 Soil erosion and sedimentation control training fund 1,200 Solid waste management fund - staff account 17,300 Stormwater permit fees 16,700 Technologically enhanced naturally occurring radioactive material 10,000 Underground storage tank cleanup fund 35,800 Wastewater operator training fees 4,900 Water pollution control revolving fund 16,500 Water quality protection fund 800 Water use reporting fees 3,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,173,800 Sec. 109. DRINKING WATER AND ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH Full-time equated classified positions 160.0 Drinking water and environmental health--FTEs 160.0 $ 38,467,100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 38,467,100 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 13,755,900 Special revenue funds: Campground fund 388,200 Fees and collections 34,700 Public swimming pool fund 762,200 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 Public water supply fees 3,067,800 Refined petroleum fund 761,100 Septage waste program fund 828,900 Wastewater operator training fees 267,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 18,600,600 Sec. 110. MATERIALS MANAGEMENT DIVISION Full-time equated classified positions 120.0 Material management programs--FTEs 120.0 $ 27,221,600 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 27,221,600 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from department of state police 1,590,500 Federal revenues: Federal funds 3,487,600 Special revenue funds: Private funds 510,700 Cleanup and redevelopment fund 3,890,500 Coal ash care fund 268,100 Community pollution prevention fund 1,250,000 Electronic waste recycling fund 333,700 Environmental pollution prevention fund 4,167,300 Medical waste emergency response fund 454,500 Public utility assessments 247,900 Scrap tire regulatory fund 5,647,300 Small business pollution prevention revolving loan fund 134,400 Solid waste management fund - staff account 3,991,600 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Technologically enhanced naturally occurring radioactive material 465,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 782,000 Sec. 111. GEOLOGIC RESOURCES MANAGEMENT DIVISION Full-time equated classified positions 70.6 Geologic resources management--FTEs 70.6 $ 10,827,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 10,827,800 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from department of licensing and regulatory affairs 112,100 Federal revenues: Federal funds 153,100 Infrastructure investment and jobs act fund 5,155,400 Special revenue funds: Private funds 40,000 Water use reporting fees 300 State general fund/general purpose $ 5,366,900 Sec. 112. WATER INFRASTRUCTURE Full-time equated classified positions 23.5 Lead service line replacement $ 9,601,300 Municipal assistance--FTEs 23.5 3,598,100 Water state revolving funds 93,233,700 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 106,433,100 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 76,211,600 Special revenue funds: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Revolving loan revenue bonds 15,000,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 15,221,500 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations for fiscal year 2026-2027 general sections Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, total state spending under part 1 from state resources is $316,124,700.00 and state spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $41,273,300.00. The following itemized statement identifies appropriations from which spending to local units of government will occur: DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT, GREAT LAKES, AND ENERGY Brownfield grants $ 1,000,000 Drinking water and environmental health 8,786,000 Emergency cleanup actions 116,000 Lead service line replacement 9,601,300 Material management programs 1,270,000 Renew Michigan program 20,000,000 Technology advancements for water monitoring 500,000 TOTAL $ $41,273,300 Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1: (a) "Department" means the department of environment, Great 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Lakes, and energy. (b) "Director" means the director of the department. (c) "FTE" means full-time equated. (d) "IDG" means interdepartmental grant. (e) "NPDES" means the national pollutant discharge elimination system. (f) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house appropriations committees, the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on environment, Great Lakes, and energy, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office. Sec. 204. If the state administrative board, acting under section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount appropriated under part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and serving in each house, intertransfer funds within part 1 for the particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution. Sec. 205. (1) The department shall use the internet to fulfill the reporting requirements of this part and shall make each report readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each required report in a single archivable location on the department's website not later than the due date required for each report. (2) In addition to placing all reports required in the current fiscal year on the department's website, the department shall maintain on its website all reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years posted by fiscal year in the same single archivable location. (3) The department shall transmit all required reports for the current fiscal year to the standard report recipients and any other 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 required recipients by email. The email shall include a copy of the report and a link to access the report online. Sec. 206. The department shall receive and retain copies of all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department shall follow federal and state law and guidelines for short-term and long-term retention of records. The department shall electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required by federal and state guidelines. Sec. 207. (1) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to maintain a searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following for the department: (a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category. (b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit. (c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor, including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and payment description. (2) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to update the searchable website on a quarterly basis. Sec. 208. Not later than December 15, the state budget office shall prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses by major departmental program or program areas. Sec. 209. Not later than 14 days after the release of the executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 with the state budget office to provide an annual report on estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the previous 2 fiscal years. Sec. 210. Not later than November 15, the department shall report on private and other third-party funds received by the department in the previous fiscal year. The report must include the amount of funding received, the specific source of funding received, the purpose for which funding was expended, and the amount of any remaining funds. Sec. 211. Consistent with section 217 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, the department shall prepare a report on out-of-state travel expenses by not later than January 1. The report must list all travel outside this state by classified and unclassified employees in the previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or in part with funds appropriated in the department's budget. The report must include all of the following information: (a) The dates of each travel occurrence. (b) The total transportation and related costs of each travel occurrence and the proportions funded with state general fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal revenues, local revenues, and private revenues, including specific sources of state restricted, federal, local, and private revenues. (c) The destination of each travel occurrence. (d) The specific purpose and description of each travel occurrence, including the specific name of the event or meeting. Sec. 212. On a quarterly basis, the department shall report on all of the following: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) The number of full-time equated positions in pay status by civil service classification. (b) A comparison by line item of the number of full-time equated positions authorized from funds appropriated in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated positions employed by the department at the end of the reporting period. (c) The number of active employees in each of the following statuses: (i) Full-time salary. (ii) Full-time hourly. (iii) Part-time. (iv) Permanent-intermittent. (v) Limited-term. (vi) Seasonal. (vii) Worker's compensation. (viii) Noncareer/per diem. (ix) Job share. (x) Special personal services/contractual. (d) The number of overtime hours worked by employees, by classifications. Sec. 213. Not later than April 1, the department shall report on each specific policy change made to implement a public act affecting the department that took effect during the previous calendar year. The report must include reference to the public act that necessitates the policy change. The department shall submit the report to the standard report recipients, to the senate and house standing committees responsible for addressing issues affected by the public acts, and to the joint committee on administrative rules. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 214. (1) Not later than April 1, the department shall maintain, on a publicly accessible website, a department scorecard that identifies, tracks, and updates on a quarterly basis key metrics that are used to monitor and improve the department's performance. (2) The department shall notify the standard report recipients when the quarterly updates to the department scorecard are available on a publicly accessible website. Sec. 215. (1) Unless specifically authorized elsewhere in this part or part 1, funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to pay for a state obligation that exceeds $200,000.00 for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim without prior legislative approval. (2) If a state obligation for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim results in a change from current statute, the department shall notify the legislature. (3) This section does not apply to compensation and other relief to individuals wrongfully imprisoned as required under the wrongful imprisonment compensation act, 2016 PA 343, MCL 691.1751 to 691.1757. Sec. 216. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $3,000,000.00 for state restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 217. Total authorized appropriations from all sources under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 are estimated at $19,364,100.00. From this amount, total 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 appropriations for pension-related legacy costs for the department are estimated at $19,364,100.00. Total appropriations for retiree health care legacy costs for the department are estimated at $0.00. Sec. 218. To the extent possible, the department shall not expend appropriations in part 1 until all existing authorized work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted. Sec. 219. The department shall submit reports that summarize all work project accounts not later than December 31, March 30, June 30, and September 30. The reports must include all of the following: (a) A list of all work project accounts. (b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each account. (c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously designated work project accounts, the name and description of the work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed amounts. Sec. 220. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1: (a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are available. (b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. (c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. Sec. 221. The department shall not take disciplinary action against an employee of the department because the employee communicates with a member of the legislature or legislative staff unless the communication is prohibited by law and the department is exercising its authority as provided by law. Sec. 222. (1) The department shall maximize the efficiency of the state workforce and utilization and occupancy of office space, leased or owned, for each division within the department. Employees with job responsibilities that require employees to serve in their capacities outside of an office shall be monitored each pay period to ensure all work hours reported on timesheets are actually worked. (2) The department shall comply with requirements set forth by the office of the state employer on in-person work and utilization and occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure at least 80% of employees are in person and building occupancy and utilization rates are at least 80% or higher. (3) The department shall submit reports not later than January 15 and April 15 on all of the following: (a) Remote work policy by division. (b) Building occupancy by address. (c) Whether the building is state-owned or leased. (d) Aggregate badge scanning information by employee. (4) As used in this section, "occupancy" means the actual number of employees physically present in a workplace. Sec. 223. (1) The department shall require as a condition of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 each contract or subcontract that the prequalified contractor or prequalified subcontractor agree to use the E-Verify system to verify that all persons hired during the contract term by the contractor or subcontractor are legally present and authorized to work in the United States. (2) The department may verify this information directly or may require contractors and subcontractors to verify the information and submit a certification to the department. The department shall submit a report not later than March 1 that describes the processes it has developed and implemented under this section. (3) The department shall not contract with any foreign entities that are known or suspected to be enemies of the United States or known foreign adversaries. Foreign adversaries include all of the following: (a) The People's Republic of China. (b) The Russian Federation. (c) The Islamic Republic of Iran. (d) The Democratic People's Republic of Korea. (e) The Republic of Cuba. (f) The Venezuelan regime of Nicolï¿½s Maduro. (g) The Syrian Arab Republic. (h) An agency or other entity under significant control of a country described in subdivisions (a) to (g). (4) As used in this section, "E-Verify" means an internet-based system operated by the Department of Homeland Security, United States Citizenship and Immigration Services in partnership with the Social Security Administration. Sec. 224. (1) Within 30 days of enactment of this act, the state budget office shall post a list of legislatively directed 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 spending items funded in part 1 as defined in sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. The list must include all information and documents pertaining to the funded items as publicly disclosed in accordance with sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. (2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency administering the grant shall submit a report not later than November 1. The department or agency shall update the report and shall submit updated reports not later than March 15 and September 15 of the current fiscal year. The department or agency shall include in the report the most comprehensive information the department or agency has available at the time of posting for grants awarded, including, but not limited to, project milestones, percent completed, funding expended, and funding encumbered. (3) Before executing a grant agreement, all grant recipients must provide a spending plan that specifies the scope of service, the program goals, the measurement for meeting program goals, and how all grant funds will be used, and must indicate if any grant funds will be provided to a third party or subrecipient. (4) Each department or agency responsible for awarding or disbursing grant funds must annually audit the entity's use of the grant funds for each fiscal year in which the grant is active. Each entity must submit information requested by the department or agency to confirm compliance. (5) Each department or agency shall work with the office of the auditor general to conduct an audit of the grant according to generally accepted accounting practices and audit standards. The 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 office of the auditor general must be given access to all internal and external records. All contracts or agreements between a department or agency and a grant recipient or between a grant recipient and a third party must include a clause granting the office of the auditor general access to all internal and external records. (6) Grant recipients and their immediate family members are prohibited from being employed by the executive branch or legislative branch of this state. In addition, grant recipients are prohibited from serving on any state board that has direct or indirect responsibility for approving or auditing grant funds awarded or disbursed by any department or agency. (7) Full and complete audits of grant funds issued by the department or an agency of this state, without redaction unless required by law, must be posted to the department's or agency's website in a conspicuous place for public review. (8) On a quarterly basis, the department or agency shall submit a report on legislatively sponsored grant funds that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) The name of each grant recipient and the status of each grant. (b) The amount distributed to each grant recipient. (c) Any changes to scope or costs of program. (9) The report under subsection (8) must include the following statements made by the department or agency: (a) A statement that confirms the department or agency reviewed and affirmed compliance by each grant recipient with program scope and expenditure of grant funding. (b) A statement that confirms the department or agency 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 reviewed applicable program reports and requests for reimbursement. Sec. 225. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall do the following: (a) Report on any amounts of severance pay for a department director, deputy director, or other high-ranking department official not later than 14 days after a severance agreement with the director, deputy director, or official is signed. The name of the director, deputy director, or official and the amount of severance pay must be included in the report required by this subdivision. (b) Not later than February 1, report on the total amount of severance pay remitted to former department employees during the previous fiscal year and the total number of former department employees that were remitted severance pay during the previous fiscal year. (2) As used in this section, "severance pay" means compensation to which both of the following apply: (a) The compensation is payable or paid upon the termination of employment. (b) The compensation is paid in addition to wages or benefits earned during the course of employment or generally applicable retirement benefits. Sec. 226. Funds appropriated in part 1 from state or federal sources are prohibited from being used to provide services, grants, or programming to an individual who is not a citizen of the United States unless the individual is a qualified alien as that term is defined in 8 USC 1641. This section does not prohibit the department, political subdivision, state university, or other state agency from expending funds for the purpose of detaining 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 individuals who are not citizens of the United States, including any costs associated with housing such individuals in county jails or state correctional facilities. Sec. 227. State funds must not be used for diversity, equity, and inclusion, or diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives or programs, as outlined in federal Executive Order No. 14151, 90 Fed. Reg. 8339 (January 29, 2025) "Ending Radical and Wasteful Government DEI Programs and Preferencing", federal Executive Order No. 14168, 90 Fed. Reg. 8615 (January 30, 2025) "Defending Women from Gender Ideology Extremism and Restoring Biological Truth to the Federal Government", or federal Executive Order No. 14173, 90 Fed. Reg. 8633 (January 31, 2025) "Ending Illegal Discrimination and Restoring Merit-Based Opportunity". Sec. 228. The department shall use the same precontract risk assessment program utilized by the department of technology, management, and budget to evaluate financial compliance, security risks, and insurance requirements prior to contract execution. Sec. 250. (1) The department may expend amounts remaining from the current and prior fiscal year appropriations to meet funding needs of the environmental cleanup and redevelopment program, environmental cleanup support, contaminated site remediation and redevelopment programs, contaminated site cleanup, contaminated site cleanup contingency reserve, premcor remediation activities, PFAS remediation grant program, the renew Michigan program, the refined petroleum product cleanup program, brownfield grants and loans, waterfront grants, and the environmental bond site reclamation program. (2) Unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining from appropriations from the clean Michigan initiative fund - response 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 activities contained in 2011 PA 63, 2013 PA 59, 2014 PA 252, 2015 PA 84, 2016 PA 268, 2017 PA 107, and 2025 PA 22 are appropriated for expenditure. (3) Unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining from appropriations from the refined petroleum fund activities contained in 2013 PA 59, 2014 PA 252, 2015 PA 84, 2016 PA 268, 2017 PA 107, 2018 PA 207, 2019 PA 57, 2020 PA 166, 2021 PA 87, 2022 PA 166, 2023 PA 119, 2024 PA 121, and 2025 PA 22 are appropriated for expenditure. (4) Unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining from the appropriations from the strategic water quality initiatives fund contained in 2011 PA 50, 2011 PA 63, 2012 PA 200, 2013 PA 59, 2014 PA 252, 2015 PA 84, 2016 PA 268, 2017 PA 107, and 2018 PA 207, are appropriated for expenditure. (5) For the strategic water quality initiatives fund, funds not yet disbursed are appropriated for expenditure for the same program under sections 5201, 5202, and 5204e of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.5201, 324.5202, and 324.5204e. (6) Unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining from the appropriations from the renew Michigan fund contained in 2018 PA 207, 2019 PA 57, 2020 PA 166, 2021 PA 87, 2022 PA 166, 2023 PA 119, 2024 PA 121, and 2025 PA 22 are appropriated for expenditure. (7) Unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining from the appropriations from the contaminated site cleanup contingency fund contained in 2021 PA 87 and 2022 PA 166, are appropriated for expenditure. (8) Unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining from the appropriations from the cleanup and redevelopment fund contained in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 2022 PA 166, 2023 PA 119, 2024 PA 121, and 2025 PA 22 are appropriated for expenditure. Sec. 252. (1) Semiannually, the department shall prepare a report that contains information regarding all remediation and redevelopment efforts funded from part 1. (2) The report must contain the following information: (a) List of sites where work is planned to occur, including the county for each site. (b) The type of site, whether refined petroleum cleanup, nonrefined petroleum cleanup, brownfield, or a combination of types. (c) A brief description of how the issue will be addressed, including whether contractors will be utilized. (d) The estimated date for project completion. (e) The amount and funding source or sources allocated to the site. (3) The report must be submitted to the senate and house of representatives subcommittees on the environment, Great Lakes, and energy and the state budget director. Sec. 253. The department shall submit a report to the senate and house of representatives standing committees and appropriations subcommittees with primary responsibility for issues under the jurisdiction of the department that details departmental activities of the most recent fiscal year in administering permitting programs. The report must include, at a minimum, all of the following: (a) The number of FTEs assigned to each permitting program and the number of unfilled positions at the beginning and end of the most recent fiscal year. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) The number of permit applications received by the department in the preceding year, including applications for new and increased uses and reissuances. (c) The number of permits for each program approved. (d) The number of permits for each program denied. (e) The percentage and number of permit applications that were reviewed for administrative completeness within statutory time frames. (f) The percentage and number of permit applications for which a final action was taken by the department within statutory time frames for new and increased uses and reissuances. (g) Activities to reduce any backlog of permits that exceed the statutory time frames and the average time frame for permit approvals for each program. (h) Activities to reduce the percentage of permit applications submitted as incomplete, in need of modification, or additional information before final determination. (i) Under conditions in which the department states a permit is incomplete or denied, the department shall provide an explanation as to the reason or reasons the permit is insufficient and how the permit can be strengthened or made complete. Sec. 254. If the department responds to a significant incident to protect life or property, as soon as possible and within 24 hours after the department responds to the significant incident, the department shall notify, in writing, the senate and house of representatives members whose district includes the site. Sec. 255. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used by the department to promulgate a rule that will apply to small businesses and have a disproportionate economic impact on small 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 businesses because of the size of those businesses if the department fails to reduce the disproportionate economic impact of the rule on small businesses as provided under section 40 of the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.240. (2) As used in this section: (a) "Rule" means that term as defined under section 7 of the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.207. (b) "Small business" means that term as defined under section 7a of the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.207a. Sec. 256. The department must issue permits in accordance with each permit's statutory timeline and shall report progress under this section to the standard report recipients on a quarterly basis. Sec. 257. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall annually update the permitting guidebooks funded in 2025 PA 22 and annually submit updated paper copies to the standard report recipients. Sec. 258. (1) To the extent allowed under state and federal law, applicants shall receive a 10% discount on permit fees for every 30 days a permit review process remains incomplete beyond the permit application review time frame as defined in statute or administrative rules. (2) The department shall report quarterly on the fiscal impact of discounts given under this section to the standard report recipients. REMEDIATION AND REDEVELOPMENT DIVISION Sec. 302. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 contaminated site remediation and redevelopment programs, emergency cleanup actions, and environmental cleanup and redevelopment program are designated as work project appropriations, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the projects is to provide contaminated site cleanup. (b) The projects will be accomplished by utilizing contracts with service providers. (c) The total estimated cost of all projects is identified in each line-item appropriation. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030. Sec. 304. (1) In addition to the money appropriated in part 1, the department may receive and expend money from the subaccounts of the cleanup and redevelopment fund as described under section 20108 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.20108, including the environmental response fund or the natural resource damages fund, to provide funding for actions by the department that are authorized by a court of competent jurisdiction and set forth in a final court order or judgment in an action to which the department is a party. (2) Not later than January 30, the department shall submit a report to the appropriations subcommittees, the fiscal agencies, and the state budget office that provides a summary of the expenditures incurred under this section during the preceding fiscal year. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 305. It is the intent of the legislature to repay the refined petroleum fund for the $70,000,000.00 that was transferred to the environmental protection fund created in section 503a of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.503a, as part of the resolution for the fiscal year 2006-2007 budget. WATER RESOURCES DIVISION Sec. 402. The department shall report the following to the standard report recipients: (a) The number of permit application decision appeals filed in the previous fiscal year. (b) The number of permit applications approved within 30 days, 60 days, 90 days, 6 months, and 1 year after an application is determined to be administratively complete. Sec. 405. If a certified health department does not exist in a city, county, or district or does not fulfill its responsibilities under part 117 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.11701 to 324.11721, then the department may spend funds appropriated in part 1 for drinking water and environmental health in accordance with section 11716 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.11716. Sec. 410. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall compile a report by November 1 of every fiscal year ending in an odd number on the status of the implementation plan for the western Lake Erie basin collaborative agreement. In an effort to learn more about the presence and timing of harmful algal blooms, the report must contain all of the following: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) An estimated cost of removal of total phosphorus per pound at the 4 major wastewater treatment plants. (b) A description of the grants that have been awarded. (c) A description of the work that has commenced on the issue of dissolved reactive phosphorus, the expected objectives and outcomes of that work, and a list of the parties involved in that effort. (d) A description of the efforts and outcomes aimed at the total phosphorus reduction for the River Raisin watershed. UNDERGROUND STORAGE TANK AUTHORITY Sec. 701. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for the underground storage tank cleanup program are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to provide underground storage tank cleanup. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing contracts with service providers. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $20,000,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2029. MATERIALS MANAGEMENT DIVISION Sec. 901. In addition to the money appropriated in part 1, the department may receive and expend money from the Volkswagen 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Environmental Mitigation Trust Agreement to provide funding for activities as outlined within the State's Mitigation Plan. The department shall prepare a report to the appropriations subcommittees, the fiscal agencies, and the state budget office by February 1, 2027 of the expenditures incurred under this section during the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026. WATER INFRASTRUCTURE Sec. 951. The funds appropriated in part 1 for lead service line replacement must be used to support water infrastructure projects, including, but not limited to, lead service line replacement and associated activities, drinking water projects, wastewater management, or stormwater management to promote coordinated water infrastructure work. Sec. 952. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for water state revolving funds, a minimum of 25% of the funds must be awarded to communities with populations of less than 20,000. ARTICLE 5 GENERAL GOVERNMENT part 1 line-item appropriations FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the legislature, the executive, the department of the attorney general, the department of state, the department of treasury, the department of technology, management, and budget, the department of civil rights, and certain state purposes related to those branches and departments for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, from the following funds: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 TOTAL GENERAL GOVERNMENT APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 44.0 Full-time equated classified positions 6,988.9 ï¿½ï¿½ Full-time employees 6,971.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Limited-term employees 386.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Noncareer/per diem employees 138.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Part-time employees 4.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Permanent-intermittent employees 4.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Seasonal employees 2.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 4,664,556,200 Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 864,156,200 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,800,400,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 29,790,600 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 14,864,500 Total private revenues 1,917,700 Total other state restricted revenues 2,714,961,600 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,038,865,600 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF ATTORNEY GENERAL (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 626.4 ï¿½ï¿½ Full-time employees 595.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Limited-term employees 37.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Noncareer/per diem employees 29.0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 ï¿½ï¿½ Part-time employees 2.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Permanent-intermittent employees 0.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Seasonal employees 0.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 118,609,400 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 39,899,600 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 78,709,800 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 10,710,500 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 961,400 Total other state restricted revenues 30,893,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 36,144,900 (2) ATTORNEY GENERAL OPERATIONS Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 626.4 Attorney general $ 112,500 Unclassified salaries--FTEs 5.0 993,100 Alcohol and gambling enforcement--FTEs 15.6 2,881,800 Assistance with convictions and expungements--FTEs 27.0 4,133,500 Child elder family financial crimes--FTEs 18.8 5,008,900 Child support enforcement--FTEs 22.9 3,938,600 Children and Youth Services--FTEs 26.6 5,300,000 Civil rights and elections--FTEs 11.0 2,152,300 Collections--FTEs 14.2 2,775,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Corporate oversight--FTEs 44.0 8,352,400 Corrections--FTEs 36.6 7,015,900 Criminal appellate and parole appeals--FTEs 15.6 2,054,800 Criminal investigations--FTEs 42.1 2,759,900 Criminal trials--FTEs 33.9 8,479,100 Departmentwide employee economic adjustments 1,636,700 Environment, natural resources and agriculture--FTEs 31.1 5,852,900 Executive office--FTEs 7.0 1,232,900 Finance--FTEs 10.1 2,315,600 Fiscal management--FTEs 8.2 1,082,100 Health care fraud--FTEs 32.0 6,208,900 Health education and family services--FTEs 34.0 5,591,100 Human resources--FTEs 6.4 961,400 Labor--FTEs 31.1 5,233,800 Licensing and regulation--FTEs 35.8 4,876,000 Office of communications--FTEs 8.2 1,017,400 Office of legislative affairs--FTEs 1.8 362,800 Opinions review board--FTE 1.0 284,500 Public administration--FTEs 2.7 418,900 Public service division--FTEs 12.8 2,438,300 Revenue and tax--FTEs 24.7 5,256,300 Sexual assault law enforcement--FTEs 5.0 1,493,700 Solicitor general--FTEs 3.7 1,444,300 Special litigation--FTEs 4.6 2,091,900 State operations--FTEs 39.5 8,286,500 Transportation--FTEs 9.2 2,544,400 Victim rights/victim services--FTEs 9.2 1,168,300 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 117,756,500 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from MDOC 745,700 IDG from MDE 832,000 IDG from EGLE 2,468,400 IDG from MDHHS, health policy 332,100 IDG from MDHHS, human services 7,049,000 IDG from MDHHS, medical services administration 792,000 IDG from MDHHS, WIC 380,100 IDG from MDIFS, financial and insurance services 1,644,800 IDG from LEO, Michigan occupational safety and health administration 213,100 IDG from LEO, workforce development 102,300 IDG from MDLARA, bureau of marijuana regulatory agency 2,562,700 IDG from MDLARA, fireworks safety fund 92,300 IDG from MDLARA, health professions 3,187,600 IDG from MDLARA, licensing and regulation fees 803,700 IDG from MDLARA, remonumentation fees 118,600 IDG from MDLARA, securities fees 788,600 IDG from MDLARA, unlicensed builders 1,209,000 IDG from MDMVA 185,100 IDG from MDOS, children's protection registry 45,000 IDG from MDOT, comprehensive transportation fund 112,600 IDG from MDOT, state aeronautics fund 196,900 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 IDG from MDOT, state trunkline fund 2,269,800 IDG from MDSP 291,400 IDG from MDTMB 1,371,100 IDG from MDTMB, civil service commission 347,900 IDG from MDTMB, risk management revolving fund 1,424,900 IDG from MILEAP 1,024,500 IDG from Michigan state housing development authority 1,305,800 IDG from Michigan strategic fund 203,800 IDG from treasury 7,798,800 Federal revenues: DAG, state administrative match grant/food stamps 137,000 Federal funds 3,858,500 HHS, medical assistance, medigrant 425,900 HHS-OS, state Medicaid fraud control units 6,289,100 Special revenue funds: Criminal property seizures 961,400 Antitrust enforcement collections 869,600 Attorney general's operations fund 4,127,800 Attorney general support fund 8,112,200 Auto repair facilities fees 376,900 Franchise fees 434,900 Game and fish protection fund 693,300 Human trafficking commission fund 170,000 Liquor purchase revolving fund 1,673,900 Michigan employment security act - administrative fund 2,550,700 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Michigan merit award trust fund 550,800 Michigan opioid healing and recovery 203,100 Mobile home code fund 278,600 Prisoner reimbursement 804,300 Public utility assessments 2,255,900 Reinstatement fees 293,600 Retirement funds 1,184,600 Second injury fund 680,500 Self-insurers security fund 414,700 Silicosis and dust disease fund 119,800 State building authority revenue 135,100 State casino gaming fund 2,018,700 State lottery fund 397,800 Utility consumer representation fund 1,974,300 Waterways account 156,300 Worker's compensation administrative revolving fund 415,600 State general fund/general purpose $ 35,292,000 (3) INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY Information technology services and projects $ 852,900 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 852,900 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 852,900 Sec. 103. DEPARTMENT OF CIVIL RIGHTS (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 160.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Full-time employees 98.0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 ï¿½ï¿½ Limited-term employees 88.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Noncareer/per diem employees 2.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Part-time employees 0.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Permanent-intermittent employees 0.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Seasonal employees 0.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 23,263,500 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 23,263,500 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 3,427,700 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 18,700 Total other state restricted revenues 58,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 19,758,600 (2) CIVIL RIGHTS OPERATIONS Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 160.0 Unclassified salaries--FTEs 6.0 $ 829,500 Complaint investigation and enforcement--FTEs 102.0 14,301,600 Departmentwide employee economic adjustments 504,600 Disability rights and compliance--FTEs 11.0 1,729,000 Division on deaf, deafblind, and hard of hearing--FTEs 6.0 761,400 Executive office--FTEs 26.0 2,665,300 Public affairs--FTEs 15.0 1,697,600 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 22,489,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: EEOC, state and local antidiscrimination agency contracts 1,768,500 HUD, grant 1,651,700 Special revenue funds: Private revenues 18,700 State restricted indirect funds 58,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 18,991,600 (3) INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY Information technology services and projects $ 774,500 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 774,500 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: EEOC, state and local antidiscrimination agency contracts 7,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 767,000 Sec. 104. EXECUTIVE OFFICE (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 10.0 Full-time equated classified positions 86.2 ï¿½ï¿½ Full-time employees 0.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Limited-term employees 79.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Noncareer/per diem employees 0.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Part-time employees 0.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Permanent-intermittent employees 0.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Seasonal employees 0.0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 9,890,200 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 9,890,200 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 9,890,200 (2) EXECUTIVE OFFICE OPERATIONS Full-time equated unclassified positions 10.0 Full-time equated classified positions 86.2 Unclassified salaries--FTEs 8.0 $ 1,720,800 Governor 159,300 Lieutenant governor 111,600 Executive office--FTEs 86.2 7,898,500 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 9,890,200 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 9,890,200 Sec. 105. LEGISLATURE (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 242,076,800 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 7,668,900 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 234,407,900 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 488,900 Total other state restricted revenues 6,815,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 227,103,500 (2) LEGISLATURE Senate $ 52,837,900 Senate automated data processing 3,339,300 Senate fiscal agency 5,054,500 House of representatives 77,597,300 House automated data processing 3,339,300 House fiscal agency 5,054,500 Legislative security 735,700 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 147,958,500 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 147,958,500 (3) LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL Legislative corrections ombudsman $ 1,657,900 Legislative council 17,221,200 Legislative service bureau automated data processing 3,880,800 Michigan veterans' facility ombudsman 385,300 Sentencing commission 100 Office of tribal legislative liaison 522,700 Worker's compensation 185,200 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 23,853,200 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 23,853,200 (4) LEGISLATIVE RETIREMENT SYSTEM Actuarially determined contribution $ 100 General nonretirement expenses 6,565,500 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 6,565,600 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Court fees 1,527,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 5,037,800 (5) PROPERTY MANAGEMENT Binsfeld Office Building and other properties $ 10,313,400 Cora Anderson Building 7,135,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 17,448,600 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 17,448,600 (6) STATE CAPITOL HISTORIC SITE Bond/lease obligations $ 100 General operations 6,872,800 Restoration, renewal, and maintenance 4,020,500 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 10,893,400 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Private - gifts and bequests 488,900 State general fund/general purpose $ 10,404,500 (7) DIGITAL OVERSIGHT OFFICE Digital oversight office $ 2,700,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,700,000 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Lawsuit settlement proceeds fund 2,700,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (8) OFFICE OF THE AUDITOR GENERAL Unclassified positions $ 453,200 Field operations 32,204,300 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 32,657,500 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG, commercial mobile radio system emergency telephone fund 46,900 IDG, contract audit administration fees 85,900 IDG, deferred compensation funds 118,300 IDG, emp ben div postemployment life insurance benefit 24,000 IDG from LEO, self-insurers security fund 101,400 IDG from DHHS, human services 39,800 IDG from MDLARA, liquor purchase revolving fund 137,600 IDG from MDMVA, Michigan veterans' facility authority 109,600 IDG from MDOT, comprehensive transportation fund 49,200 IDG from MDOT, Michigan transportation fund 399,800 IDG from MDOT, state aeronautics fund 38,700 IDG from MDOT, state trunkline fund 928,600 IDG, legislative retirement system 41,900 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 IDG, Michigan economic development corporation 159,500 IDG, Michigan education trust fund 76,600 IDG, Michigan finance authority 323,700 IDG, Michigan justice training commission fund 61,700 IDG, Michigan strategic fund 261,100 IDG, office of retirement services 937,700 IDG, other restricted funding sources 26,800 IDG, pension schedules of employer allocations funds 127,600 IDG, single audit act 3,484,100 IDG, state sponsored group insurance fund 88,400 Special revenue funds: 21st century jobs trust fund 122,200 Brownfield development fund 35,700 Game and fish protection account 39,800 MDTMB, civil service commission 225,300 Michigan state housing development authority fees 143,900 Michigan veterans' trust fund 2,000 Michigan veterans' trust fund income and assessments 23,000 Motor transport revolving fund 9,300 Office services revolving fund 12,900 State disbursement unit, office of child support 72,600 State services fee fund 1,886,700 Waterways account 14,300 State general fund/general purpose $ 22,400,900 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Sec. 106. DEPARTMENT OF STATE (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 1,477.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Full-time employees 1,480.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Limited-term employees 25.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Noncareer/per diem employees 2.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Part-time employees 0.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Permanent-intermittent employees 0.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Seasonal employees 0.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 249,314,200 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 249,314,200 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 1,460,000 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 50,100 Total other state restricted revenues 239,104,300 State general fund/general purpose $ 8,699,800 (2) DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 118.0 Secretary of state $ 112,500 Unclassified salaries--FTEs 5.0 600,100 Departmentwide employee economic adjustments 4,504,300 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Executive direction--FTEs 27.0 5,165,900 Operations--FTEs 91.0 27,191,900 Property management 10,508,700 Worker's compensation 139,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 48,222,600 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Abandoned vehicle fees 239,800 Auto repair facilities fees 181,000 Children's protection registry fund 274,400 Driver fees 2,593,300 Enhanced driver license and enhanced official state personal identification card fund 3,529,900 Expedient service fees 17,400 Marine safety fund 17,300 Mobile home commission fees 1,600 Motorcycle safety fund 2,900 Personal identification card fees 101,900 Scrap tire fund 78,600 Transportation administration collection fund 40,664,400 Vehicle theft prevention fees 9,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 511,100 (3) LEGAL SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 163.0 Operations--FTEs 163.0 $ 24,483,100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 24,483,100 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Auto repair facilities fees 3,250,600 Driver education provider and instructor fund 150,000 Driver fees 1,658,500 Enhanced driver license and enhanced official state personal identification card fund 2,902,200 Reinstatement fees - operator licenses 598,500 Transportation administration collection fund 15,174,700 Vehicle theft prevention fees 748,600 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (4) CUSTOMER DELIVERY SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 1,117.0 Branch operations--FTEs 827.0 $ 99,789,100 Central operations--FTEs 288.0 50,826,000 Motorcycle safety education administration--FTEs 2.0 598,200 Motorcycle safety education grants 1,940,700 Organ donor program 51,900 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 153,205,900 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: Federal revenues: DOT 860,000 OHSP 600,000 Special revenue funds: Private funds 100 Thomas Daley gift of life fund 50,000 Abandoned vehicle fees 450,900 Auto repair facilities fees 763,700 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Child support clearance fees 100,000 Driver fees 22,881,500 Driver improvement course fund 800,000 Enhanced driver license and enhanced official state personal identification card fund 14,577,300 Expedient service fees 2,996,700 Marine safety fund 1,579,000 Michigan state police auto theft fund 123,000 Mobile home commission fees 511,200 Motorcycle safety and education awareness fund 293,500 Motorcycle safety fund 1,945,400 Off-road vehicle title fees 170,700 Parking ticket court fines 518,400 Personal identification card fees 2,399,500 Recreation passport fee revenue 1,000,000 Reinstatement fees - operator licenses 1,028,200 Snowmobile registration fee revenue 390,000 Transportation administration collection fund 98,379,000 Vehicle theft prevention fees 786,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,800 (5) ELECTION REGULATION Full-time equated classified positions 79.0 County clerk education and training fund $ 66,000 Election administration and services--FTEs 79.0 23,335,400 Fees to local units 1,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 23,402,600 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Election administration support fund 14,949,700 Notary education and training fund 66,000 Notary fee fund 200,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 8,186,900 Sec. 107. DEPARTMENT OF TECHNOLOGY, MANAGEMENT, AND BUDGET (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 2,948.8 ï¿½ï¿½ Full-time employees 3,082.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Limited-term employees 115.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Noncareer/per diem employees 70.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Part-time employees 2.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Permanent-intermittent employees 3.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Seasonal employees 0.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,407,465,300 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 804,302,000 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 603,163,300 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 4,493,200 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 3,094,500 Total private revenues 354,300 Total other state restricted revenues 125,169,900 State general fund/general purpose $ 470,051,400 (2) DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 894.3 Unclassified salaries--FTEs 6.0 $ 1,134,600 Administrative services--FTEs 142.3 23,569,400 Budget and financial management--FTEs 194.0 43,332,700 Building operation services--FTEs 275.0 116,395,600 Business support services--FTEs 97.0 16,689,900 Design and construction services--FTEs 54.0 9,861,500 Departmentwide employee economic adjustments 5,983,000 Executive operations--FTEs 32.5 5,556,100 Michigan center for data and analytics--FTEs 38.0 6,933,200 Motor vehicle fleet--FTEs 38.0 107,494,600 Office of the state employer--FTEs 9.0 1,678,300 Property management 10,117,000 State archives--FTEs 14.5 2,134,900 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 350,880,800 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from accounting service centers user charges 6,937,300 IDG from building occupancy and parking charges 119,583,000 IDG from MDHHS 759,100 IDG from MDLARA 100,000 IDG from motor transport fund 107,598,800 IDG from technology user fees 15,347,600 IDG from user fees 10,101,800 Federal revenues: Federal funds 4,493,200 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Special revenue funds: Local funds 35,000 Local - MPSCS subscriber and maintenance fees 59,100 Private funds 354,300 Deferred compensation 100,600 Health management funds 443,200 Other agency charges 1,329,600 Pension trust funds 362,600 SIGMA user fees 2,156,100 Special revenue, internal service, and pension trust funds 24,316,700 State restricted funds 1% 408,700 State restricted indirect funds 3,856,300 State sponsored group insurance 165,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 52,372,000 (3) TECHNOLOGY SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 1,387.5 Enterprise user experience--FTEs 14.0 $ 4,260,500 Homeland security initiative/cyber security--FTEs 53.0 20,206,400 Information technology investment fund 3,765,500 Information technology services--FTEs 1,190.5 538,785,600 Michigan public safety communication system--FTEs 130.0 51,511,500 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 618,529,500 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from technology user fees 538,785,600 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Special revenue funds: Local - MPSCS subscriber and maintenance fees 3,000,400 State general fund/general purpose $ 76,743,500 (4) STATEWIDE APPROPRIATIONS Professional development fund - AFSCME $ 10,900 Professional development fund - MPE, SEIU, scientific and engineering unit 33,700 Professional development fund - MPE, SEIU, technical unit 900 Professional development fund - NEREs 200,000 Professional development fund - UAW 110,400 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 355,900 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from employer contributions 355,900 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (5) SPECIAL PROGRAMS Full-time equated classified positions 209.0 Michigan digital service office--FTEs 15.0 $ 3,708,500 Office of the child advocate--FTEs 21.0 4,018,000 Property management executive 1,496,000 Retirement services--FTEs 173.0 26,334,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 35,556,500 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Deferred compensation 5,246,600 Pension trust funds 21,014,600 State general fund/general purpose $ 9,295,300 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 (6) STATE BUILDING AUTHORITY RENT State building authority rent - community colleges $ 38,116,500 State building authority rent - state agencies 81,465,200 State building authority rent - universities 142,153,900 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 261,735,600 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 261,735,600 (7) CIVIL SERVICE COMMISSION Full-time equated classified positions 458.0 Agency services--FTEs 108.0 $ 18,243,700 Employee benefits--FTEs 28.0 6,323,100 Executive direction--FTEs 32.0 9,911,500 Human resources operations--FTEs 290.0 39,620,800 Information technology services and projects 6,099,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 80,198,900 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: State restricted funds 1% 29,977,900 State restricted indirect funds 14,310,600 State sponsored group insurance 11,390,400 State general fund/general purpose $ 24,520,000 (8) CAPITAL OUTLAY Enterprisewide special maintenance for state facilities $ 24,000,000 Major special maintenance, remodeling, and addition for state agencies 3,800,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 27,800,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from building occupancy charges 3,800,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 24,000,000 (9) INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY Information technology services and projects $ 26,408,100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 26,408,100 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from building occupancy and parking charges 723,200 IDG from user fees 209,700 Special revenue funds: Deferred compensation 2,600 Pension trust funds 3,259,500 SIGMA user fees 2,037,700 Special revenue, internal service, and pension trust funds 2,706,500 State restricted indirect funds 2,083,900 State general fund/general purpose $ 15,385,000 (10) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS EMS health strategies fund $ 6,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 6,000,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 6,000,000 Sec. 108. DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 10.0 Full-time equated classified positions 1,690.5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 ï¿½ï¿½ Full-time employees 1,716.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Limited-term employees 42.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Noncareer/per diem employees 35.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Part-time employees 0.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Permanent-intermittent employees 1.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Seasonal employees 2.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,613,936,800 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 12,285,700 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,546,074,400 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 9,699,200 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 11,770,000 Total private revenues 44,300 Total other state restricted revenues 2,312,920,400 State general fund/general purpose $ 267,217,200 (2) DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Full-time equated unclassified positions 10.0 Full-time equated classified positions 374.5 Unclassified salaries--FTEs 10.0 $ 1,013,100 Bureau of accounting and financial services--FTEs 67.0 9,835,100 Bureau of operational excellence--FTEs 23.0 4,363,100 Collections services bureau--FTEs 137.0 28,819,600 Department services--FTEs 67.0 10,151,400 Departmentwide employee economic adjustments 3,403,300 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Executive direction and operations--FTEs 21.5 5,048,700 Office of security and data risk management--FTEs 27.0 4,079,700 Property management 6,992,600 Unclaimed property--FTEs 32.0 5,681,800 Worker's compensation 15,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 79,403,600 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenue: IDG, data/collection services fees 339,100 IDG, fiscal agent service fees 400 IDG from accounting service center user charges 424,900 IDG from MDHHS, title IV-D 846,500 IDG, levy/warrant cost assessment fees 3,774,400 IDG from MDOT, Michigan transportation fund 55,700 IDG, state agency collection fees 2,574,100 Federal revenues: DED-OPSE, federal lenders allowance 540,700 DED-OPSE, higher education act of 1965, insured loans 579,400 HHS-SSA, low-income energy assistance 8,300 Special revenue funds: Local - assessor training fees 1,300 Local - audit charges 8,100 Local - city income tax fund 273,800 Brownfield redevelopment fund 400 Casino gambling agreements 10,500 Delinquent tax collection revenue 42,750,500 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Equine development fund 9,600 Escheats revenue 5,767,700 Fantasy contest fund 3,500 Garnishment fees 2,915,500 Insurance provider fund 11,300 Internet gaming fund 169,300 Internet sports betting fund 27,900 Justice system fund 458,800 Land reutilization fund 1,700 Marihuana regulation fund 1,352,900 Marihuana regulatory fund 197,300 MFA, bond and loan program revenue 704,100 Municipal finance fees 9,000 Qualified heavy equipment rental personal property exemption reimbursement fund 2,600 Retirement funds 155,500 School bond fees 15,600 State building authority revenue 8,600 State lottery fund 1,125,200 State restricted indirect funds 288,900 State services fee fund 749,500 Tobacco tax revenue 24,400 Treasury fees 66,900 State general fund/general purpose $ 13,149,700 (3) LOCAL GOVERNMENT PROGRAMS Full-time equated classified positions 79.0 Flint settlement payment $ 35,000,000 Local finance--FTEs 14.0 2,309,500 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Michigan infrastructure council 3.0 3,031,400 Property tax assessor training--FTE 1.0 702,800 Supervision of the general property tax law--FTEs 61.0 16,839,100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 57,882,800 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenue: IDG from MDOT, Michigan transportation fund 254,700 Special revenue funds: Local - assessor training fees 702,800 Local - audit charges 623,500 Local - equalization study charge-backs 40,000 Local - revenue from local government 100,000 Delinquent tax collection revenue 1,667,600 Land reutilization fund 2,073,800 Municipal finance fees 353,300 State general fund/general purpose $ 52,067,100 (4) TAX PROGRAMS Full-time equated classified positions 674.0 Bottle act implementation $ 250,000 Home heating assistance 3,026,100 Insurance provider assessment program--FTEs 6.0 955,700 Living donor tax credit 750,000 Office of revenue and tax analysis--FTEs 23.0 4,034,900 Tax and economic policy--FTEs 69.0 10,604,900 Tax compliance--FTEs 223.0 42,193,400 Tax processing--FTEs 342.0 46,210,200 Tobacco tax enforcement--FTEs 11.0 1,632,800 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 109,658,000 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenue: IDG from MDOT, Michigan transportation fund 2,894,100 IDG from MDOT, state aeronautics fund 72,200 Federal revenues: HHS-SSA, low-income energy assistance 3,026,100 Special revenue funds: Bottle deposit fund 250,000 Brownfield redevelopment fund 213,800 Comprehensive road funding fund 500,000 Delinquent tax collection revenue 74,033,100 Insurance provider fund 955,700 Marihuana regulation fund 2,665,700 Marihuana regulatory fund 119,300 Qualified heavy equipment rental personal property exemption reimbursement fund 422,900 Tobacco tax revenue 4,277,300 Waterways account 107,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 20,120,700 (5) FINANCIAL PROGRAMS Full-time equated classified positions 113.0 Investments--FTEs 80.0 $ 22,751,500 State and authority finance--FTEs 10.0 3,492,500 Student financial assistance programs--FTEs 23.0 4,954,500 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 31,198,500 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenue: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 IDG, fiscal agent service fees 215,200 Federal revenues: DED-OPSE, federal lenders allowance 3,429,300 DED-OPSE, higher education act of 1965, insured loans 1,525,200 Special revenue funds: Defined contribution administrative fee revenue 300,000 MFA, bond and loan program revenue 1,666,800 Retirement funds 17,409,900 School bond fees 938,500 Treasury fees 5,271,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 442,500 (6) DEBT SERVICE Clean Michigan initiative $ 7,098,000 Great Lakes water quality bond 89,761,000 Quality of life bond 620,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 97,479,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 97,479,000 (7) GRANTS Convention facility development distribution $ 125,017,900 Election administration support fund 14,949,700 Emergency 911 payments 49,147,300 Qualified heavy equipment rental personal property exemption reimbursement distribution 27,000,000 Recreational marihuana grants 51,575,500 Senior citizen cooperative housing tax exemption program 12,215,500 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Wrongful imprisonment compensation fund 2,800,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 282,705,900 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Convention facility development fund 125,017,900 Counties, equally 911 fund 9,701,700 Counties, per capita 911 fund 14,553,100 Marihuana regulation fund 51,575,500 Public safety answer point (PSAP) training 911 fund 2,092,500 Qualified heavy equipment rental personal property exemption reimbursement fund 27,000,000 Reimburse local exchange providers 911 fund 21,300,000 State police administrator and coordinator 911 fund 900,000 State police dispatch operator 911 fund 600,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 29,965,200 (8) BUREAU OF STATE LOTTERY Full-time equated classified positions 194.0 Lottery information technology services and projects $ 1,928,900 Lottery operations--FTEs 194.0 33,454,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 35,383,100 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: State lottery fund 35,383,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (9) CASINO GAMING 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Full-time equated classified positions 203.0 Casino gaming control operations--FTEs 179.0 $ 42,660,500 Gaming information technology services and projects 2,685,000 Horse racing--FTEs 4.0 890,400 Michigan gaming control board 84,400 Millionaire party regulation--FTEs 20.0 3,190,100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 49,510,400 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Casino gambling agreements 1,025,300 Equine development fund 1,011,200 Fantasy contest fund 1,082,600 Internet gaming fund 15,939,500 Internet sports betting fund 3,011,600 State services fee fund 27,440,200 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (10) PAYMENTS IN LIEU OF TAXES Commercial forest reserve $ 3,269,800 Purchased lands 13,235,600 Swamp and tax reverted lands 22,031,100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 38,536,500 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Private funds 44,300 Game and fish protection account 3,846,300 Michigan natural resources trust account 3,618,700 Waterways account 417,700 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 State general fund/general purpose $ 30,609,500 (11) REVENUE SHARING City, village, and township revenue sharing $ 379,386,000 Constitutional state general revenue sharing grants 1,045,337,700 County revenue sharing 310,889,200 Financially distressed cities, villages, or townships 2,500,000 Public safety revenue sharing grants 60,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,798,112,900 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Sales tax 1,788,112,900 State general fund/general purpose $ 10,000,000 (12) STATE BUILDING AUTHORITY Full-time equated classified positions 4.0 State building authority--FTEs 4.0 $ 1,026,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,026,200 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: State building authority revenue 1,026,200 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (13) CITY INCOME TAX ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM Full-time equated classified positions 49.0 City income tax administration program--FTEs 49.0 $ 7,746,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 7,746,000 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Local - city income tax fund 7,746,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (14) INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY Treasury operations information technology services and projects $ 25,293,900 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 25,293,900 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenue: IDG from MDOT, Michigan transportation fund 834,400 Federal revenues: DED-OPSE, federal lenders allowance 590,200 Special revenue funds: Local - city income tax fund 2,274,500 Delinquent tax collection revenue 6,469,200 Marihuana regulation fund 778,200 Retirement funds 829,700 Tobacco tax revenue 134,200 State general fund/general purpose $ 13,383,500 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations for fiscal year 2026-2027 general sections Sec. 201. (1) In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963 for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is $3,753,827,200.00 and state spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $2,155,772,000.00. The following itemized statement identifies 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 appropriations from which spending to local units of government will occur: DEPARTMENT OF STATE Election administration and services $ 10,000,000 Fees to local units 500 Motorcycle safety education grants 1,415,900 Subtotal $ 11,416,400 DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY Airport parking distribution pursuant to section 909 $ 46,000,000 City, village, and township revenue sharing 379,386,000 Commercial forest reserve 3,269,800 Constitutional state general revenue sharing grants 1,045,337,700 Convention facility development fund distribution 125,017,900 County revenue sharing 310,889,200 Emergency 9-1-1 payments 49,147,300 Financially distressed cities, villages, or townships 2,500,000 Public safety revenue sharing grants 56,750,000 Purchased lands 13,235,600 Qualified heavy equipment rental personal property exemption reimbursement distribution 27,000,000 Recreational marihuana grants 51,575,500 Senior citizen cooperative housing tax exemption 12,215,500 Swamp and tax reverted lands 22,031,100 Subtotal $ 2,144,355,600 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 TOTAL $ 2,155,772,000 (2) In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, in the appropriations acts for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, total state spending from state sources is estimated at $43,747,623,200.00 and total state spending from state sources to be paid to local units of government is estimated at $26,635,211,300.00. The proportion of total state spending from state sources to be paid to local units is estimated at 60.9%. (3) If payments to local units of government and state spending from state sources for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 are different than the amounts estimated in subsection (2), the state budget director shall report the payments to local units of government and state spending from state sources that were made for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 to the standard report recipients and to the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations not later than 30 days after the final book-closing for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027. Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1: (a) "COBRA" means the consolidated omnibus budget reconciliation act of 1985, Public Law 99-272. (b) "DAG" means the United States Department of Agriculture. (c) "DED" means the United States Department of Education. (d) "DED-OPSE" means the DED Office of Postsecondary Education. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (e) "EEOC" means the United States Equal Employment Opportunity Commission. (f) "FTE" means full-time equated. (g) "Geographically disadvantaged business enterprise" means a geographically-disadvantaged business enterprise as that term is defined by Executive Directive No. 2023-1. (h) "GF/GP" means general fund/general purpose. (i) "HHS" means the United States Department of Health and Human Services. (j) "HHS-OS" means the HHS Office of the Secretary. (k) "HHS-SSA" means the Social Security Administration. (l) "HUD" means the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development. (m) "IDG" means interdepartmental grant. (n) "JCOS" means the joint capital outlay subcommittee. (o) "MCL" means the Michigan Compiled Laws. (p) "MDE" means the Michigan department of education. (q) "MDHHS" means the Michigan department of health and human services. (r) "MDIFS" means the Michigan department of insurance and financial services. (s) "MDLARA" means the Michigan department of licensing and regulatory affairs. (t) "MDLEO" means the Michigan department of labor and economic opportunity. (u) "MDMVA" means the Michigan department of military and veterans affairs. (v) "MDOC" means the Michigan department of corrections. (w) "MDOS" means the Michigan department of state. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (x) "MDOT" means the Michigan department of transportation. (y) "MDSP" means the Michigan department of state police. (z) "MDTMB" means the Michigan department of technology, management, and budget. (aa) "MEDC" means the Michigan economic development corporation, which is the public body corporate created under section 28 of article VII of the state constitution of 1963 and the urban cooperation act of 1967, 1967 (Ex Sess) PA 7, MCL 124.501 to 124.512, by contractual interlocal agreement effective April 5, 1999, between local participating economic development corporations formed under the economic development corporations act, 1974 PA 338, MCL 125.1601 to 125.1636, and the Michigan strategic fund. (bb) "MEGA" means the Michigan economic growth authority. (cc) "MFA" means the Michigan finance authority. (dd) "MPE" means the Michigan public employees. (ee) "MPSCS" means the Michigan public safety communications system. (ff) "MSF" means the Michigan strategic fund. (gg) "NERE" means nonexclusively represented employees. (hh) "PA" means public act. (ii) "RFP" means a request for a proposal. (jj) "SEIU" means Service Employees International Union. (kk) "SIGMA" means statewide integrated governmental management applications. (ll) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house appropriations committees, the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on general government, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (mm) "WIC" means women, infants, and children. Sec. 204. If the state administrative board, acting under section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount appropriated under part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and serving in each house, intertransfer funds within part 1 for the particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution. Sec. 205. (1) A department or agency shall use the internet to fulfill the reporting requirements of this part and shall make each report readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each required report in a single archivable location on the department's or agency's website not later than the due date required for each report. (2) In addition to placing all reports required in the current fiscal year on the department's or agency's website, a department or agency shall maintain on its website all reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years posted by fiscal year in the same single archivable location. (3) A department or agency shall transmit all required reports for the current fiscal year to the standard report recipients and any other required recipients by email. The email shall include a copy of the report and a link to access the report online. Sec. 206. A department or agency shall receive and retain copies of all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. A department or agency shall follow federal and state law and guidelines for short-term and long-term retention of records. A department or agency shall electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required by federal and state guidelines. Sec. 207. (1) A department or agency shall cooperate with the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 MDTMB to maintain a searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following for the department or agency: (a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category. (b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit. (c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor, including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and payment description. (2) A department or agency shall cooperate with the MDTMB to update the searchable website on a quarterly basis. Sec. 208. Not later than December 15, the state budget office shall prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the total GF/GP appropriation lapses at the close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the projected year-end GF/GP appropriation lapses by major departmental program or program areas. Sec. 209. Not later than 14 days after the release of the executive budget recommendation, a department or agency shall cooperate with the state budget office to provide an annual report on estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the previous 2 fiscal years. Sec. 210. Not later than November 15, a department or agency shall report on private and other third-party funds received by the department or agency in the previous fiscal year. The report must include the amount of funding received, the specific source of funding received, the purpose for which funding was expended, and the amount of any remaining funds. Sec. 211. Consistent with section 217 of the management and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, a department or agency shall prepare a report on out-of-state travel expenses by not later than January 1. The report must list all travel outside this state by classified and unclassified employees in the previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or in part with funds appropriated in the department's or agency's budget. The report must include all of the following information: (a) The dates of each travel occurrence. (b) The total transportation and related costs of each travel occurrence and the proportions funded with state GF/GP revenues, state restricted revenues, federal revenues, local revenues, and private revenues, including specific sources of state restricted, federal, local, and private revenues. (c) The destination of each travel occurrence. (d) The specific purpose and description of each travel occurrence, including the specific name of the event or meeting. Sec. 212. On a quarterly basis, a department or agency and the office of the auditor general shall report on all of the following: (a) The number of full-time equated positions in pay status by civil service classification. (b) A comparison by line item of the number of full-time equated positions authorized from funds appropriated in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated positions employed by the department or agency at the end of the reporting period. (c) The number of active employees in each of the following statuses: (i) Full-time salary. (ii) Full-time hourly. (iii) Part-time. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (iv) Permanent-intermittent. (v) Limited-term. (vi) Seasonal. (vii) Worker's compensation. (viii) Noncareer/per diem. (ix) Job share. (x) Special personal services/contractual. (d) The number of overtime hours worked by employees, by classifications. Sec. 213. Not later than April 1, a department or agency shall report on each specific policy change made to implement a public act affecting the department or agency that took effect during the previous calendar year. The report must include reference to the public act that necessitates the policy change. The department or agency shall submit the report to the standard report recipients, to the senate and house standing committees responsible for addressing issues affected by the public acts, and to the joint committee on administrative rules. Sec. 214. (1) Not later than April 1, a department or agency shall maintain, on a publicly accessible website, a department or agency scorecard that identifies, tracks, and updates on a quarterly basis key metrics that are used to monitor and improve the department's or agency's performance. (2) A department or agency shall notify the standard report recipients when the quarterly updates to the department or agency scorecard are available on a publicly accessible website. Sec. 215. (1) Unless specifically authorized elsewhere in this part or part 1, funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to pay for a state obligation that exceeds $200,000.00 for a court- 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim without prior legislative approval. (2) If a state obligation for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim results in a change from current statute, the relevant department or agency shall notify the legislature. (3) This section does not apply to compensation and other relief to individuals wrongfully imprisoned as required under the wrongful imprisonment compensation act, 2016 PA 343, MCL 691.1751 to 691.1757. Sec. 218. To the extent possible, a department or agency shall not expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted. Sec. 219. A department or agency shall submit reports that summarize all work project accounts not later than December 31, March 30, June 30, and September 30. The reports must include all of the following: (a) A list of all work project accounts. (b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each account. (c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously designated work project accounts, the name and description of the work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed amounts. Sec. 220. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are available. (b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. (c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. Sec. 221. A department or agency shall not take disciplinary action against an employee of the department or agency because the employee communicates with a member of the legislature or legislative staff unless the communication is prohibited by law and the department or agency is exercising its authority as provided by law. Sec. 222. (1) A department or agency shall maximize the efficiency of the state workforce and utilization and occupancy of office space, leased or owned, for each division within the department. Employees with job responsibilities that require employees to serve in their capacities outside of an office shall be monitored each pay period to ensure all work hours reported on timesheets are actually worked. (2) A department or agency shall comply with requirements set forth by the office of the state employer on in-person work and utilization and occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure at least 80% of employees are in person and building occupancy and utilization rates are at least 80% or higher. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (3) A department or agency shall submit reports not later than January 15 and April 15 on all of the following: (a) Remote work policy by division. (b) Building occupancy by address. (c) Whether the building is state-owned or leased. (d) Aggregate badge scanning information by employee. (4) As used in this section, "occupancy" means the actual number of employees physically present in a workplace. Sec. 223. (1) A department or agency shall require as a condition of each contract or subcontract that the prequalified contractor or prequalified subcontractor agree to use the E-Verify system to verify that all persons hired during the contract term by the contractor or subcontractor are legally present and authorized to work in the United States. (2) A department or agency may verify this information directly or may require contractors and subcontractors to verify the information and submit a certification to the department or agency. A department or agency shall submit a report not later than March 1 that describes the processes it has developed and implemented under this section. (3) A department or agency shall not contract with any foreign entities that are known or suspected to be enemies of the United States or known foreign adversaries. Foreign adversaries include all of the following: (a) The People's Republic of China. (b) The Russian Federation. (c) The Islamic Republic of Iran. (d) The Democratic People's Republic of Korea. (e) The Republic of Cuba. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (f) The Venezuelan regime of Nicolï¿½s Maduro. (g) The Syrian Arab Republic. (h) An agency or other entity under significant control of a country described in subdivisions (a) to (g). (4) As used in this section, "E-Verify" means an internet-based system operated by the Department of Homeland Security, United States Citizenship and Immigration Services in partnership with the Social Security Administration. Sec. 224. (1) Within 30 days of enactment of this act, the state budget office shall post a list of legislatively directed spending items funded in part 1 as defined in sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. The list must include all information and documents pertaining to the funded items as publicly disclosed in accordance with sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. (2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency administering the grant shall submit a report not later than November 1. The department or agency shall update the report and shall submit updated reports not later than March 15 and September 15 of the current fiscal year. The department or agency shall include in the report the most comprehensive information the department or agency has available at the time of posting for grants awarded, including, but not limited to, project milestones, percent completed, funding expended, and funding encumbered. (3) Before executing a grant agreement, all grant recipients must provide a spending plan that specifies the scope of service, the program goals, the measurement for meeting program goals, and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 how all grant funds will be used, and must indicate if any grant funds will be provided to a third party or subrecipient. (4) Each department or agency responsible for awarding or disbursing grant funds must annually audit the entity's use of the grant funds for each fiscal year in which the grant is active. Each entity must submit information requested by the department or agency to confirm compliance. (5) Each department or agency shall work with the office of the auditor general to conduct an audit of the grant according to generally accepted accounting practices and audit standards. The office of the auditor general must be given access to all internal and external records. All contracts or agreements between a department or agency and a grant recipient or between a grant recipient and a third party must include a clause granting the office of the auditor general access to all internal and external records. (6) Grant recipients and their immediate family members are prohibited from being employed by the executive branch or legislative branch of this state. In addition, grant recipients are prohibited from serving on any state board that has direct or indirect responsibility for approving or auditing grant funds awarded or disbursed by any department or agency. (7) Full and complete audits of grant funds issued by the department or an agency of this state, without redaction unless required by law, must be posted to the department's or agency's website in a conspicuous place for public review. (8) On a quarterly basis, the department or agency shall submit a report on legislatively sponsored grant funds that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) The name of each grant recipient and the status of each grant. (b) The amount distributed to each grant recipient. (c) Any changes to scope or costs of program. (9) The report under subsection (8) must include the following statements made by the department or agency: (a) A statement that confirms the department or agency reviewed and affirmed compliance by each grant recipient with program scope and expenditure of grant funding. (b) A statement that confirms the department or agency reviewed applicable program reports and requests for reimbursement. Sec. 225. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, a department or agency shall do the following: (a) Report on any amounts of severance pay for a director, deputy director, or other high-ranking official of the department or agency not later than 14 days after a severance agreement with the director, deputy director, or official is signed. The name of the director, deputy director, or official and the amount of severance pay must be included in the report required by this subdivision. (b) Not later than February 1, report on the total amount of severance pay remitted to former department or agency employees during the previous fiscal year and the total number of former department or agency employees that were remitted severance pay during the previous fiscal year. (2) As used in this section, "severance pay" means compensation to which both of the following apply: (a) The compensation is payable or paid upon the termination of employment. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) The compensation is paid in addition to wages or benefits earned during the course of employment or generally applicable retirement benefits. Sec. 226. Funds appropriated in part 1 from state or federal sources are prohibited from being used to provide services, grants, or programming to an individual who is not a citizen of the United States unless the individual is a qualified alien as that term is defined in 8 USC 1641. This section does not prohibit a department, political subdivision, state university, or other state agency from expending funds for the purpose of detaining individuals who are not citizens of the United States, including any costs associated with housing such individuals in county jails or state correctional facilities. Sec. 227. State funds must not be used for diversity, equity, and inclusion, or diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives or programs, as outlined in federal Executive Order No. 14151, 90 Fed. Reg. 8339 (January 29, 2025) "Ending Radical and Wasteful Government DEI Programs and Preferencing", federal Executive Order No. 14168, 90 Fed. Reg. 8615 (January 30, 2025) "Defending Women from Gender Ideology Extremism and Restoring Biological Truth to the Federal Government", or federal Executive Order No. 14173, 90 Fed. Reg. 8633 (January 31, 2025) "Ending Illegal Discrimination and Restoring Merit-Based Opportunity". Sec. 228. A department or agency shall use the same precontract risk assessment program utilized by the MDTMB to evaluate financial compliance, security risks, and insurance requirements prior to contract execution. Sec. 250. Funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used by this state or a department, agency, or authority of this state to 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 purchase an ownership interest in a casino enterprise or a gambling operation as those terms are defined in the Michigan Gaming Control and Revenue Act, 1996 IL 1, MCL 432.201 to 432.226. Sec. 251. (1) In accordance with section 352 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1352, which provides for a transfer of state general fund revenue into or out of the countercyclical budget and economic stabilization fund, the calculations required by section 352 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1352, are determined as follows: 2025 2026 2027 Michigan personal income (millions) $672,972 $695,180 $720,207 ï¿½ï¿½ Less: transfer payments 151,408 157,704 158,089 ï¿½ï¿½ Subtotal $521,564 $537,476 $562,118 Divided by: Detroit Consumer Price ï¿½ï¿½ Index for 12 months ending December 31 2.979 3.078 3.17 Equals: real adjusted Michigan ï¿½ï¿½ personal income $175,089 $174,604 $177,311 Percentage change N/A 0.3% 1.6% Growth rate in excess of 2% N/A N/A N/A Equals: calculated transfer to countercyclical budget and economic stabilization fund for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026 (millions) N/A $0.0 Growth rate less than 0% N/A YES Appropriation from countercyclical budget and economic stabilization fund allowed for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 N/A $538.7 (2) Notwithstanding subsection (1), there is appropriated for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 from GF/GP revenue for 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 deposit into the countercyclical budget and economic stabilization fund the sum of $300,000,000.00. Sec. 252. (1) A department or agency that receives an appropriation in part 1 shall assign a product owner for each information technology project that the department or agency undertakes. (2) Beginning January 1, a product owner assigned to an information technology project with a budget of $5,000,000.00 or more must possess valid certification as a scrum master and be assigned full time to the information technology project. (3) As used in this section, "product owner" means an individual from the sponsoring department or agency who is responsible for maximizing the value of the product to be developed by the project and who is responsible for effective product backlog management. Responsibilities of a product owner include, but are not limited to, all of the following: (a) Developing and explicitly communicating the product goal. (b) Creating and clearly communicating product backlog items. (c) Prioritizing product backlog items. (d) Ensuring that the product backlog is transparent, visible, and understood. (e) Ensuring that there is frequent and effective communication among the project manager, vendor, and product owner to ensure collaboration in addressing all risks and issues as they arise. (f) Ensuring that product users are regularly engaged in the development process for testing and input on development of the product. Sec. 253. A department or agency that is appropriated funds in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 part 1 shall delegate all responsibility for the procurement, development, and maintenance of all information technology services to the MDTMB unless the department or agency is otherwise delegated the responsibility by law. Sec. 254. Funds appropriated in part 1 shall not be expended for electric vehicle charging stations. DEPARTMENT OF ATTORNEY GENERAL Sec. 301. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $750,000.00 for federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $750,000.00 for state restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $50,000.00 for local contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $50,000.00 for private contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 302. (1) The attorney general shall perform all legal services, including representation before courts and administrative agencies, rendering legal opinions, and providing legal advice to a principal executive department or state agency. A principal executive department or state agency shall not employ or enter into a contract with any other person for services described in this section. (2) The attorney general shall defend judges of all state courts if a claim is made or a civil action is commenced for injuries to persons or property caused by the judge through the performance of the judge's duties while acting within the scope of the judge's authority as a judge. (3) The attorney general shall perform the duties specified in 1846 RS 12, MCL 14.28 to 14.35, and 1919 PA 232, MCL 14.101 to 14.102, and as otherwise provided by law. Sec. 303. The attorney general may provide not more than 350 copies of the report required under section 30 of 1846 RS 12, MCL 14.30, on a gratis basis. If the attorney general provides 350 copies of the report on a gratis basis, the attorney general may sell additional copies of the report. The attorney general shall not provide gratis copies of the report to members of the legislature. Electronic copies of biennial reports must be made available on the department of attorney general's website. The attorney general shall sell copies of the report at not less than the actual cost of the report and deposit the money received from the sales into the general fund. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 304. The department of attorney general is responsible for the legal representation of the law of this state and the legal representation for state of Michigan state employee worker's disability compensation cases. The risk management revolving fund revenue appropriation in part 1 must be satisfied by billings from the department of attorney general for the actual costs of legal representation, including salaries and support costs. Sec. 307. (1) In addition to the antitrust enforcement collections revenues in part 1, not more than $350,000.00 in antitrust revenues, securities fraud revenues, consumer protection or class action enforcement revenues, or attorney fees recovered by the department of attorney general are appropriated to the department of attorney general for antitrust, securities fraud, and consumer protection or class action enforcement cases. (2) Not more than $1,000,000.00 of the unexpended funds from antitrust revenues, securities fraud revenues, or consumer protection or class action enforcement revenues at the end of the fiscal year, including antitrust funds in part 1, may be carried forward for expenditure in the following fiscal year. (3) On request, the department of attorney general shall make available information detailing the amount of revenue described in subsection (1) recovered by the attorney general and a description of the source of the revenue and the carryforward amount. Sec. 308. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, not more than $1,000,000.00 is appropriated from litigation expense reimbursements awarded to this state. (2) The funds described in subsection (1) may be expended for the payment of court judgments, settlements, arbitration awards or other administrative and litigation decisions, attorney fees, and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 litigation costs, assessed against the office of the governor, the department of attorney general, the governor, or the attorney general when acting in an official capacity as the named party in litigation against this state. The funds described in subsection (1) may also be expended for the payment of state costs incurred under section 16 of chapter X of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 770.16. (3) Unexpended funds at the end of the fiscal year may be carried forward for expenditure in the following year, but not more than a maximum authorization of $250,000.00. Sec. 309. (1) From the prisoner reimbursement funds appropriated in part 1, the department of attorney general may expend not more than $804,300.00 on activities related to the state correctional facility reimbursement act, 1935 PA 253, MCL 800.401 to 800.406. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, if the department of attorney general collects more than $1,131,000.00 in gross annual prisoner reimbursement receipts provided to the general fund, not more than $1,000,000.00 of the excess is appropriated to the department of attorney general and may be spent on the representation of the MDOC and its officers, employees, and agents, including, but not limited to, the defense of litigation in civil actions filed by prisoners against this state, its departments, officers, employees, or agents. (2) Not later than March 1, the department of attorney general shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the house of representatives and senate appropriations subcommittees with jurisdiction over the budget of the MDOC. The report must include all of the following: (a) The total amount of reimbursements received under section 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 6 of the state correctional facility reimbursement act, 1935 PA 253, MCL 800.406. (b) A description of each expenditure made from the reimbursements. (c) The amount paid to conduct the investigations from the reimbursements. (d) The amount credited to the general fund from the reimbursements. Sec. 310. (1) For the purposes of providing title IV-D child support enforcement funding, the attorney general shall maintain a cooperative agreement with the MDHHS, as the state IV-D agency, for federal IV-D funding to support the child support enforcement activities within the department of attorney general. (2) The attorney general or the attorney general's designee shall, to the extent allowed under federal law, have access to any information used by this state to locate parents who fail to pay court-ordered child support. Sec. 312. The department of attorney general shall not receive or expend funds, other than those authorized in part 1, for legal services provided specifically to other state departments or agencies except for expert witness costs, court costs, or other nonsalary litigation costs associated with a pending legal action. Sec. 313. The department of attorney general shall submit a quarterly report on the lawsuit settlement proceeds fund described in section 33 of 1846 RS 12, MCL 14.33, to the standard report recipients. Each report must include all of the following: (a) The total amount of revenue deposited in the lawsuit settlement proceeds fund in the current fiscal year delineated by case. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) The total amount appropriated from the lawsuit settlement proceeds fund in the current fiscal year delineated by appropriation. (c) Earned settlement proceeds that are anticipated but not yet deposited in the fund delineated by case. (d) Any known potential settlement amounts from cases that have not been decided, delineated by case. Sec. 315. Total authorized appropriations from all sources under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 are $10,220,500.00. From this amount, total department of attorney general appropriations for pension-related legacy costs are estimated at $10,220,500.00. Total department of attorney general appropriations for retiree health care legacy costs are estimated at $0.00. Sec. 316. (1) The department of attorney general shall work with the state budget director to lapse the remaining unexpended and unencumbered funds appropriated in 2024 PA 121 for sexual assault law enforcement and carried forward under work project account number 27302 and the remaining unexpended and unencumbered funds appropriated in 2023 PA 119 for sexual assault law enforcement and carried forward under work project account number 23989. From the work project lapse funds, $1,493,700.00 is appropriated to the department of attorney general to test backlogged sexual assault kits across this state. The funding provided in part 1 must be used for only 1 or more of the following purposes: (a) To eliminate all county sexual assault kit backlogs across this state. (b) To assist local prosecutors with investigations and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 prosecutions of viable sexual assault cases. (c) To provide victim services. (2) Not later than February 1, the department of attorney general shall submit a report to the standard report recipients. The report must include all of the following information: (a) The number of sexual assault kits across this state that remain untested as of January 31, 2027. (b) A detailed work plan that outlines the department of attorney general's action plan to eliminate all outstanding sexual assault kits and the time frame for completion of testing of all untested sexual assault kits. (c) A detailed work and spending plan that outlines anticipated litigation action and expenditures resulting from findings of the sexual assault kit testing. (3) Any funds remaining after the department of attorney general has met the obligations required under subsection (1) may be used for the purpose of retesting any previously tested sexual assault kits across this state using currently available DNA testing. Funds may be used under this subsection only for DNA testing on previously tested kits that were not tested for DNA. If there are remaining untested sexual assault kits on January 31, 2027, funds appropriated in part 1 must be used only for the testing of those kits. Sec. 317. (1) The department of attorney general shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the state budget director. The report must include all legal costs and associated expenses related to the declaration of emergency due to drinking water contamination and the investigations and any resulting prosecutions. The state budget director shall include the report in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the Flint water emergency-financial and activities tracking and reporting document that is posted by the state budget director on the public website, https://www.michigan.gov/budget/fiscal-pages/reports/flint. The tracking and reporting documents must include the budget line item source for each expenditure. (2) At the conclusion of all attorney general investigations related to the declaration of emergency due to drinking water contamination, all materials related to any investigations shall be preserved pursuant to applicable document retention policies. Sec. 318. Not later than November 30, the department of attorney general shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations. The report must include all of the following information: (a) The amount of expenditures by line item and work project account made for any investigation of Native American boarding schools itemized by purpose. (b) The number of FTEs assigned to each investigation described in subdivision (a) and the number of hours expended. (c) Information on the activities conducted for each investigation described in subdivision (a) and any contracted vendors. (d) The estimated date for completion of each investigation described in subdivision (a). Sec. 319. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the attorney general shall submit a quarterly report to the standard report recipients on the wrongful imprisonment compensation fund that includes at least all of the following: (a) All payments made from the wrongful imprisonment 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 compensation fund in each prior quarter of the fiscal year, and the total of those payments, including if each payment is part of a new settlement or part of an installment plan. (b) Total payments made from each prior fiscal year and the total of all payments to date. (c) Any settlements that have been decided but have yet to receive a payment. (d) The number of known cases seeking a settlement, but do not have a final judgment, and the dollar amount of each potential payment for these known cases, and the total of these payments. (e) The balance of the wrongful imprisonment compensation fund at the end of the previous quarter. (f) The percentage of claims received in the immediately preceding fiscal quarter that were awarded compensation. (g) The percentage of claims received in the immediately preceding fiscal year that were awarded compensation. (h) For claims that did not receive the full amount of compensation sought, both of the following: (i) The amount of compensation that was sought. (ii) The amount of compensation that was received. Sec. 320. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of attorney general shall do all of the following: (a) Not later than 14 days after the settlement of a lawsuit with a fiscal impact of $200,000.00 or more, submit a report on the settlement to the standard report recipients. (b) Enforce the laws of this state. (2) Any proceeds from a lawsuit initiated by or settlement agreement entered into on behalf of this state against a manufacturer of tobacco products or manufacturer or distributor of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 opioid products by the attorney general are state funds, unless otherwise directed by a court or legal agreement, and are subject to appropriation as provided by law. Sec. 321. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of attorney general shall maintain a publicly accessible website dedicated to opioid settlement distributions. The website must include estimated future amounts payable to local units of government and estimated amounts received by local units of government, delineated by case settlement agreement. Sec. 322. (1) Not later than February 1, the department of attorney general shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on the cumulative dollar expenditure amount related to each of the following initiatives and activities of the department of attorney general for the immediately preceding fiscal year: (a) Catholic church investigation. (b) Elder abuse task force. (c) Conviction integrity unit. (d) Opioid litigation. (e) Hate crimes unit and domestic terrorism unit. (f) Payroll fraud enforcement unit. (g) PFAS contamination. As used in this subdivision, "PFAS" means perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances. (h) Human trafficking. (i) Robocall enforcement. (j) Job court. (k) Organized retail crime unit. (l) Reducing utility rate increases. (m) Boy Scouts of America investigation. (n) Address confidentiality program. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (2) For each expenditure required to be reported under subsection (1), the report must include the dollar amount spent by fund source. (3) For each initiative listed under subsection (1), the department of attorney general shall provide a summary of activities, staffing levels, and outcomes as practicable. Sec. 324. (1) Not later than September 30, the department of attorney general must make available to the public on its website a report on the activities and findings, since April 1, 2019, of the payroll fraud enforcement unit. The report must include all of the following: (a) A list of each complaint received by the unit. (b) For each complaint listed under subdivision (a), whether the attorney general took enforcement action on the complaint and, if applicable, a description of the enforcement action. (2) If the payroll fraud enforcement unit requests that another department or agency investigate the validity of a report received by the unit, or if the unit refers a complaint to another department or agency, the department of attorney general shall request the department or agency to report back on the department's or agency's findings to enable the department of attorney general to comply with this section. Sec. 325. It is the intent of the legislature that from the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of attorney general shall not take any legal action or join or take part in any multistate lawsuit, lawsuit against the federal government, or lawsuit against any oil or gas entity except on appropriation or legislative transfer that is made for those purposes in accordance with section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 MCL 18.1393. Sec. 326. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of attorney general shall not contract for legal services or for the appointment of a special assistant attorney general with a person in which compensation and the repayment of costs to the person are contingent on the successful recovery of funds obtained in the litigation or services pursued under the terms of the contract. DEPARTMENT OF CIVIL RIGHTS Sec. 401. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,000,000.00 for federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $375,000.00 for private contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 402. (1) In addition to the appropriations contained in part 1, the department of civil rights may receive and expend not more than $600,000.00 in funds from local sources, private sources, or both, for all of the following purposes: (a) Developing and presenting training for employers on equal employment opportunity law and procedures. (b) Publishing and selling civil rights related informational 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 material. (c) Providing copies of material made available in response to requests under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (d) Paying other copy fees, subpoena fees, and witness fees. (e) Developing, presenting, and participating in mediation processes for certain civil rights cases. (f) Providing workshops, seminars, and recognition or award programs consistent with the programmatic mission of the individual unit sponsoring or coordinating the programs. (g) Paying staffing costs for all activities included in this subsection. (2) Not later than November 30, the department of civil rights shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations on the amount of funds received and expended for purposes authorized under this section. Sec. 403. (1) The department of civil rights may contract with local units of government to review equal employment opportunity compliance of potential and existing contractors and may charge for and expend amounts received from local units of government for the purpose of developing and providing these contractual services. (2) Not later than November 30, the department of civil rights shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations on the amount of funds received and expended for purposes authorized under this section. Sec. 404. The department of civil rights shall submit quarterly reports to the standard report recipients that include, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 but are not limited to, all of the following information for the immediately preceding fiscal quarter: (a) The number of all complaints received by the department by basis of complaint. (b) The number of certified complaint cases initiated by basis of complaint. (c) The number of certified complaint cases completed. (d) The final disposition of certified complaint case investigations. (e) The average number of days for a case to be completed after certification. (f) The number of FTE positions filled from the FTE authorization for complaint investigations and enforcement. (g) The number of open cases that have been open for more than 1 year. (h) The quotient of the number of certified cases completed divided by the number of filled FTE positions. (i) A listing of amounts awarded to claimants. Sec. 405. On submitting a report or complaint to the United States Commission on Civil Rights or any other federal department, the department of civil rights shall submit a copy of the report or complaint to the standard report recipients not later than the next business day. Sec. 406. From the funds appropriated in part 1, not later than November 30, the department of civil rights shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on all expenditures related to the Native American boarding school study. The report must include both of the following: (a) Information on the activities conducted for the study by 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the department of civil rights and any contracted university or entity. (b) Total expenditures to date. Sec. 407. The department of civil rights shall not expend funds appropriated in part 1 for disability rights and compliance on contracts with private or nonprofit service providers. Sec. 410. Total authorized appropriations from all sources under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 are $2,255,000.00. From this amount, total department of civil rights appropriations for pension-related legacy costs are estimated at $2,255,000.00. Total department of civil rights appropriations for retiree health care legacy costs are estimated at $0.00. LEGISLATURE Sec. 600. The senate, the house of representatives, or an entity within the legislative branch may receive, expend, and transfer funds in addition to those authorized in part 1. Sec. 601. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 to an entity within the legislative branch must not be expended or transferred to another account without written approval of the authorized agent of the legislative entity. If the authorized agent of the legislative entity notifies the state budget director of its approval of an expenditure or transfer before the year-end book-closing date for that legislative entity, the state budget director shall immediately make the expenditure or transfer. The authorized legislative entity must be designated by the speaker of the house of representatives for house entities, the senate majority leader for senate entities, and the legislative council for legislative 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 council entities. (2) Funds appropriated within the legislative branch, to a legislative council component, must not be expended by any agency or other subgroup included in that component without the approval of the legislative council. Sec. 602. The senate may charge rent and assess charges for utility costs. The amounts received for rent charges and utility assessments are appropriated to the senate for the renovation, operation, and maintenance of the Binsfeld Office Building. Sec. 604. (1) The appropriation in part 1 to the Michigan state capitol historic site includes funds to operate the legislative parking facilities in the capitol area. The Michigan state capitol commission shall establish rules regarding the operation of the legislative parking facilities. (2) The Michigan state capitol commission may collect a fee from state employees and the general public using certain legislative parking facilities. The revenues received from the parking fees are appropriated on receipt and must be allocated by the Michigan state capitol commission. (3) As used in this section, "Michigan state capitol commission" means the Michigan state capitol commission established in the Michigan state capitol historic site act, 2013 PA 240, MCL 4.1945. Sec. 606. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for Binsfeld Office Building and other properties are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to purchase equipment and services for building maintenance to ensure a safe and productive work environment. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $2,000,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2029. Sec. 608. In addition to funds appropriated in part 1, the Michigan capitol committee publications save the flags fund account may accept contributions, gifts, bequests, devises, grants, and donations. Those funds that are not expended in the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 do not lapse at the close of the fiscal year, and must be carried forward for expenditure in the following fiscal years. Sec. 611. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for senate, $250,000.00 must be allocated for an internship program. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for house of representatives, $250,000.00 must be allocated for an internship program. Sec. 612. It is the intent of the legislature that, from the funds appropriated in part 1, the Michigan state capitol commission established in section 5 of the Michigan state capitol historic site act, 2013 PA 240, MCL 4.1945, ensure that the Capitol Building is open for not less than 3 hours on Saturdays that are not state holidays. Sec. 615. Total authorized appropriations from all sources under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 30, 2027 are estimated at $15,046,800.00. From this amount, total legislature appropriations for pension-related legacy costs are estimated at $15,046,800.00. Total legislature appropriations for retiree health care legacy costs are estimated at $0.00. Sec. 616. (1) As used in this section: (a) "Office" means the digital oversight office created under this section. (b) "Officer" means the digital oversight officer appointed under this section. (c) "State agency" means a department, board, commission, office, agency, authority, or other unit of state government. (2) The office of digital oversight is created in the legislature from funds appropriated from part 1 for office of digital oversight. The office consists of the officer and staff the officer appoints to carry out the duties of the office. (3) The principal executive officer of the office is the digital oversight officer. The legislature, by a majority vote of the members elected to and serving in each house, shall appoint a digital oversight officer to serve for a term of 3 years. The officer may be removed for cause at any time by a 2/3 vote of the members elected to and serving in each house. (4) The office shall do all of the following: (a) Investigate information technology projects, services, and purchasing by state agencies. (b) Overtake, join, or collaborate with state agencies on information technology projects. (c) Support adoption of modern software development best practices, including agile development methodologies and open-source practices for the development and deployment of new and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 existing digital services. Practices must include advocacy of modern software development tools and practices, such as DevSecOps, modular contracting, user-centered design, iterative and incremental development, unified, development infrastructure, service-oriented architecture, open-source software, and modern best practices as described in the following 13 plays of the Digital Services Playbook published by the United States Digital Service: (i) Understand what people need. (ii) Address the whole experience, from start to finish. (iii) Make it simple and intuitive. (iv) Build the service using agile and iterative practices. (v) Structure budgets and contracts to support delivery. (vi) Assign 1 leader and hold that individual accountable. (vii) Bring in experienced teams. (viii) Choose a modern technology stack. (ix) Deploy in a flexible hosting environment. (x) Automate testing and deployments. (xi) Manage security and privacy through reusable processes. (xii) Use data to drive decisions. (xiii) Default to open. (d) Study innovative procurement practices to the acquisition of digital products by and for state departments and agencies, to facilitate the rapid provision of high-quality digital services that are based on users' needs and that comply with state best practices and policies regarding data privacy, security, and accessibility. (5) The office may commence an investigation or overtake, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 join, or collaborate on information technology projects on either of the following: (a) Receipt of a complaint from a state agency or an individual concerning an information technology project, service, or purchase by a state agency that is in danger of exceeding expected costs or deadlines, or where the product may fail to achieve desired outcomes. (b) The office's own initiative. (6) The office shall establish procedures for receiving and processing complaints and conducting investigations. (7) On request, a state agency shall give the office access to physical or electronic copies of all information, records, and documents in the possession of any state agency that the office considers necessary in an investigation concerning an information technology project, service, or purchase. (8) All of the following apply to confidential information obtained under this section: (a) The office is subject to the same duty of confidentiality imposed by law on the entity providing the confidential information. (b) The officer and office staff are subject to any civil or criminal penalties imposed by law for unlawfully disclosing that confidential information. (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, state officers and employees of all branches, departments, offices, boards, commissions, agencies, authorities, and institutions of this state are not subject to civil or criminal penalties imposed by state law for providing information requested by the office. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (9) This act does not authorize the office to access or examine records or information subject to the attorney-client privilege or executive privilege, or subject to a court order prohibiting disclosure of the content of the record or information. (10) All records of the office in connection with investigations are exempt from disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. LEGISLATIVE AUDITOR GENERAL Sec. 620. In accordance with section 53 of article IV of the state constitution of 1963, the auditor general shall conduct audits of the executive, judicial, and legislative branches. Sec. 622. From the funds appropriated in part 1 to the office of the auditor general, the auditor general's salary and the salaries of the remaining 2.0 FTE unclassified positions must be set by the speaker of the house of representatives, the senate majority leader, the house of representatives minority leader, and the senate minority leader. Sec. 623. Any audits, reviews, or investigations requested of the auditor general by the legislature or by legislative leadership, legislative committees, or individual legislators must include an estimate of the additional costs involved and, if those costs exceed $50,000.00, must provide supplemental funding. The auditor general shall determine whether to perform those activities in accordance with Operations Manual Policy No. 2-26. Sec. 625. A branch, department, office, board, commission, agency, authority, or institution of this state shall not deny the auditor general access to examine its confidential information. The auditor general is subject to the same duty of confidentiality 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 imposed by law on the entity providing the confidential information. Sec. 628. On a quarterly basis, the auditor general shall submit a report to the standard report recipients, the chairpersons of the senate and house of representatives appropriations committees, and the senate and house of representatives oversight committees that includes all of the following information related to projects initiated during the immediately preceding quarter: (a) Audit title. (b) Audit type. (c) Audit period. (d) Audit objectives. (e) Branch of government being audited. (f) Whether the auditor general or a contracted auditor is conducting the audit and, if a contracted auditor is conducting the audit, the identity of the contracted auditor. (g) Details regarding the reason for initiating the audit, including whether it was discretionary or required by statute. (h) Details regarding any similar audit the auditor general has completed in the past. (i) Estimated time frame for completion of the audit. (j) Estimated total auditor general resources necessary to complete the audit and release a report. Sec. 629. On a quarterly basis, the auditor general shall submit a report to the standard report recipients, the chairpersons of the senate and house of representatives appropriations committees, and the senate and house of representatives oversight committees that includes all of the following information for each project in progress during the immediately preceding quarter: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) Audit title. (b) Date the audit was initiated. (c) Audit status. (d) Estimated time frame for completion of the audit. (e) Details regarding the resources spent on the audit to date. (f) Estimated total auditor general resources necessary to complete the audit and release a report. Sec. 630. On a quarterly basis, the auditor general shall submit a report to the standard report recipients, the chairpersons of the senate and house of representatives appropriations committees, and the senate and house of representatives oversight committees that contains all of the following information for each project completed during the immediately preceding quarter: (a) Audit title. (b) Date the audit was initiated. (c) Date the audit report was released. (d) Results of the audit, including the number and type of findings. (e) Details regarding total auditor general resources spent on the audit. (f) To the extent authorized by law, details regarding any inquiry, tip, or request related to the audit that the auditor general received before initiating the audit. Sec. 631. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for field operations, the office of the auditor general shall conduct an audit of the secretary of state's systematic review of the voter rolls based on requirements under section 728. The office of the auditor general shall conduct the audit at least 1 time every 2 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 years beginning not later than the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027. The audit must include, but not be limited to, the review of the proper procedures, process followed, notifications, and verification that voter notification has been completed as required. DEPARTMENT OF STATE Sec. 701. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,500,000.00 for federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,500,000.00 for state restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $50,000.00 for local contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $100,000.00 for private contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 703. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the MDOS shall submit quarterly reports on record lookup fees to the standard report recipients. Each report must include the number of records sold and the revenues collected as authorized in section 208b of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.208b, section 7 of 1972 PA 222, MCL 28.297, and sections 80130, 80315, 81114, and 82156 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.80130, 324.80315, 324.81114, and 324.82156. Sec. 704. Funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to advertise or promote department of state activities through radio, audiorecorded messages, billboards, or other signage to the public. Sec. 705. (1) The MDOS may accept gifts, donations, contributions, and grants of money and other property from any private or public source to underwrite, in whole or in part, the cost of a departmental publication that is prepared and disseminated under the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923. A private or public funding source may receive written recognition in the publication and may furnish a traffic safety message, subject to approval of the MDOS, for inclusion in the publication. The MDOS may reject a gift, donation, contribution, or grant. The MDOS may furnish copies of a publication underwritten, in whole or in part, by a private source to the underwriter at no charge. (2) The MDOS may sell and accept paid advertising for placement in a departmental publication that is prepared and disseminated under the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 257.1 to 257.923. The MDOS may charge and receive a fee for any advertisement appearing in a departmental publication and shall review and approve the content of each advertisement. The MDOS may refuse to accept advertising from any person or organization. The MDOS may furnish a reasonable number of copies of a publication to an advertiser at no charge. (3) Pending expenditure, the funds received under this section must be deposited in the Michigan department of state publications fund created in section 211 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.211. Funds given, donated, or contributed to the MDOS from a private source are appropriated and allocated for the purpose for which the revenue is furnished. Funds granted to the MDOS from a public source are allocated and may be expended on receipt by the MDOS. The MDOS shall not accept a gift, donation, contribution, or grant if receipt is conditioned on a commitment of state funding at a future date. Revenue received from the sale of advertising is appropriated and may be expended on receipt by the MDOS. (4) Any unexpended revenues received under this section must be carried over into subsequent fiscal years and are available for appropriation for the purposes described in this section. (5) If the MDOS receives a gift, contribution, donation, or grant of money as authorized under section 705 of article 5 of 2025 PA 22, not later than March 1, the MDOS shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes all of the following information for the immediately preceding fiscal year: (a) The amount of gifts, contributions, donations, and grants of money received by the MDOS under section 705 of article 5 of 2025 PA 22. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) A list of the expenditures made from the amounts received by the MDOS as reported in subdivision (a). (c) A list of any gift, donation, contribution, or grant of property other than funding received by the MDOS under section 705 of article 5 of 2025 PA 22. (d) The total revenue received from the sale of paid advertising accepted under this section and a statement of the total number of advertising transactions. (6) In addition to copies delivered without charge as the secretary of state considers necessary, the MDOS may sell copies of manuals and other publications regarding the sale, ownership, or operation or regulation of motor vehicles, with amendments, at prices to be established by the secretary of state. As used in this subsection, the term "manuals and other publications" includes videos and proprietary electronic publications. All funds received from sales of these manuals and other publications must be credited to the Michigan department of state publications fund created in section 211 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.211. Sec. 707. Funds collected by the MDOS under section 211 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.211, are appropriated for all expenses necessary to provide for the costs of the publication described in section 211 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.211. Funds are allocated for expenditure when they are received by the department of treasury and do not lapse to the general fund at the end of the fiscal year. Sec. 708. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the MDOS shall use available balances at the end of the state fiscal year to provide payment to the MDSP in the amount of $332,000.00 for the services provided by the traffic accident records program as first 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 appropriated in 1990 PA 196 and 1990 PA 208. Sec. 709. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the MDOS may restrict funds from miscellaneous revenue to cover cash shortages created from normal branch office operations. The restricted amount must not exceed $50,000.00 of the total funds available in miscellaneous revenue. Sec. 710. The MDOS shall delegate all responsibility for the procurement, development, and maintenance of all information technology services and products to the MDTMB unless otherwise delegated the responsibility by law in an effort to streamline the procurement process and to ensure compliance with the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 711. Collector plate and fund-raising registration plate revenues collected by the MDOS are appropriated and allotted for distribution to the recipient university or public or private agency overseeing a state-sponsored goal when received. Distributions must occur on a quarterly basis or as otherwise authorized by law. Any revenues remaining at the end of the fiscal year do not lapse to the general fund and remain available for distribution to the university or agency in the next fiscal year. Sec. 713. (1) The MDOS, in collaboration with the Gift of Life Michigan or its successor federally designated organ procurement organization, may develop and administer a public information campaign concerning the Michigan organ donor program. (2) The MDOS may solicit funds from any private or public source to underwrite, in whole or in part, the public information campaign authorized by this section. The MDOS may accept gifts, donations, contributions, and grants of money and other property from private and public sources for this purpose. A private or 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 public funding source underwriting the public information campaign, in whole or in substantial part, shall receive sponsorship credit for its financial backing. (3) Funds received under this section, including grants from state and federal agencies, do not lapse to the general fund at the end of the fiscal year and remain available for expenditure for the purposes described in this section. (4) Funding appropriated in part 1 for the organ donor program must be used to produce a pamphlet regarding organ donations and to distribute the pamphlet with driver licenses and personal identification cards. The pamphlet must do both of the following: (a) Explain the organ donor program and encourage people to become donors by marking a checkoff on driver license and personal identification card applications. (b) Include a return reply form addressed to the gift of life organization. (5) Funding appropriated in part 1 for the organ donor program must be used to pay for return postage costs of the return reply form described in subsection (4)(b). (6) In addition to the appropriations in part 1, the MDOS may receive and expend funds from the organ and tissue donation education fund for administrative expenses. (7) Not later than March 1, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients. The report must include all of the following: (a) The amount of revenue collected by the MDOS under this section. (b) The purpose of each expenditure. (c) The amount of revenue carried forward. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 714. (1) Except as otherwise provided under subsection (2), not less than 180 days before closing a branch office or consolidating a branch office and not less than 60 days before relocating a branch office, the MDOS shall submit a report to the standard report recipients, the members of the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations, and legislators who represent affected areas. The report must include all of the following: (a) All analyses done regarding criteria for changes in the location of branch offices, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (i) Branch transactions. (ii) Revenue. (iii) The impact on citizens of the affected area, including information regarding additional distance to branch office locations resulting from the changes. (b) Detailed estimates of costs and savings that will result from the overall changes made to the branch office structure. (c) Detailed estimates of costs for new leased facilities and expansions of current leased space. (2) If the consolidation of a branch office is with another branch office that is located within the same local unit of government or the relocation of a branch office is to another location that is located within the same local unit of government, the MDOS is not required to submit a report under subsection (1). (3) As used in this section, "local unit of government" means a city, village, township, or county. Sec. 715. (1) Any service assessment collected by the MDOS from the user of a credit or debit card under section 3 of 1995 PA 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 144, MCL 11.23, may be used by the MDOS for necessary expenses related to that service and may be remitted to a credit or debit card company, bank, or other financial institution. (2) The service assessment imposed by the MDOS for credit and debit card services may be based on a percentage of each individual credit or debit card transaction or a flat rate per transaction, or both, scaled to the amount of the transaction. However, the department shall not charge any amount for a service assessment that exceeds the costs billable to the MDOS for the service assessment. (3) If there is a balance of service assessments received from credit and debit card services remaining on September 30, the balance may be carried forward to the following fiscal year and appropriated for the same purpose. (4) As used in this section, "service assessment" means costs associated with service fees imposed by credit and debit card companies and processing fees imposed by banks and other financial institutions. Sec. 716. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for branch operations, the department of state shall provide adequate in-person services as defined in section 1a of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1a. Sec. 717. (1) The MDOS may accept gifts, donations, or contributions of property from any private or public source to support, in whole or in part, the operation of a departmental function relating to licensing, regulation, or safety. The MDOS may recognize a private or public contributor for making the contribution. The MDOS may reject a gift, donation, or contribution. Any revenues received under this subsection may be 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 expended for the departmental functions relating to licensing, regulation, or safety. (2) The MDOS shall not accept a gift, donation, or contribution under subsection (1) if receipt of the gift, donation, or contribution is conditioned on a commitment of future state funding. (3) If the MDOS receives a gift, donation, or contribution of property as authorized under this section, not later than March 1, the MDOS shall submit a report to the standard report recipients. The report must include a list of each gift, donation, or contribution received by the department under subsection (1) for the immediately preceding calendar year. Sec. 718. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for election regulation, all money must be spent in accordance with the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.1 to 168.992, and the instructions, orders, and guidance of the secretary of state regarding the proper method for the conduct and administration of elections. Sec. 719. Not later than February 1, the MDOS shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on all funding allocated to counties, cities, and townships from funds appropriated in part 1 for election administration and services. The report must include the amount and purpose of each payment provided to a county, city, or township. Sec. 720. Not later than February 1, the secretary of state shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes all of the following information: (a) The total number of notices sent by the clerk under section 509aa(2) or (3) of the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 MCL 168.509aa, that were returned as undeliverable as described in section 509aa(4) of the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.509aa. (b) The total number of electors to whom the secretary of state mailed a notice under section 509aa(5) of the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.509aa. (c) The total number of each of the following: (i) Electors who changed residence and moved out of state. (ii) Electors who changed residence and moved in state. (iii) In-state duplicate voter registration records. (iv) Electors who are determined to be deceased. (d) The total number of electors who corrected their voter registration records after being mailed a notice by the secretary of state under section 509aa(5) of the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.509aa. (e) The number of possible improper votes cast by an elector at the preceding primary election referred to law enforcement by the secretary of state. (f) The number of possible improper votes cast by an elector at the immediately preceding general election referred to law enforcement by the secretary of state. Sec. 724. The MDOS shall reimburse a county, city, or township for allowable expenses not later than 60 days after the MDOS receives a bill for allowable expenses and all necessary documentation from the county, city, or township. Sec. 725. Total authorized appropriations from all sources under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 are estimated at $14,617,600.00. From this amount, total department of state appropriations for pension-related legacy costs 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 are estimated at $14,617,600.00. Total department of state appropriations for retiree health care legacy costs are estimated at $0.00. Sec. 727. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for election administration and services, the department of state shall not contract or spend funds appropriated in part 1 for third-party services related to multistate sharing of voter registration information that requires or allows for use of any voter-related information to be shared, sold, or used in any way other than to provide a cross-check verification of voter registration information and status with the department of state. (2) The department of state shall send a copy of any multistate cross-check agreement, contract, membership, memorandum of understanding, or the like to the house of representatives and senate standing committees on elections, the house of representatives and senate appropriations subcommittees on general government, and the house of representatives and senate appropriations committees. (3) The legislature may terminate any agreement, contract, membership, or memorandum of understanding described in this section if any requirements of this section are violated. (4) The department of state shall provide a semiannual report to the standard report recipients and to the chair of the house of representatives and senate standing committees on elections on the activities and voter records information sent and received or exchanged between or through the interstate compact. Sec. 728. (1) The department of state shall conduct a systematic review of the qualified voter file by comparing the department of state's driver license and state personal 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 identification card databases, legal presence documents received during identification transactions, information from the Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements Program of the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services under the United States Department of Homeland Security, or any other relevant program to verify the citizenship status and voter eligibility of registered electors in the qualified voter file. (2) The department of state shall conduct a systematic review to determine if any individuals currently included in the qualified voter file have been identified by the help America vote verification system as nonmatching with United States Social Security Administration records. The department of state shall make reasonable efforts to determine the eligibility of these individuals, including, but not limited to, sending a notice to a nonmatching individual, using available data provided by the federal government or other sources, seeking the assistance of appropriate federal, state, or local officials or agencies, and any other efforts the department of state determines are appropriate. (3) The department of state shall conduct a systematic review to identify individuals who have moved to another state or country and whose primary residence is no longer in Michigan. To conduct the review, the department of state shall use, in addition to current processes employed by the department of state, resources, including but not limited to, the national change of address program operated by the United States Postal Service and the qualified voter files of other states (4) The department of state shall notify each individual in the qualified voter file identified by the department of state's systematic reviews as potentially noneligible that the individual's 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 voter registration is in question and provide the individual the opportunity to respond before the individual's voter registration is cancelled or scheduled for cancellation after 2 federal elections as appropriate. (5) Not later than April 1, the department of state shall submit a report to the standard report recipients, the house of representatives and senate standing committees on elections, and the house of representatives and senate appropriations committees on the reviews conducted under this section and the findings. The report must include all of the following: (a) A summary of the systematic review process. (b) Any databases or resources used. (c) The number of noncitizen individuals with presence in the United States who have obtained a driver license or personal state identification card. (d) The number of individuals who are in the qualified voter file but have been identified as nonmatching to the United States Social Security Administration records. (e) The total number of individuals by each category, count of registration, date of registration, and source of registration. (6) This review must be conducted not less than every 2 years beginning not later than 2026 and not later than January 31 in every subsequent even-numbered year. DEPARTMENT OF TECHNOLOGY, MANAGEMENT, and BUDGET Sec. 801. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $2,000,000.00 for federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $4,000,000.00 for state restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $75,000.00 for local contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $50,000.00 for private contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 802. Any proceeds that exceed necessary costs incurred in conducting transfers, auctions, direct sales, or scrapping of state surplus property under section 267 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1267, are appropriated to the MDTMB to offset any costs incurred in the acquisition and distribution of surplus property. The MDTMB shall provide consolidated internet auction services through this state's contractors for all local units of government. Sec. 803. (1) The MDTMB may receive and expend funds in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 addition to those authorized by part 1 for maintenance and operation services provided specifically to other principal executive departments or state agencies, the legislative branch, the judicial branch, or private tenants, or provided in connection with facilities transferred to the operational jurisdiction of the MDTMB. (2) The MDTMB may receive and expend funds in addition to those authorized by part 1 for real estate, architectural, design, engineering, and project oversight services provided specifically to other principal executive departments or state agencies, the legislative branch, the judicial branch, universities, community colleges, or private tenants. (3) The MDTMB may receive and expend funds in addition to those authorized in part 1 for mail pickup and delivery services provided specifically to other principal executive departments and state agencies, the legislative branch, or the judicial branch. (4) The MDTMB may receive and expend funds in addition to those authorized in part 1 for purchasing services provided specifically to other principal executive departments and state agencies, the legislative branch, or the judicial branch. (5) Any revenue collected by the MDTMB from user fees under subsections (1) to (4) must be carried forward and does not lapse to the general fund at the close of the fiscal year. Sec. 805. To the extent a specific appropriation is required for a detailed source of financing included in part 1 for the MDTMB appropriations financed from special revenue and internal service and pension trust funds, or SIGMA user charges, the specific amounts are appropriated within the special revenue internal service and pension trust funds in portions not to exceed the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 aggregate amount appropriated in part 1. Sec. 807. Funding in part 1 for SIGMA must be funded by proportionate charges assessed against the respective state funds benefiting from the SIGMA project in the amounts determined by MDTMB. Sec. 808. (1) A deposit against the IDG from building occupancy and parking charges appropriated in part 1 must be collected, in part, from state agencies, the legislative branch, and the judicial branch based on estimated costs associated with maintenance and operation of buildings managed by MDTMB. To the extent excess revenue is collected due to estimates of building occupancy charges exceeding actual costs, the excess revenue may be carried forward into subsequent fiscal years for the purpose of returning funds to state agencies. (2) An appropriation in part 1 for building occupancy and parking charges may be increased to return excess revenue collected to state agencies. Sec. 809. On a biannual basis, the MDTMB shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on any revisions either individually or in the aggregate that increase or decrease current contracts by more than $250,000.00 for computer software development, hardware acquisition, or quality assurance. Sec. 810. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the MDTMB shall maintain an internet website that contains notice of all solicitations, invitations for bids, and requests for proposals over $50,000.00 that are issued by the MDTMB or by any state agency operating under delegated authority, except for solicitations up to $500,000.00 in accordance with the MDTMB policy regarding providing opportunities to Michigan small businesses, geographically 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 disadvantaged business enterprises, Michigan veteran-owned business, Michigan service disabled veteran-owned businesses, or Michigan recognized community rehabilitation organizations, or if the MDTMB determines and documents that it is in the best interest of this state. This information must appear on the first page of each department or state agency dashboard. (2) The MDTMB shall set the due date for acceptance of an invitation for bid or request for proposal to not less than 14 days after the notice is made available on the internet website described in subsection (1), unless the MDTMB determines and documents that a different due date is in the best interest of this state. (3) In addition to the requirements of this section, the MDTMB may advertise the solicitations, invitations for bids, and requests for proposals in any manner that the MDTMB determines is appropriate to give the greatest number of persons the opportunity to respond or make bids or requests for proposals. (4) A new request for a proposal that is publicly displayed on the internet website must include the proposal's corresponding department or agency. The internet website must allow for the searching of requests for proposals by department or agency. Sec. 811. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the MDTMB shall maintain a system that interfaces with other departments and agencies to track the performance of vendors in fulfilling contract obligations. The performance of these vendors must be recorded and used as a factor to determine future contracts awarded in the procurement process. Sec. 812. Total authorized appropriations from all sources under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 30, 2027 are estimated at $42,113,600.00. From this amount, total MDTMB appropriations for pension-related legacy costs are estimated at $42,113,600.00. Total MDTMB appropriations for retiree health care legacy costs are estimated at $0.00. Sec. 813. (1) Subject to subsection (7), funds in part 1 for motor vehicle fleet are appropriated to the MDTMB for administration and the acquisition, lease, operation, maintenance, repair, replacement, and disposal of state motor vehicles. (2) The funds described in subsection (1) must be funded by revenue from rates charged to principal executive departments and agencies for utilizing vehicle travel services provided by the MDTMB. Any revenue in excess of the amount appropriated in part 1 from the motor transport fund and any unencumbered funds are restricted revenues and may be carried over into the succeeding fiscal year. (3) The MDTMB shall, not later than 90 days after the close of the fiscal year, submit an annual report to the standard report recipients regarding the operation of the motor vehicle fleet. The report must include all of the following: (a) The number of vehicles assigned to, or authorized for use by, state departments and agencies. (b) The number of vehicles in the motor vehicle fleet. (c) The number of miles driven by fleet vehicles. (d) The number of gallons of fuel consumed by fleet vehicles. (e) A description of fleet garage operations. (f) The goods sold and services provided by the fleet garage. (g) The number of employees assigned to each fleet garage. (h) A comparison between the cost of electric vehicle battery charging and the cost of gasoline fuel. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (4) The information provided under subsection (3) may be adjusted during the fiscal year based on needs and cost savings to achieve the maximum value and efficiency from the state motor fleet. (5) The MDTMB may charge state agencies for fuel cost increases that exceed 10% of the budgeted price per gallon of motor vehicle fuels. The MDTMB shall notify state agencies, in writing or by email, not less than 30 days before implementing additional charges for fuel cost increases. Any revenue received from these charges is appropriated on receipt. (6) The state budget director, on notification to the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations, may adjust spending authorization and the IDG from motor transport fund in the MDTMB to ensure that the appropriations for motor vehicle fleet in the MDTMB budget equal the expenditures for motor vehicle fleet in the budgets for all executive branch agencies. (7) The funds described in subsection (1) must not be expended for the lease or purchase of electric or hybrid electric vehicles in the state fleet. All leases and purchases of state fleet vehicles must be for vehicles powered exclusively by internal combustion engines. Sec. 815. (1) The legal services fund is created within the state treasury. (2) Funds may be spent from the legal services fund only on appropriation, or legislative transfer pursuant to section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (3) Funds in the legal services fund at the close of the fiscal year remain in the legal services fund and do not lapse to the general fund. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (4) Subject to subsection (2), funds appropriated in this part for deposit into the legal services fund are available to provide support for major litigation involving the governor and the attorney general in their official capacities, and for securing outside legal advice, as identified by the attorney general, on major statewide issues not unique to a single department or agency. (5) The unexpended and unencumbered funds appropriated in 2021 PA 87 for legal services funding and carried forward under work project account number 17458, titled "legal services", or any subsequent reauthorization of the work project, are appropriated for deposit into the legal services fund created in subsection (1). (6) The MDTMB shall report quarterly to the standard report recipients on legal services fund expenditures. The report must itemize expenditures by case, purpose, and department involved and must include expenditures related to all previously appropriated funds. Sec. 816. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the office of the state employer shall work with all state departments and agencies to set requirements on in-person work and utilization and occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure at least 80% of employees are in-person and building occupancy and utilization rates are at least 80% or higher. As used in this section, "occupancy" means that term as defined in section 222(4). Sec. 820. The MDTMB shall post on its website and make available to the public a list of all parcels of real property owned by this state that are available for purchase. Sec. 821. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the office of retirement services within the MDTMB shall prepare a report by September 30 on the judges' retirement system, the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 military retirement system, the Michigan public school employees' retirement system, the state employees' retirement system, and the state police retirement system. The report must be submitted to the standard report recipients. (2) The report must include, but is not limited to, all of the following information for each of the retirement systems described in subsection (1): (a) A chart and table that details annual required contribution flow per year for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the subsequent 24 fiscal years. (b) Separate annual required contribution payment charts and tables for pension and other postemployment benefits. (c) Separate annual required contribution payment charts and tables for the current annualized rate of return, an annualized rate of return 50 basis points less than the current annualized rate of return, and an annualized rate of return 100 basis points less than the current annualized rate of return. (d) Separate annual required contribution payment charts and tables by normal cost and unfunded actuarial accrued liability. (e) A justification if the payroll growth assumption is maintained at or above 0% for any pension or OPEB plan. The report must include an analysis of active employee plan member forecasts. (3) The report must include the following items specific to the Michigan public school employees' retirement system: (a) A copy of the retirement plan election guide that is provided to new Michigan public school employees' retirement system hires as of the due date of the report. (b) The number of new Michigan public school employees' retirement system employees who entered the defined contribution 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 plan and pension plus II plan not later than 14 days after the end of the current fiscal year. (c) An explanation of how the retirement plan election guide explains that pension plus II members must pay 50% of any future unfunded actuarial accrued liability payments. (d) An explanation of how the retirement plan election guide explains that defined contribution plan members have annuity options that allow for guaranteed retirement income available through a private insurance company. (e) If any calculations are provided to plan members for expected retirement income, then the following items must be included: (i) An explanation of how the retirement plan election guide demonstrates a range of potential outcomes. (ii) The underlying assumptions the retirement plan election guide uses to calculate expected future retirement income. (iii) How underlying assumptions are disclosed in the guide. (4) The report must include the amount of money that each school district received, on a per pupil basis, in foundation allowances that was spent on Michigan public school employees' retirement system costs in the immediately preceding fiscal year. (5) The office of retirement services must post the most recent year's comprehensive annual financial report for each plan described in subsection (1) not later than 90 days after the end of the fiscal year. Sec. 822. Not later than January 1, the MDTMB shall submit a report to the standard report recipients related to the salaries of unclassified employees and gubernatorial appointees within all state departments and agencies. The report must enumerate each 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 unclassified employee and gubernatorial appointee and the employee's or appointee's annual salary rounded to the nearest thousand dollars. Sec. 822c. The funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to support any staff effort, projects, consultant expenses, or any other activity related to the development, financing, construction, operation, or implementation of the Gordie Howe International Crossing or any successor project unless the approval of the project is enacted into law. Sec. 822d. Not later than December 31, the MDTMB shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes all of the following: (a) The fee and rate schedules to be used by state departments and agencies for services, including information technology, provided by the MDTMB during the current fiscal year. (b) The changes from fees and rates charged in the immediately preceding fiscal year. (c) An explanation of the factors that justify each fee and rate increase described in subdivision (b). Sec. 822e. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the funds collected by the MDTMB for supplying census-related information and technical services, publications, statistical studies, population projections and estimates, and other demographic products are appropriated for all expenses necessary to provide the required services. These funds are available for expenditure when they are received and may be carried forward into the next fiscal year. (2) Not later than March 1, the MDTMB shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that provides the amount of revenue 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 collected by the MDTMB from the authorization in subsection (1) and the amount of revenue carried forward. Sec. 822g. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for business support services, not more than $1,200,000.00 must be used to expand a comprehensive supplier and provider risk and information subscription used for the pre-contract and monitoring risk assessment program to all state departments and agencies. The subscription must include access to real-time operational and financial signals to enable monitoring of vendors and providers on a daily basis. (2) All state departments and agencies shall subscribe to the subscription described in subsection (1) and must be given access to its services not later than November 1 to reduce fraud and risk when entering into contracts or any agreements with a vendor or provider. (3) Before entering into an agreement or contract, including those for legislatively directed spending items and services of attendance-based childcare providers, state departments and agencies shall submit the name of the vendor, entity, or provider through the risk assessment system described in subsection (1). MEMORIALS Sec. 822k. The MDTMB may receive and expend funds from the Vietnam veterans memorial monument fund in accordance with the Michigan Vietnam veterans memorial act, 1988 PA 234, MCL 35.1051 to 35.1057. The funds are appropriated and allocated when received by the MDTMB and may be expended on receipt. Sec. 822l. The Michigan veterans' memorial park commission may receive and expend money from any source, public or private, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 including, but not limited to, gifts, grants, donations of money, and government appropriations, for the purposes described in Executive Order No. 2001-10. The funds are appropriated and allocated when received by the Michigan veterans' memorial park commission and may be expended on receipt. Any deposit made under this section and any unencumbered funds are restricted revenues and may be carried over into subsequent fiscal years. Sec. 822m. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the MDTMB may receive and expend money from the Michigan law enforcement officers memorial monument fund in accordance with the Michigan law enforcement officers memorial act, 2004 PA 177, MCL 28.781 to 28.786. Any deposit made into the fund is restricted revenues and must be carried over into succeeding fiscal years. Sec. 822n. (1) A new request for proposals or other arrangements for the installation of solar energy projects, or the purchase of solar energy through utility voluntary green pricing programs authorized by the Michigan public service commission, for use at state-owned or state-leased facilities may consider the value of the life cycle carbon emissions in the manufacturing of the solar equipment as part of the selection process. Information requested through bidding processes and standards for the independent measurement and verification of life cycle carbon emissions, such as the Global Electronics Council's Electronic Product Environmental Assessment Tool, may be used in the selection process. (2) Not later than June 30, the MDTMB shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on the implementation of this section. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY Sec. 824. The MDTMB may enter into agreements to provide spatial information and technical services to other principal executive departments, state agencies, local units of government, and other organizations. The MDTMB may receive and expend funds in addition to those authorized in part 1 for providing information and technical services, publications, maps, and other products. The MDTMB may expend amounts received for salaries, supplies, and equipment necessary to provide informational products and technical services. Sec. 825. (1) The legislature shall have access to all historical and current data contained within SIGMA, or its predecessor, pertaining to state departments and to the judicial branch. (2) State departments shall have access to all historical and current data contained within SIGMA or its predecessor. Sec. 826. As used in this part and part 1, "information technology services" means services that involve all aspects of managing and processing information, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (a) Application and mobile development and maintenance. (b) Desktop computer support and management. (c) Cybersecurity. (d) Social media. (e) Mainframe computer support and management. (f) Cloud services support and management, including, but not limited to, infrastructure as a service, platform as a service, and software as a service. (g) Local area network support and management, including, but 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 not limited to, wired and wireless network build-out, support, and management. (h) Information technology project management. (i) Information technology procurement and contract management. (j) Telecommunication services, security, infrastructure, and support. (k) Server support and management. (l) Information technology planning and budget management. Sec. 827. (1) The MDTMB shall assess all subscribers of the Michigan public safety communications system reasonable access and maintenance fees and deposit the fees in the Michigan public safety communications systems fees fund. (2) All money received by the MDTMB under this section must be expended for the support and maintenance of the Michigan public safety communications system. (3) Any deposits made under this section and unencumbered funds are restricted revenues and must be carried forward into succeeding fiscal years. (4) The MDTMB shall prepare a report that indicates the amount of revenue collected under this section and expended for support and maintenance of the Michigan public safety communication system for the immediately preceding 6-month period. The report must be submitted to the standard report recipients not later than April 15. Sec. 828. Not later than 45 days after the end of the current fiscal year, the MDTMB shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes both of the following: (a) The estimated total amount of funding appropriated for 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 information technology services and projects, by funding source, for all principal executive departments and agencies for the immediately preceding fiscal year. (b) A listing of the expenditures made from the amounts received by the MDTMB as reported in subdivision (a). Sec. 829. The MDTMB shall prepare a report that analyzes and makes recommendations on the life cycle of information technology hardware and software. The report must be submitted to the standard report recipients not later than March 1. Sec. 830. (1) Any revenue collected from licenses issued under the antenna site management project shall be deposited in the antenna site management revolving fund created for this purpose in the MDTMB. The MDTMB may receive and expend money from the fund for costs associated with the antenna site management project, including the cost of a third-party site manager. Any excess revenue remaining in the fund at the close of the fiscal year must be proportionately transferred to the appropriate state restricted funds as designated in a PA or the state constitution of 1963. (2) An antenna must not be placed on any site under this section without complying with the respective local zoning codes and local unit of government processes. Sec. 831. If the MDTMB provides information technology services to a department or agency directly, the MDTMB shall submit a monthly invoice to the department or agency for the information technology services provided. If the MDTMB provides information technology services to a department or agency through a contracted vendor, the MDTMB shall submit an invoice to the department or agency not later than 45 days after the MDTMB receives approval to pay the vendor invoice. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 832. (1) The MDTMB shall inform the senate and house of representatives appropriations subcommittees on general government and the senate and house fiscal agencies not later than 30 days after learning of the proposal of a potential penalty proposed or the assessment of an actual penalty assessed by the federal government for failure of the Michigan child support enforcement system to achieve certification by the federal government. (2) If a potential penalty is proposed by the federal government, the MDTMB shall submit a report to the standard report recipients not later than 90 days after the date the potential penalty is proposed specifying the MDTMB's plans to avoid the assessment of an actual penalty and ensure federal certification of the Michigan child support enforcement system. Sec. 833. (1) The state budget director, on notification to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations, may adjust spending authorization and user fees in the MDTMB to ensure that the appropriations for information technology in the MDTMB equal the appropriations for information technology in the budgets for all executive branch agencies. (2) If, during the fiscal year, a supplemental appropriation or transfer is made under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393, to or from an information technology line item in an agency budget, there is appropriated an equal amount of user fees in the MDTMB to accommodate an increase or decrease in spending authorization. Sec. 834. (1) The MDTMB shall not contract with a vendor for a commercial-off-the-shelf product if the potential vendor would need to write software code to enable the product to meet the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 requirements and specifications of the applicable department or agency work procured under the contract and if 1 of the following conditions applies: (a) The contract would involve labor costs that exceed the base price of the commercial-off-the-shelf product, including, but not limited to, licensing and hosting fees. (b) The potential vendor is not able to provide more than 1 example of successful implementation of the offered commercial-off-the-shelf product. (2) As used in this section, "commercial-off-the-shelf product" means a software product that is commercially ready-made and available for sale, lease, or license to the general public. Sec. 835. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the MDTMB shall not enter into a contract with a vendor for software development services that has a value greater than $10,000,000.00 or that is effective for a period longer than 3 years except on appropriation or legislative transfer in accordance with section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 836. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for technology services, the department shall contract for independent verification and validation services for each information technology project that meets either of the following conditions: (a) The project has a contract value that is greater than $5,000,000.00. (b) The project has a contract value that is greater than $1,000,000.00 and 1 or more of the following conditions applies: (i) The project spans across more than 1 department or agency. (ii) The project involves multiple vendors. (iii) The project has an accelerated schedule. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (iv) The impact is high if the project were to fail or be delayed. (2) A contract for independent verification and validation services must require the independent verification and validation vendor to report on a monthly basis and 2 times each year. In addition to the MDTMB and sponsoring department or agency, all independent verification and validation reporting must be submitted to each technology vendor on the project and to the standard report recipients. Sec. 837. All information technology projects funded by appropriations in part 1 must do both of the following: (a) Use information technology project management best practices and services as defined or recommended by the enterprise portfolio management office of the MDTMB. (b) Comply with the requirements of the state unified information technology environment methodology as it applies to all information technology project management processes. Sec. 838. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for information technology investment fund must be used for the modernization of state information technology systems, improvement of this state's cybersecurity framework, and to achieve efficiencies. (2) The MDTMB shall develop a plan regarding the use of the funds appropriated in part 1 for the information technology investment fund. (3) The plan described in subsection (2) must include all of the following: (a) A description of proposed information technology investment projects. (b) The time frame for completion of the information 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 technology investment projects. (c) The initial budgeted amount for each project. (d) The number of employees assigned to implement each information technology investment project. (e) The contracts entered into for each information technology investment project. (f) Any other information the MDTMB considers necessary. (4) The MDTMB shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes the plan and the anticipated spending reductions or overages for each of the proposed information technology investment projects. The report must also include both of the following: (a) A comparison of the initial budgeted amounts and cumulative costs, both by project and in total for all projects. (b) The amount of any transfer of budgeted funds from 1 project to another. Sec. 840. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the MDTMB shall use the United States General Services Administration's Contract-Awarded Labor Category Tool for calculating expected labor costs for information technology software project contracts before soliciting bids, RFPs, or solutions for those contracts. (2) Each RFP for a contract described in subsection (1) must include a clear statement of objective that is not longer than 5 pages and that communicates all essential operational requirements of the contracted service. Sec. 841. (1) As used in this section: (a) "Chief digital service officer" means the individual appointed under subsection (13). (b) "Chief information officer" means that term as defined in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 section 2 of the cyber civilian corps act, 2017 PA 132, MCL 18.222. (c) "Department" means the department of technology, management, and budget. (d) "Digital service office" means the state digital service office created under this section. (e) "Director" means the director of the department. (f) "Product manager" means an individual from a state department or agency who is responsible for ensuring that the product developed from a software development project delivers measurable value to users and achieves strategic objectives through evidence-based decision-making and continuous user engagement. (2) The state digital service office is created within the department. (3) The digital service office shall implement this act. The digital service office shall exercise its powers, duties, functions, and responsibilities independently of the director. (4) The digital service office shall do both of the following: (a) Develop strategies and practices that aim to achieve the maximum effect on critical systems and programs. (b) Work to foster cultural change in the technology workforce of this state, conducive to implementing the adoption of modern software development strategies and practices, as described in subsection (7). (5) The digital service office shall advise and collaborate with the chief information officer, the department's central procurement office, the department's enterprise portfolio management office, and any office under the chief information officer to adopt modern software development strategies and practices, as described in subsection (7), for building and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 deploying technology and digital services that improve the lives of the residents of this state. (6) The digital service office shall advise and collaborate with the department's central procurement office and the director to study innovative procurement practices for the acquisition of digital products by and for state departments and agencies to facilitate the rapid provision of high-quality digital services that are based on users' needs and that comply with the department's best practices and policies regarding data privacy, security, and accessibility. (7) The digital service office shall advise and collaborate with the chief information officer, the executive office of the governor or lieutenant governor, the director, and state departments and agencies to support adoption of modern software development strategies and practices, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (a) Agile development methodologies. (b) Open-source practices for the development and deployment of new and existing digital services. (c) Advocacy of modern software development tools and practices that include, but are not limited to, all of the following: (i) Development, security, and operations. (ii) Modular contracting. (iii) Active product management. (iv) User-centered design. (v) Iterative and incremental development. (vi) User research and testing. (vii) Unified development infrastructure. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (viii) Service-oriented architecture. (ix) Open-source software. (x) Unified development infrastructure. (xi) The modern best practices described in the 13 plays of the Digital Services Playbook, published by United States Digital Service. (8) The digital service office shall do all of the following: (a) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, review requests from state departments and agencies for software development projects that have an estimated cost of $1,000,000.00 or more to evaluate and advise on the optimal design and development approach, including development approaches that encourage in-house development. The digital service office may review software development projects that have an estimated cost of less than $1,000,000.00 if requested by a state department or agency or if the digital service office determines that a review is beneficial. (b) Promote the most effective means for improving digital services based on quantitative and qualitative assessments of user needs. (c) Coordinate training for state departments and agencies on effective management and collaboration in software development projects, including, but not limited to, training on the role of product managers. (d) Provide all of the following for information technology activities within state departments and agencies that have a cost of more than $500,000.00: (i) Oversight, monitoring, and recommendations that promote modern software development strategies and practices. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (ii) Standards for the management, organization, and tracking of the information technology activities. (9) Not later than February 1 of each year, the digital service office shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes all of the following: (a) Actions taken to pursue and implement responsibilities provided in this act. (b) The status of progress made toward achieving full adoption of the modern software development strategies and practices described in subsection (7). (c) Actions recommended to the department and the status and outcomes of the recommendations. (d) A summary of any actions that resulted in reductions or avoidances of costs to this state and estimates of the amounts and of the savings to this state. (e) Whether the chief digital service officer has blocked or redirected the advancement of a technology project under subsection (16), including a description of the decision. (10) The digital service office shall, not later than February 1 of each year, prepare a report on resident-centered outcomes for projects that the digital service office reviewed under subsection (8)(a) in the immediately preceding calendar year. The digital service office shall submit the report to the standard report recipients and make the report available to the public on the department's website. For purposes of this subdivision, "resident-centered outcomes" includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) Time saved. (b) Applications completed without error. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (c) Percentage of users accessing services successfully. (11) The digital service office shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the chief information officer if a project with a budget of more than $500,000.00 encounters problems that result in any of the following: (a) The project is at risk of exceeding the project budget or schedule. (b) The project has exceeded the project budget or schedule. (c) There is a risk of significant disruption of efficient and reliable services to residents of this state. (12) The report described in subsection (11) must identify the reason for the problem and provide recommendations to resolve the problem. (13) The chief digital service officer shall lead the digital service office. The governor shall appoint the chief digital service officer with the advice and consent of the senate majority leader and the speaker of the house of representatives. (14) The chief digital service officer shall be a full voting member of the board that governs the information technology investment fund described in section 838 of 2025 PA 22. (15) The chief digital service officer shall build and commit to a talent strategy that attracts, recruits, competitively compensates, and retains interdisciplinary expertise in technology, strategy, business, and management to import world-class digital services into state information technology services and projects. (16) The chief digital service officer may block or redirect the advancement of a technology project that poses a risk of significant unnecessary costs to this state or significant disruption of efficient and reliable services to the residents of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 this state. (17) The digital service office shall exist for the 5-year period immediately following the effective date of this act. STATE BUILDING AUTHORITY RENT Sec. 842. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for state building authority rent may, in addition to this purpose, be expended for the payment of required premiums for insurance on facilities owned by the state building authority or payment of costs that may be incurred as the result of any deductible provisions in the applicable insurance policies. (2) If the amount appropriated in part 1 for state building authority rent is not sufficient to pay the rent obligations and insurance premiums and deductibles identified in subsection (1) for state building authority projects, there is appropriated from the general fund of this state the amount necessary to pay the obligations. OFFICE OF THE STATE EMPLOYER Sec. 843. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for statewide appropriations must be funded by assessments against longevity and insurance appropriations throughout state government in a manner prescribed by the MDTMB. The funds must be used as specified in joint labor/management agreements, or through the coordinated compensation hearings process. Any deposits of assessments made under this subsection and any unencumbered funds are restricted revenues, may be carried over into the succeeding fiscal years, and are appropriated. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1 for 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 statewide appropriations, the MDTMB may receive and expend funds in the additional amounts specified in joint labor/management agreements, or through the coordinated compensation hearings process, in the same manner and subject to the same conditions as prescribed in subsection (1). Sec. 844. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the MDTMB may receive and expend funds from other principal executive departments and state agencies to implement administrative leave bank transfer provisions specified in joint labor/management agreements. The funds may also be transferred to other principal executive departments and state agencies under the joint labor/management agreement and any amounts transferred under the joint labor/management agreement are authorized for receipt and expenditure by the receiving principal executive department or state agency. Any funds received by the MDTMB under this section and intended, under the joint labor/management agreements, to be available for use beyond the close of the fiscal year, and any unencumbered funds, may be carried over into the next fiscal year. CIVIL SERVICE COMMISSION Sec. 850. (1) In accordance with section 5 of article XI of the state constitution of 1963, all restricted funds must be assessed a sum not less than 1% of the total aggregate payroll paid from those funds for financing the civil service commission on the basis of actual 1% restricted sources total aggregate payroll of the classified service for the preceding fiscal year. This includes, but is not limited to, restricted funds appropriated in part 1 of any appropriations act. The civil service commission shall return any unexpended funds appropriated under this 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 subsection to each 1% fund source not later than 6 months after the end of the fiscal year. (2) The appropriations in part 1 are estimates of actual charges based on payroll appropriations. With the approval of the state budget director, the civil service commission may adjust financing sources for civil service charges based on actual payroll expenditures, if the adjustments do not increase the total appropriation for the civil service commission. (3) The financing from restricted sources must be credited to the civil service commission by the end of the second fiscal quarter. Sec. 851. Except where specifically appropriated for this purpose, financing from restricted sources must be credited to the civil service commission. For restricted sources of funding within the general fund that have the legislative authority for carryover, if current spending authorization or revenues are insufficient to accept the charge, the shortage must be taken from carryforward balances of that funding source. Restricted revenue sources that do not have carryforward authority must be utilized to satisfy civil service commission operating deductions first and civil service commission obligations second. General fund dollars are appropriated for any shortfall, if approved by the state budget director. Sec. 852. The appropriation in part 1 to the civil service commission, for state-sponsored group insurance, flexible spending accounts, and COBRA, represents amounts, in part, included within the various appropriations throughout state government for the current fiscal year to fund the flexible spending account program included within the civil service commission. Deposits against 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 state-sponsored group insurance, flexible spending accounts, and COBRA for the flexible spending account program must be made from assessments levied during the fiscal year in a manner prescribed by the civil service commission. Unspent employee contributions to the flexible spending accounts may be used to offset administrative costs for the flexible spending account program, and any remaining balance of unspent employee contributions lapses to the general fund. Sec. 853. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the Michigan civil service commission shall continue to work toward completing its review of current employee classifications and educational requirements necessary for employment. On completion of the review, the commission, where possible, shall substitute relevant experience for the default educational requirement of a bachelor's degree. CAPITAL OUTLAY Sec. 860. As used in sections 861 through 875 of this part: (a) "Board" means the state administrative board created in section 1 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.1. (b) "Community college" means a community college organized under the community college act of 1966, 1966 PA 331, MCL 389.1 to 389.195, or under part 25 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1601 to 380.1607, and does not include a state agency or university. (c) "Director" means the director of the MDTMB. (d) "State agency" means an agency of state government. State agency does not include a community college or university. (e) "State building authority" means the authority created in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 section 2 of 1964 PA 183, MCL 830.412. (f) "University" means a 4-year university supported by this state. University does not include a community college or a state agency. Sec. 861. Each capital outlay project authorized in this part and part 1 or any previous capital outlay act shall comply with the procedures required by the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 862. (1) The MDTMB shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the JCOS on the status of each planning or construction project financed by the state building authority, this part and part 1, or a previous PA. (2) Before the end of the fiscal year, the MDTMB shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the JCOS for each capital outlay project other than lump sums that includes all of the following: (a) The account number and name of each construction project. (b) The balance remaining in each account. (c) The date of the last expenditure from the account. (d) The anticipated date of occupancy if the project is under construction. (e) The appropriations history for the project. (f) The professional service contractor. (g) The amount of the project financed with federal funds. (h) The amount of the project financed through the state building authority. (i) The total authorized cost for the project and the state authorized share if different than the total. (3) Before the end of the fiscal year, the MDTMB shall submit 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 a report to the standard report recipients and the JCOS on all of the following for each project by a state agency, university, or community college that is authorized for planning but is not yet authorized for construction: (a) The name of the project and account number. (b) Whether a program statement is approved. (c) Whether schematics are approved by the MDTMB. (d) Whether preliminary plans are approved by the MDTMB. (e) The name of the professional service contractor. (4) As used in this section, "project" includes appropriation line items made for purchase of real estate. Sec. 863. The MDTMB shall work with all state departments and agencies to evaluate their current office building and space usage to identify any projected changes for the current and next fiscal year. The MDTMB shall report the following information to the standard report recipients not later than May 1: (a) Projected changes in state-owned property being utilized by each department and agency for the current and next fiscal year. (b) Projected changes to leased property being utilized by each department and agency for the current and next fiscal year. (c) A comparative analysis of 2022 occupancy levels to expected levels for the current and next fiscal year. (d) All of the following information for the immediately preceding fiscal year: (i) A list of expenditures related to space optimization as a result of remote work, including costs associated with divesting state-owned property and vacating leased facilities. (ii) Net savings as a result of property divestment or vacated leased facilities. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (iii) A description of each divested property or location of each vacated leased facility. Sec. 864. The appropriations in part 1 for capital outlay must be carried forward at the end of the fiscal year in accordance with section 248 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1248. Sec. 865. (1) A site preparation economic development fund is created in the MDTMB. The MEDC board and the state budget director shall determine whether a specific state-owned site qualifies for inclusion in the site preparation economic development fund. (2) Any proceeds from the sale of an economic development site must be deposited in the site preparation economic development fund and are available for site preparation expenditures, unless otherwise provided by law. The economic development sites are authorized for sale consistent with state law. Expenditures from the site preparation economic development fund are authorized for site preparation activities that enhance the marketable sale value of the economic development sites. (3) A cash advance in an amount of not more than $25,000,000.00 is authorized from the general fund to the site preparation economic development fund. (4) Not later than December 31, the MDTMB shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations that includes both of the following: (a) The revenue and expenditure activity in the site preparation economic development fund for the immediately preceding fiscal year. (b) The sites identified as economic development sites. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (5) As used in this section: (a) "Economic development site" means a state-owned site that is declared as surplus property under section 251 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1251, and would provide economic benefit to the area of the site or to this state. (b) "Site preparation activities" includes, but is not limited to, demolition, environmental studies and abatement, utility enhancement, and site excavation. Sec. 866. (1) The energy efficiency revolving fund is created within the state treasury. The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the energy efficiency revolving fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the energy efficiency revolving fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the energy efficiency revolving fund interest and earnings from energy efficiency revolving fund investments. (2) Money in the energy efficiency revolving fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the energy efficiency revolving fund and does not lapse to the general fund. (3) The MDTMB shall provide oversight and direction for the energy efficiency revolving fund, coordinate a call for projects, and prioritize the award of projects that will contribute to a reduction in this state's carbon footprint. State administrative costs must be not more than 10% of the total project cost. (4) The MDTMB shall set terms with agencies participating in the energy efficiency revolving fund program that include the scope of each project, funding commitments, data collection and reporting requirements, and any other financial terms related to realization of energy savings related to implementation of the project. The MDTMB may enter into a memorandum of understanding to memorialize 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 these terms. (5) Not later than February 1, the MDTMB shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on projects funded under this section in the immediately preceding fiscal year. The report must list each approved project, the amount provided from the energy efficiency revolving fund for each project, the department or agency under which the project belongs, anticipated annual savings from each project, and revenue from savings deposited into the energy efficiency revolving fund by project. CAPITAL OUTLAY - UNIVERSITIES and COMMUNITY COLLEGES Sec. 873. (1) This section applies only to projects for community colleges. (2) State support is directed towards the remodeling and additions, special maintenance, or construction of certain community college buildings. The community college shall obtain or provide for site acquisition and initial main utility installation to operate the facility. The funding must be composed of local and state shares and not more than 50% of a capital outlay project, not including a lump-sum special maintenance project or remodeling and addition project, for a community college may be appropriated from state and federal funds, unless otherwise appropriated by the legislature. (3) An expenditure under this part and part 1 is authorized when the release of the appropriation is approved by the board on the recommendation of the director. The director may recommend to the board the release of any appropriation in part 1 only after the director is assured that the legal entity operating the community college to which the appropriation is made has complied with this 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 part and part 1 and has matched the amounts appropriated as required by this part and part 1. A release of funds in part 1 must not exceed 50% of the total cost of planning and construction of any project, not including lump-sum remodeling and additions and special maintenance, unless otherwise appropriated by the legislature. Further planning and construction of a project authorized by this part and part 1 or applicable sections of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594, must be in accordance with the purpose and scope as defined and delineated in the approved program statements and planning documents. This part and part 1 are applicable to all projects for which planning appropriations were made in previous PAs. (4) The community college shall take the steps necessary to secure available federal construction and equipment money for projects funded for construction in this part and part 1 if an application was not previously made. If there is a reasonable expectation that a previous year unfunded application may receive federal money in a subsequent year, the community college shall take whatever action necessary to keep the application active. Sec. 874. If university and community college matching revenues are received in an amount less than the appropriations for capital projects contained in this part and part 1, the state funds must be reduced in proportion to the amount of matching revenue received. Sec. 875. (1) The director may require that community colleges and universities that have an authorized project described in part 1 submit documentation regarding the project match and governing board approval of the authorized project not more than 60 days after the beginning of the fiscal year. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (2) If the documentation required by the director under subsection (1) is not submitted, or does not adequately authenticate the availability of the project match or governing board approval of the authorized project, the director may terminate the authorization. The authorization terminates 30 days after the director notifies the JCOS of the intent to terminate the project unless the JCOS approves an extension of the authorization. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Sec. 890. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for EMS health strategies fund shall be allocated to a health strategies fund operated by a statewide organization representing Michigan EMS agencies that existed before April 1, 2020. (2) The EMS health strategies fund shall be used to provide grants to EMS agencies who have been engaged in the transport of incarcerated individuals in the state. The statewide organization representing Michigan EMS agencies that operates the EMS health strategies fund created under this section shall provide a report on expenditures to the senate and house appropriations committees, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the state budget office, and the state treasurer by August 15, 2027. At a minimum, the report shall include the total amount of grants awarded and the number of licensed EMS agencies that received grant funding. DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY OPERATIONS Sec. 901. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $500,000.00 for federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $10,000,000.00 for state restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $100,000.00 for local contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $20,000.00 for private contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 902. (1) Amounts needed to pay for interest, fees, principal, mandatory and optional redemptions, arbitrage rebates as required by federal law, and costs associated with the payment, registration, trustee services, credit enhancements, and issuing costs in excess of the amount appropriated to the department of treasury in part 1 for debt service on notes and bonds that are issued by this state under sections 14, 15, or 16 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, as implemented by 1967 PA 266, MCL 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 17.451 to 17.455, are appropriated. (2) In addition to the amount appropriated to the department of treasury for debt service in part 1, there is appropriated an amount for fiscal year cash-flow borrowing costs to pay for interest on interfund borrowing authorized under 1967 PA 55, MCL 12.51 to 12.53. (3) In addition to the amount appropriated to the department of treasury for debt service in part 1, all repayments received by this state on loans made from the school bond loan fund that the state treasurer determines are not required to be deposited in the school loan revolving fund under section 4 of 1961 PA 112, MCL 388.984, are appropriated to the department of treasury for the payment of debt service, including, but not limited to, optional and mandatory redemptions, on bonds, notes, or commercial paper issued by this state under 1961 PA 112, MCL 388.981 to 388.985. Sec. 902a. As a condition of receiving the appropriations in part 1, not later than 30 days after a refunding or restructuring bond issue is sold, the department of treasury must submit a report to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations. The report must include all of the following: (a) A comparison of the annual debt service before the refinancing or restructuring to the annual debt service after the refinancing or restructuring. (b) The change in the principal and interest over the duration of the debt. (c) The projected change in the present value of the debt service as a result of the refinancing and restructuring. Sec. 902b. As a condition of receiving the appropriations in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 part 1, not later than 30 days after the state of Michigan annual comprehensive financial report under section 494 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1494, is published, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on all funds that are controlled or administered by the department of treasury and not appropriated in part 1. The current and all previous reports prepared as required under this section must be saved and made available on the department of treasury's public website and stored in a common location with all other reports that the department of treasury is required by law to prepare. The link to the location of the reports must be clearly indicated on the main page of the department of treasury's internet website. The report must include all of the following information for each fund for the immediately preceding fiscal year: (a) The starting balance. (b) Total revenue generated by transfers in and investments. (c) Total expenditures. (d) The ending balance. Sec. 903. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of treasury may contract with law firms or private collection agencies to collect taxes and other accounts due this state or due a city for which the department of treasury has entered into an agreement to provide tax administration services. In addition to the amounts appropriated in part 1 to the department of treasury, there are appropriated amounts necessary to fund the cost of these collections, including infrastructure costs. The additional amounts appropriated under this subsection must not exceed 25% of the collections or 2.5% plus operating costs, as applicable. Each contract must prescribe the applicable amount. The 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 amounts appropriated to fund collection costs and fees under this subsection are appropriated from the fund or account to which the corresponding taxes and other accounts being collected are recorded or dedicated. However, if the taxes and other accounts collected are dedicated for a specific purpose under the state constitution of 1963, the amounts appropriated under this subsection are appropriated from the general purpose account of the general fund. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of treasury may contract with law firms or private collections agencies to collect defaulted student loans and other accounts due the Michigan guaranty agency. In addition to the amounts appropriated in part 1 to the department of treasury, there are appropriated amounts necessary to fund collection costs and fees not to exceed 24.34% of the collection or a lesser amount as prescribed by the contract. The amounts appropriated under this subsection are appropriated from the fund or account to which the revenues being collected are recorded or dedicated. (3) By November 30, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations. The report must include all of the following information for the immediately preceding fiscal year: (a) The name of each law firm and each private collection agency that the department of treasury contracted with under subsection (1) or (2). (b) The amount collected under each contract. (c) The costs of collection under each contract. (d) Any other information that is pertinent to determining whether the authority described in subsection (1) or (2) should be 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 continued. Sec. 904. (1) The bureau of investments of the department of treasury may charge an investment service fee against the applicable retirement funds. The revenue from the investment service fees charged under this subsection may be expended for necessary salaries, wages, contractual services, supplies, materials, equipment, travel, worker's compensation insurance premiums, and grants to the civil service commission retirement fund and the state employees' retirement fund. If the bureau of investments of the department of treasury charges a total amount of investment service fees under this subsection that is greater than the aggregate amount appropriated in part 1, the bureau of investments of the department of treasury shall periodically repay the surplus revenue to the applicable retirement funds. The department of treasury shall maintain accounting records in sufficient detail to enable repayment under this subsection. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1 from the retirement funds to the department of treasury, there is appropriated from retirement funds an amount sufficient to pay for the services of money managers, investment advisors, investment consultants, custodians, or other outside professionals that the state treasurer considers necessary to prudently manage the retirement funds' investment portfolios. The state treasurer shall submit an annual report to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations regarding the performance of each portfolio delineated by investment advisor. (3) Not later than November 30, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 identifies the service fees assessed against each retirement system under subsection (1) and the methodology used for assessment. Sec. 904a. (1) There is appropriated an amount sufficient to recognize and pay expenditures for financial services provided by financial institutions or equivalent vendors that perform these financial services, including the department of treasury, as provided under section 1 of 1861 PA 111, MCL 21.181. (2) The appropriations under subsection (1) must be funded by restricting revenues from common cash interest earnings and investment earnings in an amount sufficient to cover these expenditures. If the amounts of common cash interest earnings are insufficient to cover these expenditures, miscellaneous revenues must be used to fund the remaining balance of these expenditures. Sec. 905. The municipal finance fee fund is created in the department of treasury as a revolving fund. The department of treasury shall deposit the fees that the department of treasury collects under the revised municipal finance act, 2001 PA 34, MCL 141.2101 to 141.2821, into the municipal finance fee fund. The money in the fund at the end of the fiscal year may be carried forward for future appropriation. Sec. 906. (1) The department of treasury shall charge for audits as allowed under state or federal law or under a contract between the department of treasury and a local unit of government, other principal executive department, or state agency. However, the department of treasury shall not charge more than the actual cost for performing the audit. Not later than November 30, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes details of the audits performed and audit charges for the immediately preceding fiscal year. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (2) The audit charges fund is created in the department of treasury as a revolving fund. The department of treasury shall deposit the contractual charges collected under subsection (1) into the audit charges fund. The money in the fund at the end of the fiscal year may be carried forward for future appropriation. Sec. 907. (1) The department of treasury shall create and operate a property assessor certification and training program. The purpose of the program is to offer courses in assessment administration. (2) The assessor certification and training fund is created in the department of treasury as a revolving fund. The department of treasury shall use the money in the assessor certification and training fund to create and operate the property assessor certification and training program described in subsection (1). (3) Each participant in the program shall pay to the department of treasury an examination fee not to exceed $50.00 per examination and a certification fee not to exceed $175.00. In addition, each participant shall pay a fee to cover the expenses incurred in offering the program to certified assessing personnel and other individuals interested in an assessment career opportunity. The department of treasury shall deposit the fees collected under this subsection into the property assessor certification and training program fund. Sec. 908. The amount appropriated in part 1 for the home heating assistance program is to cover the costs, including data processing, of administering federal home heating credits to eligible claimants and of administering the supplemental fuel cost payment program for eligible tax credit and welfare recipients. Sec. 909. Revenue from the airport parking tax act, 1987 PA 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 248, MCL 207.371 to 207.383, is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with section 7a of the airport parking tax act, 1987 PA 248, MCL 207.377a. Sec. 910. The disbursement by the department of treasury from the bottle deposit fund to dealers as required by section 3c(3) of 1976 IL 1, MCL 445.573c, is appropriated. Sec. 911. (1) There is appropriated an amount sufficient to recognize and pay refundable tax credits, tax refunds, and interest as provided by law. (2) The appropriations under subsection (1) must be funded by restricting tax revenue in an amount sufficient to cover these expenditures. Sec. 912. A plaintiff in a garnishment action involving this state shall pay to the state treasurer 1 of the following: (a) A fee of $6.00 at the time a writ of garnishment of periodic payments is served on the state treasurer, as provided in section 4012 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.4012. (b) A fee of $6.00 at the time any other writ of garnishment is served on the state treasurer. However, the fee must be reduced to $5.00 for each writ of garnishment for individual income tax refunds or credits that is filed electronically. Sec. 913. (1) The department of treasury may contract with private firms to appraise and, if necessary, appeal the assessments of senior citizen cooperative housing units. Payment for this service must be made from the savings that result from the appraisal or appeal process being conducted by private firms. (2) The department of treasury may use a portion of the funds appropriated in part 1 for the senior citizen cooperative housing 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 tax exemption program for an audit of the program. The department of treasury shall submit copies of any completed audit report to the standard report recipients. The department of treasury may use not more than 1% of the funds for administering and auditing the program. Sec. 914. The department of treasury may provide a $200.00 annual prize from the Ehlers internship award account in the gifts, bequests, and deposit fund to the runner-up of the Rosenthal prize for interns. The Ehlers internship award account is interest bearing. Sec. 915. As required under section 61 of the Michigan campaign finance act, 1976 PA 388, MCL 169.261, there is appropriated from the general fund to the state campaign fund an amount equal to the amounts designated for the 2023 tax year. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the amount appropriated does not revert to the general fund and remains in the state campaign fund. Any amount that remains in the state campaign fund in excess of $10,000,000.00 on December 31 reverts to the general fund. Sec. 916. (1) The department of treasury may make available to an interested entity a customized list of otherwise unavailable nonconfidential information regarding unclaimed property that is in the department of treasury's possession. The department of treasury shall charge for this information as follows: (a) For 1 to 100,000 records, 2.5 cents per record. (b) For 100,001 or more records, 0.5 cents per record. (2) The revenue received under subsection (1) must be deposited in the revenue account or fund that is associated with the applicable unclaimed property. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (3) Not later than June 1, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations that states the amount of revenue received from the sale of the information under this section. Sec. 917. (1) There is appropriated for write-offs and advances an amount equal to total write-offs and advances for departmental programs. The amount appropriated under this subsection must not exceed current year authorizations that would otherwise lapse to the general fund. (2) Not later than November 30, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients. The report must include all of the following information for the immediately preceding fiscal year: (a) The amounts appropriated for write-offs and advances under subsection (1). (b) An explanation for each write-off or advance under subsection (1). Sec. 919. (1) From funds appropriated in part 1, the department of treasury may contract with private auditing firms to audit for and collect unclaimed property due this state in accordance with the uniform unclaimed property act, 1995 PA 29, MCL 567.221 to 567.265. In addition to the amounts appropriated in part 1 to the department of treasury, there are appropriated amounts necessary to fund auditing and collection costs and fees not to exceed 12% of the collections or a lesser amount as prescribed by the applicable contract. The appropriation to fund collection costs and fees for the auditing and collection of unclaimed property due this state is from the fund or account to which the revenues being 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 collected are recorded or dedicated. (2) Not later than November 30, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations. The report must include all of the following information for the immediately preceding fiscal year: (a) The name of each auditing firm that the department of treasury contracted with under subsection (1). (b) The amount collected by each of the auditing firms. (c) The costs of collection. (d) Any other information that is pertinent to determining whether the authority under subsection (1) should be continued. Sec. 920. Not later than June 30, from the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of treasury shall do both of the following: (a) Produce a list of all personal property tax reimbursement payments to be distributed in the current fiscal year by the local community stabilization authority. (b) Post the list produced under subdivision (a) on the department of treasury's public website. Sec. 921. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of treasury shall, for each revenue administrative bulletin, administrative rule that involves tax administration or collection, and notice interpreting a change in law, submit a notification to every member of the legislature. The department of treasury shall submit the notification not later than 3 days after the department of treasury posts the notification. Each notification must include all of the following: (a) A summary of the proposed changes from current procedures. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) Identification of industries that will or might be affected by the bulletin, rule, or notice. (c) A statement of the potential fiscal implications of the bulletin, rule, or notice. This subdivision does not apply to a bulletin, rule, or notice that is a routine update of a tax or interest rate required by statute. (d) A summary of the reason for the proposed change. Sec. 924. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of treasury may receive and expend principal residence audit fund revenue for administration of principal residence audits under the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.1 to 211.155. (2) Not later than December 31, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes the amount of exemptions denied and the revenue received under the program described in subsection (1) for the immediately preceding fiscal year. Sec. 927. The department of treasury shall submit a progress report regarding essential service assessment audits to the standard report recipients. The report must include all of the following: (a) The number of audits. (b) The revenue generated from the audits. (c) The number of complaints received by the department of treasury related to the audits. Sec. 928. The department of treasury may provide receipt, check and cash processing, data, collection, investment, fiscal agent, levy and check cost assessment, writ of garnishment, and other user services on a contractual basis for other principal 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 executive departments and state agencies. Funds for the services provided are appropriated and must be expended for salaries, wages, fees, supplies, and equipment necessary to provide the services. Money in the fund that is unobligated at the end of the fiscal year lapses to the general fund. Sec. 930. (1) The department of treasury shall provide accounts receivable collections services to other principal executive departments and state agencies in accordance with 1927 PA 375, MCL 14.131 to 14.134, or to a city with which the department of treasury has contracted to provide tax administration services. The department of treasury shall deduct a fee equal to the cost of collections from all receipts except for unrestricted general fund collections. Fees must be credited to a restricted revenue account and are appropriated to the department of treasury to pay for the cost of collections. If the department of treasury deducts fees under this subsection that total an amount that is greater than the actual cost of the collections, the department of treasury shall periodically repay the surplus to the respective account. The department of treasury shall maintain accounting records in sufficient detail to enable repayment under this subsection. (2) Not later than November 30, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes the following information regarding subsection (1) for the immediately preceding fiscal year: (a) The principal executive departments and state agencies served. (b) The funds collected. (c) The costs of collection. Sec. 931. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the appropriation in part 1 to the department of treasury for treasury fees must be assessed against all restricted funds that receive common cash earnings or other investment income. This subsection does not apply to federal or state restricted funds that are temporary in nature or otherwise do not qualify to be assessed treasury fees. The fee assessed against each restricted fund must be based on the size of the restricted fund, calculated as the absolute value of the average daily cash balance plus the market value of investments in the immediately preceding fiscal year, and the level of resources necessary to maintain the restricted fund as required by each department. Not later than November 30, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that identifies the fees assessed against each restricted fund and the methodology used for the assessment. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of treasury may receive and expend investment fees that are related to new restricted funding sources that participate in common cash earnings or other investment income during the current fiscal year. (3) As used in this section, "treasury fees" includes all costs, including administrative overhead, that are related to the investment of a restricted fund. Sec. 932. The board of directors of the Michigan education trust may expend revenue received under the Michigan education trust act, 1986 PA 316, MCL 390.1421 to 390.1442, for necessary salaries, wages, supplies, contractual services, equipment, worker's compensation insurance premiums, and grants to the civil service commission retirement fund and the state employees' retirement fund. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 934. (1) The department of treasury may expend revenues received under the hospital finance authority act, 1969 PA 38, MCL 331.31 to 331.84, the shared credit rating act, 1985 PA 227, MCL 141.1051 to 141.1076, the higher education facilities authority act, 1969 PA 295, MCL 390.921 to 390.934, the Michigan public educational facilities authority, Executive Reorganization Order No. 2002-3, MCL 12.192, the Michigan tobacco settlement finance authority act, 2005 PA 226, MCL 129.261 to 129.279, the land bank fast track act, 2003 PA 258, MCL 124.751 to 124.774, part 505 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.50501 to 324.50522, the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1401 to 125.1499c, and the MFA, Executive Reorganization Order No. 2010-2, MCL 12.194, for necessary salaries, wages, supplies, contractual services, equipment, worker's compensation insurance premiums, grants to the civil service commission retirement fund and the state employees' retirement fund, and other expenses as allowed under those acts or executive reorganization orders. (2) Not later than January 31, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes both of the following for the immediately preceding fiscal year: (a) The amount and purpose of expenditures of $250,000.00 or more that are made under subsection (1) from funds received by the department of treasury that are in addition to those appropriated in part 1. (b) A list of reimbursement of revenue, if any. Sec. 935. The position of student loan ombudsman is created in the department of treasury's advocacy services team. The student 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 loan ombudsman serves as an advocate for borrowers and shall work with the financial resource navigator within the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential to provide technical assistance to individuals taking out or paying off student loans. Sec. 936. Revenue collected in the state forensic laboratory fund is appropriated and shall be distributed in accordance with section 7 of the forensic laboratory funding act, 1994 PA 35, MCL 12.207. Sec. 937. As a condition of receiving funds in part 1, not later than March 31, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the senate and house standing committees on appropriations regarding the department of treasury's collection efforts for delinquent accounts. The report must include all of the following: (a) Information regarding the effectiveness of the department of treasury's current collection strategies, including the use of vendors or contractors. (b) The amount of delinquent accounts. (c) The liquidation rates for declining delinquent accounts. (d) The profile of uncollected delinquent accounts, including specific uncollected amounts by category. (e) The department of treasury's strategy to manage delinquent accounts when those accounts exceed the collectible period. (f) A summary of the strategies used in other states, including, but not limited to, secondary placement services, and assessing the benefits of those strategies. Sec. 938. Revenue collected in the qualified heavy equipment rental personal property exemption reimbursement fund is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with section 9 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 of the qualified heavy equipment rental personal property specific tax act, 2022 PA 35, MCL 211.1129. Sec. 939. Revenue deposited in the local government reimbursement fund is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with section 3a of the Michigan trust fund act, 2000 PA 489, MCL 12.253a. Sec. 940. (1) The election administration support fund is created in the state treasury. (2) Any unexpended funds in the election administration support fund must be carried forward and are available for expenditure under this section. (3) Funds may be spent from the election administration support fund only on appropriation, or legislative transfer pursuant to section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (4) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit in the election administration support fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the election administration support fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the election administration support fund interest and earnings from the election administration support fund. (5) Funds in the election administration support fund at the close of the fiscal year remain in the election administration support fund and do not lapse to the general fund. (6) Funds appropriated in part 1 for election administration support fund must be deposited in the election administration support fund. Sec. 941. (1) Not later than November 1, from the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of treasury, in conjunction 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 with the MSF, shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations on the annual cost of the MEGA tax credits. The report must include, for each year from 1995 to the expiration of the MEGA tax credit program, the board-approved credit amount, adjusted for credit amendments if applicable, and the actual and projected value of tax credits. For years for which credit claims are complete, the report must include the total of actual certificated credit amounts. For years for which claims are still pending or not yet submitted, the report must include a combination of actual credits if available and projected credits. Credit projections must be based on updated estimates of employees, wages, and benefits for eligible companies. (2) In addition to the report under subsection (1), not later than November 1, the department of treasury, in conjunction with the MSF, shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations on the annual cost of all other certificated credits by program for each year until the credits expire or can no longer be collected. The report must include estimates on the brownfield redevelopment credit, film credits, MEGA photovoltaic technology credit, MEGA polycrystalline silicon manufacturing credit, MEGA vehicle battery credit, and other certificated credits. Sec. 944. From the funds appropriated in part 1, if the department of treasury hires a pension plan consultant using any of the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of treasury shall do all of the following: (a) Retain each report provided to the department of treasury by that consultant. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) Notify the standard report recipients that the department of treasury has hired a pension plan consultant, including the reason why the department of treasury hired the pension plan consultant. (c) Make a report described in subdivision (a) available to a standard report recipient if requested by the standard report recipient. Sec. 945. From the funds appropriated in part 1, audits of local unit assessment administration practices, procedures, and records must be conducted in each assessment jurisdiction a minimum of 1 time every 5 years and in accordance with section 10g of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.10g. Sec. 946. Revenue collected in the convention facility development fund is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with sections 8, 9, and 10 of the state convention facility development act, 1985 PA 106, MCL 207.628, 207.629, and 207.630. Sec. 947. It is the intent of the legislature that financial independence teams cooperate with the financial responsibility section to coordinate and streamline efforts in identifying and addressing fiscal emergencies in school districts and intermediate school districts. Sec. 948. Total authorized appropriations from all sources under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 are estimated at $22,584,500.00. From this amount, total department of treasury appropriations for pension-related legacy costs are estimated at $22,584,500.00. Total department of treasury appropriations for retiree health care legacy costs are estimated at $0.00. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 949. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of treasury may contract with private agencies to prevent the disbursement of fraudulent tax refunds. In addition to the amounts appropriated in part 1 to the department of treasury, there are appropriated amounts necessary to pay the costs of the contracts or to fund operations designed to reduce fraudulent income tax refund payments. The additional amount appropriated under this subsection must not be greater than $2,000,000.00. The appropriation to fund fraud prevention efforts under this subsection is from the fund or account to which the revenues being collected are recorded or dedicated. (2) Not later than November 30, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations. The report must include all of the following for the immediately preceding fiscal year: (a) The number of refund claims denied because of the fraud prevention operations. (b) The amount of refunds denied. (c) The costs of the fraud prevention operations. (d) Any other information that is pertinent to determining whether the authority under subsection (1) should be continued. Sec. 949a. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for city income tax administration program, the department of treasury may expand its individual income tax administration for any additional cities that enter into service-level agreements with the department of treasury for this purpose. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, any additional local funds received as part of the service-level agreements are appropriated to the department for 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 staffing and administration of the program. Sec. 949b. Tax capture revenues collected in accordance with written agreements under the good jobs for Michigan program and transferred from the general fund for deposit into the good jobs for Michigan fund, including tax capture revenues collected for calculated payments from the good jobs for Michigan fund to authorized businesses and distributions to the MSF for administrative expenses, are appropriated in accordance with chapter 8D of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2090g to 125.2090j. Sec. 949c. From the funds appropriated in part 1, funds must be expended in coordination with the department of agriculture and rural development to improve the timely processing and issuance of tax credits from the Michigan's farmland and open space preservation program created under section 36109 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.36109, for the Michigan's farmland and open space preservation program under parts 361 and 362 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.36101 to 324.36116 and 324.36201 to 324.36207. Sec. 949d. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for financial review commission, the department of treasury shall continue financial review commission efforts under the Michigan financial review commission act, 2014 PA 181, MCL 141.1631 to 141.1643, in the current fiscal year. The purpose of the funding is to cover ongoing costs associated with the operation of the commission. (2) The department of treasury shall identify specific outcomes and performance measures for this initiative, including, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 but not limited to, the department of treasury's ability to perform a critical fiscal review to ensure the city of Detroit does not reenter distress following its exit from bankruptcy and to ensure that the community district does not enter distress and maintains a balanced budget. (3) Not later than March 15, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes both of the following: (a) A description of the specific outcomes and measures required in subsection (1). (b) The results and data related to these outcomes and measures. Sec. 949e. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for the state essential services assessment program, the department of treasury shall administer the state essential services assessment program. The purpose of the program is to provide a phased-in replacement of locally collected personal property taxes on eligible manufacturing personal property. The program must provide the department of treasury with the ability to collect the state essential services assessment. Sec. 949f. Revenue from the tobacco products tax act, 1993 PA 327, MCL 205.421 to 205.436, related to counties with a population of more than 2,000,000 according to the 2000 federal decennial census is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with section 12(2)(e) of the tobacco products tax act, 1993 PA 327, MCL 205.432. Sec. 949h. Revenue from part 6 of the medical marihuana facilities licensing act, 2016 PA 281, MCL 333.27601 to 333.27605, is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with part 6 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 of the medical marihuana facilities licensing act, 2016 PA 281, MCL 333.27601 to 333.27605. Sec. 949i. Revenue from the Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27951 to 333.27967, is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with the Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27951 to 333.27967. Sec. 949j. All funds in the wrongful imprisonment compensation fund created in the wrongful imprisonment compensation act, 2016 PA 343, MCL 691.1751 to 691.1757, are appropriated and available for expenditure. Expenditures are limited to support wrongful imprisonment compensation payments under section 6 of the wrongful imprisonment compensation act, 2016 PA 343, MCL 691.1756. Sec. 949k. There is appropriated an amount equal to the tax captured revenues due under approved transformational brownfield plans created under the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670. Sec. 949m. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the Michigan infrastructure council shall plan, conduct, and contract for asset management improvement activities, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (a) Infrastructure data collection activities. (b) Asset manager training. (c) Development of a 30-year asset management plan for this state. (d) Assistance in asset management improvement projects, including maintaining an asset management portal. (e) Any other projects that promote improved asset management for infrastructure in this state. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (2) As used in this section, "Michigan infrastructure council" means the Michigan infrastructure council created in section 3 of the Michigan infrastructure council act, 2018 PA 323, MCL 21.603. Sec. 949n. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the money in the fostering futures scholarship trust fund, including any money received as gifts or donations to the fostering futures scholarship trust fund, is appropriated and the department of treasury may issue payments in compliance with the fostering futures scholarship trust fund act, 2008 PA 525, MCL 722.1021 to 722.1031. REVENUE SHARING Sec. 950. The department of treasury shall distribute the funds appropriated in part 1 for constitutional revenue sharing to cities, villages, and townships, as required under section 10 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. Revenue collected in accordance with section 10 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963 in excess of the amount appropriated in part 1 for constitutional revenue sharing is appropriated for distribution to cities, villages, and townships, on a population basis as required under section 10 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. Sec. 952. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for city, village, and township revenue sharing are for grants to cities, villages, and townships and must be distributed as provided in this section. (2) From the first $299,126,400.00 appropriated in part 1 for city, village, and township revenue sharing, each city, village, or township shall receive an amount equal to 100.0% of the revenue sharing payment for which the city, village, or township received 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 under section 952(2) of article 5 of 2025 PA 22 rounded to the nearest dollar. (3) The remaining amount appropriated in part 1 for city, village, and township revenue sharing after the distributions under subsection (2) must be distributed as follows: (a) 1/3 shall be distributed as taxable value payments as provided under subsection (4). (b) 1/3 must be distributed as unit type population payments as provided under subsection (5). (c) 1/3 must be distributed as yield equalization payments as provided under subsection (6). (4) A taxable value payment must be made to each city, village, and township, determined as follows: (a) Determine the per capita taxable value for each city, village, and township by dividing the taxable value of that city, village, or township by the population of that city, village, or township. (b) Determine the statewide per capita taxable value by dividing the total taxable value of all cities, villages, and townships by the total population of all cities, villages, and townships. (c) Determine the per capita taxable value ratio for each city, village, and township by dividing the statewide per capita taxable value by the per capita taxable value for that city, village, or township. (d) Determine the adjusted taxable value population for each city, village, and township by multiplying the per capita taxable value ratio as determined under subdivision (c) for that city, village, or township by the population of that city, village, or 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 township. (e) Determine the total statewide adjusted taxable value population, which is the sum of all adjusted taxable value population for all cities, villages, and townships. (f) Determine the taxable value payment rate by dividing the amount to be distributed under this subsection by the total statewide adjusted taxable value population as determined under subdivision (e). (g) Determine the taxable value payment for each city, village, and township by multiplying the result under subdivision (f) by the adjusted taxable value population for that city, village, or township. (5) A unit type population payment must be made to each city, village, and township, determined as follows: (a) Determine the unit type population weight factor for each city, village, and township as follows: (i) For a township with a population of 5,000 or less, 1.0. (ii) For a township with a population of more than 5,000 but less than 10,001, 1.2. (iii) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (xix), for a township with a population of more than 10,000 but less than 20,001, 1.44. (iv) For a township with a population of more than 20,000 but less than 40,001, 4.32. (v) For a township with a population of more than 40,000 but less than 80,001, 5.18. (vi) For a township with a population of more than 80,000, 6.22. (vii) For a village with a population of 5,000 or less, 1.5. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 (viii) For a village with a population of more than 5,000 but less than 10,001, 1.8. (ix) For a village with a population of more than 10,000, 2.16. (x) For a city with a population of 5,000 or less, 2.5. (xi) For a city with a population of more than 5,000 but less than 10,001, 3.0. (xii) For a city with a population of more than 10,000 but less than 20,001, 3.6. (xiii) For a city with a population of more than 20,000 but less than 40,001, 4.32. (xiv) For a city with a population of more than 40,000 but less than 80,001, 5.18. (xv) For a city with a population of more than 80,000 but less than 160,001, 6.22. (xvi) For a city with a population of more than 160,000 but less than 320,001, 7.46. (xvii) For a city with a population of more than 320,000 but less than 640,001, 8.96. (xviii) For a city with a population of more than 640,000, 10.75. (xix) For a township that has a population of not less than 10,000 and certifies to the department of treasury that the township provides for or makes available all of the following, the township must receive the unit type population weight factor for a city with the same population: (A) Fire services. (B) Police services on a 24-hour basis either through contracting for or directly employing personnel. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (C) Water services to 50% or more of its residents. (D) Sewer services to 50% or more of its residents. (b) Determine the adjusted unit type population for each city, village, and township by multiplying the unit type population weight factor for that city, village, or township as determined under subdivision (a) by the population of the city, village, or township. (c) Determine the total statewide adjusted unit type population, which is the sum of the adjusted unit type population for all cities, villages, and townships. (d) Determine the unit type population payment rate by dividing the amount to be distributed under this subsection by the total statewide adjusted unit type population as determined under subdivision (c). (e) Determine the unit type population payment for each city, village, and township by multiplying the result under subdivision (d) by the adjusted unit type population for that city, village, or township. (6) A yield equalization payment must be made to each city, village, and township in an amount that is sufficient to provide the guaranteed tax base for a local tax effort, but not to exceed 0.02. The payment must be determined as follows: (a) The guaranteed tax base is the maximum combined state and local per capita taxable value that can be guaranteed in a state fiscal year to each city, village, and township for a local tax effort, not to exceed 0.02, if an amount equal to the amount described in subsection (3)(c) is distributed to cities, villages, and townships whose per capita taxable value is below the guaranteed tax base. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) The full yield equalization payment to each city, village, and township is the product of the amounts determined under subparagraphs (i) and (ii): (i) An amount greater than zero that is equal to the difference between the guaranteed tax base determined in subdivision (a) and the per capita taxable value of the city, village, or township. (ii) The local tax effort of the city, village, or township, not to exceed 0.02, multiplied by the population of that city, village, or township. (7) For purposes of this section, any city, village, or township that completely merges with another city, village, or township must be treated as a single entity, so that when determining the eligible city, village, and township revenue sharing payment under section 952(2) of article 5 of 2025 PA 22 for the combined single entity, the city, village, and township revenue sharing amount that each of the merging local units of government was eligible to receive under section 952(2) of article 5 of 2025 PA 22 is summed. Sec. 954. (1) Cities, villages, and townships receiving a payment under section 952(2) and counties receiving a payment under section 955(2) shall receive 1/6 of their total payment on the last business day of October, December, February, April, June, and August. On the last business day of February 2027, cities, villages, and townships receiving a payment under section 952(3) and counties receiving a payment under section 955(3) shall receive 50% of the estimated payment to be received under section 952(3) or 955(3), as applicable. On the last business day of June 2027, cities, villages, and townships receiving a payment under section 952(3) and counties receiving a payment under 955(3) shall receive 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 any remaining payment calculated under section 952(3) or 955(3), as applicable. (2) Payments distributed under section 952 or section 955 may be withheld in accordance with sections 17a and 21 of the Glenn Steil state revenue sharing act of 1971, 1971 PA 140, MCL 141.917a and 141.921. (3) If a city, village, or township that receives a payment under section 952 is determined to have a retirement pension benefit system in underfunded status under section 5 of the protecting local government retirement and benefits act, 2017 PA 202, MCL 38.2805, the city, village, or township must allocate to its pension unfunded liability an amount equal to 50% of the difference between its current year payment under section 952 and the amount the city, village or township would have been eligible to receive under section 952 of article 5 of 2025 PA 22, rounded to the nearest dollar. A city, village, or township that has issued a municipal security under section 518 of the revised municipal finance act, 2001 PA 34, MCL 141.2518, is exempt from this requirement. (4) If a county that receives a payment under section 955 is determined to have a retirement pension benefit system in underfunded status under section 5 of the protecting local government retirement and benefits act, 2017 PA 202, MCL 38.2805, the county must allocate to its pension unfunded liability an amount equal to 50% of the difference between its current year payment under section 955 and the amount the county would have been eligible to receive under section 955 of article 5 of 2025 PA 22, rounded to the nearest dollar. A county that has issued a municipal security under section 518 of the revised municipal finance act, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 2001 PA 34, MCL 141.2518, is exempt from this requirement. Sec. 955. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for county revenue sharing are for grants to counties and must be distributed as provided in this section. (2) From the first $261,069,700.00 appropriated in part 1, each county shall receive an amount equal to 100.0% of the revenue sharing payment for which the county received under section 955 of article 5 of 2025 PA 22, rounded to the nearest dollar. (3) From the remaining amount appropriated in part 1 for county revenue sharing after the distributions under subsection (2), a taxable value payment must be made to each county, determined as follows: (a) Determine the per capita taxable value for each county by dividing the taxable value of that county by the population of that county. (b) Determine the statewide per capita taxable value by dividing the total taxable value of all counties by the total population of all counties. (c) Determine the per capita taxable value ratio for each county by dividing the statewide per capita taxable value by the per capita taxable value for that county. (d) Determine the adjusted taxable value population for each county by multiplying the per capita taxable value ratio as determined under subdivision (c) for that county by the population of that county. (e) Determine the total statewide adjusted taxable value population, which is the sum of the adjusted taxable value population for all counties. (f) Determine the taxable value payment rate by dividing the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 amount to be distributed under this subsection by the total statewide adjusted taxable value population as determined under subdivision (e). (g) Determine the taxable value payment for each county by multiplying the result under subdivision (f) by the adjusted taxable value population for that county. Sec. 956. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for financially distressed cities, villages, or townships, the department of treasury shall create and operate a grant program to award grants to cities, villages, and townships that have 1 or more conditions that indicate probable financial distress, as determined by the department of treasury. A city, village, or township with 1 or more conditions that indicate probable financial distress may apply in a manner determined by the department of treasury for a grant to pay for specific projects or services that move the city, village, or township toward financial stability. Grants must be used for specific projects or services that move the city, village, or township toward financial stability. The city, village, or township must use the grants under this section to do 1 or more of the following: (a) Make payments to reduce unfunded accrued liability. (b) Repair or replace critical infrastructure and equipment owned or maintained by the city, village, or township. (c) Reduce debt obligations. (d) Pay for costs associated with a transition to shared services with another jurisdiction. (e) Administer other projects that move the city, village, or township toward financial stability. (2) The department of treasury shall award not more than 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 $2,000,000.00 to any city, village, or township under this section. (3) Not later than March 31, the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes all of the following for each grant recipient. (a) The name of the grant recipient. (b) The date the grant was approved. (c) The amount of the grant. (d) A description of the project or projects that will be paid by the grant. (4) The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for financially distressed cities, villages, or townships are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditure for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to provide assistance to financially distressed cities, villages, and townships under this section. (b) The projects will be accomplished by grants to cities, villages, and townships approved by the department of treasury. (c) The total estimated cost of all projects is $2,500,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2029. Sec. 957. A term that is defined in the Glenn Steil state revenue sharing act, 1971 PA 140, MCL 141.901 to 141.921, has the same meaning when used in sections 950 to 956. Sec. 959. (1) The department of treasury shall distribute funds appropriated in part 1 for public safety revenue sharing 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 grants as provided for in subsection (9) and as follows: (a) $3,250,000.00 to the MDHHS to establish and administer a grant program to award funds to community violence intervention programs. (b) $42,562,500.00 for a public safety assistance payment to each city, village, or township. The public safety assistance payment must be calculated as follows: (i) Determine the average violent crime count for each city, village, and township by adding the 2 highest annual violent crime counts for each city, village, and township from the 3 most recently available annual crime reports published by the MDSP as of the first day of the current fiscal year and dividing by 2. (ii) Determine the statewide total violent crime count by summing the average violent crime count for each city, village, and township as determined under subparagraph (i). (iii) Determine the proportional factor for each city, village, and township by dividing the average violent crime count for each city, village, and township as determined under subparagraph (i) by the statewide total violent crime count determined under subparagraph (ii). (iv) Multiply the proportional factor determined in subparagraph (iii), for each city, village, and township by the total amount available for distribution under this subdivision, and round to the nearest dollar. (2) A public safety assistance payment to a city, village, or township as determined under subsection (1)(b) is limited to not more than 25% of the total amount available for distribution under subsection (1)(b). (3) All of the following apply to a distribution under 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 subsection (1)(b): (a) A city, village, or township must use the distribution only for operational and capital expenditures that serve the purposes of public safety. (b) Not less than 75% of a public safety assistance payment distributed under subsection (1)(b) to a city, village, or township must be used to fund, either directly or indirectly through a subgrant to another governmental entity, a law enforcement agency or law enforcement officers as defined in section 2 of the Michigan commission on law enforcement standards act, 1965 PA 203, MCL 28.602. (c) Not more than 25% of a public safety assistance payment distributed under subsection (1)(b) to a city, village, or township must be used to fund other non-law-enforcement-related public safety purposes, which include, but are not limited to: public safety initiatives to improve recruitment or retention efforts; training programs; equipment purchases; programs designed to reduce identified risks to public safety; crime diversion programs; operational emergency medical or firefighter services; or capital improvements to public safety buildings or structures. All local public safety initiative expenses must be related to public safety and designed to reduce identified risks to public safety and cannot include unproven intervention solutions to community violence. (d) A distribution made under subsection (1)(b) must not be used for the following nonoperating expenses: (i) Pension and other post employee benefit (OPEB) payments. (ii) Lawsuits and claims payments. (iii) Debt service payments. (iv) The acquisition or use of a vehicle weighing more than 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 15,000 pounds that is designed or used for a tactical police purpose. (v) The acquisition or use of facial recognition technology. (vi) The acquisition or use of a chemical weapon. (4) A city, village, or township may subgrant all or part of the distribution under subsection (1)(b) if the subgrant is used for the purpose of public safety as described under subsection (3). (5) Subject to subsections (6), (7), and (8), not later than November 30, the director of the MDSP shall provide the department of treasury with a certified list that contains all of the following: (a) Base crime level. (b) Current violent crime counts. (c) Current violent crime rates, as determined by the director of the MDSP. (6) The current violent crime data described in subsection (5)(b) and (c) mean the calendar year annual violent crime data for each city, village, and township received and finalized by the MDSP during the immediately preceding state fiscal year and the 2 immediately preceding calendar years before the immediately preceding state fiscal year. (7) Crimes reported by a city, village, township, or reported by a county on behalf of the city, village, or township, must be included in the certified list under subsection (5), but crimes reported by other authorities must be omitted from the certified list under subsection (5). (8) The certified list under subsection (5) must contain all cities, villages, and townships in this state and must report a zero for cities, villages, and townships that did not submit crime 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 data. (9) $14,187,500.00 must be used for public safety assistance payments to counties. The payment to each county must be calculated by dividing the amount to be distributed under this subsection by the total statewide adjusted taxable value population as determined under section 955(3)(e) and multiplying the result by the adjusted taxable value population for that county as determined under section 955(3)(d). All of the following apply to a distribution made under this subsection: (a) A county must use the distribution only for operational and capital expenditures that serve the purposes of public safety. (b) Not less than 75% of a public safety assistance payment distributed to a county under this subsection must be used to fund, either directly or indirectly through a subgrant to another governmental entity, a law enforcement agency or law enforcement officers as defined in section 2 of the Michigan commission on law enforcement standards act, 1965 PA 203, MCL 28.602. (c) Not more than 25% of a public safety assistance payment distributed to a county under this subsection must be used to fund other non-law-enforcement-related public safety purposes, which include, but are not limited to: public safety initiatives to improve recruitment or retention efforts; training programs; equipment purchases; programs designed to reduce identified risks to public safety; crime diversion programs; operational emergency medical or firefighter services; or capital improvements to public safety buildings or structures. All local public safety initiative expenses must be related to public safety and designed to reduce identified risks to public safety and cannot include unproven intervention solutions to community violence. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (d) A distribution made under this subsection must not be used for the following nonoperating expenses: (i) Pension and other post employee benefit (OPEB) payments. (ii) Lawsuits and claims payments. (iii) Debt service payments. (iv) The acquisition or use of a vehicle weighing more than 15,000 pounds that is designed or used for a tactical police purpose. (v) The acquisition or use of facial recognition technology. (vi) The acquisition or use of a chemical weapon. (10) A county may subgrant all or part of the distribution under subsection (9) if the subgrant is used for the purpose of public safety as described in subsection (9). (11) As used in subsections (1) to (8): (a) "Base crime level" means the average of a city, village, or township's 2 highest annual rates of violent crime, as certified by the director of the MDSP and determined by the annual crime reports published by the MDSP in the 3 calendar years immediately preceding the current calendar year. (b) "Population" means the counts, as defined by the Federal Bureau of Investigation and used by the director of the MDSP, to determine the population for each city, village, and township. (c) "Violent crime" means that term as defined by the director of the MDSP in accordance with the department's incident crime reporting program and the corresponding annual crime reports. (d) "Violent crime count" means the number of violent crimes based on victim counts, as certified by the director of the MDSP. When a victim is connected to multiple offenses, the victim is counted under the highest-ranked offense, as defined by the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 director of the MDSP. (e) "Violent crime rate" means the number of crimes per 100,000 people, determined by dividing a particular city, village, or township violent crime count by the population, then multiplying by 100,000 and rounding to the nearest whole number. (12) As used in this section: (a) "Chemical weapon" means a munition or device that is specifically designed to cause death or other harm through a toxic chemical that would be released as a result of the employment of the munition or device. (b) "Facial recognition technology" means an automated or a semiautomated technological process that assists in identifying or verifying an individual based on the individual's face. (13) The department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report recipients by March 1 that includes the following information for each grant authorized under this section: (a) The date the grant was disbursed. (b) The grant recipient. (c) The planned use of grant funds, including whether the grant is to be used as a subgrant. (14) It is the intent of the legislature that not less than $50,000,000.00 be appropriated for the purposes outlined in this section in fiscal years 2026-2027, and 2027-2028. BUREAU OF STATE LOTTERY Sec. 960. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1 to the bureau of state lottery, there is appropriated from state lottery fund revenues the amount necessary for, and directly related to, implementing and operating lottery games under the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 McCauley-Traxler-Law-Bowman-McNeely lottery act, 1972 PA 239, MCL 432.1 to 432.47, and activities under the Traxler-McCauley-Law-Bowman bingo act, 1972 PA 382, MCL 432.101 to 432.152, including expenditures for contractually mandated payments for vendor commissions, contractually mandated payments for instant tickets intended for resale, the contractual costs of providing and maintaining the online system communications network, and incentive and bonus payments to lottery retailers. Sec. 964. For the bureau of state lottery, there is appropriated 1% of the lottery's immediately preceding fiscal year's gross sales for promotion and advertising. Michigan gaming control board Sec. 970. As used in sections 971 to 979: (a) "Compulsive gaming prevention fund" means the compulsive gaming prevention fund created in section 3 of the compulsive gaming prevention act, 1997 PA 70, MCL 432.253. (b) "Fantasy contest fund" means the fantasy contest fund created in section 16 of the fantasy contests consumer protection act, 2019 PA 157, MCL 432.516. (c) "First responder presumed coverage fund" means the first responder presumed coverage fund created in section 405 of the worker's disability compensation act of 1969, 1969 PA 317, MCL 418.405. (d) "Internet gaming fund" means the internet gaming fund created in section 16 of the lawful internet gaming act, 2019 PA 152, MCL 432.316. (e) "Internet sports betting fund" means the internet sports betting fund created in section 16 of the lawful sports betting 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 act, 2019 PA 149, MCL 432.416. Sec. 971. (1) From the revenue collected by the Michigan gaming control board from the total annual assessment of each casino licensee, funds are appropriated and must be distributed as described in section 12a(5) of the Michigan Gaming Control and Revenue Act, 1996 IL 1, MCL 432.212a. (2) The revenue collected in the internet sports betting fund is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with the lawful sports betting act, 2019 PA 149, MCL 432.401 to 432.419. (3) The revenue collected in the internet gaming fund is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with the lawful internet gaming act, 2019 PA 152, MCL 432.301 to 432.322, and the Traxler-McCauley-Law-Bowman bingo act, 1972 PA 382, MCL 432.101 to 432.152. Sec. 972. After all other required expenditures described in section 16(3) of the fantasy contests consumer protection act, 2019 PA 157, MCL 432.516, section 16(4) of the lawful internet gaming act, 2019 PA 152, MCL 432.316, and section 16(4) of the lawful sports betting act, 2019 PA 149, MCL 432.416 are made, any money remaining in the fantasy contest fund, internet gaming fund, and internet sports betting fund is appropriated and must be deposited in the state school aid fund as described in section 16(3)(b) of the fantasy contests consumer protection act, 2019 PA 157, MCL 432.516, section 16(4) of the lawful internet gaming act, 2019 PA 152, MCL 432.316, and section 16(4) of the lawful sports betting act, 2019 PA 149, MCL 432.416. Sec. 973. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for local government programs may be used to provide assistance to a local revenue sharing board referenced in an agreement authorized by the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Indian gaming regulatory act, Public Law 100-497. (2) A local revenue sharing board described in subsection (1) shall comply with the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275, and the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (3) A county treasurer may receive and administer funds on behalf of a local revenue sharing board. Funds appropriated in part 1 for local government programs may be used to audit local revenue sharing board funds held by a county treasurer. This section does not limit the ability of local units of government to enter into agreements with federally recognized Indian tribes to provide financial assistance to local units of government or to jointly provide public services. (4) A local revenue sharing board described in subsection (1) shall comply with all applicable provisions of any agreement authorized by the Indian gaming regulatory act, Public Law 100-497, in which the local revenue sharing board is referenced, including, but not limited to, the disbursal of tribal casino payments received in accordance with applicable provisions of the tribal-state class III gaming compact under which those funds are received. (5) The director of the MDSP and the executive director of the Michigan gaming control board may assist the local revenue sharing boards in determining allocations to be made to local public safety organizations. (6) Not later than September 30, the Michigan gaming control board shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations on the receipts and distribution of revenues by 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 local revenue sharing boards. Sec. 974. If revenues collected in the state services fee fund created in section 12a of the Michigan Gaming Control and Revenue Act, 1996 IL 1, MCL 432.212a, are less than the amounts appropriated from the state services fee fund, available revenues must be used to fully fund the appropriation in part 1 for casino gaming regulation activities before distributions are made to other state departments and agencies. If the remaining revenue in the state services fee fund is insufficient to fully fund appropriations to other state departments or agencies, the shortfall must be distributed proportionally among those departments and agencies. Sec. 975. In expending the funds appropriated in part 1 for advertising for responsible gaming, the Michigan gaming control board shall engage with MDHHS on strategies to support addiction prevention and education efforts in addition to advertising for responsible gaming. Not later than September 1, the Michigan gaming control board shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on the expenditures and programming funded from the appropriations in part 1 for advertising for responsible gaming. Sec. 976. The executive director of the Michigan gaming control board may pay rewards of not more than $5,000.00 to a person who provides information that results in the arrest and conviction on a felony or misdemeanor charge for a crime that involves the horse racing industry. A reward paid under this section must be paid out of the appropriation in part 1 for the racing commission. Sec. 977. All appropriations from the equine industry development fund created in section 20 of the horse racing law of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 1995, 1995 PA 279, MCL 431.320, except for the racing commission appropriations, must be reduced proportionately if revenues to the equine industry development fund decline during the current fiscal year to a level lower than the amount appropriated in part 1. Sec. 978. The Michigan gaming control board shall use actual expenditure data in determining the actual regulatory costs of conducting racing dates and shall submit a report of that data to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives appropriations subcommittees on agriculture. The Michigan gaming control board may not be reimbursed for more than the actual regulatory cost of conducting race dates. In determining actual costs, the Michigan gaming control board shall take into account that each specific breed of horse may require different regulatory mechanisms. Sec. 979. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for millionaire party regulation, the Michigan gaming control board may receive and expend internet gaming fund revenue in an amount that is not more than the amount appropriated in part 1 for necessary expenses incurred in the licensing and regulation of millionaire parties under article 2 of the Traxler-McCauley-Law-Bowman bingo act, 1972 PA 382, MCL 432.132 to 432.152. Any unused internet gaming fund revenues are subject to the distribution requirements in section 16 of the lawful internet gaming act, 2019 PA 152, MCL 432.316. Not later than March 1, the Michigan gaming control board shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes all of the following: (a) The total expenditures related to the licensing and regulating of millionaire parties. (b) The steps taken to ensure charities are receiving revenue 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 due to them. (c) A description of the progress on promulgating rules to ensure compliance with the Traxler-McCauley-Law-Bowman bingo act, 1972 PA 382, MCL 432.101 to 432.152. (d) Any enforcement actions taken. STATE BUILDING AUTHORITY Sec. 1100. (1) Subject to section 242 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1242, and on the approval of the state building authority, the department of treasury may expend from the general fund of this state during the fiscal year an amount necessary to meet the cash flow requirements of those state building authority projects solely for lease to a state agency identified in both part 1 and this section, and for which state building authority bonds or notes have not been issued, and for the sole acquisition by the state building authority of equipment and furnishings for lease to a state agency as permitted by 1964 PA 183, MCL 830.411 to 830.425, for which the issuance of bonds or notes is authorized by an appropriations PA that is effective for the immediately preceding fiscal year. Any general fund advances for which state building authority bonds have not been issued must bear an interest cost to the state building authority at a rate that is not greater than the rate earned by the state treasurer's common cash fund during the period in which the advances are outstanding and are repaid to the general fund of this state. (2) On sale of bonds or notes for the projects identified in part 1 or for equipment as authorized by an appropriations PA and in this section, the state building authority shall credit the general fund of this state an amount equal to the amount expended 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 from the general fund plus interest, if any, as described in this section. (3) For state building authority projects for which bonds or notes have been issued and on the request of the state building authority, the state treasurer shall make advances without interest from the general fund as necessary to meet cash flow requirements for the projects. The state building authority shall reimburse the state treasurer for the advances when the investments earmarked for the financing of the projects mature. (4) If a project identified in part 1 is terminated after final design is complete, advances made on behalf of the state building authority for the costs of final design must be repaid to the general fund in a manner recommended by the director of the state building authority. Sec. 1102. (1) The state building authority shall not release state building authority funding to a university or community college to finance the construction or renovation of a facility that collects revenue in excess of money required for the operation of that facility unless the university or community college agrees to use that excess revenue to reimburse the state building authority. The excess revenue received by the state building authority as reimbursement must be credited to the general fund to offset rent obligations associated with the retirement of bonds issued for the applicable facility. The auditor general shall annually identify and audit the facilities that are subject to this section. Costs associated with the administration of the audit must be charged against money received by the state building authority as reimbursement under this section. (2) As used in this section, "revenue" includes state 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 appropriations, facility opening money, other state aid, indirect cost reimbursement, and other revenue generated by the activities of the facility. Sec. 1103. Not later than October 15, the state building authority shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the JCOS regarding the status of construction projects associated with state building authority bonds as of the end of the immediately preceding fiscal year. Not later than 30 days after a refinancing or restructuring bond issue is sold, the state building authority shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the JCOS regarding the status of construction projects associated with that bond issue. Each report must include all of the following: (a) A list of all completed construction projects for which state building authority bonds have been sold, and which bonds are currently active. (b) A list of all projects under construction for which sale of state building authority bonds is pending. (c) A list of all projects authorized for construction or identified in an appropriations act for which approval of schematic/preliminary plans or total authorized cost is pending that have state building authority bonds identified as a source of financing. REVENUE STATEMENT Sec. 1201. In accordance with section 18 of article V of the state constitution of 1963, fund balances and estimates are presented in the following statement: BUDGET RECOMMENDATIONS BY OPERATING FUNDS 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 (Amounts in millions) Fiscal Year 2026-2027 Beginning Balance Estimated Revenue Ending Balance OPERATING FUNDS General fund/general purpose 319.7 13,310.0 19.9 School aid fund 753.3 21,974.0 2.0 Federal aid 0.0 31,047.2 0.0 Transportation funds 0.0 10,904.4 0.0 Special revenue funds 3,738.5 9,442.3 3,287.0 Other funds 1,817.2 54.2 1,871.4 TOTALS $6,628.7 $86,732.1 $5,180.3 ARTICLE 6A DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES - human services part 1 line-item appropriations FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of health and human services for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, from the following funds: DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated classified positions 9,855.8 ï¿½ï¿½ Full-time employees 9,716.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Limited-term employees 406.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Noncareer/per diem employees 8.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Part-time employees 0.0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 ï¿½ï¿½ Permanent-intermittent employees 39.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Seasonal employees 5.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 6,644,754,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 9,218,100 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 6,635,535,900 Federal revenues: Capped federal revenues 397,990,300 Social security act, temporary assistance for needy families 466,050,000 Total other federal revenues 4,157,940,100 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 62,962,100 Total private revenues 8,997,900 Total other state restricted revenues 121,962,200 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,419,633,300 Sec. 102. CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT Full-time equated classified positions 174.7 Child support enforcement operations--FTEs 169.7 $ 28,534,900 Child support incentive payments 24,409,600 Legal support contracts 132,600,300 State disbursement unit--FTEs 5.0 4,638,400 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 190,183,200 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Capped federal revenues 16,239,100 Total other federal revenues 149,872,300 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 State general fund/general purpose $ 24,071,800 Sec. 103. COMMUNITY SERVICES AND OUTREACH Full-time equated classified positions 45.0 Bureau of community services and outreach--FTEs 20.0 $ 2,900,000 Community services and outreach administration--FTEs 13.0 9,265,900 Community services block grant 31,221,600 Diaper assistance grant 718,800 Homeless programs--FTEs 4.0 28,972,400 Housing and support services 13,643,100 Runaway and homeless youth grants 11,837,900 Weatherization assistance 22,633,700 Weatherization assistance IIJA--FTEs 8.0 10,156,400 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 131,349,800 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Capped federal revenues 72,468,500 Social security act, temporary assistance for needy families 19,638,500 Total other federal revenues 11,474,400 State general fund/general purpose $ 27,768,400 Sec. 104. CHILDREN'S SERVICES AGENCY - CHILD WELFARE Full-time equated classified positions 3,467.2 Adoption subsidies $ 228,000,000 Adoption support services--FTEs 10.0 29,309,200 Attorney general contract 5,191,100 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Child abuse and neglect - children's justice act--FTE 1.0 549,900 Child care fund 339,928,700 Child care fund - indirect cost allotment 3,500,000 Child protection 1,264,700 Child welfare administration travel 132,600 Child welfare licensing--FTEs 48.0 6,930,900 Child welfare local office staff - noncaseload compliance--FTEs 353.0 43,144,700 Child welfare medical/psychiatric evaluations 6,207,800 Children trust Michigan--FTEs 5.0 4,125,400 Children's protective services - caseload staff--FTEs 1,325.1 155,838,900 Children's protective services supervisors--FTEs 335.1 42,416,200 Children's services administration--FTEs 195.0 28,490,900 Contractual services, supplies, and materials 9,852,000 Court-appointed special advocates 2,250,000 Education planners--FTEs 2.0 45,400 Family preservation and prevention services administration--FTEs 7.8 1,263,400 Family preservation programs--FTEs 25.3 58,479,600 Foster care payments 375,900,000 Foster care services - caseload staff--FTEs 768.7 90,795,300 Foster care services supervisors--FTEs 183.7 25,240,100 Guardianship assistance program 12,800,000 Interstate compact 68,700 Peer coaches--FTEs 45.5 6,579,600 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Permanency resource managers--FTEs 28.0 3,666,600 Prosecuting attorney contracts 7,285,200 Second line supervisors and technical staff--FTEs 126.0 20,609,200 Settlement monitor 1,660,200 Strong families/safe children 10,082,000 Title IV-E compliance and accountability office--FTEs 4.0 477,200 Youth in transition--FTEs 4.0 7,650,600 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,529,736,100 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential 244,400 Federal revenues: Capped federal revenues 97,313,500 Social security act, temporary assistance for needy families 265,938,900 Total other federal revenues 251,600,300 Special revenue funds: Local funds - county chargeback 48,503,000 Private - collections 1,500,000 Children's trust fund 1,845,300 Total other state restricted revenues 3,600,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 859,190,700 Sec. 105. CHILDREN'S SERVICES AGENCY - JUVENILE JUSTICE Full-time equated classified positions 125.8 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Bay Pines Center--FTEs 49.2 $ 7,136,100 Committee on juvenile justice administration--FTEs 2.5 219,100 Committee on juvenile justice grants 921,600 Community support services--FTEs 2.0 983,100 County juvenile officers 3,904,300 Juvenile justice, administration and maintenance--FTEs 18.2 7,551,900 Juvenile justice treatment centers--FTEs 53.9 16,260,600 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 36,976,700 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Capped federal revenues 5,563,300 Total other federal revenues 10,000 Special revenue funds: Local funds - county chargeback 10,484,300 Local funds - state share education funds 1,527,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 19,391,600 Sec. 106. PUBLIC ASSISTANCE Full-time equated classified positions 1.0 Emergency services local office allocations $ 7,553,900 Family independence program 82,485,000 Family independence program - clothing allowance 10,000,000 Family independence program - child supplemental payment 23,240,100 Food stamps program benefits 3,446,187,200 Indigent burial 2,157,100 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Low-income home energy assistance program 149,077,400 Michigan agricultural surplus system 12,045,000 Michigan energy assistance program--FTE 1.0 100,000,000 Refugee assistance program 3,950,300 State disability assistance payments 4,543,800 State supplementation 58,085,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,899,324,800 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Capped federal revenues 153,027,700 Social security act, temporary assistance for needy families 91,668,200 Total other federal revenues 3,441,477,200 Special revenue funds: Child support collections 9,908,100 Low-income energy assistance fund 100,000,000 Public assistance recoupment revenue 4,811,300 Supplemental security income recoveries 1,797,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 96,634,800 Sec. 107. LOCAL OFFICE OPERATIONS AND SUPPORT SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 5,559.0 Administrative support workers--FTEs 64.1 $ 5,722,800 Adult services local office staff--FTEs 519.4 65,274,200 Contractual services, supplies, and materials 33,567,000 Departmentwide employee economic adjustments 27,246,300 Donated funds positions--FTEs 159.0 19,939,700 Elder Law of Michigan MiCAFE contract 247,500 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Electronic benefit transfer (EBT) 6,143,700 Employment and training support services 3,869,100 Food stamps reinvestment--FTEs 13.0 2,172,400 Local office policy and administration--FTEs 122.0 21,146,100 Local office staff travel 8,327,400 Medical/psychiatric evaluations 180,500 Public assistance local office staff--FTEs 4,681.5 559,105,200 SSI advocacy legal services grant 975,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 753,916,900 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from department of corrections 120,200 IDG from department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential 8,223,000 IDG from department of technology, management, and budget - office of retirement services 11,200 Federal revenues: Capped federal revenues 53,378,200 Social security act, temporary assistance for needy families 88,804,400 Total other federal revenues 202,918,800 Special revenue funds: Local funds - county chargeback 9,000 Local funds - donated funds 2,438,300 Private funds - donated funds 7,247,900 Private revenues 250,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 390,515,900 Sec. 108. DISABILITY DETERMINATION SERVICES 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Full-time equated classified positions 483.1 Disability determination operations--FTEs 480.0 $ 102,790,800 Retirement disability determination--FTEs 3.1 475,700 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 103,266,500 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from department of technology, management, and budget - office of retirement services 619,300 Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues 100,587,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 2,060,100 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations for fiscal year 2026-2027 general sections Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the current fiscal year, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is $1,541,595,500.00 and state spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $228,677,600.00. The following itemized statement identifies appropriations from which spending to local units of government will occur: DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT Child support incentive payments $ 9,754,900 Legal support contracts 1,400 COMMUNITY SERVICES AND OUTREACH 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Community services and outreach administration 1,000 Homeless programs 11,800 Housing and support services 138,500 CHILDREN'S SERVICES AGENCY ï¿½ CHILD WELFARE Child care fund 208,675,600 Child care fund - indirect cost allotment 3,500,000 Child welfare licensing 26,500 Child welfare medical/psychiatric evaluations 18,100 Children trust Michigan 35,100 Contractual services, supplies, and materials 50,700 Family preservation programs 100 Foster care payments 2,122,400 Prosecuting attorney contracts 1,235,600 Strong families/safe children 36,300 Youth in transition 800 CHILDREN'S SERVICES AGENCY ï¿½ JUVENILE JUSTICE Bay Pines Center 40,700 Community support services 124,100 County juvenile officers 67,900 PUBLIC ASSISTANCE Emergency services local office allocations 2,045,000 Indigent burial 2,800 Michigan energy assistance program 439,300 State disability assistance payments 256,300 LOCAL OFFICE OPERATIONS AND SUPPORT SERVICES Contractual services, supplies, and materials 84,000 Employment and training support services 5,400 DISABILITY DETERMINATION SERVICES 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Disability determination operations 3,300 TOTAL OF PAYMENTS TO LOCAL UNITS OF GOVERNMENT $ 228,677,600 Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1: (a) "AIDS" means acquired immunodeficiency syndrome. (b) "CCBHC" means certified community behavioral health clinic. (c) "CMHSP" means a community mental health services program as that term is defined in section 100a of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1100a. (d) "CMS" means the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. (e) "CPT" means current procedural terminology. (f) "Current fiscal year" means the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027. (g) "Department" means the department of health and human services. (h) "Director" means the director of the department. (i) "EPSDT" means early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment. (j) "Federal poverty level" means the poverty guidelines revised periodically and published in the Federal Register by the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services under the Secretary's authority to revise the poverty line under 42 USC 9902. (k) "FQHC" means federally qualified health center. (l) "FTE" means full-time equated. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (m) "GME" means graduate medical education. (n) "Health plan" means, at a minimum, an organization that meets the criteria for delivering the comprehensive package of services under the department's comprehensive health plan. (o) "HEDIS" means health care effectiveness data and information set. (p) "HMO" means health maintenance organization. (q) "IDEA" means the individuals with disabilities education act, 20 USC 1400 to 1482. (r) "IDG" means interdepartmental grant. (s) "MCH" means maternal and child health. (t) "Medicaid" means benefits under the medical assistance program established under title XIX of the social security act, 42 USC 1396 to 1396w-8, and administered by the department under the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.1 to 400.119b. (u) "Medicare" means benefits under the federal Medicare program established under title XVIII of the social security act, 42 USC 1395 to 1395mmm. (v) "MiCAFE" means Michigan's coordinated access to food for the elderly. (w) "MIChild" means the program described in section 1670 of this part. (x) "MiSACWIS" means Michigan statewide automated child welfare information system. (y) "PACE" means program of all-inclusive care for the elderly. (z) "PAS/ARR-OBRA" means the preadmission screening and annual resident review required under the omnibus budget reconciliation act of 1987, section 1919(e)(7) of the social security act, 42 USC 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 1396r. (aa) "PATH" means Partnership. Accountability. Training. Hope. (bb) "PFAS" means perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances. (cc) "PIHP" means an entity designated by the department as a regional entity or a specialty prepaid inpatient health plan for Medicaid mental health services, services to individuals with developmental disabilities, and substance use disorder services. Regional entities are described in section 204b of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1204b. Specialty prepaid inpatient health plans are described in section 109f of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.109f. (dd) "Previous fiscal year" means the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026. (ee) "Quarterly basis" means February 1, April 1, July 1, and September 30 of the current fiscal year. (ff) "Semiannual basis" means March 1 and September 30 of the current fiscal year. (gg) "Settlement" means the settlement agreement entered in the case of Dwayne B. v Snyder, Docket No. 2:06-cv-13548 in the United States District Court for the Eastern District of Michigan. (hh) "SSI" means supplemental security income. (ii) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house appropriations committees, the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on the department budget, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office. (jj) "Temporary assistance for needy families" or "TANF" or "title IV-A" means part A of title IV of the social security act, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 42 USC 601 to 619. (kk) "Title IV-B" means part B of title IV of the social security act, 42 USC 621 to 629m. (ll) "Title IV-D" means part D of title IV of the social security act, 42 USC 651 to 669b. (mm) "Title IV-E" means part E of title IV of the social security act, 42 USC 670 to 679c. (nn) "Title X" means subchapter VIII of the public health service act, 42 USC 300 to 300a-8, which establishes grants to states for family planning services. Sec. 204. If the state administrative board, acting under section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount appropriated under part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and serving in each house, intertransfer funds within part 1 for the particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution. Sec. 205. (1) The department shall use the internet to fulfill the reporting requirements of this part and shall make each report readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each required report in a single archivable location on the department's website not later than the due date required for each report. (2) In addition to placing all reports required in the current fiscal year on the department's website, the department shall maintain on its website all reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years posted by fiscal year in the same single archivable location. (3) The department shall transmit all required reports for the current fiscal year to the standard report recipients and any other required recipients by email. The email shall include a copy of the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 report and a link to access the report online. Sec. 206. The department shall receive and retain copies of all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department shall follow federal and state law and guidelines for short-term and long-term retention of records. The department shall electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required by federal and state guidelines. Sec. 207. (1) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to maintain a searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following for the department: (a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category. (b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit. (c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor, including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and payment description. (2) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to update the searchable website on a quarterly basis. Sec. 208. Not later than December 15, the state budget office shall prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses by major departmental program or program areas. Sec. 209. Not later than 14 days after the release of the executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate with the state budget office to provide an annual report on 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the previous 2 fiscal years. Sec. 210. Not later than November 15, the department shall report on private and other third-party funds received by the department in the previous fiscal year. The report must include the amount of funding received, the specific source of funding received, the purpose for which funding was expended, and the amount of any remaining funds. Sec. 211. Consistent with section 217 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, the department shall prepare a report on out-of-state travel expenses by not later than January 1. The report must list all travel outside this state by classified and unclassified employees in the previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or in part with funds appropriated in the department's budget. The report must include all of the following information: (a) The dates of each travel occurrence. (b) The total transportation and related costs of each travel occurrence and the proportions funded with state general fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal revenues, local revenues, and private revenues, including specific sources of state restricted, federal, local, and private revenues. (c) The destination of each travel occurrence. (d) The specific purpose and description of each travel occurrence, including the specific name of the event or meeting. Sec. 212. On a quarterly basis, the department shall report on all of the following: (a) The number of full-time equated positions in pay status by 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 civil service classification. (b) A comparison by line item of the number of full-time equated positions authorized from funds appropriated in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated positions employed by the department at the end of the reporting period. (c) The number of active employees in each of the following statuses: (i) Full-time salary. (ii) Full-time hourly. (iii) Part-time. (iv) Permanent-intermittent. (v) Limited-term. (vi) Seasonal. (vii) Worker's compensation. (viii) Noncareer/per diem. (ix) Job share. (x) Special personal services/contractual. (d) The number of overtime hours worked by employees, by classifications. Sec. 213. Not later than April 1, the department shall report on each specific policy change made to implement a public act affecting the department that took effect during the previous calendar year. The report must include reference to the public act that necessitates the policy change. The department shall submit the report to the standard report recipients, to the senate and house standing committees responsible for addressing issues affected by the public acts, and to the joint committee on administrative rules. Sec. 214. (1) Not later than April 1, the department shall 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 maintain, on a publicly accessible website, a department scorecard that identifies, tracks, and updates on a quarterly basis key metrics that are used to monitor and improve the department's performance. (2) The department shall notify the standard report recipients when the quarterly updates to the department scorecard are available on a publicly accessible website. Sec. 215. (1) Unless specifically authorized elsewhere in this part or part 1, funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to pay for a state obligation that exceeds $200,000.00 for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim without prior legislative approval. (2) If a state obligation for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim results in a change from current statute, the department shall notify the legislature. (3) This section does not apply to compensation and other relief to individuals wrongfully imprisoned as required under the wrongful imprisonment compensation act, 2016 PA 343, MCL 691.1751 to 691.1757. Sec. 216. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $20,000,000.00 for federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Federal contingency authorization must not be made available to increase TANF authorization. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $20,000,000.00 for state 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $5,000,000.00 for local contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $2,000,000.00 for private contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 217. Total authorized appropriations from all sources under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 are estimated at $174,401,600.00. From this amount, total appropriations for pension-related legacy costs for the department are estimated at $174,401,600.00. Total appropriations for retiree health care legacy costs for the department are estimated at $0.00. Sec. 218. To the extent possible, the department shall not expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted. Sec. 219. The department shall submit reports that summarize all work project accounts not later than December 31, March 30, June 30, and September 30. The reports must include all of the following: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) A list of all work project accounts. (b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each account. (c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously designated work project accounts, the name and description of the work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed amounts. Sec. 220. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1: (a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are available. (b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. (c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. Sec. 221. The department shall not take disciplinary action against an employee of the department because the employee communicates with a member of the legislature or legislative staff unless the communication is prohibited by law and the department is exercising its authority as provided by law. Sec. 222. (1) The department shall maximize the efficiency of the state workforce and utilization and occupancy of office space, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 leased or owned, for each division within the department. Employees with job responsibilities that require employees to serve in their capacities outside of an office shall be monitored each pay period to ensure all work hours reported on timesheets are actually worked. (2) The department shall comply with requirements set forth by the office of the state employer on in-person work and utilization and occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure at least 80% of employees are in person and building occupancy and utilization rates are at least 80% or higher. (3) The department shall submit reports not later than January 15 and April 15 on all of the following: (a) Remote work policy by division. (b) Building occupancy by address. (c) Whether the building is state-owned or leased. (d) Aggregate badge scanning information by employee. (4) As used in this section, "occupancy" means the actual number of employees physically present in a workplace. Sec. 223. (1) The department shall require as a condition of each contract or subcontract that the prequalified contractor or prequalified subcontractor agree to use the E-Verify system to verify that all persons hired during the contract term by the contractor or subcontractor are legally present and authorized to work in the United States. (2) The department may verify this information directly or may require contractors and subcontractors to verify the information and submit a certification to the department. The department shall submit a report not later than March 1 that describes the processes it has developed and implemented under this section. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (3) The department shall not contract with any foreign entities that are known or suspected to be enemies of the United States or known foreign adversaries. Foreign adversaries include all of the following: (a) The People's Republic of China. (b) The Russian Federation. (c) The Islamic Republic of Iran. (d) The Democratic People's Republic of Korea. (e) The Republic of Cuba. (f) The Venezuelan regime of Nicolï¿½s Maduro. (g) The Syrian Arab Republic. (h) An agency or other entity under significant control of a country described in subdivisions (a) to (g). (4) As used in this section, "E-Verify" means an internet-based system operated by the Department of Homeland Security, United States Citizenship and Immigration Services in partnership with the Social Security Administration. Sec. 224. (1) Within 30 days of enactment of this act, the state budget office shall post a list of legislatively directed spending items funded in part 1 as defined in sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. The list must include all information and documents pertaining to the funded items as publicly disclosed in accordance with sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. (2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency administering the grant shall submit a report not later than November 1. The department or agency shall update the report and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 shall submit updated reports not later than March 15 and September 15 of the current fiscal year. The department or agency shall include in the report the most comprehensive information the department or agency has available at the time of posting for grants awarded, including, but not limited to, project milestones, percent completed, funding expended, and funding encumbered. (3) Before executing a grant agreement, all grant recipients must provide a spending plan that specifies the scope of service, the program goals, the measurement for meeting program goals, and how all grant funds will be used, and must indicate if any grant funds will be provided to a third party or subrecipient. (4) Each department or agency responsible for awarding or disbursing grant funds must annually audit the entity's use of the grant funds for each fiscal year in which the grant is active. Each entity must submit information requested by the department or agency to confirm compliance. (5) Each department or agency shall work with the office of the auditor general to conduct an audit of the grant according to generally accepted accounting practices and audit standards. The office of the auditor general must be given access to all internal and external records. All contracts or agreements between a department or agency and a grant recipient or between a grant recipient and a third party must include a clause granting the office of the auditor general access to all internal and external records. (6) Grant recipients and their immediate family members are prohibited from being employed by the executive branch or legislative branch of this state. In addition, grant recipients are prohibited from serving on any state board that has direct or 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 indirect responsibility for approving or auditing grant funds awarded or disbursed by any department or agency. (7) Full and complete audits of grant funds issued by the department or an agency of this state, without redaction unless required by law, must be posted to the department's or agency's website in a conspicuous place for public review. (8) On a quarterly basis, the department or agency shall submit a report on legislatively sponsored grant funds that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) The name of each grant recipient and the status of each grant. (b) The amount distributed to each grant recipient. (c) Any changes to scope or costs of program. (9) The report under subsection (8) must include the following statements made by the department or agency: (a) A statement that confirms the department or agency reviewed and affirmed compliance by each grant recipient with program scope and expenditure of grant funding. (b) A statement that confirms the department or agency reviewed applicable program reports and requests for reimbursement. Sec. 225. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall do the following: (a) Report on any amounts of severance pay for a department director, deputy director, or other high-ranking department official not later than 14 days after a severance agreement with the director, deputy director, or official is signed. The name of the director, deputy director, or official and the amount of severance pay must be included in the report required by this subdivision. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) Not later than February 1, report on the total amount of severance pay remitted to former department employees during the previous fiscal year and the total number of former department employees that were remitted severance pay during the previous fiscal year. (2) As used in this section, "severance pay" means compensation to which both of the following apply: (a) The compensation is payable or paid upon the termination of employment. (b) The compensation is paid in addition to wages or benefits earned during the course of employment or generally applicable retirement benefits. Sec. 226. Funds appropriated in part 1 from state or federal sources are prohibited from being used to provide services, grants, or programming to an individual who is not a citizen of the United States unless the individual is a qualified alien as that term is defined in 8 USC 1641. This section does not prohibit the department, political subdivision, state university, or other state agency from expending funds for the purpose of detaining individuals who are not citizens of the United States, including any costs associated with housing such individuals in county jails or state correctional facilities. Sec. 227. State funds must not be used for diversity, equity, and inclusion, or diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives or programs, as outlined in federal Executive Order No. 14151, 90 Fed. Reg. 8339 (January 29, 2025) "Ending Radical and Wasteful Government DEI Programs and Preferencing", federal Executive Order No. 14168, 90 Fed. Reg. 8615 (January 30, 2025) "Defending Women from Gender Ideology Extremism and Restoring Biological Truth to 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the Federal Government", or federal Executive Order No. 14173, 90 Fed. Reg. 8633 (January 31, 2025) "Ending Illegal Discrimination and Restoring Merit-Based Opportunity". Sec. 228. The department shall use the same precontract risk assessment program utilized by the department of technology, management, and budget to evaluate financial compliance, security risks, and insurance requirements prior to contract execution. Sec. 250. If either of the following events occurs, not later than 30 days after the event occurs, the department shall notify the standard report recipients of that fact: (a) A legislative objective of this part or of a bill or amendment to a bill to amend the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.1 to 400.119b, cannot be implemented because implementation would conflict with or violate federal law. (b) A federal grant for which a notice of an award has been received cannot be used or will not be used. Sec. 251. (1) In addition to funds appropriated in part 1 for all programs and services, there is appropriated, for write-offs of accounts receivable, deferrals, and for prior year obligations in excess of applicable prior year appropriations, an amount equal to total write-offs and prior year obligations, but not to exceed amounts available in prior year revenues. (2) The department's ability to satisfy appropriation fund sources in part 1 is not limited to collections and accruals pertaining to services provided in the current fiscal year and includes reimbursements, refunds, adjustments, and settlements from prior years. Sec. 252. Not later than February 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 recipients, a report on the detailed names and amounts of estimated federal, restricted, private, and local sources of revenue that support the appropriations in each of the line items in part 1 for the previous fiscal year. The report must itemize, rather than aggregate, specific revenue sources deposited into the generic statewide integrated governmental management application (SIGMA) fund numbers 1200, 1274, 4000, and 5000. Sec. 253. As required under part 23 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.2301 to 333.2321, the appropriations in part 1 must include the following: (a) Immunizations. (b) Communicable disease control. (c) Sexually transmitted infection control. (d) Tuberculosis control. (e) Prevention of gonorrhea eye infection in newborns. (f) Screening newborn infants for the conditions listed in section 5431 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.5431, or recommended by the newborn screening quality assurance advisory committee created under section 5430 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.5430. (g) Health and human services annex of the Michigan Emergency Management Plan. (h) Prenatal care. (i) Mental health. Sec. 254. (1) The department may contract with the Michigan Public Health Institute for the design and implementation of projects and for other public health-related activities prescribed in section 2611 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.2611. The department may develop a master agreement with the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Michigan Public Health Institute to carry out the activities described in this subsection for up to a 1-year period. (2) On a semiannual basis, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report that includes all of the following: (a) A detailed description of each funded project. (b) The amount allocated for each project, the appropriation line item from which the allocation is funded, and the source of financing for each project. (c) The expected project duration. (d) A detailed spending plan for each project, including a list of all subgrantees and the amount allocated to each subgrantee. (3) On a semiannual basis, the department shall provide, to the standard report recipients, a copy of all reports, studies, and publications produced by the Michigan Public Health Institute, its subcontractors, or the department with the funds appropriated in the department's budget in the previous fiscal year and allocated to the Michigan Public Health Institute. Sec. 255. The department shall ensure that faith-based organizations are able to apply and compete for services, programs, or contracts that the organizations are qualified and suitable to fulfill. The department shall not disqualify faith-based organizations solely on the basis of the religious nature of the organizations or the guiding principles or statements of faith for the organizations. Sec. 256. In accordance with section 1b of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.1b, the department shall treat part 1 and this part as a time-limited addendum to the social welfare act, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.1 to 400.119b. Sec. 257. (1) Not later than 30 days before the implementation date of a major policy change, the department shall report the change to the standard report recipients. (2) The department shall make the department's entire policy and procedures manual available and accessible to the public on the department's website. (3) The department shall attach each policy bulletin issued during the previous calendar year to the report under section 213. Sec. 258. The department may establish and collect fees for publications, videos and related materials, conferences, and workshops. Collected fees are appropriated when received and must be used to offset expenditures for publication printing and mailing, costs of the publications, videos and related materials, conferences, and workshops. The department shall not collect fees under this section that exceed the cost of the expenditures. If collected fees are appropriated under this section in an amount that exceeds the current fiscal year appropriation, not later than 30 days after the collected fee appropriation, the department shall notify the standard report recipients of that fact. Sec. 259. The department may retain all of this state's share of food assistance overissuance collections as an offset to general fund/general purpose costs. Retained collections must be applied against federal funds deductions in all appropriation units where department costs related to the investigation and recoupment of food assistance overissuances are incurred. Retained collections in excess of the investigation and recoupment costs must be applied against the federal funds deducted in the departmental administration and support appropriation unit. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 260. If the revenue collected by the department from fees and collections exceeds the amount appropriated in part 1, the revenue may be carried forward with the approval of the state budget director into the subsequent fiscal year. The revenue carried forward under this section must be used as the first source of funds in the subsequent fiscal year. Sec. 261. If the department receives tobacco tax funds and Healthy Michigan fund revenue from part 1, not later than April 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on both of the following activities during the previous fiscal year: (a) Tobacco tax revenue appropriations in the Medicaid program. (b) Information for each project implemented with revenue under this section, including all of the following: (i) The project's name. (ii) The appropriation line item and amount. (iii) The project's target population. (iv) A description of the project. (v) The outcomes or accomplishments of the project. Sec. 262. If the department is authorized under federal law or the law of this state to collect an overpayment owed to the department, beginning 60 days after the initial notification date of the overpayment amount, the department may assess a penalty of 1% per month. If an overpayment is caused by department error, a penalty may be assessed 6 months after the initial notification date of the overpayment amount. The department shall not collect penalty interest in an amount that exceeds the amount of the original overpayment. This state's share of any funds collected 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 under this section must be deposited in the general fund of this state. Sec. 263. (1) On a quarterly basis, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on the status of the implementation of any noninflationary, noncaseload, programmatic funding increases in the current fiscal year from the previous fiscal year. The report must confirm the implementation of already-implemented funding increases and provide an explanation for any planned implementation of funding increases that have not yet occurred. For any planned implementation of funding increases that have not yet occurred, the report must include an expected implementation date and the reason for delayed implementation. (2) For any programmatic funding increases not reported as implemented or in the process of being implemented in the first 2 reports under subsection (1), the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a status update in the last 2 reports required under subsection (1). Sec. 265. The department shall provide the approved spending plan for each line item receiving an appropriation in the current fiscal year to the senate and house of representatives appropriations subcommittees on the department budget and the senate and house fiscal agencies not later than 60 days after approval by the department or not later than January 15 of the current fiscal year, whichever is earlier. In all places that a line-item appropriation number is listed, a line-item appropriation name must be included. The spending plan must include the following information regarding planned expenditures for each category: allocation in the previous period, change in the allocation, and new allocation. The spending plan must include the following 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 information regarding each revenue source for the line item: category of the fund source indicated by general fund/general purpose, state restricted, local, private, or federal. Figures included in the approved spending plan must not be assumed to constitute the actual final expenditures, as line items may be updated on an as-needed basis to reflect changes in projected expenditures and projected revenue. The department shall supplement the spending plan information by providing a list of all active contracts and grants in the department's contract system. For amounts listed in the other contracts category of each spending plan, the department shall include the name of the line item and the name of the fund source for each contract, grant, and amount for the current fiscal year. For amounts listed in the all other costs category of each spending plan, the department shall provide a list detailing planned expenditures and amounts for the current fiscal year and include the name of the line item and the name of the fund source related to each expenditure and amount. Sec. 267. Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on total actual expenditures in the previous fiscal year for advertising and media outreach, including the purpose, amount, and fund source by program or appropriation line item. Sec. 268. Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit a description of programs report to the standard report recipients. For each program, the report must include the appropriation unit; the line item name and number; the appropriation history; the program name; the program overview; a financing summary; and, where applicable, the program's legal basis, effectiveness, and outcomes. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 269. On a quarterly basis, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on any line-item appropriation for which the department estimates total annual expenditures would exceed the funds appropriated for the line-item appropriation by 5% or more. The department shall provide a detailed explanation for any relevant line-item appropriation exceedance, identify the corrective actions undertaken to mitigate line-item appropriation expenditures from exceeding the funds appropriated for the line-item appropriation by a greater amount, and identify other corrective actions if no legislative transfer or supplemental is approved. This section does not apply for line-item appropriations that are part of the May revenue estimating conference caseload and expenditure estimates. Sec. 270. (1) The department shall ensure that each federally recognized tribe is able to apply and compete for services, programs, grants, and contracts. (2) For competitive grant programs described in this part, each federally recognized tribe is eligible to apply for grant funds made available to organizations exempt from federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501, and to local units of government. Sec. 271. (1) Except as provided in this subsection, before submission of a waiver, state plan amendment, or similar proposal to CMS or another federal agency, the department shall notify the standard report recipients of the planned submission. This subsection does not apply to the submission of a waiver, state plan amendment, or similar proposal that does not propose a material change or is outside of the ordinary course of a waiver, state plan amendment, or similar proposal. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (2) On a semiannual basis, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report that summarizes the status of any new or ongoing discussions with CMS, the United States Department of Health and Human Services, or another federal agency regarding any potential or future waiver applications and the status of any submitted waivers that have not yet received federal approval. If there is not a reportable item at the time that a semiannual report is due, a report is not required. Sec. 272. The department shall advise the legislature of the receipt of a notification from the attorney general's office of a legal action in which expenses had been recovered under section 10b of the medicaid false claim act, 1977 PA 72, MCL 400.610b. If applicable, not later than February 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) The total amount recovered from the legal action. (b) The program or service for which the money was originally expended. (c) Details on the disposition of the funds recovered, such as the appropriation or revenue account in which the money was deposited. (d) A description of the facts involved in the legal action. Sec. 273. On the day that is 1 week after the day that the governor submits the executive budget proposal for the ensuing fiscal year to the legislature, the department, in collaboration with the state budget office, shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on spending and revenue projections for each of the capped federal funds listed in this subsection. The report must contain actual spending and revenue in the previous fiscal 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 year, spending and revenue projections for the current fiscal year as enacted, and spending and revenue projections in the executive budget proposal for the immediately ensuing fiscal year for each individual line item for the department budget. The report must also include federal funds transferred to other departments. The capped federal funds include, but are not limited to, all of the following: (a) TANF. (b) Title XX social services block grant. (c) Title IV-B subpart I child welfare services block grant. (d) Title IV-B subpart II promoting safe and stable families funds. (e) Low-income home energy assistance program. Sec. 274. (1) On a quarterly basis, the department, with the approval of the state budget director, is authorized to realign sources between other federal, TANF, and capped federal financing authorizations to maximize federal revenues. The realignment of financing must not produce any of the following: (a) A gross increase or decrease in the department's total individual line item authorizations. (b) A net increase or decrease in total federal revenues. (c) A net increase in TANF authorization. (2) On a quarterly basis, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on the realignment of federal fund sources transacted to date in the current fiscal year under subsection (1), including the dates, line items, and amounts of the transactions. If, at the time a quarterly report is due, a transaction was not made under subsection (1), a report is not required. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (3) Not later than 30 days after the date on which year-end book closing is completed, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on the realignment of federal fund sources that took place as part of the year-end closing process for the previous fiscal year. Sec. 275. Any public advertisement for public assistance must inform the public of the welfare fraud hotline operated by the department. Sec. 276. Not later than April 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on funds appropriated for the healthy moms, healthy babies initiative. The report must include the budgeted amount, year-to-date expenditures, remaining balance of appropriations, and the percent of budget spent for each appropriation related to the initiative. The report must also include information on how the funds have assisted with meeting the goals and outcomes of the initiative. Sec. 277. (1) The department may accept monetary and nonmonetary gifts, bequests, donations, contributions, or grants from any private source to support, in whole or in part, a departmental function or program. The department shall expend or use such gifts, bequests, donations, contributions, or grants for the purposes designated by the private source, if the purpose is specified and part 1 has sufficient authorization. (2) In the demonstration projects line item, money remaining in the fund under this section that is unexpended and unencumbered must not lapse to the general fund but must be carried forward to the subsequent fiscal year. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT Sec. 401. (1) The appropriations in part 1 assume a total federal child support incentive payment of $26,500,000.00. (2) From the federal money received for child support incentive payments, $12,000,000.00 must be retained by this state and expended for child support program expenses. (3) From the federal money received for child support incentive payments, $14,500,000.00 must be paid to counties based on each county's performance level for each of the performance measures under 45 CFR 305.2. (4) If the child support incentive payment to this state from the federal government is greater than $26,500,000.00, then 100% of the amount in excess must be retained by this state and is appropriated until the total retained by this state reaches $15,397,400.00. (5) If the child support incentive payment to this state from the federal government is greater than the amount needed to satisfy subsections (1), (2), (3), and (4), the additional funds are subject to appropriation by the legislature. (6) If the child support incentive payment to this state from the federal government is less than $26,500,000.00, then the state share and the county share must each be reduced by 50% of the shortfall. Sec. 409. (1) If statewide retained child support collections exceed $38,300,000.00, 75% of the amount in excess of $38,300,000.00 is appropriated to legal support contracts. The excess appropriation may be distributed to eligible counties to supplement, but not supplant, county title IV-D funding. (2) Each county whose retained child support collections in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the current fiscal year exceed its fiscal year 2004-2005 retained child support collections, excluding tax offset and financial institution data match collections in both the current fiscal year and fiscal year 2004-2005, shall receive its proportional share of the 75% excess appropriation. Sec. 410. (1) If title IV-D-related child support collections are escheated, the state budget director is authorized to adjust the sources of financing for the funds appropriated in part 1 for legal support contracts to reduce federal authorization by 66% of the escheated amount and increase general fund/general purpose authorization by the same amount. The adjustment is required to offset the loss of federal revenue due to the escheated amount being counted as title IV-D program income in accordance with 45 CFR 304.50. (2) Not later than 30 days after an adjustment under subsection (1), the department shall notify the standard report recipients of the adjustment. COMMUNITY SERVICES AND OUTREACH Sec. 453. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for homeless programs, the department shall allocate funds to the emergency shelter program to support efforts of shelter providers to move homeless individuals and households into permanent housing as quickly as possible. The funds must be equal to or exceed the amount that a provider would receive if the provider is paid a $19.00 per diem rate. Expected outcomes are increased shelter discharges to stable housing destinations, decreased recidivism rates for shelter clients, and a reduction in the average length of stay in emergency shelters. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on the total amount expended for the emergency shelter program in the prior 2 fiscal years, the total number of shelter nights provided, and the average length of stay in an emergency shelter. Sec. 454. The department shall allocate the full amount of funds appropriated in part 1 for homeless programs to provide services for homeless individuals and families, including, but not limited to, third-party contracts for emergency shelter services. Sec. 455. As a condition of receipt of federal TANF revenue, after admitting a family to a homeless shelter, the homeless shelter and human services agencies shall collaborate with the department to obtain necessary TANF eligibility information on the family as soon as possible. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for homeless programs, the department is authorized to make allocations of TANF revenue only to the homeless shelters and human services agencies that report necessary data to the department to meet TANF eligibility reporting requirements. Homeless shelters or human services agencies that do not report necessary data to the department to meet TANF eligibility reporting requirements shall not receive reimbursements that exceed the per diem amount the homeless shelters or human service agencies received in fiscal year 2000. The use of TANF revenue under this section is not an ongoing commitment of funding. Sec. 456. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for homeless programs, the department shall allocate $10,000.00 to reimburse public service agencies that provide documentation of paying birth certificate fees on behalf of category 1 homeless clients at county 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 clerk's offices. Each public service agency must be reimbursed for the cost of the birth certificate fees quarterly until the allocation is fully spent. Sec. 457. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for homeless programs, the department shall allocate $8,500,000.00 of TANF revenue to support family shelters or families who are homeless and at risk of being homeless. Funds appropriated under this section must be used as follows: (a) $3,000,000.00 for emergency hotels for families experiencing homelessness. (b) $3,500,000.00 for assistance and supports to families engaged with child welfare. This may include, but is not limited to, eviction diversion, first month's rent and deposit, and utility arrears. (c) $2,000,000.00 for creating additional spaces at family homeless shelters that have been in operation for at least 24 months. Sec. 458. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for homeless programs, the department shall require any entities receiving direct or indirect state funds to report data to a Homeless Management Information System that satisfies the baseline data collection requirements. Sec. 459. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for homeless programs, the department shall allocate $2,000,000.00 of TANF revenue to acquire and develop for individuals and families noncongregate shelter that utilizes options under a Housing First model and prioritizes providing stable and permanent housing without preconditions or requirements, such as sobriety or participation in treatment programs. Eligible uses for this funding 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 may include, but are not limited to, hotels, motels, dormitories, recuperative care facilities, and other facilities that offer noncongregate shelter. Sec. 461. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for community services outreach administration, the department shall allocate $1,000,000.00 as a grant to a nonprofit organization that grows and distributes food and provides farming education programming to children from low-income families in not less than 3 counties in this state. The nonprofit organization shall use the funds to expand its services to additional schools and communities. The funding may be used to cover employee costs, food and supplies, equipment, and other operational costs identified by the nonprofit organization to support its mission and goals. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for community services outreach administration, the department shall allocate $1,000,000.00 as competitive grants to nonprofit organizations to provide food delivery and farming and nutrition education programming to children from low-income families in this state. Sec. 463. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for runaway and homeless youth grants and domestic violence prevention and treatment, the department is authorized to make allocations of TANF revenue only to agencies that report necessary data to the department to meet TANF eligibility reporting requirements. Sec. 464. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for diaper assistance grant, the department shall allocate grants to diaper assistance programs, maternity homes, local county offices, and other nonprofit agencies that distribute diapers free of charge and were established as of January 1, 2020. The funds must be used only to purchase diapering supplies and to cover related administrative 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 costs. Funds must be distributed to all counties in the state. Not more than 10% of the funds appropriated in part 1 are expendable for administrative purposes. (2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on the distribution of diapering supplies that includes, but is not limited to, the names and locations of the entities described in subsection (1) that distribute diaper supplies and the total amount of diapering supplies distributed by each entity by county. Sec. 465. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for community services and outreach administration, $3,950,000.00 must be distributed as provided in subsection (2). Michigan 2-1-1 must continue to seek funding from local United Way organizations and other nonprofit organizations and foundations. (2) Funds distributed under subsection (1) must be distributed to Michigan 2-1-1, the entity designated by the Michigan public service commission to serve as this state' s 2-1-1 coordinating agency under section 214(5) of the Michigan telecommunications act, 1991 PA 179, MCL 484.2214. Michigan 2-1-1 shall use the funds only to fulfill the Michigan 2-1-1 business plan adopted by Michigan 2-1-1 in January 2005. (3) Michigan 2-1-1 shall refer any received calls that report fraud, waste, or abuse of state-administered public assistance to the department. (4) Michigan 2-1-1 shall submit, to the department, the senate and house of representatives standing committees with primary jurisdiction over matters relating to human services and telecommunications on 2-1-1 system performance, and the standard 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 report recipients, a report that includes, but is not limited to, call volume by health and human service needs and unmet needs identified through caller data and number and the percentage of callers referred to public or private provider types. Sec. 466. Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit to the standard report recipients a report on the runaway homeless youth program that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) A list of counties served and the amount of funding allocated to each county. (b) The amount of funding being allocated to previously underserved communities and how capacity has been expanded or is planned to be expanded in those communities. (c) Identified barriers that have hindered providers from expanding capacity. CHILDREN'S SERVICES AGENCY - CHILD WELFARE Sec. 501. (1) A goal is established that not more than 25% of all children in foster care at any given time during the current fiscal year, unless contrary to the best interest of the child, will have been in foster care for 24 months or more. (2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report describing the steps that will be taken to achieve the goal under subsection (1). The report must also include the following: (a) An explanation of the most significant barriers that prevent long-term foster children from permanent placements. (b) The number of children currently in foster care for longer than 24 months and the percentage of those children that had paid 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Medicaid behavioral health claims or encounters within the last year. Sec. 502. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for foster care, the department shall reimburse Indian tribal governments for 50% of the foster care expenditures for children who are under the jurisdiction of Indian tribal courts and are not otherwise eligible for federal foster care cost sharing. However, the department may reimburse up to 100% of the foster care expenditures for an Indian tribal government that enters into a state-tribal Title IV-E agreement allowed under this state's Title IV-E state plan. Sec. 505. Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on youth referred or committed to the department for care or supervision in the previous fiscal year that outlines the number of youth served by the department in the juvenile justice system by the type of setting for each youth. Sec. 506. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for attorney general contract, not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on the juvenile justice system in any county in which funds appropriated in part 1 are expended. The report must include, but not be limited to, all of the following: (a) The number of youth referred or committed to the department for care or supervision in the previous fiscal year and in the first quarter of the current fiscal year. (b) The number of youth referred or committed to the care or supervision of the county in which funds appropriated in part 1 were expended for the previous fiscal year and the first quarter of the current fiscal year. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (c) The type of setting for each youth referred or committed for care or supervision, any applicable performance outcomes, and identified financial costs or savings. (d) The required and actual staff-to-youth ratios. Sec. 507. The department's ability to satisfy appropriation deductions in part 1 for foster care private collections is not limited to collections and accruals pertaining to services provided only in the current fiscal year and may include revenues collected during the current fiscal year for services provided in prior fiscal years. Sec. 508. (1) In addition to the amount appropriated in part 1 for children trust Michigan, money granted or money received as gifts or donations to the children's trust fund created in 1982 PA 249, MCL 21.171 to 21.172, is appropriated for expenditure. (2) For the funds described in subsection (1), the department shall ensure that administrative delays are avoided and local grant recipients and direct service providers receive money in an expeditious manner. The department and the state board as that term is defined in section 2 of the child abuse and neglect prevention act, 1982 PA 250, MCL 722.602, shall make the children's trust fund contract funds available to grantees not later than 31 days after the start date of the funded project. Sec. 509. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for adoption support services, the department shall maintain a rate structure that pays for cases based on the average length of time it takes to reach adoption finalization by case characteristics for licensed child placing agencies contracted with the department that provide adoption services for youth in foster care. (2) For cases accepted before the implementation of the new 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 rate structure described in subsection (1), the department shall maintain the increase of contracted rates paid to private child placing agencies, including the $23.00 per diem for all foster youth from the date of the case acceptance to the date of adoption petition acceptance or 150 days, whichever occurs sooner, for licensed child placing agencies contracted with the department to provide adoption services for foster youth. The per diem rate must be separate from the outcome-based reimbursement system and must not be deducted from the total reimbursement an agency receives for the applicable placement or finalization rate of an adoption. Sec. 510. The department shall submit reports on a monthly basis to the standard report recipients on all of the following: (a) The number of children without an identified placement awaiting placement in a residential setting by county in which the child resided before placement. (b) The reason for the delay in placement, including, but not limited to, facility bed shortages, placement process delays, or other reasons. (c) The number of incentive payments that were awarded by the department by child caring institution. (d) The number of incentive payments that were denied by the department by child caring institution. (e) Of the denials identified in subdivision (d), the department shall provide the rationale for denial of incentive payments including, but not limited to, refusal of placement, lack of staffing, or other reasons. Sec. 511. The department shall submit, to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing committees that cover subject matters dealing with families and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 human services, reports on a semiannual basis that include the number and percentage of children who received timely physical and mental health examinations after entry into foster care. The goal of the program is for not less than 85% of children to have an initial medical and mental health examination that is not later than 30 days after entry into foster care. Sec. 512. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for foster care payments, the department shall allocate $500,000.00 of TANF revenue to provide luggage to a child who is being removed from the child's home or changing placement and is a TANF eligible individual. The luggage provided under this section is considered to belong to the child and may not be confiscated by the department or the child's foster parent. The department is not required to provide new luggage under this section to a child who is changing placement and has had luggage previously provided by the department. (2) The department may partner with local charities to establish and maintain the supply of luggage to be used to transport a child's personal belongings. Additionally, the department may accept donations of luggage to fulfill the requirements of this section. (3) As used in this section, "luggage" means any of the following: (a) A suitcase of any size. (b) A duffel bag that holds at least 30 liters. Sec. 513. (1) The department shall not expend funds appropriated in part 1 to pay for the department's direct placement of a child in an out-of-state facility unless all of the following conditions are met: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) An appropriate placement is not available in this state, as determined by the department's interstate compact office. (b) An out-of-state placement exists that is nearer to the child's home than the closest appropriate in-state placement, as determined by the department's interstate compact office. (c) The out-of-state facility meets all of the licensing standards for a comparable facility in this state. (d) The out-of-state facility meets all of the applicable licensing standards of the state in which it is located. (e) The department has visited the site of the out-of-state facility; has reviewed the facility records, licensing records, and reports; and believes that the facility is an appropriate placement for the child. (2) The department shall not expend money for a child placed in an out-of-state facility without approval of the executive director of the children's services agency. (3) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the state court administrative office and the standard report recipients, a report on the number of Michigan children residing in out-of-state facilities in the previous fiscal year, the total cost and average per diem cost of the out-of-state placements to this state, a list of each out-of-state placement arranged by the Michigan county of residence for each child, and a list of out-of-state facilities that were visited by the department before the child's placement. Sec. 514. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for foster care payments, the department shall maintain a statewide respite care services network available to licensed foster parents and unlicensed relative caregivers that care for children in foster 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 care. (2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on the total number of licensed foster parents and unlicensed relative caregivers that were provided respite services, the average amount of respite time per month, and the total amount of funding spent on respite services during the previous fiscal year. Sec. 515. If a children's protective services caseworker requests approval for another children's protective services caseworker or other department employee to accompany the caseworker on a home visit because the caseworker believes that it would be unsafe to conduct the home visit alone, the department shall not deny the request. Sec. 516. (1) From funds appropriated in part 1 for child care fund, the administrative or indirect cost payment equal to 10% of a county's total monthly gross expenditures must be distributed to the county on a monthly basis, and a county is not required to submit documentation to the department for any of the expenditures that are covered under the 10% payment as described in section 117a(4)(b)(ii) and (iv) of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.117a. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for child care fund ï¿½ indirect cost allotment, the department shall allocate $3,500,000.00 to counties and tribal governments that receive reimbursements in part 1 from child care fund. (3) The amount described in subsection (2) must be distributed to each county or tribal government in the same proportion as indirect cost allotments are provided to counties in the same 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 manner described in section 117a of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.117a. Sec. 517. For a child placed in a family foster care home located out of this state, the department may ask a state or private child placing agency contracted by the receiving state to carry out required visits and any additional visits that the department finds necessary. Sec. 518. Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on the cumulative child care fund expenditures of in-home juvenile justice care that are eligible for the 75% state and 25% local split required under section 117a(4)(i) of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.117a. Eligible expenditures include community-based juvenile supervision, services, and related practices, and per diem rates for the use of respite and shelter for less than 30 days. The report must also include the expenditures by county and type of service provided, the number of youth receiving care, and the number of days of care. Sec. 519. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for attorney general contract, the department must allow for contracts, interagency agreements, or any other type of agreement currently held by the department of attorney general to be competitively bid. Sec. 520. Not later than February 15 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on the number of days of care and expenditures by funding source for the previous fiscal year for out-of-home placements by specific placement programs for child abuse or child neglect and juvenile justice, including, but not limited to, paid relative placement, department direct family foster care, private- 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 agency-supervised foster care, private child caring institutions, county-supervised facilities, and independent living. The report must also include the number of days of care for department-operated residential juvenile justice facilities by security classification. Sec. 522. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for youth in transition, the department shall allocate $750,000.00 for scholarships through the fostering futures scholarship program in the Michigan education trust to youth who were in foster care because of child abuse or child neglect and are attending a college or a career technical educational institution located in this state. One hundred percent of the funds appropriated must be used to fund scholarships for the youth described in this section. (2) Not later than June 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report that includes the number of youth who applied for scholarships under this section, the number of youth who received scholarships under this section and the amount of each scholarship, and the total amount of funds spent or encumbered in the current fiscal year. Sec. 523. Not later than February 15 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on the MI Family Together program. The report must include both of the following: (a) Utilization and outcome data based on families served. (b) For each program, information on any innovations or expansions that may increase child safety and reduce risk. Sec. 524. As a condition of receiving funds appropriated in part 1 for strong families/safe children, not later than October 1 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 of the current fiscal year, counties shall submit the service spending plan to the department for approval. Not later than 30 calendar days after receipt of a properly completed service spending plan, the department shall approve the service spending plan. Sec. 525. (1) The department shall maintain the same on-site evaluation processes for privately operated child welfare and juvenile justice residential facilities as is used to evaluate state-operated facilities. Penalties for noncompliance must be the same for privately operated child welfare and juvenile justice residential facilities and state-operated facilities. (2) On a quarterly basis, the department shall submit to the standard report recipients a report that includes data on the number of penalties for noncompliance under subsection (1) listed by facility along with the reason for noncompliance for the most recent quarter. Sec. 526. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for court-appointed special advocates, the department shall allocate $2,250,000.00 to fund a project with the entity that received funds under section 526 of article 6 of 2025 PA 22 for the purpose described in that section. The funds must be used to recruit, screen, train, and supervise volunteers who provide advocacy services on behalf of abused and neglected children. Sec. 527. Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit to the standard report recipients, information used to train providers on the use of restraint and seclusion in foster care and juvenile justice residential facilities. Sec. 528. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for child care 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 fund, the department shall allocate $3,730,300.00 to support the annual basic grant to counties with a population of less than 75,000, according to the most recent federal decennial census, and as described in section 117e of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.117e, and to eligible tribal entities. The basic grant must be $56,520.00 to eligible counties and tribal entities. Sec. 529. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for family preservation programs, the department shall maintain the total funding level of the MI Family Together program at an amount not less than the amount provided as of September 30, 2021. Sec. 530. (1) All master contracts relating to foster care and adoption services as funded by the appropriations in section 105 of part 1 must be performance-based contracts that employ a client-centered and results-oriented process that is based on measurable performance indicators and desired outcomes and includes an annual assessment of the quality of services provided. (2) Not later than February 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report detailing measurable performance indicators, desired outcomes, and an assessment of the quality of services provided by the department during the previous fiscal year. Sec. 532. Beginning on October 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall hold semiannual meetings with state and private residential providers to receive feedback and discuss potential improvements to the residential system. Sec. 534. Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on the adoption subsidies expenditures from the previous fiscal year. The report must include, but is not limited to, the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 range of non-$0.00 annual adoption support subsidy amounts, for both Title IV-E eligible cases and state-funded cases, paid to adoptive families; the number of Title IV-E and state-funded cases; the number of cases in which an adoption support subsidy request by an adoptive parent was denied by the department; and the number of adoptive parents who requested a renegotiation of their adoption support subsidy contract. Sec. 537. Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on the following information for cases of child abuse or child neglect from the previous fiscal year: (a) The total number of relative care placements. (b) The total number of relative care placements into unlicensed relative homes. (c) The total number of relative care placements into licensed relative homes. (d) The total number of unlicensed relative providers with a relative placement that were denied a foster home license due to not meeting the standards established for foster care licensing in this state. (e) From a sample of cases, a list of the reasons documented by the department for denial of relative foster home licensure. (f) For licensed or approved relative caregivers with placements, the status of Title IV-E claims for foster care maintenance payments and foster care administrative payments. Sec. 540. If a physician or psychiatrist who is providing services to a state or court ward placed in a residential facility submits a formal request to the department to change the psychotropic medication for a ward, the department shall, if the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 ward is a state ward, make a determination on the proposed change not later than 7 business days after the request or, if the ward is a temporary court ward, seek parental consent not later than 7 business days after the request. If the determination or parental consent is not provided by the seventh business day, the department shall petition the court for the determination or consent on the eighth business day. Sec. 546. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for foster care payments and from child care fund, the department shall pay an administrative rate before incentive payments of not less than $60.20 to providers of general foster care, independent living, and trial reunification services. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall pay providers of independent living plus services per diem statewide rates for staff-supported housing and host-home housing that are based on proposals submitted in response to a solicitation for pricing. The independent living plus program provides staff-supported housing and services for foster youth 16 years of age to 19 years of age who, because of their individual needs and assessments, are not initially appropriate for general independent living foster care. (3) If required by the federal government to meet Title IV-E requirements, on a quarterly basis, providers of foster care services shall submit a report on expenditures to the department to identify actual costs of providing foster care services. Sec. 547. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for the guardianship assistance program, the department shall pay a minimum rate that is not less than the approved age-appropriate payment rates for youth placed in family foster care. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (2) The department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report that includes quarterly data on the number of children enrolled in the guardianship assistance and foster care ï¿½ children with serious emotional disturbance waiver programs. Sec. 550. (1) The department shall not offset against reimbursements to counties or seek reimbursement from counties for charges that were received by the department more than 12 months before the department seeks to offset against reimbursement. A county shall not request reimbursement, and reimbursements must not be paid, for a charge that is more than 12 months after the date of service or original status determination when initially submitted by the county. (2) Not later than 12 months after a date of service, a service provider shall submit a request for payment. A request for payment submitted later than 12 months after the date of service requires the provider to submit an exception request to the county or the department for approval or denial. (3) A county is not subject to any offset, chargeback, or reimbursement liability for a prior expenditure resulting from an error in a foster care fund source determination. Sec. 551. Not later than 30 days after a county requests a clarification through the department's child care fund management unit email address, the department shall respond to the request. Sec. 552. Sixty days after a county's child care fund review is completed, including the receipt of all requested documentation from the county, the department shall provide the results of the review to the county. In the review, the department shall not evaluate the relevancy, quality, effectiveness, efficiency, or impact of the services provided to youth by the county's child care 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 fund programs. The department shall not release the results of a county's child care fund review to a third party without the permission of the county. Sec. 554. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for foster care payments, the department shall allocate $50,000.00 to the entity that received funds under section 554 of article 6 of 2025 PA 22 to provide a shopping environment to local children in need, as well as clothing, shoes, toys, linens, nursery furniture, strollers, car seats, school supplies, hygiene products, and safety equipment to local foster children and their families free of charge. Sec. 555. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for foster care payments, the department shall allocate $4,000,000.00 as grants to community action agencies to support youths in informal kinship care and the families that care for the youths. (2) As used in this section, "informal kinship care" means an arrangement between a youth's parents and a family member of the youth or someone with a close relationship with the family of the youth to care for the youth without the involvement of the department or court. Sec. 557. If a vehicle that is owned by the state is available and not scheduled for use by other state workers, the department may consider a children's protective services caseworker or a foster care caseworker driving the vehicle to a foster home visit or driving the vehicle to the caseworker's own home as an allowable use of the vehicle if the driving would be helpful to the caseworker in conducting the caseworker's work. Sec. 559. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for adoption support services, not later than December 1 of the current 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 fiscal year, the department shall allocate $500,000.00 to a grant recipient to operate and expand its adoptive parent mentor program to provide a listening ear, knowledgeable guidance, and community connections to adoptive parents and children who were adopted in this state or another state. (2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the grant recipient shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on the program described in subsection (1), including, but not limited to, the number of cases served and the number of cases in which the program prevented an out-of-home placement. Sec. 562. If a foster parent transports a foster child to parent-child visitation, the department shall reimburse the foster parent for the foster parent's time and travel. As part of the foster care parent contract, the department shall provide written confirmation to foster parents that states that the foster parents have the right to request reimbursement for all parent-child visitations. Not later than 60 days after receiving a request from a foster parent for eligible reimbursement, the department shall provide the reimbursement. Sec. 564. (1) The department shall maintain a clear policy for parent-child visitations. All of the following individuals shall meet an 85% success rate, after accounting for factors outside of caseworker control: (a) Caseworkers and supervisors of local county offices. (b) Caseworkers and supervisors of child placing agencies. (2) In accordance with the court-ordered number of required meetings between caseworkers and a parent, the caseworkers shall achieve a success rate of 85%, after accounting for factors outside of caseworker control. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (3) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on the following: (a) The percentage of success rates for parent-child visitations and court-ordered required meetings under subsections (1) and (2) for the previous fiscal year. (b) The barriers to achieve the success rates described in subsections (1) and (2) and how this information is tracked. Sec. 568. (1) The department shall ensure each youth transitioning out of foster care is given assistance with obtaining a driver license or state identification card and is issued a copy of the youth's Social Security number, as required by department policy. Assistance must be provided to each youth who is eligible to obtain a driver license or state identification card and, based on the youth's citizenship and legal residency status, a Social Security card. (2) Not later than April 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on the number of youth who obtained a driver license or state identification card, the number of youth who obtained a Social Security card, and the number of youth who were eligible but did not receive a driver license, state identification card, or Social Security card and an explanation as to why the youth did not receive the documents. Sec. 569. The department shall reimburse each private child placing agency that completes an adoption at the rate on the date when the petition for adoption and the required support documentation were accepted by the court and not the rate on the date when the court's order placing for adoption was entered. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 574. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for foster care payments, $1,375,000.00 is allocated to support family incentive grants to private and community-based foster care service providers and relative caregivers for assistance with home improvements to alleviate safety concerns or obtain items needed to ensure compliance with licensing rule requirements and to accommodate children in foster care. (2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on the total amount expended in the previous year for grants to private and community-based foster care service providers for home improvements or physical exams described in subsection (1) and the number of grants issued. Sec. 575. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for children's services administration, the department shall allocate $200,000.00 to provide support and coordinated services to the kinship caregiver advisory council. The responsibilities of the council may include all of the following: (a) Establishing a public awareness campaign to educate the public about kinship caregivers and this state's efforts to better serve kinship caregivers. (b) Consulting and coordinating with the kinship caregiver navigator program to collect aggregate data on individuals being served by the kinship caregiver navigator program, including information on what services the individuals need. (c) Consulting and collaborating with the provider of the kinship caregiver navigator program on the design and administration of the program. (d) Establishing, maintaining, and updating a list of local 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 support groups and programs that provide services to kinship families and, in order to obtain a better understanding of the issues facing kinship families, devising a plan of action for engaging with the groups and programs on the list. (e) Developing methods to promote and improve collaboration between state, county, and local governments and agencies and private stakeholders for all of the following reasons: (i) To obtain a broad understanding of the characteristics and prevalence of kinship caregiving. (ii) To improve service delivery. (iii) To include the methods in the council's recommendations. Sec. 578. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for foster care payments, the department shall allocate Title IV-E passthrough funds for educational pilot programs to strengthen this state's child welfare workforce. The department shall enter into contractual arrangements with 1 or more state universities to provide bachelor of social work and master of social work educational training, including field placements and stipends for tuition and educational expenses. In exchange, students completing eligible educational programs are contractually obligated to work for Michigan child welfare agencies for a minimum of 4 months for every semester they receive the stipend. The matching funds for the Title IV-E funds must be provided by the participating state universities from the expenses incurred for training child welfare students who participate in the program. (2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on the status of pilot programs under subsection (1) that includes, but is not limited to, the total number of applicants, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the total number of program participants, a list of state universities that participated in the pilot programs, and the total amount of matching funds that each state university contributed to the programs. Sec. 581. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for foster care payments, the department shall allocate at least $50,000.00 for caseworkers to provide immediate assistance with urgent needs, including, but not limited to, food, clothing, and other basic necessities, for children, including children who are victims of human trafficking, on the children's removal from the children's homes or other dangerous environments. Sec. 583. Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing committees that cover subject matters dealing with families and human services, a report that includes all of the following: (a) The number and percentage of foster parents that closed their license in the previous fiscal year, the reasons the foster parents left, and how the figures compare to the figures for prior fiscal years. (b) The number and percentage of foster parents successfully retained in the previous fiscal year and how the figures compare to the figures for prior fiscal years. (c) The number and percentage of licensed foster homes that closed their license because they adopted their foster child based on survey data from foster parents closing their licenses. Sec. 585. Each month, the department shall make available at least 1 pre-service training class in which new caseworkers for private foster care and adoption agencies can enroll. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 588. (1) Concurrently with public release, the department shall transmit, without revision, all reports from the court-appointed settlement monitor, including, but not limited to, the needs assessment and period outcome reporting, to the standard report recipients. (2) Not later than October 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a detailed plan that addresses the status and progress toward exiting the settlement by September 30 of the current fiscal year. The report must include an update on the department's child welfare initiative. Sec. 589. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for child care fund, the department shall pay 100% of the administrative rate for all new cases referred to providers of foster care services. (2) On a quarterly basis, the department shall submit a report, to the standard report recipients, on the monthly number of all foster care cases administered by the department and all foster care cases administered by private providers. Sec. 592. On a quarterly basis, the department shall submit, to the chairs of the senate and house of representatives standing oversight committees and the standard report recipients, a report that includes data from children's protective services staff for each of the following for the most recent quarter before the applicable report is submitted: (a) The percent of investigations commenced in 24 hours immediately after receiving a report. (b) The percent of central registry reviews performed for required individuals. (c) The percent of face-to-face contacts made within the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 established timeframe required by the department. (d) In appropriate cases, the percent of sibling placement evaluations completed when 1 or more children remain in the home after a child has been removed. (e) The percent of supervisory reviews performed in a timely manner. (f) The results of a department survey of children's protective services investigators on the number of investigators who are concerned for their own personal safety. (g) The percent of investigators using the mobile application or another tool to document compliance. Sec. 593. The department shall conduct an annual review in each county to determine if the county has adopted and implemented standard child abuse and child neglect investigation and interview protocols under section 8(6) of the child protection law, 1975 PA 238, MCL 722.628. Sec. 594. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for foster care payments, the department shall support regional resource teams to provide for the recruitment, retention, and training of foster and adoptive parents and shall expand the Michigan youth opportunities initiative to all counties of this state. The purpose of the funding is to increase the number of annual inquiries from prospective foster parents, increase the number of nonrelative foster homes that achieve licensure each year, increase the annual retention rate of nonrelative foster homes, reduce the number of older foster youth placed outside of family settings, and provide older youth with enhanced support in transitioning to adulthood. Sec. 598. Partial child care fund reimbursements to counties for undisputed charges must not be made later than 45 business days 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 after receipt of the required forms and documentation. Not later than 15 business days after receiving a request from a county for reimbursement of a disputed charge, the department shall commence activity to investigate and resolve the disputed reimbursement charge. The activity to investigate and resolve a disputed reimbursement charge may include, but is not limited to, the use of a formal appeals process under applicable law and the department chargeback policy. Not later than 45 business days after a properly corrected submission by the county, the department shall reimburse the county for the corrected charge or charges. PUBLIC ASSISTANCE Sec. 601. After a client agrees to the release of the client's name and address to the local housing authority, the department shall request from the local housing authority information regarding whether the housing unit for which vendoring has been requested meets applicable local housing codes. Vendoring must be terminated if the local housing authority indicates in writing that the unit does not meet local housing codes and until the local housing authority indicates in writing that the local housing codes have been met. Sec. 602. The department shall conduct a full evaluation of an individual's assistance needs if the individual has applied for disability more than 1 time in a 1-year period. Sec. 603. For any change in the income of a recipient of the food stamps program, the family independence program, or state disability assistance that results in a benefit decrease, the department shall notify the recipient of the amount of the decrease not later than 15 work days before the first day of the month in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 which the decrease takes effect. Sec. 604. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for state disability assistance payments, the department shall operate a state disability assistance program. Except as provided in subsection (3), to be eligible for the program, an individual must be a needy citizen of the United States or alien exempted from the SSI citizenship requirement who is not less than 18 years of age, or an emancipated minor, and meets 1 or more of the following requirements: (a) Is a recipient of SSI, Social Security, or medical assistance due to disability or being 65 years of age or older. (b) Is an individual with a physical or mental impairment that meets federal SSI disability standards, except that the minimum duration of the disability must be 90 days. Substance use disorder alone is not a basis for eligibility. (c) Is a resident of an adult foster care facility, a home for the aged, a county infirmary, or a substance use disorder treatment center. (d) Is an individual receiving 30-day postresidential substance use disorder treatment. (e) Is an individual diagnosed as having AIDS. (f) Is an individual receiving special education services through a local intermediate school district. (g) Is a caretaker of a disabled individual who meets the requirements specified in subdivision (a), (b), (e), or (f). (2) An applicant for or recipient of state disability assistance is considered needy if the applicant or recipient does both of the following: (a) Meets the same asset test as is applied for the family 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 independence program. (b) Has a monthly budgetable income that is less than the payment standards. (3) Except for an individual described in subsection (1)(c) or (d), an individual is not disabled under this section if the individual's drug addiction or alcoholism is a contributing factor material to the determination of disability. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Material to the determination of disability" means that, if the individual stopped using drugs or alcohol, the individual's remaining physical or mental limitations would not be disabling. If the individual's remaining physical or mental limitations would be disabling, then the drug addiction or alcoholism is not material to the determination of disability and the individual may receive state disability assistance, but the individual must actively participate in a substance abuse treatment program, and the assistance must be paid to a third party or through vendor payments. (b) "Substance abuse treatment" includes receipt of inpatient or outpatient services or participation in Alcoholics Anonymous or a similar program. Sec. 605. The level of reimbursement provided to state disability assistance recipients in licensed adult foster care facilities must be the same as the prevailing SSI rate under the personal care category. Sec. 606. County department offices shall require each recipient of family independence program and state disability assistance who has applied with the Social Security Administration for SSI to sign a contract to repay any assistance rendered through 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the family independence program or state disability assistance program on receipt of retroactive SSI benefits. Sec. 607. (1) The department's ability to satisfy appropriation deductions in part 1 for state disability assistance/supplemental security income recoveries and public assistance recoupment revenues is not limited to recoveries and accruals pertaining to state disability assistance, or family independence program grant payments provided only in the current fiscal year and may include revenues collected during the current year that are prior-year-related and not a part of the department's accrued entries. (2) The department may use SSI recoveries to satisfy the deduct in any line in which the revenues are appropriated, regardless of the source from which the revenue is recovered. Sec. 608. An adult foster care facility that provides domiciliary care or personal care to a resident receiving SSI or a home for the aged serving a resident receiving SSI shall not require a resident described in this section to reimburse the home for the aged or adult foster care facility for care at a rate in excess of a rate that is authorized by the legislature. To the extent permitted by federal law, an adult foster care facility and home for the aged that serves a resident receiving SSI is not prohibited from accepting a third-party payment in addition to SSI if the payment is not for food, clothing, or shelter, or would result in a reduction in the resident's SSI payment. Sec. 609. The department shall not reduce the state supplementation level under the SSI program for the personal care/adult foster care and home for the aged categories during the current fiscal year. Not later than 30 days before a proposed 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 reduction in the state supplementation level, the department shall notify the legislature of the proposed reduction. Sec. 610. (1) The department shall grant an exemption from the good-cause criteria for the state emergency relief program if an emergency results from an unexpected expense related to maintaining or securing employment. (2) In determining housing affordability eligibility for state emergency relief, a group is considered to have sufficient income to meet ongoing housing expenses if the group's total housing obligation does not exceed 75% of the group's total net income. (3) The department shall not make a state emergency relief payment to an individual who has been found guilty of fraud in obtaining public assistance. (4) The department shall not make a state emergency relief payment to an individual who is an out-of-state or nonlegal resident. (5) The department shall distribute a state emergency relief payment for rent assistance directly to a landlord and shall not add the payment to a Michigan bridge card. Sec. 611. The state supplementation level under the SSI program for the living independently category or living in the household of another category must not exceed the minimum state supplementation level as required under federal law. Sec. 613. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for indigent burial, the department shall provide a reimbursement for the final disposition of an indigent individual. A reimbursement under this section must comply with all of the following: (a) The maximum allowable reimbursement for the final disposition is $960.00. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) The adult burial with services allowance is $875.00. (c) The adult burial without services allowance is $610.00. (d) The infant burial allowance is $240.00. (e) The adult cremation with services allowance is $640.00. (f) The adult cremation without services allowance is $390.00. (g) The maximum allowable reimbursement if an irrevocable funeral agreement exists is $260.00. (2) The department shall reimburse up to $80.00 for a cremation permit fee and for mileage at the standard rate for an eligible cremation. A reimbursement under this subsection must take into consideration whether an indigent individual's religious preference prohibits cremation. (3) An application for burial services must be made no later than 20 business days after the burial, cremation, or donation takes place. A friend or relative of the indigent individual may supplement the burial payment in any amount up to $6,000.00 for additional services. A funeral director, with written authorization provided by a relative of the indigent individual, is deemed an authorized representative for burial benefits. (4) By January 31 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on burial service payments issued from the state emergency relief program during the previous fiscal year. The report must include the number of applicants denied, categorized by reason for denial, and the number of payments by the following burial service categories: (a) Fetus or infant less than 1 month of age. (b) Burial with memorial service. (c) Burial without memorial service. (d) Cremation with memorial service. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (e) Cremation without memorial service. (f) Transportation of a donated or unclaimed body being cremated. (g) Cremation permit fee for an unclaimed body. (h) Disposition of an unclaimed body. (i) Payment if an irrevocable funeral agreement exists. (j) An unclaimed body received by a university. (5) For any indigent burial reimbursement that is denied, the department shall notify the applicant of the reason for the denial and provide information on how to request a hearing to contest the decision. Sec. 614. By January 15 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on the number and percentage of state disability assistance recipients who were determined to be eligible for federal SSI benefits in the previous fiscal year. Sec. 615. Except as required by federal law, the department shall not use funds appropriated in part 1 to provide public assistance to an individual who is not a United States citizen, permanent resident alien, or refugee. This section does not prohibit the department from entering into a contract with a food bank, emergency shelter provider, or another human service agency that may, as a normal part of doing business, provide food or emergency shelter. Sec. 616. The department shall require a retailer that participates in the electronic benefits transfer program to charge no more than a $2.50 fee for cash back as a condition of participation. Sec. 619. The department shall not deny a title IV-A 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 assistance and food stamps benefit under 21 USC 862a to an individual who has been convicted of a felony for the possession, use, or distribution of a controlled substance, if both of the following are met: (a) The act that resulted in the conviction occurred after August 22, 1996. (b) The individual is not in violation of the individual's probation or parole requirements. Sec. 620. (1) The department shall determine a Medicaid applicant's Medicaid eligibility not later than 90 days after the Medicaid applicant completes a Medicaid application if the Medicaid applicant's disability is an eligibility factor. For other Medicaid applicants, including an applicant who is a patient of a nursing home, the department shall determine the applicant's Medicaid eligibility within 45 days after receiving the Medicaid applicant's application. (2) On a quarterly basis, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on the number of recipients who were ineligible for Medicaid after Medicaid eligibility redeterminations resumed after federal continuous enrollment requirements ended. The report must include, in a monthly data format, the number of recipients who had their eligibility examined directly, through an ex parte eligibility process or through a passive eligibility process. The report must also include a copy of each baseline and monthly report that the department provides to CMS for unwinding data reporting and the number of recipients who did not respond to the department through eligibility outreach or data requests. Sec. 625. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for SSI 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 advocacy legal services grant, the department shall allocate $975,000.00 as a grant to a membership association for attorneys licensed to practice law in this state to assist current or potential recipients of state disability assistance who have applied for or wish to apply for SSI or other federal disability benefits. The grant recipient shall provide a list of newly eligible SSI recipients to the department to verify that services are provided to department referrals. Sec. 626. (1) The department shall not seek, apply for, accept, or renew any waiver of work requirements under 7 USC 2015(o)(4) without first obtaining specific authorization from the legislature. (2) The department shall not exercise the state's option to provide any exemptions from the work requirement under 7 USC 2015(o)(6)(F). This subsection must not be construed to limit the application of good cause exemptions for temporary absence from employment as provided in 7 CFR 273.24(b)(2). Sec. 627. (1) The department shall enter into a data matching agreement with the bureau of state lottery to identify households enrolled in the food stamps program with lottery or gambling winnings of $3,000.00 or more and, to the extent permissible under federal law, treat this data as verified upon receipt. To the extent the data may not be verified upon receipt as described under this subsection, the department shall conduct further investigations to determine whether the households have lottery or gambling winnings that are equal to or greater than the resource limit for elderly or disabled households as defined in 7 USC 2014(g)(1). If the department verifies data on receipt as described under this subsection or determines that a household has lottery or 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 gambling winnings that are equal to or greater than the resource limit for elderly or disabled households as defined in 7 USC 2014(g)(1), the department shall determine that the household is not eligible to participate in the food stamps program. (2) On at least a monthly basis, the department shall receive and review vital records information concerning individuals in households enrolled in the food stamps program that indicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility for food stamps. (3) On at least a quarterly basis, the department shall receive and review information from the department of labor and economic opportunity concerning individuals in households enrolled in the food stamps program that indicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility for food stamps, including, but not limited to, changes in employment or wages. (4) On at least a monthly basis, the department shall receive and review address change information from returned mail by the United States Postal Service and the National Change of Address database concerning individuals in households enrolled in the food stamps program that indicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility for food stamps, including a change in residency. (5) On at least an annual basis, the department shall receive and review information from the department of treasury concerning individuals in households enrolled in the food stamps program that indicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility for food stamps, including, but not limited to, potential changes in income, wages, household composition, or residency as identified by tax records. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (6) On at least a monthly basis, the department shall receive and review information from the department of corrections concerning individuals in households enrolled in the food stamps program that indicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility. Sec. 628. On at least a monthly basis, the department shall utilize Michigan bridge card data to flag any individual making purchases exclusively out-of-state over a 60-day period. The department shall contact each individual flagged within 30 days to determine whether they reside in the state and remove those who are determined not to be residing in the state or do not respond. Within 15 days of their removal, the department shall refer such cases to the United States Attorney's Office for the district where the individual claimed to reside. Sec. 629. On at least a monthly basis, the department shall, to assess continued eligibility and act on findings, review all of the following for households enrolled in the food stamps program: (a) Earned income information, incarceration records, supplemental security income information, beneficiary records, earnings information, and pension information maintained by the United States Social Security Administration. (b) Income and employment information maintained in the national directory of new hires database and child support enforcement data maintained by the United States Department of Health and Human Services. (c) Payment and earnings information maintained by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development. (d) National fleeing felon information maintained by the United States Federal Bureau of Investigation. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 630. (1) The department has the authority to execute a memorandum of understanding with any department, agency, or division for information required to be shared between agencies outlined in this act. (2) This act does not prohibit the department from contracting with 1 or more independent vendors to provide additional data or information that may indicate a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility. Sec. 631. Categorical eligibility under 7 USC 2014(a) or 7 CFR 273.2(j)(2)(iii) must not be granted for any noncash, in-kind, or other benefit unless expressly required by federal law for the supplemental nutrition assistance program. The department shall not apply gross income standards higher than the standards specified in 7 USC 2014(c) or allowable financial resources higher than the standards specified in 7 USC 2014(g)(1), other than financial resources described in 7 USC 2014(g)(2)(D), unless expressly required by federal law. Exempting households from the gross income standards or allowable financial resource standards must not be granted for any noncash, in-kind, or other benefit, unless expressly required by federal law. Sec. 632. The department shall assign certification periods of no greater than 4 months, but not less than 3 months, to households with zero net income, households that include an able-bodied adult without dependents, or other households whose circumstances are determined by the department to be unstable. Sec. 633. If the department receives information concerning an individual enrolled in the food stamps program that indicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility, the department shall review and take action on the individual's or household's 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 case. Sec. 634. The funds appropriated in part 1 for food stamps program benefits must not be used to expand eligibility for the restaurant meal program beyond the federal eligibility standards. The department shall limit eligibility for the restaurant meal program to households receiving food stamps program benefits in which all members are either: (a) Individuals who are 60 years of age or older. (b) Individuals who are disabled. (c) Individuals who are homeless. (d) A spouse of a food stamps program recipient who is eligible for the restaurant meal program. Sec. 635. (1) Not later than November 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall request a waiver from the United States Department of Agriculture to exclude soda and candy from the definition of eligible foods under 7 CFR 271.2. If the United States Department of Agriculture grants the waiver requested under this subsection, the funds appropriated in part 1 for food stamps program benefits must not be used to purchase soda or candy with benefits provided through the food stamps program. (2) As used in this section: (a) "Candy" means preparations of sugar, honey, or other sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts, or other ingredients in the form of bars, drops, or pieces. Candy does not include bars, drops, or pieces that contain flour or that require refrigeration. (b) "Soda" means any nonalcoholic beverage that contains natural or artificial sweeteners. Soda does not include a beverage that contains milk or milk substitutes or is greater than 50% 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 vegetable juice or fruit juice by volume. Sec. 645. The department shall consider an individual or family to be homeless for purposes of eligibility for state emergency relief, if the individual or family is living temporarily with another in order to escape domestic violence. The department shall define and verify domestic violence in the same manner as the department defines and verifies that term in the department's policies on good cause for not cooperating with child support and paternity requirements. Sec. 653. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for food stamps program benefits, an individual who is the victim of domestic violence or human trafficking and who does not qualify for any other exemption may be exempt from the 3-month in 36-month limit on receiving food stamps under 7 USC 2015. The department may extend the exemption for an additional 3 months if an individual described in this section demonstrates to the department a continuing need. Sec. 654. The department shall notify a recipient of food stamps program benefits that the recipient's benefits can be spent with the recipient's Michigan bridge card at many farmers markets in this state. The department shall also provide a recipient with information about the double up food bucks program that is administered by the Fair Food Network. The information about the double up food bucks program must include, but is not limited to, information that if the recipient spends $20.00 at a participating farmers market through the program, the recipient may receive an additional $20.00 to buy Michigan produce. Sec. 655. Not later than 14 days after the spending plan for low-income home energy assistance program is approved by the state 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 budget office, the department shall provide the spending plan, including itemized projected expenditures and itemized expenditures for the previous fiscal year, to the standard report recipients. Sec. 660. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for Michigan agricultural surplus system, the department shall allocate $12,045,000.00 for procuring and distributing the Michigan agricultural surplus system to distribute surplus produce to low-income residents of this state. Sec. 669. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for family independence program ï¿½ clothing allowance, the department shall allocate $10,000,000.00 for the annual clothing allowance. The department shall grant the allowance to eligible children in a family independence program group. Sec. 672. (1) By February 15 of the current fiscal year, the department's office of inspector general shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on the department's efforts to reduce the inappropriate use of Michigan bridge cards and food stamps program trafficking. The department shall provide information on the number of recipients of services who used their Michigan bridge card inappropriately and the current status of each case, the number of recipients whose benefits were permanently and temporarily revoked as a result of inappropriately using their Michigan bridge cards, and the number of retailers that were fined or removed from the electronic benefit transfer program for permitting the inappropriate use of Michigan bridge cards. The report must also include the number of Michigan bridge card trafficking instances and overall welfare fraud referrals, that includes, but is not limited to, information on the number of investigations completed, fraud and intentional program violation 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 dollar amounts identified, the number of referrals to prosecutors, the number of administrative hearing referrals and waivers, and the number of program disqualifications imposed. The report must distinguish between savings and cost avoidance. As used in this subsection: (a) "Cost avoidance" includes expenditures avoided due to front-end eligibility investigations and other preemptive actions undertaken in the prevention of fraud. (b) "Savings" includes receivables established from instances of fraud committed. (2) If a fourth Michigan bridge card has been issued to a household in a 12-month period, the department shall notify the household that the household has reached the number of issued cards threshold. At a household's fifth and each subsequent card replacement request, a card will not be issued until a recipient from the household has spoken directly to the local office district manager or county director. The district manager or county director may issue a new Michigan bridge card based on the district manager's or county director's assessment of the recipient's situation and the recipient's explanation. (3) As used in this section: (a) "Food stamps trafficking" means the buying and selling of food stamps benefits for cash or items not authorized under 7 USC 2036b. (b) "Inappropriate use" means not used to meet a family's ongoing basic needs, including, but not limited to, food, clothing, shelter, utilities, household goods, personal care items, and general incidentals. Sec. 677. (1) The department shall establish a state goal for 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the percentage of family independence program cases involved in employment activities. The percentage established must not be less than 50%. The goal for long-term employment must be 15% of cases for 6 months or more. (2) The department shall submit an annual report, providing quarterly data, to the standard report recipients on the number of cases referred to PATH, the current percentage of family independence program cases involved in PATH employment activities, an estimate of the current percentage of family independence program cases that meet federal work participation requirements on the whole, and an estimate of the current percentage of the family independence program cases that meet federal work participation requirements for those cases referred to PATH. (3) The department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients. The report must include quarterly data on all of the following: (a) The number and percentage of nonexempt family independence program recipients who are employed. (b) The average and range of wages of employed family independence program recipients. (c) The number and percentage of employed family independence program recipients who remain employed for 6 months or more. Sec. 678. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for family independence program ï¿½ child supplemental payment, the department shall allocate $16,240,100.00 of TANF revenue to provide a supplemental payment for the current fiscal year for each child under 6 years of age within a family receiving cash assistance. Not later than November 30 of the current fiscal year, the department shall distribute an equal payment based on the funds available in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 part 1 and the total number of children under 6 years of age who are within a family receiving cash assistance. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for family independence program ï¿½ child supplemental payment, the department shall allocate $7,000,000.00 of TANF revenue to provide a supplemental payment for the current fiscal year for each child 6 years of age or older but under 14 years of age within a family receiving cash assistance. Not later than November 30 of the current fiscal year, the department shall distribute an equal payment based on the funds available in part 1 and the total number of children who are 6 years of age or older but under 14 years of age within a family receiving cash assistance. (3) By February 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on the amount of funding distributed under this section and shall include the number of family independence program cases, the number of family independence program eligible children by age group, and the amount of funding distributed by age category. Sec. 686. (1) The department shall confirm that an individual who presents a personal identification issued by another state and is seeking assistance through the family independence program, food stamps program, state disability assistance program or medical assistance program is not receiving benefits from another state. (2) The department shall confirm the address provided by an individual who is seeking family independence program benefits or state disability assistance benefits. (3) The department shall prohibit an individual who has property assets assessed at a value higher than $200,000.00 from receiving assistance through a department-administered program, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 unless prohibiting assistance would violate a federal law or guideline. (4) The department shall make a reasonable attempt to obtain an up-to-date telephone number for an individual seeking medical assistance benefits during the eligibility determination or redetermination process for the individual. Sec. 687. (1) On a quarterly basis, the department shall compile and make available a report on its website that contains all of the following information about the family independence program, state disability assistance, the food stamps program, indigent burial, Medicaid, and state emergency relief: (a) The number of applications received. (b) The number of applications approved. (c) The number of applications denied. (d) The number of applications pending and neither approved nor denied. (e) The number of cases opened. (f) The number of cases closed. (g) The number of cases at the beginning of the quarter and the number of cases at the end of the quarter. (2) The department shall compile and make the information provided under subsection (1) available for this state as a whole and for each county and shall report the information separately for each program listed in subsection (1). (3) On a quarterly basis, the department shall compile and make available a report on its website of the following family independence program information: (a) The number of new applicants who successfully met the requirements of the 10-day assessment period for PATH. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) The number of new applicants who did not meet the requirements of the 10-day assessment period for PATH. (c) The number of cases sanctioned because of a school truancy policy. (d) The number of cases closed because of the lifetime limits. (e) The number of first-, second-, and third-time sanctions. (f) The number of children 0 to 5 years of age who are living in a family independence program-sanctioned household. CHILDREN'S SERVICES AGENCY ï¿½ JUVENILE JUSTICE Sec. 701. Unless required by a change to federal law or the law of this state or at the request of a provider, the department shall not alter the terms of a signed contract with a private residential facility that serves children who are under state or court supervision without receiving written consent from a representative of the private residential facility. Sec. 702. (1) Not later than December 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on all of the following for the prior fiscal year: (a) The average daily population by month of youths residing at state-run juvenile justice facilities. (b) The total number of beds at each facility, separated by staffed and unstaffed, for each month. (c) The average daily number of available beds by month. (d) The average number of staff vacancies by month. (2) The report must separate the data described in subsection (1) by each state-run juvenile justice facility. Sec. 703. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for juvenile justice, administration and maintenance, the department shall 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 allocate $2,000,000.00 to be distributed as grants to support capital improvements for private and state-run juvenile justice facilities that are licensed and have a contract with this state. Funds must be used to reimburse costs associated with damages resulting from property damage or injury caused by youth placed by the department. Payments must not exceed $100,000.00 per incident or $300,000.00 in total per facility. Sec. 704. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for juvenile justice treatment centers, the department shall allocate $16,260,600.00 to support juvenile justice programming. The funds appropriated in this section must be allocated for both of the following: (a) $8,130,300.00 to the Michigan youth treatment center to support facility operations and services. (b) $8,130,300.00 to support juvenile justice bed expansion projects through private or state-run juvenile justice facilities. Sec. 706. A county is subject to a 50% chargeback for the use of an alternative regional detention service, if the detention service does not fall under the basic grant provision of section 117e of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.117e, or if a county operates the detention service program primarily with professional rather than volunteer staff. Sec. 707. To be reimbursed for child care fund expenditures, a county shall submit to the department the report required under section 117a(11) of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.117a, to enable the department to document a potential federally claimable expenditure. Sec. 708. (1) As a condition of receiving funds appropriated in part 1 for the child care fund line item, by October 15 of the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 current fiscal year, a county shall have an approved service spending plan for the current fiscal year. Not later than August 15 of the current fiscal year, a county shall submit the county's service spending plan for the following fiscal year to the department for approval. The department shall approve a county's service spending plan not later than 30 calendar days after the department receives a properly completed service spending plan from the county that complies with the requirements of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.1 to 400.119b. The department shall notify and submit revisions to a service spending plan to a county whose service spending plan is not approved after initial submission. The department shall not request any additional revisions to a county's service spending plan outside of the requested revision notification submitted to the county by the department. The department shall notify a county that its service spending plan is approved not later than 30 days after the department considers the county's revisions to the county's service spending plan. (2) A county shall submit an amendment to its county service spending plan for the current fiscal year to the department not later than August 30 of the current fiscal year. A county shall submit payable estimates for the current fiscal year to the department not later than September 15 of the current fiscal year. (3) Not later than February 15 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on the number of counties that fail to submit a service spending plan by August 15 of the previous fiscal year and the number of service spending plans not approved by October 15. The report must include the number of county service spending plans that were not 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 initially approved by the department and the number of service spending plans that were not approved by the department after being resubmitted by the county after revisions were requested by the department under subsection (1). Sec. 709. The department's master contract for juvenile justice residential foster care services must prohibit a contractor from denying a referral for placing a youth, or terminating a youth's placement, if the youth's assessed treatment needs are in alignment with the facility's residential program type, as identified by a court or the department. The master contract must also require that a youth placed in a juvenile justice residential foster care facility receives regularly scheduled treatment sessions with a licensed clinician or therapist and has access to a licensed psychologist or a psychiatrist or both, as clinically indicated. LOCAL OFFICE OPERATIONS AND SUPPORT SERVICES Sec. 801. The department shall submit a monthly report to the standard report recipients on the most recent food stamps program error rate derived from the active cases, reported to the United States Department of Agriculture Food and Nutrition Service for the supplemental nutrition assistance program. Sec. 802. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for local office staff travel, the department shall allocate up to $100,000.00 annually toward reimbursing the out-of-pocket costs of county board members and county department directors to attend statewide meetings of the Michigan County Social Services Association. Sec. 807. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for Elder Law 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 of Michigan MiCAFE contract, the department shall allocate not less than $247,500.00 to an elder services organization that received funds under section 807 of article 6 of 2025 PA 22 for the purpose described in that section. Of the $247,500.00 allocated under this section, the department shall use $225,000.00 of general fund/general purpose revenue as state matching funds to receive not less than $22,500.00 in funding from the United States Department of Agriculture to provide outreach program activities as part of a statewide food stamps hotline. The outreach program activities may include eligibility screening and information services. Sec. 825. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall provide an individual with not more than $2,000.00 for vehicle repairs, including a repair done in the previous 12 months. The $2,000.00 limit described in this section includes the combined total of payments made by the department and the work participation program. (2) By February 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that details the total amount of funding distributed and the total number of payments made for vehicle repairs. Sec. 826. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for local office policy and administration, not less than $300,000.00 is allocated for the department to contract with a legal association that received funds under section 826(1) of article 6 of 2025 PA 22 for the purpose described in that section. (2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the contracted entity shall submit a report to the department on the efficacy of the contract. The department shall submit the report to the standard report recipients not later than 30 days after the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department receives the report. Sec. 850. (1) The department shall maintain each out-stationed eligibility specialist in a community-based organization, community mental health agency, nursing home, adult placement and independent living setting, FQHC, and hospital, unless the community-based organization, community mental health agency, nursing home, adult placement and independent living setting, FQHC, or hospital requests to discontinue the positions at its facility. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for donated funds positions, the department shall enter into a contract with any agency that is able and eligible under federal law to provide the required matching funds for federal funding, as determined by federal law. (3) A contract for a donated funds position for assistance payments must include, but not be limited to, performance metrics on both of the following topics: (a) Meeting a standard of promptness for processing an application for Medicaid and other public assistance programs under the law of this state. (b) Meeting required standards for error rates in determining programmatic eligibility, as determined by the department. (4) The department shall fill an additional donated funds position only after a new contract has been signed with an agency. The position must be abolished when the contract expires or is terminated. (5) The department shall classify as a limited-term FTE a new employee who is hired to fill a donated funds position contract or is hired to fill a vacancy from an employee who transferred to a donated funds position. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (6) By March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients detailing information on the donated funds positions. The report must include, but is not limited to, the total number of occupied positions, the total private contribution of the positions, and the total cost to this state for a nonsalary expenditure for the donated funds position employees. Sec. 851. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for adult services local office staff, the department shall seek to reduce the number of older adults who are victims of crime and fraud by increasing the standard of promptness in every county, as measured by commencing an investigation not later than 24 hours after a report is made to the department, establishing face-to-face contact with the client not later than 72 hours after a report is made to the department, and completing the investigation not later than 30 days after a report is made to the department. DISABILITY DETERMINATION SERVICES Sec. 890. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for disability determination services, the department shall maintain the unit rates in effect on September 30, 2019 for medical consultants performing disability determination services, including physicians, psychologists, and speech-language pathologists. ARTICLE 6b DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES - MEDICAID AND BEHAVIORAL HEALTH part 1 line-item appropriations 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of health and human services for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, from the following funds: DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 3,826.3 ï¿½ï¿½ Full-time employees 3,390.3 ï¿½ï¿½ Limited-term employees 51.5 ï¿½ï¿½ Noncareer/per diem employees 12.7 ï¿½ï¿½ Part-time employees 2.5 ï¿½ï¿½ Permanent-intermittent employees 18.6 ï¿½ï¿½ Seasonal employees 0.0 Average population 774.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 22,936,432,900 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 2,524,000 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 22,933,908,900 Federal revenues: Capped federal revenues 39,112,700 Social security act, temporary assistance for needy families 56,745,300 Total other federal revenues 15,646,014,700 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 68,691,300 Total private revenues 23,501,200 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 Michigan merit award trust fund 95,700,000 Total other state restricted revenues 1,414,648,900 State general fund/general purpose $ 5,589,494,800 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 957.8 Unclassified salaries--FTEs 6.0 $ 1,086,800 Administrative hearings officers 7,139,000 Child welfare institute--FTEs 56.8 9,909,800 Coordinated children's healthcare policy and supports--FTEs 62.0 23,663,300 Demonstration projects--FTE 1.0 4,235,900 Departmental administration and management--FTEs 613.4 114,684,700 Departmentwide employee economic adjustments 15,701,400 Legal services 2,900 Office of inspector general--FTEs 205.9 30,202,000 Property management 52,602,500 Terminal leave payments 5,694,400 Training and program support--FTEs 18.7 3,660,200 Worker's compensation 7,884,900 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 276,467,800 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential 1,913,700 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 IDG from department of technology, management, and budget - office of retirement services 600 Federal revenues: Capped federal revenues 18,613,100 Social security act, temporary assistance for needy families 16,936,700 Total other federal revenues 82,525,700 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 91,200 Total private revenues 3,067,900 Total other state restricted revenues 1,374,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 151,944,400 Sec. 103. BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION AND SPECIAL PROJECTS Full-time equated classified positions 95.0 Behavioral health program administration--FTEs 59.0 $ 50,354,600 Community substance use disorder prevention, education, and treatment--FTEs 6.6 79,207,900 Family support subsidy 17,173,100 Federal and other special projects 25,500 Gambling addiction--FTE 1.0 4,274,700 Mental health diversion council 3,850,000 Michigan clinical consultation and care 5,789,000 Office of recipient rights--FTEs 24.4 3,563,200 Opioid response activities--FTEs 4.0 122,157,200 Protection and advocacy services support 194,400 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 286,589,600 Appropriated from: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Federal revenues: Social security act, temporary assistance for needy families 17,173,100 Total other federal revenues 159,620,100 Special revenue funds: Total private revenues 2,704,700 Total other state restricted revenues 62,124,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 44,967,000 Sec. 104. BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 11.7 Autism services $ 560,716,600 Behavioral health community supports and services--FTEs 8.0 29,531,000 Certified community behavioral health clinic demonstration 916,062,700 Civil service charges 265,200 Community mental health non-Medicaid services 125,578,200 Federal mental health block grant--FTEs 3.7 27,483,900 Health homes 50,239,800 Healthy Michigan plan - behavioral health 375,780,500 Medicaid mental health services 3,329,969,700 Medicaid substance use disorder services 84,902,600 Nursing home PAS/ARR-OBRA 18,813,600 State disability assistance program substance use disorder services 1,922,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,521,265,800 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 Total other federal revenues 3,787,480,600 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 9,943,600 Total other state restricted revenues 560,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,723,281,600 Sec. 105. STATE PSYCHIATRIC HOSPITALS AND FORENSIC MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 2,210.2 Average population 774.0 Caro Regional Mental Health Center - psychiatric hospital - adult--FTEs 428.7 $ 70,848,100 Average population 100.0 Center for forensic psychiatry--FTEs 624.5 127,449,700 Average population 240.0 Developmental disabilities council and projects--FTEs 9.0 2,783,500 Gifts and bequests for patient living and treatment environment 69,800 IDEA, federal special education 17,200 Kalamazoo Psychiatric Hospital - adult--FTEs 473.2 73,686,600 Average population 170.0 Purchase of medical services for residents of hospitals and centers 445,600 Revenue recapture 9,200 Southeast Michigan state psychiatric hospital - adult--FTEs 467.6 84,481,300 Average population 192.0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Southeast Michigan state psychiatric hospital - children and adolescents--FTEs 175.3 31,680,500 Average population 72.0 Special maintenance 562,800 State hospital administration--FTEs 31.9 5,801,900 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 397,836,200 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues 28,114,300 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 23,938,400 Total private revenues 69,800 Total other state restricted revenues 17,637,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 328,075,900 Sec. 106. CHILDREN'S SPECIAL HEALTH CARE SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 48.1 Bequests for care and services--FTEs 9.8 $ 2,227,300 Children's special health care services administration--FTEs 38.3 9,297,200 Medical care and treatment 443,164,400 Outreach and advocacy 6,722,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 461,411,100 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues 253,175,200 Special revenue funds: Total private revenues 1,037,200 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Total other state restricted revenues 4,579,400 State general fund/general purpose $ 202,619,300 Sec. 107. HEALTH AND AGING SERVICES ADMINISTRATION Full-time equated classified positions 501.5 Aging services administration--FTEs 35.2 $ 7,969,400 Health services administration--FTEs 466.3 122,330,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 130,300,200 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues 79,283,600 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 187,700 Total private revenues 1,721,300 Total other state restricted revenues 336,300 State general fund/general purpose $ 48,771,300 Sec. 108. HEALTH SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 2.0 Adult home help services $ 742,737,100 Ambulance services 25,335,200 Auxiliary medical services 5,126,300 Dental clinic program 1,000,000 Dental services 102,603,300 Federal Medicare pharmaceutical program 450,194,500 Federally qualified health centers 157,182,600 Health plan services 3,992,654,300 Healthy kids dental 233,684,200 Healthy Michigan plan 1,971,816,200 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Healthy Michigan plan - fee-for-service 657,272,000 Home health services 18,690,200 Hospice services 258,260,400 Hospital services and therapy 378,449,500 Integrated care organizations 711,203,700 Long-term care services 2,586,950,000 Maternal and child health 37,267,500 Medicaid home- and community-based services waiver 586,826,500 Medicaid resource optimization (300,000,000) Medicare premium payments 1,049,501,000 Personal care services 5,035,500 Pharmaceutical services 448,310,400 Physician services 135,333,300 Plan first 2,378,700 Program of all-inclusive care for the elderly 326,992,100 Rural health transformation program--FTEs 2.0 173,200,000 School-based services 196,691,300 Special Medicaid reimbursement 370,654,700 Transportation 26,057,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 15,351,407,700 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Rural health transformation program revenues 173,200,000 Total other federal revenues 10,856,917,000 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 34,530,400 Total private revenues 9,650,300 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Michigan merit award trust fund 95,700,000 Total other state restricted revenues 1,263,275,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 2,918,134,200 Sec. 109. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY Bridges information system $ 112,389,200 Child support automation 37,044,400 Comprehensive child welfare information system 8,750,300 Information technology services and projects 114,913,000 Michigan Medicaid information system 98,392,400 Michigan statewide automated child welfare information system 20,992,300 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 392,481,600 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential 609,700 Federal revenues: Capped federal revenues 20,499,600 Social security act, temporary assistance for needy families 22,635,500 Total other federal revenues 225,698,200 Special revenue funds: Total private revenues 5,250,000 Total other state restricted revenues 2,010,400 State general fund/general purpose $ 115,778,200 Sec. 110. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Opioid response activities $ 62,750,000 State hospital administration 1,200,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 State psychiatric DSH disallowance 54,722,900 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 118,672,900 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Michigan opioid healing and recovery fund 62,750,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 55,922,900 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations for fiscal year 2026-2027 general sections Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the current fiscal year, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is $7,099,843,700.00 and state spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $1,874,696,100.00. The following itemized statement identifies appropriations from which spending to local units of government will occur: DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION AND SPECIAL PROJECTS Behavioral health program administration $ 42,800 Community substance use disorder prevention, education, and treatment 8,913,500 Gambling addiction 1,065,000 Mental health diversion council 113,900 Opioid response activities 927,800 BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SERVICES 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Autism services 189,487,300 Behavioral health community supports and services 482,300 Certified community behavioral health clinic demonstration 171,371,900 Community mental health non-Medicaid services 125,578,200 Health homes 15,613,400 Healthy Michigan plan - behavioral health 34,234,900 Medicaid mental health services 1,139,834,100 Medicaid substance use disorder services 29,231,400 Nursing home PAS/ARR-OBRA 4,689,400 State disability assistance program substance use disorder services 1,539,000 STATE PSYCHIATRIC HOSPITALS AND FORENSIC MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES Caro Regional Mental Health Center - psychiatric hospital ï¿½ adult 68,500 Center for forensic psychiatry 696,600 Kalamazoo Psychiatric Hospital - adult 84,200 Southeast Michigan state psychiatric hospital ï¿½ adult 43,200 CHILDREN'S SPECIAL HEALTH CARE SERVICES Medical care and treatment 943,000 Outreach and advocacy 3,176,000 HEALTH AND AGING SERVICES ADMINISTRATION Aging services administration 125,000 Health services administration 361,000 HEALTH SERVICES 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Adult home help services 86,000 Ambulance services 1,216,000 Dental services 717,400 Healthy Michigan plan ï¿½ fee-for-service 907,500 Hospital services and therapy 613,000 Long-term care services 124,067,800 Medicaid home- and community-based services waiver 15,862,900 Personal care services 24,000 Physician services 1,378,000 Transportation 401,000 TOTAL OF PAYMENTS TO LOCAL UNITS OF GOVERNMENT $ 1,874,696,100 Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1: (a) "AIDS" means acquired immunodeficiency syndrome. (b) "CCBHC" means certified community behavioral health clinic. (c) "CMHSP" means a community mental health services program as that term is defined in section 100a of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1100a. (d) "CMS" means the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. (e) "CPT" means current procedural terminology. (f) "Current fiscal year" means the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027. (g) "Department" means the department of health and human services. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (h) "Director" means the director of the department. (i) "EPSDT" means early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment. (j) "Federal poverty level" means the poverty guidelines revised periodically and published in the Federal Register by the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services under the Secretary's authority to revise the poverty line under 42 USC 9902. (k) "FQHC" means federally qualified health center. (l) "FTE" means full-time equated. (m) "GME" means graduate medical education. (n) "Health plan" means, at a minimum, an organization that meets the criteria for delivering the comprehensive package of services under the department's comprehensive health plan. (o) "HEDIS" means health care effectiveness data and information set. (p) "HMO" means health maintenance organization. (q) "IDEA" means the individuals with disabilities education act, 20 USC 1400 to 1482. (r) "IDG" means interdepartmental grant. (s) "MCH" means maternal and child health. (t) "Medicaid" means benefits under the medical assistance program established under title XIX of the social security act, 42 USC 1396 to 1396w-8, and administered by the department under the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.1 to 400.119b. (u) "Medicare" means benefits under the federal Medicare program established under title XVIII of the social security act, 42 USC 1395 to 1395mmm. (v) "MiCAFE" means Michigan's coordinated access to food for 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the elderly. (w) "MIChild" means the program described in section 1670 of this part. (x) "MiSACWIS" means Michigan statewide automated child welfare information system. (y) "PACE" means program of all-inclusive care for the elderly. (z) "PAS/ARR-OBRA" means the preadmission screening and annual resident review required under the omnibus budget reconciliation act of 1987, section 1919(e)(7) of the social security act, 42 USC 1396r. (aa) "PATH" means Partnership. Accountability. Training. Hope. (bb) "PFAS" means perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances. (cc) "PIHP" means an entity designated by the department as a regional entity or a specialty prepaid inpatient health plan for Medicaid mental health services, services to individuals with developmental disabilities, and substance use disorder services. Regional entities are described in section 204b of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1204b. Specialty prepaid inpatient health plans are described in section 109f of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.109f. (dd) "Previous fiscal year" means the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026. (ee) "Quarterly basis" means February 1, April 1, July 1, and September 30 of the current fiscal year. (ff) "Semiannual basis" means March 1 and September 30 of the current fiscal year. (gg) "Settlement" means the settlement agreement entered in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the case of Dwayne B. v Snyder, Docket No. 2:06-cv-13548 in the United States District Court for the Eastern District of Michigan. (hh) "SSI" means supplemental security income. (ii) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house appropriations committees, the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on the department budget, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office. (jj) "Temporary assistance for needy families" or "TANF" or "title IV-A" means part A of title IV of the social security act, 42 USC 601 to 619. (kk) "Title IV-B" means part B of title IV of the social security act, 42 USC 621 to 629m. (ll) "Title IV-D" means part D of title IV of the social security act, 42 USC 651 to 669b. (mm) "Title IV-E" means part E of title IV of the social security act, 42 USC 670 to 679c. (nn) "Title X" means subchapter VIII of the public health service act, 42 USC 300 to 300a-8, which establishes grants to states for family planning services. Sec. 204. If the state administrative board, acting under section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount appropriated under part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and serving in each house, intertransfer funds within part 1 for the particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution. Sec. 205. (1) The department shall use the internet to fulfill the reporting requirements of this part and shall make each report readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 required report in a single archivable location on the department's website not later than the due date required for each report. (2) In addition to placing all reports required in the current fiscal year on the department's website, the department shall maintain on its website all reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years posted by fiscal year in the same single archivable location. (3) The department shall transmit all required reports for the current fiscal year to the standard report recipients and any other required recipients by email. The email shall include a copy of the report and a link to access the report online. Sec. 206. The department shall receive and retain copies of all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department shall follow federal and state law and guidelines for short-term and long-term retention of records. The department shall electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required by federal and state guidelines. Sec. 207. (1) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to maintain a searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following for the department: (a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category. (b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit. (c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor, including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and payment description. (2) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to update the searchable website 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 on a quarterly basis. Sec. 208. Not later than December 15, the state budget office shall prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses by major departmental program or program areas. Sec. 209. Not later than 14 days after the release of the executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate with the state budget office to provide an annual report on estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the previous 2 fiscal years. Sec. 210. Not later than November 15, the department shall report on private and other third-party funds received by the department in the previous fiscal year. The report must include the amount of funding received, the specific source of funding received, the purpose for which funding was expended, and the amount of any remaining funds. Sec. 211. Consistent with section 217 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, the department shall prepare a report on out-of-state travel expenses by not later than January 1. The report must list all travel outside this state by classified and unclassified employees in the previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or in part with funds appropriated in the department's budget. The report must include all of the following information: (a) The dates of each travel occurrence. (b) The total transportation and related costs of each travel 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 occurrence and the proportions funded with state general fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal revenues, local revenues, and private revenues, including specific sources of state restricted, federal, local, and private revenues. (c) The destination of each travel occurrence. (d) The specific purpose and description of each travel occurrence, including the specific name of the event or meeting. Sec. 212. On a quarterly basis, the department shall report on all of the following: (a) The number of full-time equated positions in pay status by civil service classification. (b) A comparison by line item of the number of full-time equated positions authorized from funds appropriated in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated positions employed by the department at the end of the reporting period. (c) The number of active employees in each of the following statuses: (i) Full-time salary. (ii) Full-time hourly. (iii) Part-time. (iv) Permanent-intermittent. (v) Limited-term. (vi) Seasonal. (vii) Worker's compensation. (viii) Noncareer/per diem. (ix) Job share. (x) Special personal services/contractual. (d) The number of overtime hours worked by employees, by classifications. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 213. Not later than April 1, the department shall report on each specific policy change made to implement a public act affecting the department that took effect during the previous calendar year. The report must include reference to the public act that necessitates the policy change. The department shall submit the report to the standard report recipients, to the senate and house standing committees responsible for addressing issues affected by the public acts, and to the joint committee on administrative rules. Sec. 214. (1) Not later than April 1, the department shall maintain, on a publicly accessible website, a department scorecard that identifies, tracks, and updates on a quarterly basis key metrics that are used to monitor and improve the department's performance. (2) The department shall notify the standard report recipients when the quarterly updates to the department scorecard are available on a publicly accessible website. Sec. 215. (1) Unless specifically authorized elsewhere in this part or part 1, funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to pay for a state obligation that exceeds $200,000.00 for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim without prior legislative approval. (2) If a state obligation for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim results in a change from current statute, the department shall notify the legislature. (3) This section does not apply to compensation and other relief to individuals wrongfully imprisoned as required under the wrongful imprisonment compensation act, 2016 PA 343, MCL 691.1751 to 691.1757. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 216. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $20,000,000.00 for federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Federal contingency authorization must not be made available to increase TANF authorization. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $20,000,000.00 for state restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $5,000,000.00 for local contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $2,000,000.00 for private contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 217. Total authorized appropriations from all sources under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 are estimated at $174,401,600.00. From this amount, total 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 appropriations for pension-related legacy costs for the department are estimated at $174,401,600.00. Total appropriations for retiree health care legacy costs for the department are estimated at $0.00. Sec. 218. To the extent possible, the department shall not expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted. Sec. 219. The department shall submit reports that summarize all work project accounts not later than December 31, March 30, June 30, and September 30. The reports must include all of the following: (a) A list of all work project accounts. (b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each account. (c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously designated work project accounts, the name and description of the work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed amounts. Sec. 220. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1: (a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are available. (b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. (c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. Sec. 221. The department shall not take disciplinary action against an employee of the department because the employee communicates with a member of the legislature or legislative staff unless the communication is prohibited by law and the department is exercising its authority as provided by law. Sec. 222. (1) The department shall maximize the efficiency of the state workforce and utilization and occupancy of office space, leased or owned, for each division within the department. Employees with job responsibilities that require employees to serve in their capacities outside of an office shall be monitored each pay period to ensure all work hours reported on timesheets are actually worked. (2) The department shall comply with requirements set forth by the office of the state employer on in-person work and utilization and occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure at least 80% of employees are in person and building occupancy and utilization rates are at least 80% or higher. (3) The department shall submit reports not later than January 15 and April 15 on all of the following: (a) Remote work policy by division. (b) Building occupancy by address. (c) Whether the building is state-owned or leased. (d) Aggregate badge scanning information by employee. (4) As used in this section, "occupancy" means the actual number of employees physically present in a workplace. Sec. 223. (1) The department shall require as a condition of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 each contract or subcontract that the prequalified contractor or prequalified subcontractor agree to use the E-Verify system to verify that all persons hired during the contract term by the contractor or subcontractor are legally present and authorized to work in the United States. (2) The department may verify this information directly or may require contractors and subcontractors to verify the information and submit a certification to the department. The department shall submit a report not later than March 1 that describes the processes it has developed and implemented under this section. (3) The department shall not contract with any foreign entities that are known or suspected to be enemies of the United States or known foreign adversaries. Foreign adversaries include all of the following: (a) The People's Republic of China. (b) The Russian Federation. (c) The Islamic Republic of Iran. (d) The Democratic People's Republic of Korea. (e) The Republic of Cuba. (f) The Venezuelan regime of Nicolï¿½s Maduro. (g) The Syrian Arab Republic. (h) An agency or other entity under significant control of a country described in subdivisions (a) to (g). (4) As used in this section, "E-Verify" means an internet-based system operated by the Department of Homeland Security, United States Citizenship and Immigration Services in partnership with the Social Security Administration. Sec. 224. (1) Within 30 days of enactment of this act, the state budget office shall post a list of legislatively directed 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 spending items funded in part 1 as defined in sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. The list must include all information and documents pertaining to the funded items as publicly disclosed in accordance with sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. (2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency administering the grant shall submit a report not later than November 1. The department or agency shall update the report and shall submit updated reports not later than March 15 and September 15 of the current fiscal year. The department or agency shall include in the report the most comprehensive information the department or agency has available at the time of posting for grants awarded, including, but not limited to, project milestones, percent completed, funding expended, and funding encumbered. (3) Before executing a grant agreement, all grant recipients must provide a spending plan that specifies the scope of service, the program goals, the measurement for meeting program goals, and how all grant funds will be used, and must indicate if any grant funds will be provided to a third party or subrecipient. (4) Each department or agency responsible for awarding or disbursing grant funds must annually audit the entity's use of the grant funds for each fiscal year in which the grant is active. Each entity must submit information requested by the department or agency to confirm compliance. (5) Each department or agency shall work with the office of the auditor general to conduct an audit of the grant according to generally accepted accounting practices and audit standards. The 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 office of the auditor general must be given access to all internal and external records. All contracts or agreements between a department or agency and a grant recipient or between a grant recipient and a third party must include a clause granting the office of the auditor general access to all internal and external records. (6) Grant recipients and their immediate family members are prohibited from being employed by the executive branch or legislative branch of this state. In addition, grant recipients are prohibited from serving on any state board that has direct or indirect responsibility for approving or auditing grant funds awarded or disbursed by any department or agency. (7) Full and complete audits of grant funds issued by the department or an agency of this state, without redaction unless required by law, must be posted to the department's or agency's website in a conspicuous place for public review. (8) On a quarterly basis, the department or agency shall submit a report on legislatively sponsored grant funds that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) The name of each grant recipient and the status of each grant. (b) The amount distributed to each grant recipient. (c) Any changes to scope or costs of program. (9) The report under subsection (8) must include the following statements made by the department or agency: (a) A statement that confirms the department or agency reviewed and affirmed compliance by each grant recipient with program scope and expenditure of grant funding. (b) A statement that confirms the department or agency 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 reviewed applicable program reports and requests for reimbursement. Sec. 225. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall do the following: (a) Report on any amounts of severance pay for a department director, deputy director, or other high-ranking department official not later than 14 days after a severance agreement with the director, deputy director, or official is signed. The name of the director, deputy director, or official and the amount of severance pay must be included in the report required by this subdivision. (b) Not later than February 1, report on the total amount of severance pay remitted to former department employees during the previous fiscal year and the total number of former department employees that were remitted severance pay during the previous fiscal year. (2) As used in this section, "severance pay" means compensation to which both of the following apply: (a) The compensation is payable or paid upon the termination of employment. (b) The compensation is paid in addition to wages or benefits earned during the course of employment or generally applicable retirement benefits. Sec. 226. Funds appropriated in part 1 from state or federal sources are prohibited from being used to provide services, grants, or programming to an individual who is not a citizen of the United States unless the individual is a qualified alien as that term is defined in 8 USC 1641. This section does not prohibit the department, political subdivision, state university, or other state agency from expending funds for the purpose of detaining 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 individuals who are not citizens of the United States, including any costs associated with housing such individuals in county jails or state correctional facilities. Sec. 227. State funds must not be used for diversity, equity, and inclusion, or diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives or programs, as outlined in federal Executive Order No. 14151, 90 Fed. Reg. 8339 (January 29, 2025) "Ending Radical and Wasteful Government DEI Programs and Preferencing", federal Executive Order No. 14168, 90 Fed. Reg. 8615 (January 30, 2025) "Defending Women from Gender Ideology Extremism and Restoring Biological Truth to the Federal Government", or federal Executive Order No. 14173, 90 Fed. Reg. 8633 (January 31, 2025) "Ending Illegal Discrimination and Restoring Merit-Based Opportunity". Sec. 228. The department shall use the same precontract risk assessment program utilized by the department of technology, management, and budget to evaluate financial compliance, security risks, and insurance requirements prior to contract execution. Sec. 250. If either of the following events occurs, not later than 30 days after the event occurs, the department shall notify the standard report recipients of that fact: (a) A legislative objective of this part or of a bill or amendment to a bill to amend the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.1 to 400.119b, cannot be implemented because implementation would conflict with or violate federal law. (b) A federal grant for which a notice of an award has been received cannot be used or will not be used. Sec. 251. (1) In addition to funds appropriated in part 1 for all programs and services, there is appropriated, for write-offs of accounts receivable, deferrals, and for prior year obligations in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 excess of applicable prior year appropriations, an amount equal to total write-offs and prior year obligations, but not to exceed amounts available in prior year revenues. (2) The department's ability to satisfy appropriation fund sources in part 1 is not limited to collections and accruals pertaining to services provided in the current fiscal year and includes reimbursements, refunds, adjustments, and settlements from prior years. Sec. 252. Not later than February 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on the detailed names and amounts of estimated federal, restricted, private, and local sources of revenue that support the appropriations in each of the line items in part 1 for the previous fiscal year. The report must itemize, rather than aggregate, specific revenue sources deposited into the generic statewide integrated governmental management application (SIGMA) fund numbers 1200, 1274, 4000, and 5000. Sec. 253. As required under part 23 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.2301 to 333.2321, the appropriations in part 1 must include the following: (a) Immunizations. (b) Communicable disease control. (c) Sexually transmitted infection control. (d) Tuberculosis control. (e) Prevention of gonorrhea eye infection in newborns. (f) Screening newborn infants for the conditions listed in section 5431 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.5431, or recommended by the newborn screening quality assurance advisory committee created under section 5430 of the public health code, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.5430. (g) Health and human services annex of the Michigan Emergency Management Plan. (h) Prenatal care. (i) Mental health. Sec. 254. (1) The department may contract with the Michigan Public Health Institute for the design and implementation of projects and for other public health-related activities prescribed in section 2611 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.2611. The department may develop a master agreement with the Michigan Public Health Institute to carry out the activities described in this subsection for up to a 1-year period. (2) On a semiannual basis, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report that includes all of the following: (a) A detailed description of each funded project. (b) The amount allocated for each project, the appropriation line item from which the allocation is funded, and the source of financing for each project. (c) The expected project duration. (d) A detailed spending plan for each project, including a list of all subgrantees and the amount allocated to each subgrantee. (3) On a semiannual basis, the department shall provide, to the standard report recipients, a copy of all reports, studies, and publications produced by the Michigan Public Health Institute, its subcontractors, or the department with the funds appropriated in the department's budget in the previous fiscal year and allocated to the Michigan Public Health Institute. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 255. The department shall ensure that faith-based organizations are able to apply and compete for services, programs, or contracts that the organizations are qualified and suitable to fulfill. The department shall not disqualify faith-based organizations solely on the basis of the religious nature of the organizations or the guiding principles or statements of faith for the organizations. Sec. 256. In accordance with section 1b of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.1b, the department shall treat part 1 and this part as a time-limited addendum to the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.1 to 400.119b. Sec. 257. (1) Not later than 30 days before the implementation date of a major policy change, the department shall report the change to the standard report recipients. (2) The department shall make the department's entire policy and procedures manual available and accessible to the public on the department's website. (3) The department shall attach each policy bulletin issued during the previous calendar year to the report under section 213. Sec. 258. The department may establish and collect fees for publications, videos and related materials, conferences, and workshops. Collected fees are appropriated when received and must be used to offset expenditures for publication printing and mailing, costs of the publications, videos and related materials, conferences, and workshops. The department shall not collect fees under this section that exceed the cost of the expenditures. If collected fees are appropriated under this section in an amount that exceeds the current fiscal year appropriation, not later than 30 days after the collected fee appropriation, the department shall 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 notify the standard report recipients of that fact. Sec. 259. The department may retain all of this state's share of food assistance overissuance collections as an offset to general fund/general purpose costs. Retained collections must be applied against federal funds deductions in all appropriation units where department costs related to the investigation and recoupment of food assistance overissuances are incurred. Retained collections in excess of the investigation and recoupment costs must be applied against the federal funds deducted in the departmental administration and support appropriation unit. Sec. 260. If the revenue collected by the department from fees and collections exceeds the amount appropriated in part 1, the revenue may be carried forward with the approval of the state budget director into the subsequent fiscal year. The revenue carried forward under this section must be used as the first source of funds in the subsequent fiscal year. Sec. 261. If the department receives tobacco tax funds and Healthy Michigan fund revenue from part 1, not later than April 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on both of the following activities during the previous fiscal year: (a) Tobacco tax revenue appropriations in the Medicaid program. (b) Information for each project implemented with revenue under this section, including all of the following: (i) The project's name. (ii) The appropriation line item and amount. (iii) The project's target population. (iv) A description of the project. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (v) The outcomes or accomplishments of the project. Sec. 262. If the department is authorized under federal law or the law of this state to collect an overpayment owed to the department, beginning 60 days after the initial notification date of the overpayment amount, the department may assess a penalty of 1% per month. If an overpayment is caused by department error, a penalty may be assessed 6 months after the initial notification date of the overpayment amount. The department shall not collect penalty interest in an amount that exceeds the amount of the original overpayment. This state's share of any funds collected under this section must be deposited in the general fund of this state. Sec. 263. (1) On a quarterly basis, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on the status of the implementation of any noninflationary, noncaseload, programmatic funding increases in the current fiscal year from the previous fiscal year. The report must confirm the implementation of already-implemented funding increases and provide an explanation for any planned implementation of funding increases that have not yet occurred. For any planned implementation of funding increases that have not yet occurred, the report must include an expected implementation date and the reason for delayed implementation. (2) For any programmatic funding increases not reported as implemented or in the process of being implemented in the first 2 reports under subsection (1), the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a status update in the last 2 reports required under subsection (1). Sec. 264. (1) The department shall not expend the funds appropriated in part 1 to enter into any contract with a Medicaid 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 managed care organization of MI Choice Waiver, MI Coordinated Health, or behavioral health unless the Medicaid managed care organization agrees to do all of the following: (a) Comply with expressly defined direct care worker network adequacy standards and any contractual consequences of not complying with the network adequacy standards described in this subdivision. (b) At a minimum, maintain the rates provided to in network direct care worker agencies and direct care workers at the rate provided during the previous fiscal year. (c) Ensure, to the greatest extent possible, that the full amount of funds appropriated for direct care worker wages, except for costs incurred by the employer, including payroll taxes, is provided to direct care workers through maintained increased wages. (d) Report to the department each direct care agency and direct care worker reimbursement rate provided to a direct care agency or direct care worker. (2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on the outcomes and compliance with the network adequacy standards described in subsection (1) and an aggregated table of rates paid to direct care agencies and direct care workers. (3) As used in this section "direct care worker" means an individual performing an activity for a program and associated service described in the department's Medicaid provider letter L 25-78. Sec. 265. The department shall provide the approved spending plan for each line item receiving an appropriation in the current fiscal year to the senate and house of representatives 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 appropriations subcommittees on the department budget and the senate and house fiscal agencies not later than 60 days after approval by the department or not later than January 15 of the current fiscal year, whichever is earlier. In all places that a line-item appropriation number is listed, a line-item appropriation name must be included. The spending plan must include the following information regarding planned expenditures for each category: allocation in the previous period, change in the allocation, and new allocation. The spending plan must include the following information regarding each revenue source for the line item: category of the fund source indicated by general fund/general purpose, state restricted, local, private, or federal. Figures included in the approved spending plan must not be assumed to constitute the actual final expenditures, as line items may be updated on an as-needed basis to reflect changes in projected expenditures and projected revenue. The department shall supplement the spending plan information by providing a list of all active contracts and grants in the department's contract system. For amounts listed in the other contracts category of each spending plan, the department shall include the name of the line item and the name of the fund source for each contract, grant, and amount for the current fiscal year. For amounts listed in the all other costs category of each spending plan, the department shall provide a list detailing planned expenditures and amounts for the current fiscal year and include the name of the line item and the name of the fund source related to each expenditure and amount. Sec. 266. For behavioral and physical health services provided through managed care or the fee-for-service program, the department shall require, for the nonfacility component of the reimbursement 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 rate, at least the same reimbursement for that service, if that service is provided through telemedicine, as if the service involved face-to-face contact between the health care professional and the patient. Sec. 267. Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on total actual expenditures in the previous fiscal year for advertising and media outreach, including the purpose, amount, and fund source by program or appropriation line item. Sec. 268. Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit a description of programs report to the standard report recipients. For each program, the report must include the appropriation unit; the line item name and number; the appropriation history; the program name; the program overview; a financing summary; and, where applicable, the program's legal basis, effectiveness, and outcomes. Sec. 269. On a quarterly basis, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on any line-item appropriation for which the department estimates total annual expenditures would exceed the funds appropriated for the line-item appropriation by 5% or more. The department shall provide a detailed explanation for any relevant line-item appropriation exceedance, identify the corrective actions undertaken to mitigate line-item appropriation expenditures from exceeding the funds appropriated for the line-item appropriation by a greater amount, and identify other corrective actions if no legislative transfer or supplemental is approved. This section does not apply for line-item appropriations that are part of the May revenue estimating conference caseload and expenditure estimates. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 270. (1) The department shall ensure that each federally recognized tribe is able to apply and compete for services, programs, grants, and contracts. (2) For competitive grant programs described in this part, each federally recognized tribe is eligible to apply for grant funds made available to organizations exempt from federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501, and to local units of government. Sec. 271. (1) Except as provided in this subsection, before submission of a waiver, state plan amendment, or similar proposal to CMS or another federal agency, the department shall notify the standard report recipients of the planned submission. This subsection does not apply to the submission of a waiver, state plan amendment, or similar proposal that does not propose a material change or is outside of the ordinary course of a waiver, state plan amendment, or similar proposal. (2) On a semiannual basis, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report that summarizes the status of any new or ongoing discussions with CMS, the United States Department of Health and Human Services, or another federal agency regarding any potential or future waiver applications and the status of any submitted waivers that have not yet received federal approval. If there is not a reportable item at the time that a semiannual report is due, a report is not required. Sec. 272. The department shall advise the legislature of the receipt of a notification from the attorney general's office of a legal action in which expenses had been recovered under section 10b of the medicaid false claims act, 1977 PA 72, MCL 400.610b. If applicable, not later than February 1 of the current fiscal year, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) The total amount recovered from the legal action. (b) The program or service for which the money was originally expended. (c) Details on the disposition of the funds recovered, such as the appropriation or revenue account in which the money was deposited. (d) A description of the facts involved in the legal action. Sec. 273. On the day that is 1 week after the day that the governor submits the executive budget proposal for the ensuing fiscal year to the legislature, the department, in collaboration with the state budget office, shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on spending and revenue projections for each of the capped federal funds listed in this subsection. The report must contain actual spending and revenue in the previous fiscal year, spending and revenue projections for the current fiscal year as enacted, and spending and revenue projections in the executive budget proposal for the immediately ensuing fiscal year for each individual line item for the department budget. The report must also include federal funds transferred to other departments. The capped federal funds include, but are not limited to, all of the following: (a) TANF. (b) Title XX social services block grant. (c) Title IV-B subpart I child welfare services block grant. (d) Title IV-B subpart II promoting safe and stable families funds. (e) Low-income home energy assistance program. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 274. (1) On a quarterly basis, the department, with the approval of the state budget director, is authorized to realign sources between other federal, TANF, and capped federal financing authorizations to maximize federal revenues. The realignment of financing must not produce any of the following: (a) A gross increase or decrease in the department's total individual line item authorizations. (b) A net increase or decrease in total federal revenues. (c) A net increase in TANF authorization. (2) On a quarterly basis, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on the realignment of federal fund sources transacted to date in the current fiscal year under subsection (1), including the dates, line items, and amounts of the transactions. If, at the time a quarterly report is due, a transaction was not made under subsection (1), a report is not required. (3) Not later than 30 days after the date on which year-end book closing is completed, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on the realignment of federal fund sources that took place as part of the year-end closing process for the previous fiscal year. Sec. 275. Any public advertisement for public assistance must inform the public of the welfare fraud hotline operated by the department. Sec. 276. Not later than April 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on funds appropriated for the healthy moms, healthy babies initiative. The report must include the budgeted amount, year-to-date expenditures, remaining balance of appropriations, and the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 percent of budget spent for each appropriation related to the initiative. The report must also include information on how the funds have assisted with meeting the goals and outcomes of the initiative. Sec. 277. (1) The department may accept monetary and nonmonetary gifts, bequests, donations, contributions, or grants from any private source to support, in whole or in part, a departmental function or program. The department shall expend or use the gifts, bequests, donations, contributions, or grants for the purposes designated by the private source, if the purpose is specified and part 1 has sufficient authorization. (2) In the demonstration projects line item, private revenue collected by the department and amounts remaining in the fund under this section at the end of the fiscal year does not lapse to the general fund but must be carried forward to the subsequent fiscal year. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Sec. 301. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for child welfare institute, the department shall train private child placing agency staff in the pre-service training requirements for child welfare caseworkers and supervisors. Private child placing agency staff must be provided an opportunity to complete the training in a virtual format at the staff's private child placing agency facility. If a private child placing agency prefers a hybrid training format that includes virtual and in-person instruction, the training must be available to the private child placing agency staff. Sec. 302. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 coordinated children's healthcare policy and supports, the department shall allocate $1,000,000.00 for autism services coordination. The department shall require a contractor receiving funds under this section to comply with performance-related metrics established by the department to maintain eligibility for funding. The performance-related metrics must include, but not be limited to, all of the following: (a) Each contractor shall have an accreditation that attests to the contractor's competency and effectiveness in providing services. (b) Each contractor shall demonstrate cost-effectiveness. (c) Each contractor shall ensure the contractor's ability to leverage private dollars to strengthen and maximize the provision of services. (d) On a quarterly basis, each contractor shall provide reports to the department on the number of clients served by PIHP region, units of service provision by PIHP region, and ability to meet the contractor's stated goals. (2) Each contractor receiving funds under this section shall submit a comprehensive report to the department not later than 60 days after the end of the contract period. The report must include specific information on services and programs provided by the contractor, the client base to which the services and programs were provided by the contractor, and the contractor's expenditures for the services. The department shall submit the reports to the standard report recipients. Sec. 303. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for training and program support, the department shall develop and implement a training program with the requisite materials to assist eligibility 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 specialists in following the verification procedures of Healthy Michigan plan community engagement requirements for the eligibility determination and redetermination processes. BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION AND SPECIAL PROJECTS Sec. 901. The department shall use the funds appropriated in part 1 to support a system of comprehensive community mental health services under the full authority and responsibility of local CMHSPs or PIHPs in accordance with the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1001 to 330.2106, the Medicaid provider manual, federal Medicaid waivers, and all other applicable federal law and the law of this state. Sec. 902. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall make a final authorization to a CMHSP or PIHP on the execution of a contract between the department and the CMHSP or PIHP. The contract must contain an approved plan and budget and any policy and procedure governing the obligations and responsibilities of each party to the contract. Each contract with a CMHSP or PIHP that the department is authorized to enter into under this subsection must include a provision that the contract is not valid unless the total dollar obligation for all of the contracts between the department and the CMHSPs or PIHPs entered into under this subsection for the current fiscal year does not exceed the amount of money appropriated in part 1 for the contracts authorized under this subsection. (2) The department shall immediately submit a report to the standard report recipients if either of the following occurs: (a) The department enters into a new contract with a CMHSP or PIHP that would affect a rate or expenditure. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) The department amends a contract that the department has entered into with a CMHSP or PIHP that would affect a rate or expenditure. (3) The report required by subsection (2) must include information about any changes to the contract and the change's effects on rates and expenditures. Sec. 904. (1) Not later than September 30 of the current fiscal year, the department shall provide a report on the CMHSPs, PIHPs, and designated regional entities for substance use disorder prevention and treatment to the standard report recipients that includes the information required by this section. (2) The report required under subsection (1) must contain, unless otherwise noted, information for each CMHSP and PIHP and a statewide summary, as follows: (a) A statewide summary of the demographic description of service recipients that, minimally, includes reimbursement eligibility, client population group, age, ethnicity, housing arrangements, and diagnosis. (b) Per capita expenditures in total and by client population group. (c) A statewide summary of Medicaid-funded cost information for the 3 diagnosis groups of adults with a mental illness, children with a serious emotional disturbance, and individuals with an intellectual or developmental disability. The statewide summary must, minimally, include expenditures by service category for each of the 3 diagnosis groups described in this subdivision and cases, units, and cost of each specific service code index or health care common procedure coding system code for each of the 3 diagnosis groups. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (d) Financial information on non-Medicaid mental health services by general fund cost reporting category. (e) Information about access to each CMHSP, PIHP, and designated regional entity for substance use disorder prevention and treatment, that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (i) The number of individuals receiving requested services. (ii) The number of individuals who requested services but did not receive services. (f) The number of second opinions requested under the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1001 to 330.2106, and the determination of any appeals. (g) Lapses and carryforwards during the previous fiscal year for each CMHSP, PIHP, and designated regional entity for substance use disorder prevention and treatment. (h) Performance indicator information required to be submitted to the department in the contracts with each PIHP. (i) Administrative expenditures of each CMHSP and PIHP that include a breakout of the salary, benefits, and pension of each executive-level staff, which includes, but is not limited to, the director, chief executive, and chief operating officer. (3) The report required under subsection (1) must contain the following information from the previous fiscal year on substance use disorder prevention, education, and treatment programs: (a) A statewide summary of the demographic description of service recipients that, minimally, must include reimbursement eligibility, primary substance of abuse, age, ethnicity, housing arrangements, and sex at birth. (b) The expenditures stratified by department-designated 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 regional entities for substance use disorder prevention and treatment, by fund source, by subcontractor, by population served, and by service type. (c) The expenditures per state client, with data on the distribution of expenditures reported using a histogram approach. (d) The number of services provided by subcontractor and by service type. Additionally, data on length of stay, referral source, and participation in other state programs. (e) The collections from other first- or third-party payers, private donations, or other state or local programs, by department-designated regional entities for substance use disorder prevention and treatment, by subcontractor, by population served, and by service type. (f) Information about access to CMHSPs, PIHPs, and designated regional entities for substance use disorder prevention and treatment that includes, but is not limited to, the following: (i) The number of individuals receiving requested services. (ii) The number of individuals who requested services but did not receive services. (4) The department shall include the data reporting requirements described in subsections (2) and (3) in the department's annual contract with each CMHSP, PIHP, and designated regional entity for substance use disorder prevention and treatment. (5) The department shall take all reasonable actions to ensure that the data required are complete and consistent among all CMHSPs, PIHPs, and designated regional entities for substance use disorder prevention and treatment. Sec. 907. (1) The department shall expend the amount 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 appropriated in part 1 for community substance use disorder prevention, education, and treatment to coordinate care and services provided to individuals with severe and persistent mental illness and substance use disorder diagnoses. (2) Each managing entity shall continue current efforts to collaborate on the delivery of services to clients with mental illness and substance use disorder diagnoses, with the goal of providing services in an administratively efficient manner. Sec. 909. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for health homes, the department shall use available revenue from the marihuana regulatory fund established in section 604 of the medical marihuana facilities licensing act, 2016 PA 281, MCL 333.27604, to improve physical health, expand access to substance use disorder prevention and treatment services, and strengthen the existing prevention, treatment, and recovery systems. Sec. 910. The department shall ensure that substance use disorder treatment is provided to applicants and recipients of public assistance through the department who are required to obtain substance use disorder treatment as a condition of eligibility for public assistance. Sec. 911. (1) The department shall ensure that a contract with a CMHSP or PIHP requires the CMHSP or PIHP to implement programs to encourage the diversion of individuals with a serious mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability from possible jail incarceration, when appropriate. (2) Each CMHSP or PIHP shall have jail diversion services and shall work toward establishing working relationships with representative staff of local law enforcement agencies, including county prosecutors' offices, county sheriffs' offices, county 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 jails, municipal police agencies, municipal detention facilities, and the courts. Written interagency agreements describing what services each participating agency is prepared to commit to the local jail diversion effort and the procedures to be used by local law enforcement agencies to access mental health jail diversion services are strongly encouraged. Sec. 912. The department shall contract directly with the program that received funding under section 912 of article 6 of 2025 PA 22, at an amount not less than the amount provided during the fiscal year ending September 30, 2020, to provide non-Medicaid substance use disorder services, if the local coordinating agency or the department confirms the program meets the standard of care established by the department. The standard of care must include, but is not limited to, using a medication assisted treatment option. Sec. 914. Not later than June 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on outcomes of the funds provided in part 1 to the Michigan Clinical Consultation and Care program (MC3). The outcomes reported must include, but are not limited to, the number of same-day telephone consultations with primary care providers and the number of local resource recommendations made to primary care providers who are providing medical care to patients who need behavioral health services. Sec. 915. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for community substance use disorder prevention, education, and treatment and opioid response activities, the department shall, to the extent possible, provide grants, pursuant to federal law, to local public entities that provide substance use disorder services and to 1 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 private entity that has a statewide contract to provide community-based substance use disorder services. Sec. 916. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for behavioral health program administration, the department shall allocate $1,100,000.00 as a grant to a nonprofit mental health clinic that received a grant under section 916 of article 6 of 2025 PA 22 for the purpose described in that section, if the clinic provides counseling services, accepts clients regardless of a client's ability to pay for services through sliding scale copayments and volunteer services, and uses fundraising to support the clinic. Sec. 917. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for opioid response activities, the department shall allocate $55,000,000.00 from the Michigan opioid healing and recovery fund created under section 3 of the Michigan trust fund act, 2000 PA 489, MCL 12.253, to programs and services to address the opioid crisis in a manner consistent with the opioid judgement, settlement, or compromise of claims pertaining to violations, or alleged violations, of law related to the manufacture, marketing, distribution, dispensing, or sale of opioids. The funds cannot be used to purchase drug paraphernalia. The funds must be allocated as follows: (a) $9,000,000.00 for primary prevention activities, as follows: (i) $6,000,000.00 for supporting out-of-school programming that prevents substance use among teenagers and young adults. (ii) $1,000,000.00 for public health awareness and education campaigns. (iii) $2,000,000.00 for reducing the risks of multigenerational addiction and family separations through family substance use supports and youth programming. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) $12,000,000.00 to support harm reduction agencies. (c) $9,000,000.00 to substance use disorder treatment, as follows: (i) $8,000,000.00 for improving access to quality substance use disorder care providers through workforce development programming. (ii) $1,000,000.00 to support expanding jail treatment services throughout the state. (d) $19,500,000.00 for recovery investments, as follows: (i) $11,000,000.00 to supplement grants to recovery community organizations under section 978. (ii) $2,000,000.00 to support housing assistance for individuals who are in recovery. (iii) $2,000,000.00 to support transportation assistance for individuals who are in recovery. (iv) $4,500,000.00 for peer support services. (e) $4,000,000.00 for informed decision-making, evaluation of investments, and training as follows: (i) $2,000,000.00 in oversight and grants management to promote good government, transparency, and accountability. (ii) $2,000,000.00 for law enforcement training. (f) $2,500,000.00 for the following stand-alone investments: (i) $2,000,000.00 to invest in tribal communities. (ii) $500,000.00 for start-up or new programming. (2) On a semiannual basis, the department shall submit to the standard report recipients a report on all of the following: (a) Total revenues deposited into and expenditures and encumbrances from the Michigan opioid healing and recovery fund since the creation of the fund. (b) Revenues deposited into and expenditures and encumbrances 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 from the Michigan opioid healing and recovery fund during the previous 6 months. (c) Estimated revenues to be deposited into and the spending plan for the Michigan opioid healing and recovery fund for the next 12 months. Sec. 918. On a quarterly basis, providing monthly data, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on the amount of funding paid to PIHPs to support the Medicaid managed mental health care program. The report must include information on the total paid to each PIHP, per capita rate paid for each eligibility group for each PIHP, the number of cases in each eligibility group for each PIHP, and a year-to-date summary of eligibles and expenditures for the Medicaid managed mental health care program. Sec. 920. As part of the Medicaid rate-setting process for behavioral health services, the department shall work with PIHP network providers and actuaries to include, as part of the Medicaid rate, state and federal wage and compensation increases that directly impact staff who provide Medicaid-funded community living supports, personal care services, respite services, skill-building services, and other supports and services that the department determines are similar. Sec. 922. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for behavioral health program administration, the department shall allocate $750,000.00 to a nonprofit organization that received funding under section 922 of article 6 of 2025 PA 22, to administer an online and interactive version of the protected health information consent tool and make any revisions to the tool to reflect any recent legislative changes. The contracting entity that receives funds 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 appropriated under this section shall also develop accompanying trainings and resources for users. Additionally, the contracting entity that receives funds appropriated under this section shall work closely with the Michigan Health Information Network Shared Services and the department to develop the technical specifications for integrating the protected health information consent tool with other relevant systems and applications, including, but not limited to, CareConnect360. Sec. 924. From the funds appropriated in part 1, for the purposes of actuarially sound rate certification and approval for Medicaid behavioral health managed care programs, the department shall maintain a fee schedule for autism services reimbursement rates for direct services. Expenditures used for rate setting shall not exceed the rates identified in the fee schedule. The fee schedule must include a rate for behavioral technicians that is not more than $66.00 per hour. Sec. 925. The department shall dedicate up to 1%, and no less than 0.5%, of the autism services line item to contract with an external, independent agency with content expertise in autism service delivery that is not itself an autism service provider to undertake efforts to identify fraud, institute quality control measures, and integrate those efforts into providing technical assistance to autism service providers receiving Medicaid funds and to improve outcomes and accountability. Sec. 926. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for community substance use disorder prevention, education, and treatment, $1,000,000.00 is allocated for a specialized substance use disorder detoxification project in conjunction with a substance use and case management provider. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (2) The substance use and case management provider receiving funds under this section shall collect and submit to the department data on the outcomes of the project throughout the duration of the project and the department shall submit a report on the project's outcomes to the standard report recipients. Sec. 928. (1) Each PIHP shall provide, from the PIHP's internal resources, local funds to be used as a part of the state match required under the Medicaid program in order to increase capitation rates for PIHPs. The local funds must not include either of the following: (a) State funds received by a CMHSP for services provided to non-Medicaid recipients. (b) The state matching portion of the Medicaid capitation payments made to a PIHP. (2) Not later than April 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall report to the standard report recipients on the lapse by PIHP from the previous fiscal year and the projected lapse by PIHP in the current fiscal year. Sec. 935. A county required under the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1001 to 330.2106, to provide matching funds to a CMHSP for mental health services rendered to residents in the county's jurisdiction shall pay the matching funds in equal installments on not less than a quarterly basis throughout the fiscal year, with the first payment being made by October 1 of the current fiscal year. Sec. 940. (1) In accordance with section 236 of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1236, the department shall review expenditures for each CMHSP to identify any CMHSP with a projected allocation surplus and to identify any CMHSP with a projected 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 allocation shortfall. The department shall encourage the board of a CMHSP with a projected allocation surplus to concur with the department's recommendation to reallocate the projected surplus to a CMHSP with a projected allocation shortfall. (2) A CMHSP that has its projected surplus reallocated during the current fiscal year as described in subsection (1) is not eligible for an additional funding reallocation during the remainder of the current fiscal year, unless the CMHSP is responding to a public health emergency as determined by the department. (3) A CMHSP shall report to the department on a proposed reallocation described in this section at least 30 days before the reallocation takes effect. (4) The department shall notify the chairs of the appropriation subcommittees on the department budget when a request is made and when the department grants approval for a reallocation described in subsection (1). Not later than February 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit a report on the amount of funding reallocated in the previous fiscal year to the standard report recipients. Sec. 942. A CMHSP shall provide at least 30 days' notice before reducing, terminating, or suspending a service provided by the CMHSP to a CMHSP client, unless the service is authorized by a physician and the service no longer meets established criteria for medical necessity. Sec. 960. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for autism services, the department shall continue to cover all Medicaid autism services to Medicaid enrollees eligible for the services that were covered on January 1, 2019. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (2) To restrain cost increases in the autism services line item, the department shall do all of the following: (a) Maintain specific written guidance for standardization of Medicaid PIHPs and CMHSPs autism spectrum disorder administrative services, including, but not limited to, reporting requirements, coding, and reciprocity of credentialing and training between PIHPs and CMHSPs to reduce administrative duplication at the PIHP, CMHSP, and service provider levels. (b) Require consultation with the client's evaluation diagnostician and PIHP to approve the client's ongoing therapy for 3 years, unless the client's evaluation diagnostician recommended an evaluation before the 3 years or if a clinician on the treatment team recommended an evaluation for the client before the third year. (c) Limit the authority to perform a diagnostic evaluation for Medicaid autism services to qualified licensed practitioners as determined by the department. (d) Allow and expand the utilization of telemedicine and telepsychiatry to increase access to diagnostic evaluation services. (e) Coordinate with the department of insurance and financial services on oversight for compliance with the Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici mental health parity and addiction equity act of 2008, Public Law 110-343, as it relates to autism spectrum disorder services, to ensure appropriate cost sharing between public and private payers. (f) Require that Medicaid eligibility be confirmed through prior evaluations conducted by qualified licensed practitioners as determined by the department. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (g) Maintain regular statewide provider trainings on autism spectrum disorder standard clinical best practice guidelines for treatment and diagnostic services. (3) By March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on total autism services spending broken down by PIHP and CMHSP for the previous fiscal year and current fiscal year and total administrative costs broken down by PIHP, CMHSP, and the type of administrative cost for the previous fiscal year and current fiscal year. Sec. 962. For special projects involving high-need children or adults, including the not guilty by reason of insanity population, the department may contract directly with providers of services to the children and adults described in this section. Sec. 965. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department and each PIHP shall maintain the comparison rate and any associated reimbursement rate of the bundled rate H0020 for the administration and services of methadone at not less than $19.00. Sec. 972. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for behavioral health program administration, the department shall allocate not less than $9,386,400.00 of general fund/general purpose revenue and any associated federal match or federal grant funding, including, but not limited to, associated federal 988 grant funding for the mental health telephone access line known as the Michigan crisis and access line (MiCAL), to provide for both of the following in accordance with section 165 of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1165: (a) Primary coverage in a region where a regional national suicide prevention lifeline center does not provide coverage. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) Statewide secondary coverage. Sec. 974. The department and a PIHP shall allow an individual with an intellectual or developmental disability who receives supports and services from a CMHSP to instead receive supports and services from another provider if the individual is eligible and qualified to receive supports and services from another provider. Other providers may include, but are not limited to, MIChoice and PACE. Sec. 978. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for community substance use disorder prevention, education, and treatment and recovery community organizations, the department shall allocate $1,200,000.00 as grants for recovery community organizations in accordance with section 273b of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1273b. A grant must be used to offer or expand recovery support center services or recovery community center services to individuals seeking long-term recovery from substance use disorders. Sec. 994. (1) Not later than June 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall seek, if necessary, federal approval through either a waiver request or state plan amendment to allow a CMHSP, PIHP, or subcontracting provider agency that is reviewed and accredited by a national accrediting entity for behavioral health care services to be considered in compliance with state program review and audit requirements that are addressed and reviewed by that national accrediting entity. (2) Not later than September 30 of the current fiscal year, the department shall report to the standard report recipients all of the following: (a) The status of the federal approval process required in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 subsection (1). (b) A list of each CMHSP, PIHP, and subcontracting provider agency that is considered to be in compliance with state program review and audit requirements under subsection (1). (c) For each CMHSP, PIHP, or subcontracting provider agency described in subdivision (b), both of the following: (i) The state program review and audit requirements that the CMHSP, PIHP, or subcontracting provider agency is considered to be in compliance with. (ii) The national accrediting entity that reviewed and accredited the CMHSP, PIHP, or subcontracting provider agency. (3) The department shall continue to comply with the laws of this state and federal law and shall not initiate an action that negatively impacts beneficiary safety. Any cost savings attributed to this action must be reinvested back into services. (4) As used in this section, "national accrediting entity" means the Joint Commission, formerly known as the Joint Commission on Accreditation of Healthcare Organizations; the Commission on Accreditation of Rehabilitation Facilities; the Council on Accreditation; the URAC, formerly known as the Utilization Review Accreditation Commission; the National Committee for Quality Assurance; or another appropriate entity, as approved by the department. Sec. 995. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for mental health diversion council, the department shall allocate $3,850,000.00 to continue to implement the jail diversion programs that are intended to address the recommendations of the mental health diversion council. (2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on the planned allocation of the funds appropriated for the mental health diversion council. (3) As used in this section, "mental health diversion council" means the council as that term is defined in section 207e of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1207e. Sec. 996. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for family support subsidy, the department shall make monthly payments of $300.36 to a parent or legal guardian of a child approved for the family support subsidy by a CMHSP. Sec. 997. The department shall use population data from the most recent federal data from the United States Census Bureau in determining the distribution of substance use disorder block grant funds. Sec. 998. If the department decides to use census data to distribute state general funds to CMHSPs, the department shall use the most recent federal data from the United States Census Bureau. BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SERVICES Sec. 1001. Not later than May 15 of the current fiscal year, each CMHSP shall submit a report to the department that identifies populations being served by the CMHSP broken down by program eligibility category. The report must also include the percentage of the operational budget that is related to program eligibility enrollment. Not later than June 30 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit the reports described in this section to the standard report recipients. Sec. 1002. The funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used by the department to expand the certified community behavioral 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 health clinic demonstration. Sec. 1003. The department shall notify the Community Mental Health Association of Michigan when developing a policy or procedure that will impact a PIHP or CMHSP. Sec. 1004. The department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on any rebased formula changes to either Medicaid behavioral health services or non-Medicaid mental health services 90 days before the department implements the formula change. The notification must include a table showing the changes in funding allocation by PIHP for Medicaid behavioral health services or by CMHSP for non-Medicaid mental health services. Sec. 1005. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for health homes, the department shall maintain the number of behavioral health homes and maintain the number of substance use disorder health homes, in place by PIHP region as of September 30 of the previous fiscal year. The department may submit a request to the senate and house appropriation committees to expand the number of behavioral health homes and the number of substance use disorder health homes in a PIHP region added after October 1 of the current fiscal year. (2) On a semiannual basis, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on both of the following: (a) The number of individuals being served and the expenditures incurred by each PIHP region by site. (b) The number of sites by PIHP region that qualify for enhanced federal reimbursement and the date when the enhanced federal reimbursement would expire. Sec. 1006. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for certified community behavioral health clinics, not later than May 1 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 of the current fiscal year the department shall submit to the standard report recipients an outcomes report for CCBHCs during the previous fiscal year that includes both statewide and CCBHC site-specific information on all of the following: (a) The total number of distinct individuals served by the CCBHCs. (b) The percentage of individuals served by the CCBHCs that were Medicaid recipients. (c) The percentage of individuals served by the CCBHCs that were not Medicaid recipients. (d) The total number of CCBHC daily visits. (e) Total number of CCBHC services provided, broken down by the 9 core CCBHC services. (f) Total expenditures from base and supplemental payments. (g) Staffing and staff vacancy levels of the CCBHCs. (h) The amount of prospective payment system rates for each CCBHC over the entire demonstration period allocated across the 9 service types. (i) The total expenditures by CCBHC in the previous fiscal year. (j) The total cost factors and implications in interpreting how CCBHCs deliver care over the course of the demonstration period. (k) The comparison of costs for a random sample of enrollees between care provided by a CCBHC provider and a Medicaid provider that is not a CCBHC. The sample must include participants known to have received services at CCBHC providers and Medicaid providers that are not CCBHCs. (l) The change, in number and percentage, from the fiscal year 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 immediately prior to the previous fiscal year of the number of individuals that needed crisis services more than once. (m) The change, in number and percentage, from the fiscal year immediately prior to the previous fiscal year of the number of individuals that went to the emergency department more than once. (n) The change, in number and percentage, from the fiscal year immediately prior to the previous fiscal year of the number of individuals that received inpatient hospital services more than once. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for certified community behavioral health clinics, the department shall submit the CCBHC cost efficiency evaluation to the standard report recipients not later than 7 business days after the department's receipt of the final information required from the relevant contractors. Sec. 1008. (1) A PIHP and CMHSP shall do all of the following: (a) Work to reduce administration costs by ensuring that PIHP and CMHSP responsible functions are efficient in allowing optimal transition of dollars to the direct services considered most effective in assisting individuals served. Any consolidation of administrative functions must demonstrate, by independent analysis, a reduction in dollars spent on administration resulting in greater dollars spent on direct services. Savings resulting from increased efficiencies must not be applied to PIHP and CMHSP net assets, internal service fund increases, building costs, increases in the number of PIHP and CMHSP personnel, or other areas not directly related to the delivery of improved services. (b) Take an active role in managing mental health care by ensuring consistent and high-quality service delivery throughout 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 its network and promote a conflict-free care management environment. (c) Ensure that direct service rate variances are related to the level of need or other quantifiable measures to ensure that the most money possible reaches direct services. (d) Whenever possible, promote fair and adequate direct care reimbursement, including, but not limited to, fair wages for direct service workers. (2) Not later than May 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on any actual reduction of administrative costs over the prior 2 fiscal years. Sec. 1010. (1) The department shall use the funds appropriated in part 1 for behavioral health community supports and services to reduce waiting lists at state-operated hospitals and centers through cost-effective community-based and residential services, including, but not limited to, assertive community treatment, forensic assertive community treatment, crisis stabilization units in accordance with chapter 9A of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1971 to 330.1979, and psychiatric residential treatment facilities in accordance with section 137a of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1137a. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for behavioral health community supports and services, the department shall allocate $7,441,900.00 to reimburse private providers for intensive psychiatric treatments and services that are provided outside of state-operated hospitals and centers and for support efforts related to overseeing community-based programs placement. (3) If a private provider has an existing wait list for 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 intensive psychiatric treatments and services, a reimbursement to the private provider under this section must not be conditioned on the private provider giving wait-list priority to individuals placed with funds appropriated in this section. (4) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for behavioral health community supports and services, the department shall allocate $4,055,000.00 as grants to build out additional crisis stabilization units under chapter 9A of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1971 to 330.1979. (5) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on all of the following: (a) The types of community supports and services purchased. (b) The quantity, measured by days or other relevant unit of service, of each community support and service purchased. (c) The quantifiable impact of the purchase of community supports and services, including the number of individuals served, the number of successful discharges, and the number of re-escalations to either the discharging entity or a state psychiatric hospital. Sec. 1014. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 to agencies providing physical and behavioral health services to multicultural populations, the department shall award grants in accordance with the requirements of subsections (2) and (3). This state is not liable for any spending above the contract amount. The department shall not release funds until reporting requirements under section 1014 of article 6 of 2025 PA 22 are satisfied. (2) The department shall require each contractor described in subsection (1) that receives greater than $1,000,000.00 in state grant 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 funding to comply with performance-related metrics to maintain their eligibility for funding. The performance-related metrics shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following: (a) Each contractor or subcontractor shall have accreditations that attest to their competency and effectiveness as behavioral health and social service agencies. (b) Each contractor or subcontractor shall have a mission that is consistent with the purpose of the multicultural agency. (c) Each contractor shall validate that any subcontractors utilized within these appropriations share the same mission as the lead agency receiving funding. (d) Each contractor or subcontractor shall demonstrate cost-effectiveness. (e) Each contractor or subcontractor shall ensure their ability to leverage private dollars to strengthen and maximize service provision. (f) Each contractor or subcontractor shall provide timely and accurate reports regarding the number of clients served, units of service provision, and ability to meet their stated goals. (3) The department shall require each contractor described in subsection (1) to ensure that the funds appropriated in this section are only used on proven or established programs. (4) The department shall require an annual report from the contractors described in subsection (2). The annual report, due 60 days following the end of the contract period, must include specific information on services and programs provided, the client base to which the services and programs were provided, information on any wraparound services provided, and the expenditures for those services. Not later than February 1 of the current fiscal year, the department must submit the annual reports to the standard report 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 recipients. Sec. 1020. The department shall not issue, implement, or otherwise proceed with any request for proposal, rebid, or procurement process related to the delivery, financing, or administration of public behavioral health or mental health services, nor expend state or federal funds for such purposes, unless the request for proposals fully complies with the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1001 to 330.2106, and the statutory framework governing Michiganï¿½s public behavioral health system, has received approval through enactment of legislation or approval by the legislature as provided in law, and the department has returned to the legislature for approval of a plan for implementation prior to taking any further action. Sec. 1021. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall not expend state general fund/general purpose revenue, federal funds, or any other funds to develop, implement, administer, or advance the proposal commonly referred to as the ï¿½Mental Health Frameworkï¿½ or any similar policy initiative that alters the current responsibilities for behavioral health services between prepaid inpatient health plans, community mental health services programs, or Medicaid health plans. (2) The department shall not take administrative, contractual, regulatory, or policy actions to transfer, delegate, or otherwise modify responsibility for psychiatric inpatient admissions or behavioral health service management in a manner inconsistent with the responsibilities established under the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1001 to 330.2106. (3) The department shall not implement policies that shift management of psychiatric inpatient benefits or related behavioral health services to Medicaid health plans unless specifically authorized by a subsequent act of the legislature. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (4) The department shall maintain the current structure of responsibility for behavioral health services unless otherwise directed by law. Sec. 1022. The department must reimburse a CMHSP that is a member of a PIHP that was a defendant in the case of Waskul, et al. v. Washtenaw County Community Mental Health, et al. for any costs associated with settlement agreement of this case. Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall provide a report to the standard report recipients on the total reimbursements provided under this section to the CMHSPs, itemized by CMHSP. Sec. 1034. (1) PIHPs must verify, on a quarterly basis, to the department and to the standard report recipients that every provider within the PIHP's provider network receives the applicable reimbursement rates or fees required in sections 924 and 264 of this part for the purpose of complying with network adequacy standards. The verification under this subsection must provide actual claims and utilization data. (2) The department shall seek CMS approval to exclude PIHPs that are not compliant with subsection (1) from all performance incentives available to PIHPs. (3) The department shall audit the claims and utilization data provided in this section. If the department audit determines that a PIHP reimburses any provider within that PIHP's provider network at a rate that is insufficient to maintain network adequacy standards for the services provided in sections 924 and 264 of this part, the department shall notify that PIHP that it is not eligible for performance incentives funded in part 1. Not later than 10 days after a notification to a PIHP under this subsection, the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department shall notify the standard report recipients that the PIHP is not eligible for performance incentives funded in part 1. STATE PSYCHIATRIC HOSPITALS AND FORENSIC MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES Sec. 1051. The department shall continue a revenue recapture project to generate additional revenues from third parties related to cases that have been closed or are inactive. A portion of revenues collected through the project's efforts may be used for departmental costs and contractual fees associated with retroactive collections under the project and to improve ongoing departmental reimbursement management functions. Sec. 1052. The department shall use gifts and bequests received for patient living and treatment environments for additional private funds to provide specific enhancements for individuals residing at state-operated facilities. The department shall use the gifts and bequests consistent with the stipulation of the donor. The department shall use gift and bequest donations within 3 years unless otherwise stipulated by the donor. Sec. 1055. (1) The department shall not implement a closure or consolidation of a state hospital, center, or agency, until each CMHSP or PIHP affected by the closure or consolidation has programs and services in place for the individuals currently in the hospital, center, or agency that is to be closed or consolidated, and has a plan for providing services to the individuals who would have been admitted to the hospital, center, or agency. (2) A closure or consolidation is dependent on adequate department-approved CMHSP and PIHP plans that include a discharge and aftercare plan for each individual currently in a facility described in subsection (1). A discharge and aftercare plan must 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 address an individual's housing needs. A homeless shelter or similar temporary shelter arrangement is inadequate to meet an individual's housing needs. (3) Four months after a closure is certified under section 19(6) of the state employees' retirement act, 1943 PA 240, MCL 38.19, the department shall provide a closure plan to the standard report recipients. (4) On the closure of a hospital, center, or agency and after transitional costs have been paid, the remaining balances of funds appropriated for the hospital, center, or agency must be transferred to CMHSPs or PIHPs responsible for providing services for individuals previously served by the hospital, center, or agency. Sec. 1056. The department may collect revenue for patient reimbursement from first- and third-party payers, including Medicaid and local county CMHSP payers, to cover the cost of patient placement in state hospitals and centers. The department may adjust financing sources for patient reimbursement based on actual revenues earned. If the revenue collected exceeds current year expenditures, the revenue may be carried forward with approval of the state budget director. The department shall use the revenue carried forward as a first source of funds in the subsequent year. Sec. 1058. Effective October 1 of the current fiscal year, the department, in consultation with the department of technology, management, and budget, may maintain a bid process to identify 1 or more private contractors to provide food and custodial services for the administrative areas at a state hospital identified by the department as capable of generating savings through the outsourcing of food and custodial services. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 1059. (1) The department shall identify specific outcomes and performance measures for state-operated hospitals and centers. Unless specified, the outcomes and performance measures must be calculated on an average monthly basis from the previous calendar year, as follows: (a) The average wait time from the time of the receipt of a court order for the treatment of an individual who is determined incompetent to stand trial until the individual's admission to the center for forensic psychiatry or other state-operated psychiatric hospital. (b) The average number of individuals determined not guilty by reason of insanity by an order of the court who, on the first day of each month, are waiting to receive admission into the center for forensic psychiatry or other state-operated psychiatric hospital. (c) The average number of adults who, on the first day of each month, are waiting to receive admission into another state-operated hospital or center through the civil admissions process. (d) The average number of children who, on the first day of each month, are waiting to receive admission into another state-operated hospital or center through the civil admissions process. (e) The average wait time for an adult who is awaiting admission into another state-operated hospital or center through the civil admissions process. (f) The average wait time for a child who is awaiting admission into another state-operated hospital or center through the civil admissions process. (g) The number of individuals determined not guilty by reason of insanity or incompetent to stand trial by an order of the court who have been determined to be ready for discharge to the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 community, and the average wait time between being determined to be ready for discharge to the community and actual community placement. (h) The number of adults admitted through the civil admission process that have been determined to be ready for discharge to the community, and the average wait time between being determined to be ready for discharge to the community and actual community placement. (i) The number of children admitted through the civil admission process that have been determined to be ready for discharge to the community, and the average wait time between being determined to be ready for discharge to the community and actual community placement. (j) The most recent 12-month total number of individuals determined not guilty by reason of insanity by an order of the court ordering the individual to be admitted into the center for forensic psychiatry or other state-operated psychiatric hospital. (k) The most recent 12-month total number of adults requested to be admitted to a state-operated hospital or center through the civil admissions process. (l) The most recent 12-month total number of children requested to be admitted to a state-operated hospital or center through the civil admissions process. (m) The number of individuals determined not guilty by reason of insanity by an order of the court who were removed from the admissions waiting list and the reason for the removal from the admissions waiting list. (n) The number of adults awaiting admission through the civil admission process removed from the admission waiting list and the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 reason for the removal from the admission waiting list. (o) The number of children awaiting admission through the civil admission process removed from the admission waiting list and the reason for the removal from the admission waiting list. (p) The number of individuals determined not guilty by reason of insanity by an order of the court and not admitted into the center for forensic psychiatry or other state-operated hospital or center, and the rationale for the individual not being admitted. (q) The number of adults not admitted into the other state-operated hospitals or centers through the civil admissions process and the rationale for the individual not being admitted. (r) The number of children not admitted into a state-operated hospital or center through the civil admission process and the rationale for the individual not being admitted. (2) Not later than April 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients of this part on the outcomes and performance measures required under subsection (1). Sec. 1060. Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit a report on mandatory overtime, staff turnover, and staff retention at the state psychiatric hospitals and centers to the standard report recipients. The report must include, but is not limited to, the following: (a) The number of direct care and clinical staff positions that are currently vacant by hospital, and how that number compares to the number of vacancies during the previous fiscal year. (b) A breakdown of voluntary and mandatory overtime hours worked by position and by hospital, and how that breakdown compares to the breakdown of voluntary and mandatory overtime hours during 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the previous fiscal year. (c) The ranges of wages paid by position and by hospital, and how the ranges of wages paid compare to wages paid during the previous fiscal year. Sec. 1061. Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall report to the standard report recipients a proposed timeline for either the future use or the demolition of the Walter P. Reuther Psychiatric Hospital, and an estimated cost of the timeline. Sec. 1063. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for southeast Michigan state psychiatric hospital ï¿½children and adolescents, the department shall maintain a psychiatric transitional unit and children's transition support team. The unit and support team described in this subsection shall augment the continuum of behavioral health services for high-need youth and provide additional continuity of care and transition into supportive community-based services. (2) The outcome and performance measures for the unit and support team described in subsection (1) include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) The rate of rehospitalization for youth served through the unit or support team at 30 and 180 days. (b) The measured change in the Michigan Child and Adolescent Needs and Strengths tool for youth and families served through the unit or support team. CHILDREN'S SPECIAL HEALTH care SERVICES Sec. 1360. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department may do 1 or more of the following: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) Provide special formulas for eligible individuals with specified metabolic and allergic disorders. (b) Provide medical care and treatment to eligible individuals with cystic fibrosis who are 26 years of age or older. (c) Provide medical care and treatment to eligible individuals with hereditary coagulation defects, commonly known as hemophilia, who are 26 years of age or older. (d) Provide human growth hormone to eligible individuals. (e) Provide mental health care to eligible individuals for mental health needs that result from, or are a symptom of, the individual's qualifying medical condition. (f) Provide medical care and treatment to eligible individuals with sickle cell disease who are 26 years of age or older. Sec. 1361. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for medical care and treatment, the department may spend the funds to continue developing and expanding telemedicine capacity to allow families with children in the children's special health care services program to access specialty providers more readily and in a more timely manner. The department may spend funds to support chronic complex care management of children enrolled in the children's special health care services program to minimize hospitalizations and reduce costs to the program while improving outcomes and quality of life. As used in this section, "children's special health care services program" or "program" means the program established under section 5815 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.5815. HEALTH AND AGING SERVICES ADMINISTRATION Sec. 1505. Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on the actual reimbursement savings and cost offsets that have resulted from the funds appropriated in part 1 for the office of inspector general and third-party liability efforts in the previous fiscal year. Sec. 1507. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for office of inspector general, the inspector general shall audit and recoup inappropriate or fraudulent payments from Medicaid managed care organizations to health care providers. Unless authorized by federal law or a law of this state, the department shall not fine, temporarily halt operations of, disenroll as a Medicaid provider, or terminate a managed care organization or health care provider from providing services due to the discovery of an inappropriate payment found during the course of an audit. Sec. 1512. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall maintain the Medicaid encounter quality initiative report to separate nonclinical administrative costs from actual claims and encounter costs. Sec. 1518. The department shall coordinate with the department of licensing and regulatory affairs to ensure that, on the issuance of an order suspending the license of an adult foster care facility, home for the aged, or nursing home, the department of licensing and regulatory affairs provides a notice to the department, to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on the department budget, and to the members of the house of representatives and senate that represent the legislative districts of the county in which the adult foster care facility, home for the aged, or nursing home is located. Sec. 1521. Not later than January 1, 2027, the department 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 shall require compliance with community engagement activities as a requirement for enrollment and redetermination for the Healthy Michigan plan. Sec. 1522. (1) Except as required under federal law, when determining eligibility for medical assistance, the department shall not accept unverified, self-attestation of any of the following: (a) Income. (b) Residency. (c) Identity. (d) Household composition. (e) Citizenship or immigration status. (2) In November and May, the department shall request and review information from the department of labor and economic opportunity and the department of treasury concerning recipients of medical assistance that indicate a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility, including changes to employment or wages. (3) In May, the department shall request and review information from the department of treasury concerning recipients of medical assistance that indicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility including adjusted gross income and family composition. (4) In November and May, the department shall request and review information from the department of corrections concerning recipients of medical assistance that indicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility. (5) In November and May, the department shall request and review information from the United States Social Security Administration concerning recipients of medical assistance that 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 indicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility, including earnings and earned-income, beneficiary records, and pensions. (6) In November and May, the department shall request and review information from the United States Department of Health and Human Services concerning recipients of medical assistance that indicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility, including income, employment, as maintained within the national directory of new hires database, and child support enforcement related data. (7) In November and May, the department shall request and review information from the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development concerning recipients of medical assistance that indicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility, including payments and earnings. (8) In May, the department shall request and review information from the United States Internal Revenue Service concerning recipients of medical assistance that indicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility, including tax filings, adjusted gross income, and family composition. (9) The department shall enter into data-sharing agreements with the departments, agencies, and bureaus described in subsections (2) to (8) as necessary to effectuate the requirements of this section. (10) The department may contract with third parties for review of information concerning recipients of medical assistance indicating changes in circumstances that may affect eligibility. (11) On receiving information concerning recipients of medical assistance that indicates a change in circumstances that may affect 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 eligibility, the department shall promptly conduct eligibility redeterminations for applicable recipients. Sec. 1523. (1) On a semiannual basis, the department shall request and review change of address information from returned mail by the United State Postal Service, the National Change of Address Database, and Medicaid managed care organizations. (a) On a semiannual basis, the department shall cross-reference all change of address information with department records for recipients of medical assistance to identify recipients who have moved out of state. (b) On a semiannual basis, the department shall cross-reference Michigan bridge card transactions that occurred out of state with department records for recipients of medical assistance to identify recipients who have moved out of state. (c) On receiving information concerning recipients of medical assistance that indicate changes in residency that may affect eligibility, the department shall promptly conduct eligibility redeterminations for applicable recipients. (d) The department shall implement the requirements of this subsection not later than January 1, 2027. (2) On a semiannual basis, the department shall submit medical assistance enrollment information to the CMS national Medicaid enrollment database, to identify individuals enrolled in multiple states. The department shall implement the requirements of this subsection not later than October 1, 2029. (3) Not later than August 31, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients detailing the implementation and administration of this section, including, but not limited to, all of the following: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) The number of recipients of medical assistance flagged through change of address information and Michigan bridge card transactions occurring out of state. (b) The number of recipients of medical assistance determined ineligible in accordance with the requirements of this section. (c) Any cost savings resulting from the implementation and administration of this section. Sec. 1524. (1) On a semiannual basis, the department shall request and review death master file information from the United States Social Security Administration, and in conjunction with a review of state birth and death records, cross-reference the information obtained with department records on recipients of medical assistance to identify recipients who are deceased. (2) The department shall remove all deceased recipients of medical assistance on confirmation of death and shall not authorize reimbursements for medical assistance services rendered after date of death. (3) The department shall recoup any improper payments under subsection (2). (4) On a quarterly basis, the office of inspector general shall conduct reviews to ensure compliance with the requirements of this section and shall provide a report on the outcomes of the reviews to the standard report recipients. (5) As used in this section, "death master file" means the database maintained by the United States Social Security Administration containing reported deaths. (6) The department shall implement the requirements of this section not later than January 1, 2027. Sec. 1525. (1) Not later than October 1, the department shall 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 report the medical assistance error rate to the standard report recipients and the house and senate standing committees on oversight. (2) The report required under subsection (1) must be made publicly available on the department's website. (3) As used in this section, "medical assistance error rate" means erroneous excess payments for medical assistance as that term is defined in 42 USC 1396b(u)(1)(D). Sec. 1526. The department shall limit retroactive coverage for medical assistance to no more than that allowable under Public Law 119-21. Sec. 1527. Not later than September 1, the department shall submit an annual report to the standard report recipients detailing compliance with section 71118 of Public Law 119-21. The report must include budget neutrality calculations for existing state Medicaid waivers. Sec. 1528. (1) The department shall not authorize participation in the medical assistance program for a provider or the provider's affiliates, subsidiaries, successors, and clinics, to which all of the following apply: (a) That is an organization described in section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code, 26 USC 501, and exempt from tax under section 501a of the internal revenue code, 26 USC 501a. (b) That is an essential community provider described in 45 CFR 156.235, to which both of the following apply: (i) Primarily engages in family planning services, reproductive health, and related medical care, and provides abortions. (ii) The total amount of federal and state expenditures under the medical assistance program, under title XIX of the social 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 security act, 42 USC 1396 to 1396w-8, for medical assistance furnished in fiscal year 2022-23 made directly, or by a covered organization, to the provider, or the provider's affiliates, subsidiaries, successors, or clinics as a part of a nationwide health care provider network, exceeded $800,000.00. (2) The department shall implement the requirements of this section not later than October 1, 2026. Sec. 1529. (1) The department shall not request a good-faith effort exemption, or any other federal waiver or state plan amendment, to delay compliance with the Medicaid community engagement requirements under section 71119 of Public Law 119-21. Instead, the department shall implement the Medicaid community engagement requirements under section 71119 of Public Law 119-21 not later than the first day of the first quarter that begins after December 31, 2026. (2) Not later than November 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on the status of implementing the Medicaid community engagement requirements described in subsection (1) by not later than the first day of the first quarter that begins after December 31, 2026. Sec. 1530. The department shall not seek or implement a Medicaid state plan amendment or a waiver under section 1115 or 1915 of the social security act, 42 USC 1315 and 1396n, without first obtaining statutory approval from the legislature. This section does not affect any state plan amendment or waiver program implemented before October 1, 2026. health SERVICES Sec. 1605. The protected income level for Medicaid coverage 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 determined under section 106(1)(b)(iii) of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.106, is 100% of the related public assistance standard. Sec. 1606. For the purpose of guardian and conservator charges, the department may deduct up to $83.00 per month as an allowable expense against a recipient's income when determining Medicaid eligibility and patient pay amounts. Sec. 1607. (1) The department shall immediately presume that an applicant for Medicaid whose qualifying condition is pregnancy is eligible for Medicaid coverage, unless the preponderance of evidence in the applicant's application indicates otherwise. The applicant who is qualified as described in this subsection is allowed to select or remain with the Medicaid participating obstetrician of the applicant's choice. (2) Each qualifying applicant is entitled to receive all medically necessary obstetrical and prenatal care without preauthorization from a health plan. All claims submitted for payment for obstetrical and prenatal care must be paid at the Medicaid fee-for-service rate if a contract does not exist between the Medicaid participating obstetrical or prenatal care provider and the managed care plan. The applicant must receive a listing of Medicaid physicians and managed care plans in the immediate vicinity of the applicant's residence. (3) If an applicant, presumed to be eligible for Medicaid under subsection (1), is subsequently found to be ineligible, a Medicaid physician or managed care plan that has been providing pregnancy services to the applicant is entitled to reimbursement for the services until the Medicaid physician or managed care plan is notified by the department that the applicant was found to be 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 ineligible for Medicaid. (4) If the preponderance of evidence in an application under subsection (1) indicates that the applicant is not eligible for Medicaid, the department shall refer the applicant to the nearest public health clinic or similar entity as a potential source for receiving pregnancy-related services. (5) The department shall develop an enrollment process for applicants covered under this section that facilitates the selection of a managed care plan at the time of application. (6) The department shall require that Medicaid managed care plans enroll women whose qualifying condition for Medicaid is pregnancy. (7) The department shall encourage physicians to provide an applicant whose qualifying condition for Medicaid is pregnancy with a referral to a Medicaid participating dentist at the applicant's first pregnancy-related appointment. Sec. 1608. (1) The department shall comply with all residency and eligibility provisions of Public Law 119-21 when determining eligibility for medical assistance. (2) Any individual who is a citizen of the United States, or qualified resident of the United States, whose legal residence was located in another state, the District of Columbia, or territory of the United States within the 12 months preceding application submission for Healthy Michigan plan benefits must verify compliance with federal community engagement requirements for the 3 months immediately preceding application submission in order to be determined compliant with state community engagement requirements for Healthy Michigan plan eligibility. Sec. 1611. (1) For care provided to Medicaid recipients with 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 other third-party sources of payment, Medicaid reimbursement shall not exceed, in combination with such other resources, including Medicare, those amounts established for Medicaid-only patients. The Medicaid payment rate shall be accepted as payment in full. Other than an approved Medicaid copayment, no portion of a provider's charge shall be billed to the recipient or any person acting on behalf of the recipient. This section does not affect the level of payment from a third-party source other than the Medicaid program. The department shall require a nonenrolled provider to accept Medicaid payments as payment in full. (2) Notwithstanding subsection (1), if a hospital service is provided to a dual Medicare/Medicaid recipient with only Medicare part B coverage, the Medicaid reimbursement must equal, when combined with a payment for Medicare or other third-party source of payment, the amount established for a Medicaid-only patient, including a capital payment. Sec. 1620. (1) If a Medicaid claim is a fee-for-service Medicaid claim, the professional dispensing fee for a drug that is listed as a medication on the Michigan pharmaceutical products list is $20.02 or the pharmacy's submitted dispensing fee, whichever is less. (2) If a Medicaid claim is a fee-for-service Medicaid claim, the professional dispensing fee for a drug that is not listed as a specialty medication on the Michigan pharmaceutical products list is as follows: (a) If the drug is indicated as preferred on the department's preferred drug list, $10.80 or the pharmacy's submitted dispensing fee, whichever is less. (b) If the drug is not on the department's preferred drug 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 list, $10.64 or the pharmacy's submitted dispensing fee, whichever is less. (c) If the drug is indicated as nonpreferred on the department's preferred drug list, $9.00 or the pharmacy's submitted dispensing fee, whichever is less. Sec. 1626. (1) Not later than January 15 of the current fiscal year, each pharmacy benefit manager that receives reimbursements directly, through a department-administered fee-for-services contract, or through a Medicaid health plan, from the funds appropriated in part 1 for health services must submit all of the following information to the department for the previous fiscal year: (a) The total number of prescriptions that were dispensed. (b) The aggregate fiscal year paid pharmacy claims repriced using the wholesale acquisition cost for each drug on its formulary. (c) The aggregate amount of rebates, discounts, and price concessions that the pharmacy benefit manager received for each drug on its formulary. The aggregate amount of rebates must include any utilization discounts the pharmacy benefit manager received from a manufacturer. (d) The aggregate amount of administrative fees that the pharmacy benefit manager received from all pharmaceutical manufacturers. (e) The aggregate amount identified in subdivisions (b) and (c) that were retained by the pharmacy benefit manager and did not pass through to the department or to the Medicaid health plan. (f) The aggregate amount of reimbursements the pharmacy benefit manager paid to contracting pharmacies. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (g) Any other information considered necessary by the department. (2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit a report including the information provided under subsection (1) to the standard report recipients. (3) Any nonaggregated information submitted under this section is confidential and must not be disclosed to any person by the department. The information described in this subsection is not a public record of the department. Sec. 1628. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for hospital services and therapy, Healthy Michigan plan, and Healthy Michigan plan ï¿½ fee-for-service, the department shall continue to allocate $3,000,000.00 in general fund/general purpose revenue and any associated federal match to maintain the Medicaid reimbursement rate for dental services provided at ambulatory surgical centers and outpatient hospitals. The funding provided in this section must be used to maintain the minimum rate of reimbursement for dental services provided in ambulatory surgical centers at $1,495.00 and maintain the minimum rate of reimbursement for dental services provided in outpatient hospitals at $2,300.00. Sec. 1629. The department shall utilize maximum allowable cost pricing for generic drugs that is based on wholesaler pricing to providers. The wholesaler pricing must be based on the price available from at least 2 wholesalers who deliver drugs in this state. Sec. 1630. Not later than April 1 of the current fiscal year, from the funds appropriated in part 1 for Medicaid dental services and Healthy Kids Dental, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on the dental service benefit. The 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 report must cover all of the following areas: (a) Information on the implementation of the Adult Medicaid dental benefit redesign including all of the following information: (i) The number of dental providers, by Medicaid health plan in this state, who provided 1 or more Medicaid dental services in the fiscal year ending September 30, 2022, and the number of additional providers who were added in the previous fiscal year, with a delineation in the reported numbers based on the average payment per visit and before and after the implementation of the Adult Medicaid dental benefit redesign. (ii) The status of enhanced care coordination. (iii) The array of covered dental benefits and services before the Adult Medicaid dental benefit redesign and how the available benefits and services changed or expanded after the Adult Medicaid dental benefit redesign. (b) Information on the Healthy Kids Dental program including all of the following information: (i) The number of children enrolled in the Healthy Kids Dental program who visited the dentist in the previous fiscal year broken down by dental benefit manager. (ii) The number of dentists who accept payment from the Healthy Kids Dental program broken down by dental benefit manager. (iii) The annual change in dental utilization of children enrolled in the Healthy Kids Dental program broken down by dental benefit manager. (iv) Service expenditures for the Healthy Kids Dental program broken down by dental benefit manager. (v) Administrative expenditures for the Healthy Kids Dental program broken down by dental benefit manager. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 1631. (1) The department shall require copayments on dental, podiatric, and vision services provided to Medicaid recipients, except as prohibited by federal law or a law of this state. (2) Except as otherwise prohibited by federal law or a law of this state, the department shall require Medicaid recipients to pay the following copayments: (a) Two dollars for a physician office visit. (b) Three dollars for a hospital emergency room visit. (c) Fifty dollars for the first day of an inpatient hospital stay. (d) Two dollars for an outpatient hospital visit. (e) One dollar for a generic drug or any drug indicated as preferred on the department's preferred drug list and $3.00 for a brand-name drug not indicated as preferred on the department's preferred drug list. Sec. 1640. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall maintain the rate increase for the home help individual caregiver rate and the home help agency provider rate specified in the department's Medicaid provider letters L 24-66, L 24-67, and L 24-74. Sec. 1641. An institutional provider that is required to submit a cost report under the Medicaid program shall submit cost reports completed in full not more than 5 months after the end of the institutional provider's fiscal year. Sec. 1644. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall maintain wages at a level not less than the amount in effect the previous fiscal year. This funding must include all costs incurred by the employer, including, but not limited to, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 payroll taxes, due to the wage increase. As used in this subsection, "direct care workers" means a registered professional nurse, licensed practical nurse, competency-evaluated nursing assistant, and respiratory therapist. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall maintain wages at a level not less than the amount in effect during the previous fiscal year for direct care workers who are employed by licensed adult foster care facilities and licensed homes for the aged and who provide Medicaid-funded fee-for-service personal care services that were not eligible for any direct care worker pay adjustment under Medicaid-funded managed care. This funding must include all costs incurred by the employer, including, but not limited to, payroll taxes, due to the wage increase. Sec. 1645. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall maintain the wages of eligible nonclinical staff employed by skilled nursing facilities. The funding must include all costs incurred by the employer, including payroll taxes, due to prior wage increases. (2) The nonclinical staff eligible for the wages described in subsection (1) are those whose costs are reported in the following job classifications in nursing facility institutional cost reports shared with the department: (a) Other housekeeping. (b) Other maintenance worker. (c) Other plant operations. (d) Other laundry. (e) Dining room assistants. (f) Other dietary workers. (g) Other medical records. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (h) Other social services. (i) Other diversion therapy. (j) Beauty and barber. (k) Gift, flower, coffee, and canteen worker. Sec. 1646. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall maintain the Medicaid reimbursement rates for orthotic and prosthetic providers in place in the previous fiscal year. Sec. 1647. The department shall recognize home office nursing costs attributable to patient care as base costs. The costs described under this section must not be reclassified to support costs or purchased services. The department shall implement the requirements of this section beginning October 1, 2026. Sec. 1657. (1) The department shall not make reimbursement for Medicaid to screen and stabilize a Medicaid recipient, including stabilization of a psychiatric crisis, in a hospital emergency room, contingent on obtaining prior authorization from the recipient's HMO. If the recipient is discharged from the emergency room, the hospital shall notify the recipient's HMO within 24 hours of the diagnosis and treatment received. (2) If the treating hospital determines that the recipient will require further medical service or hospitalization beyond the point of stabilization, that hospital shall receive authorization from the recipient's HMO prior to admitting the recipient. (3) Subsections (1) and (2) do not require an alteration to an existing agreement between an HMO and its contracting hospitals and do not require an HMO to reimburse for services that are not considered to be medically necessary. Sec. 1662. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department shall require an annual external quality review of each contracting HMO. The external quality review must analyze and evaluate aggregated information on quality, timeliness, and access to health care services that the HMO or its contractors furnish to Medicaid beneficiaries. The department shall create a report containing each quality review required under this subsection. (2) The department shall require Medicaid HMOs to provide EPSDT utilization data through the encounter data system, and HEDIS well child health measures in accordance with the National Committee for Quality Assurance prescribed methodology. (3) The department shall submit a copy of the analysis of the Medicaid HMO annual audited reports on HEDIS and the report under subsection (1) to the standard report recipients within 30 days after the department's receipt of the final information required from the contractors. Sec. 1670. (1) The appropriation in part 1 for the MIChild program is to be used to provide comprehensive health care to all children under age 19 who reside in families with an income at or below 212% of the federal poverty level, who are uninsured and have not had coverage by other comprehensive health insurance within 6 months of applying for MIChild benefits, and who are residents of this state. The department shall develop detailed eligibility criteria through the behavioral and physical health and aging services administration public concurrence process. The eligibility criteria must be consistent with the provisions of this part and part 1. (2) The department shall provide up to 1 year of continuous eligibility to a child eligible for the MIChild program unless the child reaches age 19. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 1677. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for the MIChild program, the department shall provide, at a minimum, all benefits available under the Michigan benchmark plan that are delivered through contracted providers and consistent with federal law, including, but not limited to, the following medically necessary services: (a) Inpatient mental health services, other than substance use disorder treatment services, including services furnished in a state-operated mental hospital and residential or other 24-hour therapeutically planned structured services. (b) Outpatient mental health services, other than substance use disorder services, including services furnished in a mental hospital operated by this state and community-based services. (c) Durable medical equipment and prosthetic and orthotic devices. (d) Dental services as outlined in the approved MIChild state plan. (e) Substance use disorder treatment services that may include inpatient, outpatient, and residential substance use disorder treatment services. (f) Care management services for mental health diagnoses. (g) Physical therapy, occupational therapy, and services for individuals with speech, hearing, and language disorders. (h) Emergency ambulance services. Sec. 1682. (1) In addition to the appropriations in part 1, the department is authorized to receive and spend penalty money received as the result of noncompliance with Medicaid certification regulations. Penalty money, characterized as private funds, received by the department shall increase authorizations and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 allotments in the long-term care accounts. (2) Any unexpended penalty money, at the end of the year, must carry forward to the following year. (3) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall report to the standard report recipients on penalty money received by the department as described in subsection (1). The report must include, but is not limited to, the following information: (a) The amount of penalty monies received by the department in the previous fiscal year listed by the assessed entity. (b) A list of the entities that were assessed penalties in the previous fiscal year with the rationale for each penalty. Sec. 1692. (1) The department is authorized to pursue reimbursement for eligible services provided in Michigan schools from the federal Medicaid program. The department and the state budget director are authorized to negotiate and enter into agreements, together with the department of education, with local and intermediate school districts regarding the sharing of federal Medicaid services funds received for these services. The department is authorized to receive and disburse funds to participating school districts pursuant to agreements described in this subsection and pursuant to federal law and a law of this state. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for health services school-based services payments, the department is authorized to do all of the following: (a) Finance activities within the behavioral and physical health and aging services administration related to eligible services. (b) Reimburse participating school districts pursuant to the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 fund-sharing ratios negotiated in the state-local agreements authorized in subsection (1). (c) Offset general fund costs associated with the Medicaid program. Sec. 1694. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for special Medicaid reimbursement, $2,628,500.00 of general fund/general purpose revenue and any associated federal match must be distributed for poison control services to an academic health care system that has a high volume of providing care to indigent individuals. Sec. 1697. The department shall require that Medicaid health plans administering adult dental benefits maintain a network of dental providers in sufficient numbers, mix, and geographic locations throughout their respective service areas in order to provide adequate dental care for Healthy Michigan plan enrollees. Sec. 1700. Not later than December 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall report to the standard report recipients on the distribution of funding provided, and the net benefit if the special hospital payment is not financed with general fund/general purpose revenue, to each eligible hospital during the previous fiscal year from the following special hospital payments: (a) GME. (b) Special rural hospital payments provided under section 1802(1)(b) of this part. (c) Lump-sum payments to rural hospitals for obstetrical care provided under section 1802(1)(a) of this part. Sec. 1702. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall allocate $2,830,000.00 in general fund/general purpose revenue and any associated federal match to maintain the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 rates in place in the previous fiscal year for private duty nursing services for Medicaid beneficiaries under the age of 21. Sec. 1757. The department shall obtain proof from all Medicaid recipients that they are United States citizens or otherwise legally residing in this country and that they are residents of this state before approving Medicaid eligibility. Sec. 1762. The department shall ensure consistency with CMS guidance related to medical loss ratio requirements. Sec. 1763. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall ensure that the pharmacy and therapeutics committee and drug utilization review board account for net costs of individual prescription drugs for this state's Medicaid program before recommending or approving the addition of a drug to this state's single preferred drug list. (2) For the purpose of this section, "net cost" means costs associated with pharmaceuticals that include, but are not limited to, all of the following: (a) Wholesale acquisition cost. (b) A cost of a brand name drug with a generic alternative, compared to the lowest cost generic version of the drug where a maximum allowable cost price has been determined, and the lowest cost alternative is preferred. (c) A cost associated with federal and supplemental rebates that are available, or anticipated, under 42 U.S.C. 1396r-8. (d) Dispensing and administrative costs associated with the provision of a drug. (3) The department shall require that the pharmacy and therapeutics committee and the drug utilization review board document their consideration of cost information, including 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 comparative cost effectiveness among clinically appropriate alternatives, in the meeting materials or minutes supporting each recommendation. (4) A drug must not be included in this state's single preferred drug list unless the pharmacy and therapeutics committee or drug utilization review board have affirmatively determined that the drug's inclusion is both clinically appropriate and cost effective. (5) Not later than February 1, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes both of the following: (a) A description of the process used to evaluate drug costs under this section. (b) A list of drugs included within this state's single preferred drug list during the previous fiscal year. Sec. 1764. The department's contracted actuaries shall annually certify whether rates paid to Medicaid health plans and specialty PIHPs are actuarially sound in accordance with federal requirements. The department shall provide to the standard report recipients a copy of the rate certification required under this section and the approval of rates paid to Medicaid health plans and specialty PIHPs for any fiscal year not later than October 1 for Medicaid capitation rate certifications and not later than November 15, February 15, May 15, and August 15 for any Medicaid capitation rate amendments. Following the rate certification, the department shall ensure that any new or revised policies with a substantive impact on capitation rates are reviewed by the contracted actuaries and considered for future rate amendments. Sec. 1775. From the funds appropriated in part 1, by not later 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall provide a report to the standard report recipients on the MI Coordinated Health integrated dual-eligible managed care program. The report must include all of the following: (a) The total average monthly enrollment for the previous fiscal year. (b) The average monthly enrollment by county for the previous fiscal year. (c) The state's Medicaid cost savings realized by managed coordination of Medicare and Medicaid benefits for dual-eligible individuals in the previous fiscal year. (d) Any inclusion or removal of counties from eligible program regions, with associated department rationale, that occurred in the previous fiscal year. (e) Any plan for expansion or reduction of eligible program regions, with associated department rationale, to occur in the current fiscal year or the subsequent fiscal year. Sec. 1786. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall maintain Medicaid reimbursement for the administration of injectable, nasal, and oral vaccines at $23.03. Sec. 1787. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for health plan services, Healthy Michigan plan, Healthy Michigan plan ï¿½ fee-for-service, and long-term care services, the department shall maintain the Medicaid reimbursement rates in place in the previous fiscal year for CPT codes 31579, 92507, 92508, 92520, 92521, 92522, 92523, 92524, 92526, 92597, 92607, 92608, 92609, 92610, 92630, 92633, 92700, 94010, 97129, 97130, 97533, 97799, G2250, G2251, and S9152. Sec. 1788. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department shall provide Medicaid reimbursement rates, including Medicaid reimbursements from the ambulance provider quality assurance assessment, for ground ambulance services up to 100% of the Medicare allowable rates for Locality 01 for ground ambulance services. Sec. 1789. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for federally qualified health centers, the department shall allocate not less than $11,300,000.00 in general fund/general purpose revenue and any associated federal match to maintain Medicaid prospective payment system reimbursement rates. Sec. 1790. The department shall maintain the current practitioner rates paid for CPT codes 90791 through 90899 for psychiatric procedures through Medicaid fee-for-service and through the comprehensive Medicaid health plans for psychiatric procedures provided for Medicaid recipients under the age of 21. Sec. 1791. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for health plan services and physician services, the department shall provide Medicaid reimbursement rates for neonatal services at 100% of the Medicare rate received for those services in effect on the date the services are provided to eligible Medicaid recipients. The neonatal services and physician services eligible for reimbursement rates under this section are described as CPT codes 99468, 99469, 99471, 99472, 99475, 99476, 99477, 99478, 99479, and 99480. Sec. 1792. (1) The department shall provide for Medicaid reimbursements for enrolled portable x-ray and ultrasound providers for transportation charges related to services rendered to patients residing in long-term care facilities, including nursing homes and assisted living facilities, or who are receiving services through home-based care. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (2) The reimbursement policies required under this section must take effect not later than October 1, 2026. Sec. 1793. Not later than April 30, the department shall evaluate pharmacy encounter data through the first 2 quarters of the fiscal year to determine, in consultation with the Medicaid health plans, if rates must be recertified. Not later than May 30, the department shall report the evaluation results to the standard report recipients and the Medicaid health plans. Sec. 1794. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall provide Medicaid reimbursements for hospital-based substance use disorder peer-supports. (2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall report to the standard report recipients on the statewide amounts and each hospital amount for hospital-based substance use disorder peer-supports during the first quarter of the current fiscal year, including for all of the following: (a) The number of individuals served. (b) The Medicaid reimbursement utilization. (c) The total expenditures. Sec. 1801. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for physician services and health plan services, the department shall continue the increase to Medicaid rates for primary care services provided only by primary care providers. The department shall not provide the increase to Medicaid rates under this section to primary care providers whose primary practice is as a non-primary-care subspecialty. The department shall establish policies that most effectively limit the increase to primary care providers for primary care services only. As used in this section, "primary care provider" means a physician, or a practitioner working in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 collaboration with a physician, who is either licensed under part 170 or part 175 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.17001 to 333.17097 and 333.17501 to 333.17556, and who works as a primary care provider in general practice or is board-eligible or certified with a specialty designation of family medicine, general internal medicine, or pediatric medicine, or is a provider who provides the department with documentation of equivalency. Sec. 1802. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for hospital services and therapy, the department shall provide for the following: (a) $8,470,200.00 in general fund/general purpose revenue as lump-sum payments to noncritical access hospitals that qualified for rural hospital access payments in fiscal year 2013-2014 and that have historically provided obstetrical care. Payment amounts must be based on the volume of obstetrical care cases and newborn care cases for all such cases billed by each qualified hospital in the most recent year for which data is available. The department shall make payments not later than January 1 of the current fiscal year. For the current fiscal year, a hospital that met established occupied bed criteria based on Medicaid cost reports as of the fiscal year ending September 30, 2011, and that is located within a county with a population of not more than 195,000 and within a city, village, or township with a population of not more than 15,000, according to the 2020 federal decennial census, is eligible. (b) $15,204,800.00 in general fund/general purpose revenue and any associated federal match awarded as rural access payments to noncritical access hospitals that meet criteria established by the department for services to low-income rural residents. One of the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 reimbursement components of the criteria established by the department under this subsection must be assistance with labor and delivery services. (2) Payments under this section must be made by January 1 of the current fiscal year. (3) The department shall publish the distribution of payments for the current fiscal year and the previous fiscal year. Sec. 1803. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for rural health transformation program, the department shall provide grants to hospitals and providers, in accordance with federal requirements. (2) Not later than January 15 of the current fiscal year, the department shall provide to the standard report recipients the rural health transformation program grant application and plan submitted to CMS, as revised for the subsequent award year. The department shall identify any proposals within the submission intended to increase the grant award amount when complying with the reporting requirement of this subsection. (3) The department shall submit to the standard report recipients any required reports submitted to CMS for program oversight or amendment concurrently with CMS submission. (4) Not later than May 1, if an amount equal to or greater than 50 percent of the funds appropriated in part 1 for rural health transformation program remains unexpended or unencumbered, the department shall report to the standard report recipients on remedial actions the department is undertaking to ensure that the remainder of the funds are encumbered by not later than the end of the current grant award year. (5) Not later than August 1, if an amount equal to or greater 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 than 33 percent of the funds appropriated in part 1 for rural health transformation program remains unexpended or unencumbered, the department shall report to the standard report recipients on remedial actions the department is undertaking to ensure that the remainder of the funds are encumbered by not later than the end of the current grant award year. (6) All programmatic metrics required by CMS for program oversight and quality assurance must be made publicly available and posted on the department's website, and include all dashboards created in accordance with the CMS approved grant award. The dashboard metrics must include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) Separate dashboards for each of the overarching programmatic areas, including, but not limited to, the following: (i) Transforming rural health through partnerships. (ii) Workforce for wellness initiative. (iii) Interoperability in action initiative. (iv) Care closer to home. (b) Funds encumbered by grantee, to include amount and date of encumbrance. (c) Remaining unencumbered funds for the current grant award year. (d) Notification if any enacted or proposed programmatic or policy changes resulting from the rural health transformation program would likely result in net increases in this state's costs for programmatic or service continuation after the federal grant award period ends. (e) The location of health care hubs and associated spokes, for facilities designated under the department hub-and-spoke model 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 for grant allocation, including, but not limited to, area of care coverage measured by population served, services provided, and travel time and distance to care. (7) The department shall report on a quarterly basis to the standard report recipients on the progress of Michigan Health Information Network expansion as a result of the funds appropriated in part 1 for rural health transformation program. The report must include, but is not limited to, the following: (a) The number of providers connected during the reporting period. (b) The cumulative number of providers connected since the beginning of the 5-year award period. (c) The geographic regions covered by MIHIN as a result of the rural health transformation program. (8) The department shall seek to utilize department resources and personnel to complete administrative requirements of the grant program before utilizing contractual services. Not later than August 1, the department shall report to the standard report recipients on the details of the indirect costs allocation for the funds allocated to the Michigan Public Health Institute for contractual support of the rural health transformation program administration and oversight. (9) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for rural health transformation program, the department shall explore the development of a regional demonstration implementing a value-based care payment methodology. Not later than August 1, the department shall report to the standard report recipients on activities related to accomplishing the requirements of this subsection. (10) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for rural health 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 transformation program, the department shall allocate $6,400,000.00 to the MiDocs consortium to create new primary care residency slots in rural communities. (11) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for rural health transformation program, the department shall establish a general OB-GYN residency program to provide for primary care residency slots located in rural areas. The department may coordinate with the MiDocs consortium to comply with this subsection. (12) The department shall establish and convene rural health transformation program stakeholder meetings not less than quarterly during the grant award year to assess program outcomes, identify and mitigate problems, and coordinate programmatic operations. Stakeholder meetings must be held in a manner that is publicly accessible, and must not supplant, or be held in lieu of, rural health transformation program advisory council meetings. (13) The revised application for the continuation of grant funding submitted to CMS for rural health transformation program for the subsequent fiscal year must include a contingency plan to allow for direct payments to rural hospitals. (14) All reports pursuant to the reporting requirements of this section must be made publicly available and posted to the department's rural health transformation program website. Sec. 1804. The department may utilize the federal public assistance reporting information system to continue to work to identify Medicaid recipients who are veterans and who may be eligible for federal veterans' health care benefits or other benefits and shall continue to refer veterans to the department of military and veterans affairs for assistance in securing additional benefits. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 1810. In advance of the annual rate setting development, Medicaid health plans must be given at least 60 days to dispute and correct any discarded encounter data before rates are certified. The department shall notify each contracting Medicaid health plan of any encounter data that have not been accepted for the purposes of rate setting. Sec. 1812. Not later than June 1 of the current fiscal year, and using the most recent available cost reports, the department shall complete a report of all direct and indirect costs associated with residency training programs for each hospital that receives funds appropriated in part 1 for graduate medical education or through the MiDocs consortium. The report shall be submitted to the standard report recipients. Sec. 1820. (1) In order to avoid duplication of effort, if a Medicaid health plan has been reviewed and accredited by a national accrediting entity for health care services, the department shall use applicable national accreditation review criteria to determine compliance with corresponding requirements in this state. (2) The department shall continue to comply with federal law and laws of this state and shall not initiate an action that negatively impacts beneficiary safety. (3) As used in this section, "national accrediting entity" means the National Committee for Quality Assurance, the URAC, formerly known as the Utilization Review Accreditation Commission, or another appropriate entity, as approved by the department. Sec. 1831. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for hospital services and therapy, the department shall allocate $9,000,000.00 to continue to support hospitals in this state to improve maternal safety and outcomes by administering and expanding 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 a data-driven maternal safety and quality improvement initiative that is based on interdisciplinary and consensus-based practices. The initiative expansion must focus on mitigating pregnancy-associated injury and death, work to improve outcomes for underserved groups, and address problems related to substance use disorders. (2) Not later than March 15, the department shall report to the standard report recipients on the utilization of funds allocated under this section. The report must include, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) Recipients of funds, by amount and intended purpose, for the previous fiscal year. (b) Quantitative and qualitative metrics, by recipient, measuring effect of allocations on the 3 programmatic goals established under subsection (1), for the previous fiscal year. Sec. 1833. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the department is authorized to expend an amount not to exceed $3,155,000,000.00 for state restricted insurance provider assessment and associated federal Medicaid reimbursement matching revenues, if revenues are available under sections 7, 11, and 17 of the insurance provider assessment act, 2018 PA 175, MCL 550.1757, 550.1761, and 550.1767. (2) Not later than 10 calendar days after expenditure authorization in subsection (1) is utilized, the department shall report to the standard report recipients all of the following: (a) Total state restricted expenditures incurred for this use of authorization under subsection (1), by line item. (b) Total federal expenditures incurred for this use of authorization under subsection (1), by line item. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (c) Total gross expenditures incurred for this use of authorization under subsection (1). (d) Total year-to-date expenditure authorization remaining under subsection (1). Sec. 1834. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the department is authorized to expend an amount not to exceed $6,077,000,000.00 for state restricted quality assurance assessment program and associated federal Medicaid reimbursement matching revenues, if revenues are available and the department has received CMS approval of the expenditures under the state's Medicaid preprint. (2) Not later than 10 calendar days after expenditure authorization in subsection (1) is utilized, the department shall report to the standard report recipients all of the following: (a) Total state restricted expenditures incurred for this use of authorization under subsection (1), by line item. (b) Total federal expenditures incurred for this use of authorization under subsection (1), by line item. (c) Total gross expenditures incurred for this use of authorization under subsection (1). (d) Total year-to-date expenditure authorization remaining under subsection (1). Sec. 1837. The department shall continue, and expand where appropriate, utilization of telemedicine and telepsychiatry as strategies to increase access to services for Medicaid recipients. Sec. 1846. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for graduate medical education, the department shall distribute the funds with an emphasis on the following health care workforce goals: (a) The encouragement of the training of physicians in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 specialties, including primary care, that are necessary to meet the future needs of residents of this state. (b) The training of physicians in settings that include ambulatory sites and rural locations. (c) The training of practitioners providing pediatric psychiatry services. Sec. 1850. The department may allow Medicaid health plans to assist with maintaining eligibility through outreach activities to ensure continuation of Medicaid eligibility and enrollment in managed care. The assistance may include mailings, telephone contact, or face-to-face contact with beneficiaries enrolled in the individual Medicaid health plan. Medicaid health plans may offer assistance in completing paperwork for beneficiaries enrolled in the Medicaid health plan. Sec. 1851. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for Healthy Michigan plan, the department shall allocate $1,000,000.00 in general fund/general purpose revenue and any associated federal match to enhance Medicaid health plan outreach, with providers who had contracts in the previous fiscal year, to identify, educate, and prevent chronic kidney disease in high-risk populations and regions. Sec. 1854. The funds appropriated in part 1 for PACE must support a current fiscal year enrollment cap that is not less than 9,950. Sec. 1855. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for PACE, to the extent that funding is available in the PACE line item and unused program slots are available, the department may do the following: (a) Increase the number of slots for a local and already- 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 established PACE if the local PACE has provided appropriate documentation to the department indicating its ability to expand capacity to provide services to additional PACE clients. (b) Suspend the 10 member per month individual PACE enrollment increase cap in order to allow unused and unobligated slots to be allocated to address unmet demand for PACE services. Sec. 1856. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for hospice services, $5,000,000.00 shall be expended to provide room and board for Medicaid-eligible individuals who meet hospice eligibility requirements and receive services at Medicaid enrolled hospice residences in this state. The department shall distribute funds through grants based on the total beds located in all eligible residences that have been providing these services as of October 1, 2017. An eligible grant applicant may inform the department of the applicant's request to reduce the grant amount allocated for the applicant's residence and the funds must be distributed proportionally to increase the total grant amount of the remaining grant-eligible residences. Grant amounts shall be paid out monthly with 1/12 of the total grant amount distributed each month to the grantees. (2) Not later than September 15 of the current fiscal year, each Medicaid-enrolled hospice with a residence that receives funds under this section shall provide a report to the department on the utilization of the grant funding provided in subsection (1). The report must be provided in a format prescribed by the department and must include the following information: (a) The number of patients served. (b) The number of days served. (c) The daily room and board rates for the patients served. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (d) If there is not sufficient funding to cover the total room and board need, the number of patients who did not receive care due to insufficient grant funding. (3) If funds awarded under this section remain unused at the end of the current fiscal year, the Medicaid-enrolled hospice with a residence shall return those unused funds to this state. Sec. 1859. The department shall partner with the Michigan Association of Health Plans and Medicaid health plans to develop and implement strategies for the use of information technology services for Medicaid research activities. The department shall make available state medical assistance program data, including Medicaid behavioral data, to the Michigan Association of Health Plans and Medicaid health plans or any vendor considered qualified by the department to perform research activities consistent with this state's goals of improving health; increasing the quality, reliability, availability, and continuity of care; and reducing the cost of care for the eligible population of Medicaid recipients. Sec. 1862. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall maintain payment rates for Medicaid obstetrical services at 95% of Medicare levels effective October 1, 2014. Sec. 1870. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for hospital services and therapy, the department shall allocate $6,400,000.00 in general fund/general purpose revenue plus any contributions from public entities, up to $5,000,000.00, and any associated federal match to the MiDocs consortium to create new primary care residency slots in underserved communities. The new primary care residency slots must be in 1 of the following specialties: family medicine, general internal medicine, general pediatrics, general OB-GYN, psychiatry, or general surgery. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (2) The department shall seek any necessary approvals from CMS to allow the department to implement the program described in this section. (3) Assistance with repayment of medical education loans, loan interest payments, or scholarships provided by the MiDocs consortium shall be contingent upon a minimum 2-year commitment to practice in an underserved community in this state post-residency and an agreement to forego any sub-specialty training for at least 2 years post-residency with the exception of a child and adolescent psychiatry followship that must be integrated with a psychiatry residency training program in a MiDocs consortium affiliated institution. (4) The MiDocs consortium shall work with the department to integrate the Michigan inpatient psychiatric admissions discussion (MIPAD) recommendations and, when possible, prioritize training opportunities in state psychiatric hospitals and community mental health organizations. (5) The department shall maintain the MiDocs consortium initiative advisory council to help support implementation of the program described in this section, and to provide oversight. The advisory council must be composed of the MiDocs consortium, the Michigan Area Health Education Centers, the Michigan Primary Care Association, the Michigan Center for Rural Health, the Michigan Academy of Family Physicians, and any other appointees designated by the department. (6) Not later than September 1 of the current fiscal year, the MiDocs consortium shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes all of the following information: (a) Audited financial statement of per-resident costs. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) Education and clinical quality data. (c) Roster of trainees, including areas of specialty and locations of training. (d) Medicaid revenue by training site. (7) The department shall monitor outcome and performance measures for this program, including, but not limited to, the following: (a) Increasing this state's ability to recruit, train, and retain primary care physicians and other select specialty physicians in underserved communities. (b) Maximizing training opportunities with community health centers, rural critical access hospitals, solo or group private practice physician practices, schools, and other community-based clinics, in addition to the required training through rotations at inpatient hospitals. (c) Increasing the number of residency slots for family medicine, general internal medicine, general pediatrics, general OB-GYN, psychiatry, and general surgery. (8) Unexpended and unencumbered funds up to a maximum $6,400,000.00 in rural health transformation program federal grant revenue, $6,400,000.00 in general fund/general purpose revenue plus any contributions from public entities, up to $5,000,000.00, and any associated federal match remaining in accounts appropriated in part 1 for rural health transformation program and hospital services and therapy are designated as work project appropriations, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds must not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and must be available for expenditures for the MiDocs consortium to create new primary care residency slots in underserved communities under this section and section 1803 until 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the work project has been completed. All of the following are in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the work project is to fund the cost of the MiDocs consortium to create new primary care residency slots in underserved communities. (b) The work project will be accomplished by contracting with the MiDocs consortium to oversee the creation of new primary care residency slots. (c) The total estimated completion cost of the work project is $26,600,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date for the work project is September 30, 2031. Sec. 1872. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for personal care services, the department shall maintain the monthly Medicaid personal care supplement paid to adult foster care facilities and homes for the aged that provide personal care services to Medicaid recipients in place during the previous fiscal year. Sec. 1874. The department shall ensure, in counties where PACE services are available, that PACE is included as an option in all options counseling and enrollment brokering for aging services and managed care programs, including, but not limited to, Area Agencies on Aging, centers for independent living, and the MiChoice home and community-based waiver. The department must include approved marketing and discussion materials for options counseling. Sec. 1879. Not later than May 15 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit to the standard report recipients a report with Medicaid pharmaceutical information. The report shall include, for the previous fiscal year, the total Medicaid 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 pharmaceutical costs and the total Medicaid pharmaceutical rebates. The report must categorize the total Medicaid pharmaceutical costs and total Medicaid pharmaceutical rebates recognized by the contracted health plans and the department. In addition, the report must also include all of the following information: (a) The total estimated pharmaceutical benefit expenses incurred by contracted health plans from the previous fiscal year and through the first 2 quarters of the current fiscal year. (b) The total estimated pharmaceutical benefit expenses included in approved initial rates for contracted health plans from the previous fiscal year and total estimated pharmaceutical benefit expenses included in approved initial rates for contracted health plans for the first 2 quarters of the current fiscal year. (c) The total Medicaid pharmaceutical rebates received by the department in the previous fiscal year and the single preferred drug list supplemental rebates invoices in the previous fiscal year. (d) Information as to whether the average benefit expense for the composite average across all rate cells and service categories included in capitation rates, based on actual enrollment and anticipated recoveries, for the previous fiscal year and through the first 2 quarters of the current fiscal year exceeded the reported contracted health plan's experience, adjusted for completion over the same reporting periods. (e) The following information related to the current Medicaid pharmacy carve-out of pharmaceutical products as provided for in section 109h of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.109h: (i) The number of prescriptions paid by the department during the previous fiscal year. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (ii) The total amount of expenditures for prescriptions paid by the department during the previous fiscal year. (iii) The number of and total expenditures for prescriptions paid by the department for generic equivalents during the previous fiscal year. Sec. 1880. (1) The department shall align all pharmacy-related policies with the United States Food and Drug Administration quality and clinical standards. Any single preferred drug list utilization management criteria will be established in consultation with the Medicaid health plans and the Michigan pharmacy and therapeutics committee described in section 9705 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.9705, with consideration given to applicable United States Food and Drug Administration dosing guidelines, subsequent evidence-based literature or studies, and current treatment guidelines. (2) The department shall revise existing pharmacy coverage policies to limit the authorization of anti-obesity GLP-1 receptor agonists exclusively to individuals classified as class III obesity. Coverage is contingent on documented failure of all other clinically appropriate weight-loss interventions and must be considered only as a measure to avert the need for higher-cost bariatric surgery. (3) The department shall utilize generic and biosimilar pharmaceuticals on this state's preferred drug list for both Medicaid managed care and fee-for-service. (4) The department shall not require a managed care organization to adhere to this state's single preferred drug list as a contractual obligation. Sec. 1881. (1) The department, in collaboration with the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Medicaid health plans, shall review statutory, policy, or contractual changes over the last 15 years in service coverage, case management, evaluation and screening requirements, utilization management practices, prior authorization requirements, provider network requirements, and any other practices or requirements that have led to Medicaid cost increases and provide recommendations as to whether they should or should not be revised. Not later than April 1, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes a summary of the findings. (2) The department shall implement the cost savings recommendations identified in subsection (1) to reduce Medicaid expenditures, for both managed care and fee-for-service, through modifications of department policy, administrative efficiencies, revisions of optional services, and any other area identified in collaboration with Medicaid managed care organizations. Sec. 1888. The department shall establish contract performance standards associated with the capitation withhold provisions for Medicaid health plans at least 3 months before the implementation of those standards. The determination of whether performance standards have been met must be based primarily on recognized concepts such as 1-year continuous enrollment and the health care effectiveness data and information set, HEDIS, audited data. Sec. 1889. All quality assurance assessment program revenue collected under section 20161 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.20161, must only be expended on services provided under the Healthy Michigan plan, under 2013 PA 107, or the state Medicaid program, under Title XIX and Title XXI. Sec. 1890. (1) The negative appropriation for Medicaid resource optimization in part 1 must be satisfied through Medicaid 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 savings and reductions identified by the director and approved by the state budget director. Medicaid savings and reductions must include, but are not limited to, both of the following: (a) Savings from changes to optional Medicaid services. (b) Savings from administrative and managed care overhead efficiencies. (2) Adjustments to appropriation authorizations necessary to implement the requirements of subsection (1) must be made only after approval of transfers under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (3) The state budget director is authorized to reduce federal, local, private, and state restricted appropriation amounts in part 1 to reflect savings from those fund sources associated with reductions made to state general fund/general purpose appropriations under subsection (2). INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY Sec. 1901. (1) The department shall submit a report on a semiannual basis to the standard report recipients that lists the projects approved in the previous 6 months and provides the purpose for approving each project including any federal, state, court, or legislative requirement for each project. (2) Once an award for an expansion of information technology is made, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that provides the projected cost of the expansion broken down by use and type of expense. Sec. 1902. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for comprehensive child welfare information system, the department shall submit a report not later than March 1 to the standard report 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 recipients. The report must include, but is not limited to, the following: (a) The total expenditures by fiscal year, from all sources, on the development of the comprehensive child welfare information system. (b) The expenditure plan for the subsequent fiscal year for the development, implementation, and maintenance of the comprehensive child welfare information system. (c) The details on upgrades, remediation of user-reported issues, and other modifications to currently implemented modules of the comprehensive child welfare information system that occurred during the current fiscal year and are planned for the subsequent fiscal year. (d) The current timeline for the full implementation of the comprehensive child welfare information system. (2) The department shall continue to provide the report described in subsection (1) after the implementation of the comprehensive child welfare information system is complete and operational. Sec. 1903. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for Michigan statewide automated child welfare information system, the department shall submit a report by not later than March 1 to the standard report recipients. The report must include, but is not limited to, the following: (a) The current timeline for the phaseout of MiSACWIS and MiSACWIS's replacement by the comprehensive child welfare information system. (b) Expenditures, from all funding sources, for maintenance, upgrades, and remediation of user-reported issues in the previous 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 fiscal year. (c) Any cost savings realized by decommissioning MiSACWIS. Sec. 1906. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for information technology services and projects, the department shall allocate $1,750,000.00 general fund/general purpose revenue, and all associated federal matching revenue, to a public and private nonprofit collaboration that is designated as this state's statewide health information exchange by cooperative agreement, to implement health information technology strategies for health information exchange development, data management, and population health at a statewide level. Sec. 1909. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for child support automation, the department shall only encumber or expend funds for the operation, maintenance, and improvements of the Michigan child support enforcement system. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for bridges information system, the department shall only encumber or expend funds for the operation, maintenance, and improvements of Bridges and MIBridges. (3) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for Michigan Medicaid information system, the department shall only encumber or expend funds for the operation, maintenance, and improvements of the community health automated Medicaid processing system. (4) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for Michigan statewide automated child welfare information system, the department shall only encumber or expend funds for the operation, maintenance, and improvements of MiSACWIS. (5) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for comprehensive child welfare information system, the department shall only 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 encumber or expend funds for the operation, maintenance, and improvements to the comprehensive child welfare information system. (6) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for comprehensive child welfare information system, the department shall continue development of a new information system to replace MiSACWIS consistent with the plan provided by the department to the United States District Court for Eastern District of Michigan as a part of the settlement. The development of the comprehensive child welfare information system must adhere to department of technology, management, and budget and information technology investment fund (ITIF) policies and practices, including use of the state unified information technology environment methodology and agile development. The project team shall also participate in and comply with the enterprise portfolio management office process and product quality assurance. To ensure full transparency, the project must be included in the ITIF portfolio for executive, legislative, and external reporting purposes. As a component of the ITIF portfolio, the project is subject to governance and oversight by the information technology investment management board. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Sec. 1914. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for opioid response activities, the department shall allocate $62,750,000.00 from the Michigan opioid healing and recovery fund created under section 3 of the Michigan trust fund act, 2000 PA 489, MCL 12.253, to programs and services to address the opioid crisis in a manner consistent with the opioid judgment, settlement, or compromise of claims pertaining to violations, or alleged violations, of law related to the manufacture, marketing, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 distribution, dispensing, or sale of opioids. The funds cannot be used to purchase drug paraphernalia. The funds must be allocated as follows: (a) $34,500,000.00 to invest in a series of transitional and permanent supportive recovery housing new developments, acquisitions, and renovations throughout this state. (b) $17,000,000.00 for increasing treatment retention and access to care by expanding medications for opioid use disorder and crisis services throughout this state through physical infrastructure, mobile service expansion, and programming support. (c) $1,000,000.00 for the opioid advisory commission to complete a statewide evidence-based needs assessment as required under section 851 of the legislative council act, 1986 PA 268, MCL 4.1851. (2) Funds appropriated in part 1 for opioid response activities are designated as work project appropriations. Any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and will be available for projects under this section until the work project has been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the work project is to address the opioid crisis in a manner consistent with the opioid judgment, settlement, or compromise of claims pertaining to violations, or alleged violations, of law related to the manufacture, marketing, distribution, dispensing, or sale of opioids. (b) The work project will be accomplished using resources or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated completion cost of the work project is 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 $62,750,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date for the work project is September 30, 2029. ARTICLE 6c DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES - PUBLIC HEALTH part 1 line-item appropriations FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of health and human services for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, from the following funds: DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated classified positions 735.4 ï¿½ï¿½ Full-time employees 626.7 ï¿½ï¿½ Limited-term employees 9.5 ï¿½ï¿½ Noncareer/per diem employees 2.3 ï¿½ï¿½ Part-time employees 0.5 ï¿½ï¿½ Permanent-intermittent employees 3.4 ï¿½ï¿½ Seasonal employees 0.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,136,050,200 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 3,473,400 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,132,576,800 Federal revenues: Capped federal revenues 11,912,900 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Social security act, temporary assistance for needy families 5,131,700 Total other federal revenues 517,410,000 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 50,921,900 Total private revenues 141,839,900 Michigan merit award trust fund 4,068,700 Total other state restricted revenues 79,312,600 State general fund/general purpose $ 321,979,100 Sec. 102. HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES POLICY AND INITIATIVES Full-time equated classified positions 58.6 Certificate of need program administration--FTEs 9.0 $ 2,334,800 Child advocacy centers 1,407,000 Child advocacy centers - supplemental grants 3,000,000 Crime victim grants administration services--FTEs 12.0 2,671,100 Crime victim justice assistance grants 50,117,600 Crime victim rights services grants 19,869,900 Crime victim rights sustaining grants 28,203,900 Departmentwide employee economic adjustments 1,923,200 Domestic violence prevention and treatment--FTEs 15.6 20,107,300 Human trafficking intervention services--FTE 1.0 200,000 Michigan essential health provider 3,145,900 Minority health grants and contracts--FTEs 3.0 1,077,600 Nurse education and research program 378,300 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Policy and planning administration--FTEs 16.0 1,730,200 Primary care services--FTEs 2.0 3,662,000 Rape prevention and services 5,270,100 Rural health services 155,600 Uniform statewide sexual assault evidence kit tracking system 369,500 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 145,624,000 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from department of licensing and regulatory affairs 828,300 IDG from department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential 2,400 IDG from department of treasury, Michigan finance authority 117,700 Federal revenues: Capped federal revenues 11,912,900 Social security act, temporary assistance for needy families 4,629,400 Total other federal revenues 56,350,500 Special revenue funds: Total private revenues 855,000 Child advocacy centers fund 1,407,000 Compulsive gaming prevention fund 1,040,500 Crime victim's rights fund 18,798,200 Sexual assault victims' prevention and treatment fund 3,000,000 Total other state restricted revenues 3,193,500 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 State general fund/general purpose $ 43,488,600 Sec. 103. EPIDEMIOLOGY, EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES, AND LABORATORY Full-time equated classified positions 399.5 Bioterrorism preparedness--FTEs 39.8 $ 23,950,800 Childhood lead program--FTEs 3.0 2,126,200 Emergency medical services program--FTEs 19.3 6,033,500 Epidemiology administration--FTEs 52.5 21,177,400 Healthy homes program--FTEs 65.0 53,602,700 Laboratory services--FTEs 97.3 31,103,700 Newborn screening follow-up and treatment services--FTEs 10.1 6,056,600 PFAS and environmental contamination response--FTEs 42.1 18,479,600 Vital records and health statistics--FTEs 70.4 11,497,600 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 174,028,100 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy 2,525,000 Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues 66,196,500 Special revenue funds: Total private revenues 1,342,600 Total other state restricted revenues 29,736,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 74,227,900 Sec. 104. LOCAL HEALTH AND ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Full-time equated classified positions 156.2 AIDS prevention, testing, and care programs--FTEs 54.7 $ 107,279,100 Cancer prevention and control program--FTEs 18.0 10,667,600 Chronic disease control and health promotion administration--FTEs 25.2 9,431,800 Community health programs--FTEs 5.0 17,500,000 Diabetes and kidney program--FTEs 4.0 2,861,100 Essential local public health services 81,419,300 Implementation of 1993 PA 133, MCL 333.17015 20,000 Local health services--FTEs 4.0 8,195,300 Medicaid outreach cost reimbursement to local health departments 11,086,500 Public health administration--FTEs 9.0 2,213,000 Sexually transmitted disease control program--FTEs 15.3 6,275,200 Smoking prevention program--FTEs 9.1 10,402,900 Violence prevention--FTEs 11.9 8,308,700 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 275,660,500 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Social security act, temporary assistance for needy families 2,300 Total other federal revenues 71,311,300 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 10,150,000 Total private revenues 74,556,600 Total other state restricted revenues 16,066,800 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 State general fund/general purpose $ 103,573,500 Sec. 105. FAMILY HEALTH SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 121.1 Child and adolescent health care and centers $ 39,196,900 Dental programs--FTEs 3.6 7,149,000 Drinking water declaration of emergency 3,971,000 Family, maternal, and child health administration--FTEs 41.1 8,936,700 Family planning local agreements 14,874,000 Immunization program--FTEs 16.0 19,213,400 Local MCH services 7,018,100 Pregnancy prevention program 1,297,900 Prenatal care outreach and service delivery support--FTEs 19.5 48,440,700 Special projects 5,774,200 Sudden and unexpected infant death and suffocation prevention program 321,300 Women, infants, and children program administration and special projects--FTEs 40.9 18,045,400 Women, infants, and children program local agreements and food costs 240,434,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 414,672,800 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Social security act, temporary assistance for needy families 500,000 Total other federal revenues 256,284,900 Special revenue funds: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Total local revenues 40,771,900 Total private revenues 64,785,700 Total other state restricted revenues 3,270,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 49,059,800 Sec. 106. AGING SERVICES Community services $ 59,047,200 Employment assistance 2,979,400 Nutrition services 52,004,200 Respite care program 7,268,700 Senior volunteer service programs 4,765,300 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 126,064,800 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues 67,266,800 Special revenue funds: Total private revenues 300,000 Michigan merit award trust fund 4,068,700 Total other state restricted revenues 2,800,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 51,629,300 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations for fiscal year 2026-2027 general sections Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the current fiscal year, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is $405,360,400.00 and state spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $159,754,900.00. The following 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 itemized statement identifies appropriations from which spending to local units of government will occur: DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES POLICY AND INITIATIVES Crime victim rights services grants $ 4,454,800 Crime victim rights sustaining grants 7,343,700 Domestic violence prevention and treatment 72,200 Primary care services 10,300 EPIDEMIOLOGY, EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES, AND LABORATORY Emergency medical services program 6,700 Epidemiology administration 521,000 Healthy homes program 958,200 Laboratory services 94,600 PFAS and environmental contamination response 700 LOCAL HEALTH AND ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES AIDS prevention, testing, and care programs 3,663,100 Cancer prevention and control program 30,000 Community health programs 687,700 Essential local public health services 69,050,700 Local health services 1,356,800 Public health administration 200 Sexually transmitted disease control program 720,400 Smoking prevention program 450,000 FAMILY HEALTH SERVICES Dental programs 2,346,000 Family planning local agreements 4,165,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Immunization program 1,389,700 Pregnancy prevention program 65,000 Prenatal care outreach and service delivery support 7,464,100 AGING SERVICES Community services 33,510,000 Nutrition services 14,513,000 Respite care program 5,664,000 Senior volunteer service programs 1,217,000 TOTAL OF PAYMENTS TO LOCAL UNITS OF GOVERNMENT $ 159,754,900 Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1: (a) "AIDS" means acquired immunodeficiency syndrome. (b) "CCBHC" means certified community behavioral health clinic. (c) "CMHSP" means a community mental health services program as that term is defined in section 100a of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1100a. (d) "CMS" means the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. (e) "CPT" means current procedural terminology. (f) "Current fiscal year" means the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027. (g) "Department" means the department of health and human services. (h) "Director" means the director of the department. (i) "EPSDT" means early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 treatment. (j) "Federal poverty level" means the poverty guidelines revised periodically and published in the Federal Register by the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services under the Secretary's authority to revise the poverty line under 42 USC 9902. (k) "FQHC" means federally qualified health center. (l) "FTE" means full-time equated. (m) "GME" means graduate medical education. (n) "Health plan" means, at a minimum, an organization that meets the criteria for delivering the comprehensive package of services under the department's comprehensive health plan. (o) "HEDIS" means health care effectiveness data and information set. (p) "HMO" means health maintenance organization. (q) "IDEA" means the individuals with disabilities education act, 20 USC 1400 to 1482. (r) "IDG" means interdepartmental grant. (s) "MCH" means maternal and child health. (t) "Medicaid" means benefits under the medical assistance program established under title XIX of the social security act, 42 USC 1396 to 1396w-8, and administered by the department under the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.1 to 400.119b. (u) "Medicare" means benefits under the federal Medicare program established under title XVIII of the social security act, 42 USC 1395 to 1395mmm. (v) "MiCAFE" means Michigan's coordinated access to food for the elderly. (w) "MIChild" means the program described in section 1670 of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 this part. (x) "MiSACWIS" means Michigan statewide automated child welfare information system. (y) "PACE" means program of all-inclusive care for the elderly. (z) "PAS/ARR-OBRA" means the preadmission screening and annual resident review required under the omnibus budget reconciliation act of 1987, section 1919(e)(7) of the social security act, 42 USC 1396r. (aa) "PATH" means Partnership. Accountability. Training. Hope. (bb) "PFAS" means perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances. (cc) "PIHP" means an entity designated by the department as a regional entity or a specialty prepaid inpatient health plan for Medicaid mental health services, services to individuals with developmental disabilities, and substance use disorder services. Regional entities are described in section 204b of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1204b. Specialty prepaid inpatient health plans are described in section 109f of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.109f. (dd) "Previous fiscal year" means the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026. (ee) "Quarterly basis" means February 1, April 1, July 1, and September 30 of the current fiscal year. (ff) "Semiannual basis" means March 1 and September 30 of the current fiscal year. (gg) "Settlement" means the settlement agreement entered in the case of Dwayne B. v Snyder, Docket No. 2:06-cv-13548 in the United States District Court for the Eastern District of Michigan. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (hh) "SSI" means supplemental security income. (ii) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house appropriations committees, the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on the department budget, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office. (jj) "Temporary assistance for needy families" or "TANF" or "title IV-A" means part A of title IV of the social security act, 42 USC 601 to 619. (kk) "Title IV-B" means part B of title IV of the social security act, 42 USC 621 to 629m. (ll) "Title IV-D" means part D of title IV of the social security act, 42 USC 651 to 669b. (mm) "Title IV-E" means part E of title IV of the social security act, 42 USC 670 to 679c. (nn) "Title X" means subchapter VIII of the public health service act, 42 USC 300 to 300a-8, which establishes grants to states for family planning services. Sec. 204. If the state administrative board, acting under section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount appropriated under part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and serving in each house, intertransfer funds within part 1 for the particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution. Sec. 205. (1) The department shall use the internet to fulfill the reporting requirements of this part and shall make each report readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each required report in a single archivable location on the department's website not later than the due date required for each report. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (2) In addition to placing all reports required in the current fiscal year on the department's website, the department shall maintain on its website all reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years posted by fiscal year in the same single archivable location. (3) The department shall transmit all required reports for the current fiscal year to the standard report recipients and any other required recipients by email. The email shall include a copy of the report and a link to access the report online. Sec. 206. The department shall receive and retain copies of all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department shall follow federal and state law and guidelines for short-term and long-term retention of records. The department shall electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required by federal and state guidelines. Sec. 207. (1) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to maintain a searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following for the department: (a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category. (b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit. (c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor, including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and payment description. (2) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to update the searchable website on a quarterly basis. Sec. 208. Not later than December 15, the state budget office 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 shall prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses by major departmental program or program areas. Sec. 209. Not later than 14 days after the release of the executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate with the state budget office to provide an annual report on estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the previous 2 fiscal years. Sec. 210. Not later than November 15, the department shall report on private and other third-party funds received by the department in the previous fiscal year. The report must include the amount of funding received, the specific source of funding received, the purpose for which funding was expended, and the amount of any remaining funds. Sec. 211. Consistent with section 217 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, the department shall prepare a report on out-of-state travel expenses by not later than January 1. The report must list all travel outside this state by classified and unclassified employees in the previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or in part with funds appropriated in the department's budget. The report must include all of the following information: (a) The dates of each travel occurrence. (b) The total transportation and related costs of each travel occurrence and the proportions funded with state general fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 revenues, local revenues, and private revenues, including specific sources of state restricted, federal, local, and private revenues. (c) The destination of each travel occurrence. (d) The specific purpose and description of each travel occurrence, including the specific name of the event or meeting. Sec. 212. On a quarterly basis, the department shall report on all of the following: (a) The number of full-time equated positions in pay status by civil service classification. (b) A comparison by line item of the number of full-time equated positions authorized from funds appropriated in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated positions employed by the department at the end of the reporting period. (c) The number of active employees in each of the following statuses: (i) Full-time salary. (ii) Full-time hourly. (iii) Part-time. (iv) Permanent-intermittent. (v) Limited-term. (vi) Seasonal. (vii) Worker's compensation. (viii) Noncareer/per diem. (ix) Job share. (x) Special personal services/contractual. (d) The number of overtime hours worked by employees, by classifications. Sec. 213. Not later than April 1, the department shall report on each specific policy change made to implement a public act 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 affecting the department that took effect during the previous calendar year. The report must include reference to the public act that necessitates the policy change. The department shall submit the report to the standard report recipients, to the senate and house standing committees responsible for addressing issues affected by the public acts, and to the joint committee on administrative rules. Sec. 214. (1) Not later than April 1, the department shall maintain, on a publicly accessible website, a department scorecard that identifies, tracks, and updates on a quarterly basis key metrics that are used to monitor and improve the department's performance. (2) The department shall notify the standard report recipients when the quarterly updates to the department scorecard are available on a publicly accessible website. Sec. 215. (1) Unless specifically authorized elsewhere in this part or part 1, funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to pay for a state obligation that exceeds $200,000.00 for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim without prior legislative approval. (2) If a state obligation for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim results in a change from current statute, the department shall notify the legislature. (3) This section does not apply to compensation and other relief to individuals wrongfully imprisoned as required under the wrongful imprisonment compensation act, 2016 PA 343, MCL 691.1751 to 691.1757. Sec. 216. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $20,000,000.00 for 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Federal contingency authorization must not be made available to increase TANF authorization. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $20,000,000.00 for state restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $5,000,000.00 for local contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $2,000,000.00 for private contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 217. Total authorized appropriations from all sources under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 are estimated at $174,401,600.00. From this amount, total appropriations for pension-related legacy costs for the department are estimated at $174,401,600.00. Total appropriations for retiree 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 health care legacy costs for the department are estimated at $0.00. Sec. 218. To the extent possible, the department shall not expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted. Sec. 219. The department shall submit reports that summarize all work project accounts not later than December 31, March 30, June 30, and September 30. The reports must include all of the following: (a) A list of all work project accounts. (b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each account. (c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously designated work project accounts, the name and description of the work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed amounts. Sec. 220. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1: (a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are available. (b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. (c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 comparable quality. Sec. 221. The department shall not take disciplinary action against an employee of the department because the employee communicates with a member of the legislature or legislative staff unless the communication is prohibited by law and the department is exercising its authority as provided by law. Sec. 222. (1) The department shall maximize the efficiency of the state workforce and utilization and occupancy of office space, leased or owned, for each division within the department. Employees with job responsibilities that require employees to serve in their capacities outside of an office shall be monitored each pay period to ensure all work hours reported on timesheets are actually worked. (2) The department shall comply with requirements set forth by the office of the state employer on in-person work and utilization and occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure at least 80% of employees are in person and building occupancy and utilization rates are at least 80% or higher. (3) The department shall submit reports not later than January 15 and April 15 on all of the following: (a) Remote work policy by division. (b) Building occupancy by address. (c) Whether the building is state-owned or leased. (d) Aggregate badge scanning information by employee. (4) As used in this section, "occupancy" means the actual number of employees physically present in a workplace. Sec. 223. (1) The department shall require as a condition of each contract or subcontract that the prequalified contractor or prequalified subcontractor agree to use the E-Verify system to 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 verify that all persons hired during the contract term by the contractor or subcontractor are legally present and authorized to work in the United States. (2) The department may verify this information directly or may require contractors and subcontractors to verify the information and submit a certification to the department. The department shall submit a report not later than March 1 that describes the processes it has developed and implemented under this section. (3) The department shall not contract with any foreign entities that are known or suspected to be enemies of the United States or known foreign adversaries. Foreign adversaries include all of the following: (a) The People's Republic of China. (b) The Russian Federation. (c) The Islamic Republic of Iran. (d) The Democratic People's Republic of Korea. (e) The Republic of Cuba. (f) The Venezuelan regime of Nicolï¿½s Maduro. (g) The Syrian Arab Republic. (h) An agency or other entity under significant control of a country described in subdivisions (a) to (g). (4) As used in this section, "E-Verify" means an internet-based system operated by the Department of Homeland Security, United States Citizenship and Immigration Services in partnership with the Social Security Administration. Sec. 224. (1) Within 30 days of enactment of this act, the state budget office shall post a list of legislatively directed spending items funded in part 1 as defined in sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 18.1364a. The list must include all information and documents pertaining to the funded items as publicly disclosed in accordance with sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. (2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency administering the grant shall submit a report not later than November 1. The department or agency shall update the report and shall submit updated reports not later than March 15 and September 15 of the current fiscal year. The department or agency shall include in the report the most comprehensive information the department or agency has available at the time of posting for grants awarded, including, but not limited to, project milestones, percent completed, funding expended, and funding encumbered. (3) Before executing a grant agreement, all grant recipients must provide a spending plan that specifies the scope of service, the program goals, the measurement for meeting program goals, and how all grant funds will be used, and must indicate if any grant funds will be provided to a third party or subrecipient. (4) Each department or agency responsible for awarding or disbursing grant funds must annually audit the entity's use of the grant funds for each fiscal year in which the grant is active. Each entity must submit information requested by the department or agency to confirm compliance. (5) Each department or agency shall work with the office of the auditor general to conduct an audit of the grant according to generally accepted accounting practices and audit standards. The office of the auditor general must be given access to all internal and external records. All contracts or agreements between a 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department or agency and a grant recipient or between a grant recipient and a third party must include a clause granting the office of the auditor general access to all internal and external records. (6) Grant recipients and their immediate family members are prohibited from being employed by the executive branch or legislative branch of this state. In addition, grant recipients are prohibited from serving on any state board that has direct or indirect responsibility for approving or auditing grant funds awarded or disbursed by any department or agency. (7) Full and complete audits of grant funds issued by the department or an agency of this state, without redaction unless required by law, must be posted to the department's or agency's website in a conspicuous place for public review. (8) On a quarterly basis, the department or agency shall submit a report on legislatively sponsored grant funds that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) The name of each grant recipient and the status of each grant. (b) The amount distributed to each grant recipient. (c) Any changes to scope or costs of program. (9) The report under subsection (8) must include the following statements made by the department or agency: (a) A statement that confirms the department or agency reviewed and affirmed compliance by each grant recipient with program scope and expenditure of grant funding. (b) A statement that confirms the department or agency reviewed applicable program reports and requests for reimbursement. Sec. 225. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department shall do the following: (a) Report on any amounts of severance pay for a department director, deputy director, or other high-ranking department official not later than 14 days after a severance agreement with the director, deputy director, or official is signed. The name of the director, deputy director, or official and the amount of severance pay must be included in the report required by this subdivision. (b) Not later than February 1, report on the total amount of severance pay remitted to former department employees during the previous fiscal year and the total number of former department employees that were remitted severance pay during the previous fiscal year. (2) As used in this section, "severance pay" means compensation to which both of the following apply: (a) The compensation is payable or paid upon the termination of employment. (b) The compensation is paid in addition to wages or benefits earned during the course of employment or generally applicable retirement benefits. Sec. 226. Funds appropriated in part 1 from state or federal sources are prohibited from being used to provide services, grants, or programming to an individual who is not a citizen of the United States unless the individual is a qualified alien as that term is defined in 8 USC 1641. This section does not prohibit the department, political subdivision, state university, or other state agency from expending funds for the purpose of detaining individuals who are not citizens of the United States, including any costs associated with housing such individuals in county jails 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 or state correctional facilities. Sec. 227. State funds must not be used for diversity, equity, and inclusion, or diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives or programs, as outlined in federal Executive Order No. 14151, 90 Fed. Reg. 8339 (January 29, 2025) "Ending Radical and Wasteful Government DEI Programs and Preferencing", federal Executive Order No. 14168, 90 Fed. Reg. 8615 (January 30, 2025) "Defending Women from Gender Ideology Extremism and Restoring Biological Truth to the Federal Government", or federal Executive Order No. 14173, 90 Fed. Reg. 8633 (January 31, 2025) "Ending Illegal Discrimination and Restoring Merit-Based Opportunity". Sec. 228. The department shall use the same precontract risk assessment program utilized by the department of technology, management, and budget to evaluate financial compliance, security risks, and insurance requirements prior to contract execution. Sec. 250. If either of the following events occurs, not later than 30 days after the event occurs, the department shall notify the standard report recipients of that fact: (a) A legislative objective of this part or of a bill or amendment to a bill to amend the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.1 to 400.119b, cannot be implemented because implementation would conflict with or violate federal law. (b) A federal grant for which a notice of an award has been received cannot be used or will not be used. Sec. 251. (1) In addition to funds appropriated in part 1 for all programs and services, there is appropriated, for write-offs of accounts receivable, deferrals, and for prior year obligations in excess of applicable prior year appropriations, an amount equal to total write-offs and prior year obligations, but not to exceed 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 amounts available in prior year revenues. (2) The department's ability to satisfy appropriation fund sources in part 1 is not limited to collections and accruals pertaining to services provided in the current fiscal year and includes reimbursements, refunds, adjustments, and settlements from prior years. Sec. 252. Not later than February 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on the detailed names and amounts of estimated federal, restricted, private, and local sources of revenue that support the appropriations in each of the line items in part 1 for the previous fiscal year. The report must itemize, rather than aggregate, specific revenue sources deposited into the generic statewide integrated governmental management application (SIGMA) fund numbers 1200, 1274, 4000, and 5000. Sec. 253. As required under part 23 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.2301 to 333.2321, the appropriations in part 1 must include the following: (a) Immunizations. (b) Communicable disease control. (c) Sexually transmitted infection control. (d) Tuberculosis control. (e) Prevention of gonorrhea eye infection in newborns. (f) Screening newborn infants for the conditions listed in section 5431 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.5431, or recommended by the newborn screening quality assurance advisory committee created under section 5430 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.5430. (g) Health and human services annex of the Michigan Emergency 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Management Plan. (h) Prenatal care. (i) Mental health. Sec. 254. (1) The department may contract with the Michigan Public Health Institute for the design and implementation of projects and for other public health-related activities prescribed in section 2611 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.2611. The department may develop a master agreement with the Michigan Public Health Institute to carry out the activities described in this subsection for up to a 1-year period. (2) On a semiannual basis, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report that includes all of the following: (a) A detailed description of each funded project. (b) The amount allocated for each project, the appropriation line item from which the allocation is funded, and the source of financing for each project. (c) The expected project duration. (d) A detailed spending plan for each project, including a list of all subgrantees and the amount allocated to each subgrantee. (3) On a semiannual basis, the department shall provide, to the standard report recipients, a copy of all reports, studies, and publications produced by the Michigan Public Health Institute, its subcontractors, or the department with the funds appropriated in the department's budget in the previous fiscal year and allocated to the Michigan Public Health Institute. Sec. 255. The department shall ensure that faith-based organizations are able to apply and compete for services, programs, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 or contracts that the organizations are qualified and suitable to fulfill. The department shall not disqualify faith-based organizations solely on the basis of the religious nature of the organizations or the guiding principles or statements of faith for the organizations. Sec. 256. In accordance with section 1b of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.1b, the department shall treat part 1 and this part as a time-limited addendum to the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.1 to 400.119b. Sec. 257. (1) Not later than 30 days before the implementation date of a major policy change, the department shall report the change to the standard report recipients. (2) The department shall make the department's entire policy and procedures manual available and accessible to the public on the department's website. (3) The department shall attach each policy bulletin issued during the previous calendar year to the report under section 213. Sec. 258. The department may establish and collect fees for publications, videos and related materials, conferences, and workshops. Collected fees are appropriated when received and must be used to offset expenditures for publication printing and mailing, costs of the publications, videos and related materials, conferences, and workshops. The department shall not collect fees under this section that exceed the cost of the expenditures. If collected fees are appropriated under this section in an amount that exceeds the current fiscal year appropriation, not later than 30 days after the collected fee appropriation, the department shall notify the standard report recipients of that fact. Sec. 259. The department may retain all of this state's share 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 of food assistance overissuance collections as an offset to general fund/general purpose costs. Retained collections must be applied against federal funds deductions in all appropriation units where department costs related to the investigation and recoupment of food assistance overissuances are incurred. Retained collections in excess of the investigation and recoupment costs must be applied against the federal funds deducted in the departmental administration and support appropriation unit. Sec. 260. If the revenue collected by the department from fees and collections exceeds the amount appropriated in part 1, the revenue may be carried forward with the approval of the state budget director into the subsequent fiscal year. The revenue carried forward under this section must be used as the first source of funds in the subsequent fiscal year. Sec. 261. If the department receives tobacco tax funds and Healthy Michigan fund revenue from part 1, not later than April 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on both of the following activities during the previous fiscal year: (a) Tobacco tax revenue appropriations in the Medicaid program. (b) Information for each project implemented with revenue under this section, including all of the following: (i) The project's name. (ii) The appropriation line item and amount. (iii) The project's target population. (iv) A description of the project. (v) The outcomes or accomplishments of the project. Sec. 262. If the department is authorized under federal law or 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the law of this state to collect an overpayment owed to the department, beginning 60 days after the initial notification date of the overpayment amount, the department may assess a penalty of 1% per month. If an overpayment is caused by department error, a penalty may be assessed 6 months after the initial notification date of the overpayment amount. The department shall not collect penalty interest in an amount that exceeds the amount of the original overpayment. This state's share of any funds collected under this section must be deposited in the general fund of this state. Sec. 263. (1) On a quarterly basis, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on the status of the implementation of any noninflationary, noncaseload, programmatic funding increases in the current fiscal year from the previous fiscal year. The report must confirm the implementation of already-implemented funding increases and provide an explanation for any planned implementation of funding increases that have not yet occurred. For any planned implementation of funding increases that have not yet occurred, the report must include an expected implementation date and the reason for delayed implementation. (2) For any programmatic funding increases not reported as implemented or in the process of being implemented in the first 2 reports under subsection (1), the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a status update in the last 2 reports required under subsection (1). Sec. 265. The department shall provide the approved spending plan for each line item receiving an appropriation in the current fiscal year to the senate and house of representatives appropriations subcommittees on the department budget and the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 senate and house fiscal agencies not later than 60 days after approval by the department or not later than January 15 of the current fiscal year, whichever is earlier. In all places that a line-item appropriation number is listed, a line-item appropriation name must be included. The spending plan must include the following information regarding planned expenditures for each category: allocation in the previous period, change in the allocation, and new allocation. The spending plan must include the following information regarding each revenue source for the line item: category of the fund source indicated by general fund/general purpose, state restricted, local, private, or federal. Figures included in the approved spending plan must not be assumed to constitute the actual final expenditures, as line items may be updated on an as-needed basis to reflect changes in projected expenditures and projected revenue. The department shall supplement the spending plan information by providing a list of all active contracts and grants in the department's contract system. For amounts listed in the other contracts category of each spending plan, the department shall include the name of the line item and the name of the fund source for each contract, grant, and amount for the current fiscal year. For amounts listed in the all other costs category of each spending plan, the department shall provide a list detailing planned expenditures and amounts for the current fiscal year and include the name of the line item and the name of the fund source related to each expenditure and amount. Sec. 267. Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on total actual expenditures in the previous fiscal year for advertising and media outreach, including the purpose, amount, and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 fund source by program or appropriation line item. Sec. 268. Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit a description of programs report to the standard report recipients. For each program, the report must include the appropriation unit; the line item name and number; the appropriation history; the program name; the program overview; a financing summary; and, where applicable, the program's legal basis, effectiveness, and outcomes. Sec. 269. On a quarterly basis, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on any line-item appropriation for which the department estimates total annual expenditures would exceed the funds appropriated for the line-item appropriation by 5% or more. The department shall provide a detailed explanation for any relevant line-item appropriation exceedance, identify the corrective actions undertaken to mitigate line-item appropriation expenditures from exceeding the funds appropriated for the line-item appropriation by a greater amount, and identify other corrective actions if no legislative transfer or supplemental is approved. This section does not apply for line-item appropriations that are part of the May revenue estimating conference caseload and expenditure estimates. Sec. 270. (1) The department shall ensure that each federally recognized tribe is able to apply and compete for services, programs, grants, and contracts. (2) For competitive grant programs described in this part, each federally recognized tribe is eligible to apply for grant funds made available to organizations exempt from federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501, and to local units of government. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 271. (1) Except as provided in this subsection, before submission of a waiver, state plan amendment, or similar proposal to CMS or another federal agency, the department shall notify the standard report recipients of the planned submission. This subsection does not apply to the submission of a waiver, state plan amendment, or similar proposal that does not propose a material change or is outside of the ordinary course of a waiver, state plan amendment, or similar proposal. (2) On a semiannual basis, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report that summarizes the status of any new or ongoing discussions with CMS, the United States Department of Health and Human Services, or another federal agency regarding any potential or future waiver applications and the status of any submitted waivers that have not yet received federal approval. If there is not a reportable item at the time that a semiannual report is due, a report is not required. Sec. 272. The department shall advise the legislature of the receipt of a notification from the attorney general's office of a legal action in which expenses had been recovered under section 10b of the medicaid false claims act, 1977 PA 72, MCL 400.610b. If applicable, not later than February 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) The total amount recovered from the legal action. (b) The program or service for which the money was originally expended. (c) Details on the disposition of the funds recovered, such as the appropriation or revenue account in which the money was deposited. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (d) A description of the facts involved in the legal action. Sec. 273. On the day that is 1 week after the day that the governor submits the executive budget proposal for the ensuing fiscal year to the legislature, the department, in collaboration with the state budget office, shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on spending and revenue projections for each of the capped federal funds listed in this subsection. The report must contain actual spending and revenue in the previous fiscal year, spending and revenue projections for the current fiscal year as enacted, and spending and revenue projections in the executive budget proposal for the immediately ensuing fiscal year for each individual line item for the department budget. The report must also include federal funds transferred to other departments. The capped federal funds include, but are not limited to, all of the following: (a) TANF. (b) Title XX social services block grant. (c) Title IV-B subpart I child welfare services block grant. (d) Title IV-B subpart II promoting safe and stable families funds. (e) Low-income home energy assistance program. Sec. 274. (1) On a quarterly basis, the department, with the approval of the state budget director, is authorized to realign sources between other federal, TANF, and capped federal financing authorizations to maximize federal revenues. The realignment of financing must not produce any of the following: (a) A gross increase or decrease in the department's total individual line item authorizations. (b) A net increase or decrease in total federal revenues. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (c) A net increase in TANF authorization. (2) On a quarterly basis, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on the realignment of federal fund sources transacted to date in the current fiscal year under subsection (1), including the dates, line items, and amounts of the transactions. If, at the time a quarterly report is due, a transaction was not made under subsection (1), a report is not required. (3) Not later than 30 days after the date on which year-end book closing is completed, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on the realignment of federal fund sources that took place as part of the year-end closing process for the previous fiscal year. Sec. 275. Any public advertisement for public assistance must inform the public of the welfare fraud hotline operated by the department. Sec. 276. Not later than April 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a report on funds appropriated for the healthy moms, healthy babies initiative. The report must include the budgeted amount, year-to-date expenditures, remaining balance of appropriations, and the percent of budget spent for each appropriation related to the initiative. The report must also include information on how the funds have assisted with meeting the goals and outcomes of the initiative. Sec. 277. (1) The department may accept monetary and nonmonetary gifts, bequests, donations, contributions, or grants from any private source to support, in whole or in part, a departmental function or program. The department shall expend or 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 use the gifts, bequests, donations, contributions, or grants for the purposes designated by the private source, if the purpose is specified and part 1 has sufficient authorization. (2) In the demonstration projects line item, money remaining in the fund under this section at the end of the fiscal year does not lapse to the general fund but must be carried forward to the subsequent fiscal year. HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES POLICY AND INITIATIVES Sec. 1140. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for primary care services, $400,000.00 is allocated to free health clinics operating in this state. The department shall distribute the funds equally to each free health clinic. As used in this section, "free health clinic" means a nonprofit organization that uses a volunteer health professional to provide care to an uninsured individual. Sec. 1143. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for primary care services, the department shall allocate no less than $675,000.00 for island primary health care access and services including island clinics, in the following amounts: (a) Beaver Island, $250,000.00. (b) Mackinac Island, $250,000.00. (c) Drummond Island, $150,000.00. (d) Bois Blanc Island, $25,000.00. Sec. 1145. The department shall take steps necessary to work with the Indian Health Service, tribal health program facilities, or Urban Indian Health Program facilities, that provide services under a contract with a Medicaid managed care entity to ensure that the facilities described in this section receive the maximum amount allowable under federal law for Medicaid services. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 1146. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for domestic violence prevention and treatment, the department shall allocate $1,000,000.00 to support programs that serve survivors of domestic violence, sexual violence, and human trafficking. The funds appropriated in this section must be allocated in the following manner: (a) $500,000.00 must be used by the department to provide technical assistance, training, and support to a victim service organization and must be allocated to the victim service organization that received funds under section 1146(a) of article 6 of 2025 PA 22 for the purpose described in that section. To be eligible for funding under this subsection, the victim service organization must meet all of the following requirements: (i) Be a nonprofit organization organized under the laws of this state that is exempt from federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501. (ii) Be a statewide tribal domestic violence and sexual assault coalition serving the tribes located in this state. (iii) Be recognized as the tribal coalition in this state by the Office on Violence Against Women within the United States Department of Justice. (b) $500,000.00 must be allocated to the entity that received funds under section 1146(b) of article 6 of 2025 PA 22 for the purpose described in that section. (2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit to the standard report recipients a report on the distribution of funds, a description of the services provided, and the number of people served. Sec. 1153. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for crime 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 victim rights sustaining grants, the department shall allocate $102,600.00 of state general fund/general purpose revenue for a sexual assault nurse examiners program at the same hospital that received funds under section 1153 of article 6 of 2025 PA 22 for the purpose described in that section. The funds allocated under this section must be used to support staff compensation and training, victim needs, and community awareness, education, and prevention programs. Sec. 1155. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for the uniform statewide sexual assault evidence kit tracking system, in accordance with the final report of the Michigan sexual assault evidence kit tracking and reporting commission, the department shall allocate $369,500.00 for administering a uniform statewide sexual assault evidence kit tracking system. The system must include all of the following: (a) A uniform statewide system to track the submission and status of sexual assault evidence kits. (b) A uniform statewide system to audit untested kits that were collected on or before March 1, 2015 and were released by victims to law enforcement. (c) Secure electronic access for victims. (d) The ability to accommodate concurrent data entry with kit collection through mechanisms that include, but are not limited to, web entry through computers or smartphones, and through scanning devices. (2) The sexual assault evidence tracking fund established in section 1451 of article X of 2017 PA 158 shall continue to be maintained in the department of treasury. Money in the sexual assault evidence tracking fund at the close of a fiscal year 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 remains in the sexual assault evidence tracking fund, does not revert to the general fund, and is appropriated as provided by law for the development and implementation of a uniform statewide sexual assault evidence kit tracking system as described in subsection (1). Sec. 1157. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for child advocacy centers - supplemental grants, the department shall allocate $3,000,000.00 to provide additional funding to child advocacy centers to support the general operations of child advocacy centers. The department shall allocate the additional funding to each center according to the formula under this section. The department shall set a formula in consultation with children's advocacy centers of Michigan (CAC-MI) to allocate the additional funding. The formula must include base funding for each program and factors, such as the number of children in the service area, square miles of the service area, and prior service levels. The purpose of the additional funding is to increase the amount of services provided to children and their families who are victims of abuse over the amount provided in the previous fiscal year. (2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit to the standard report recipients a report on the distribution of child advocacy center ï¿½ supplemental grants funding from the previous fiscal year. The report must include the amount allocated to each specific child advocacy center or other community-based child protection entity, including, but not limited to, child abuse councils. Sec. 1158. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for crime victim rights sustaining grants, the department shall allocate $28,101,300.00 to supplement the loss of federal victims of crime 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 act and state crime victim rights funding. The department must distribute the funds consistent with the regular allocation formula for crime victim justice grants and crime victim rights services grants. Sec. 1160. Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit to the standard report recipients a report on the distribution of crime victim rights justice assistance grants, crime victim rights services grants, and crime victim rights sustaining grants from the previous fiscal year. The report must include the number of people served listed by agency, the amount allocated to nonprofit agencies for crime victim services listed by agency, and the amount of funding that each agency has used for administrative purposes. EPIDEMIOLOGY, EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES, AND LABORATORY Sec. 1180. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for epidemiology administration and for childhood lead program, the department shall maintain a public health drinking water program and maintain enhanced efforts to monitor child blood lead levels. The public health drinking water program must ensure that appropriate investigations of potential health hazards occur for all community and noncommunity drinking water supplies where chemical exceedances of action levels, health advisory levels, or maximum contaminant limits are identified. The goals of the childhood lead program must include improving the identification of children affected by lead exposure, improving the timeliness of case follow-up, and attaining nurse care management for children with lead exposure, and to achieve a long-term reduction in the percentage of children in this state with elevated blood lead 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 levels. Sec. 1181. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for epidemiology administration, the department shall maintain a vapor intrusion response program. The vapor intrusion response program shall assess risks to public health at vapor intrusion sites and respond to vapor intrusion risks if appropriate. The goals of the vapor intrusion response program must include reducing the number of individuals who are exposed to toxic substances through vapor intrusion and improving health outcomes for individuals who are identified as having been exposed to vapor intrusion. Sec. 1182. Not later than April 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on the expenditures and activities undertaken by the lead abatement program during the previous fiscal year using the funds previously appropriated for the healthy homes program. The report must include, but is not limited to, a funding allocation schedule, the expenditures by category of expenditure and by subcontractor, a description of program elements, the number of housing units abated of lead-based paint hazards by zip code, and a description of program accomplishments and progress. LOCAL HEALTH AND ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES Sec. 1220. The amount appropriated in part 1 for implementation of the 1993 additions of or amendments to sections 9161, 16221, 16226, 17015, and 17515 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.9161, 333.16221, 333.16226, 333.17015, and 333.17515, must be used to reimburse local health departments for costs incurred to implement section 17015(18) of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.17015. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 1221. If a county that participates in a district health department or has an associated arrangement with another local health department takes action to stop participating in that arrangement after October 1 of the current fiscal year, the department may assess a penalty from the local health department's operational accounts in an amount equal to no more than 6.25% of the local health department's essential local public health services funding. The department shall assess a penalty only if a county requests the dissolution of the health department. Sec. 1222. (1) The department shall prospectively allocate funds appropriated in part 1 for essential local public health services to local health departments to support immunizations, infectious disease control, sexually transmitted disease control and prevention, hearing screening, vision services, food protection, public water supply, private groundwater supply, and on-site sewage management. The department shall consult with the department of agriculture and rural development before allocating funds for food protection under this section. The department shall consult with the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy before allocating funds for public water supply, private groundwater supply, and on-site sewage management under this section. (2) The department shall not distribute funds under subsection (1) to a county unless the county maintains local spending in the current fiscal year in an amount that is equal to or exceeds the amount the county expended in fiscal year 1992-1993 for the services described in subsection (1). (3) Not later than February 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 on the planned allocation of the funds appropriated for essential local public health services. (4) The department shall continue to implement the distribution formula for allocating essential local public health services funding to local health departments as specified in section 1234 of article X of 2018 PA 207. (5) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for essential local public health services, each local public health department is allocated not less than the amount allocated to that local public health department during the previous fiscal year. Sec. 1227. The department shall establish criteria for all funds allocated for health and wellness initiatives. The criteria must include a requirement that a program receiving funding is evidence-based and supported by research, includes interventions that have been shown to demonstrate outcomes that lower cost and improve quality, and is designed for statewide impact. The department shall give preference to a program that uses the funding as match for additional resources, including, but not limited to, federal sources. Sec. 1231. (1) From the funds appropriated for local health services, up to $4,750,000.00 is allocated for grants to local health departments to support PFAS response and emerging public health threat activities. The department shall allocate a portion of the funding in a collaborative fashion with local health departments in jurisdictions experiencing PFAS contamination. The department shall allocate the remainder of the funding to address infectious and vector-borne disease threats, and other environmental contamination issues, including, but not limited to, vapor intrusion, drinking water contamination, and lead exposure. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 The department shall allocate the funding to address issues including, but not limited to, staffing, planning and response, and creating and disseminating materials related to PFAS contamination issues and other emerging public health issues and threats. (2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on actual expenditures in the previous fiscal year and planned spending in the current fiscal year of the funds described in subsection (1). The report must include recipient entities, the amount of allocation, the general category of allocation, and detailed uses. Sec. 1232. The department may work to ensure that the United States Department of Defense reimburses the state for costs associated with PFAS and environmental contamination response at military training sites and support facilities. Sec. 1233. The department shall not expend general fund and state restricted fund appropriations in part 1 for PFAS and environmental contamination response if federal funding or private grant funding is available for the same expenditures. Sec. 1239. The department shall participate in and give necessary assistance to the Michigan PFAS action response team (MPART) pursuant to Executive Order No. 2019-03. The department shall collaborate with MPART and other departments to carry out appropriate activities, actions, and recommendations as coordinated by MPART. Efforts must be continuous to ensure that the department's activities are not duplicative with activities of another department or agency. Sec. 1240. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for chronic disease control and health promotion administration, $70,000.00 is 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 allocated to support a rare disease advisory council and the responsibilities of the rare disease advisory council, which may include all of the following: (a) Developing a list of rare diseases. (b) Posting the list of rare diseases on the department's website. (c) Updating the list of rare diseases. (d) Annually investigating and reporting to the legislature on 1 rare disease on the list, and including legislative recommendations in the report. Sec. 1241. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for community health programs, the department shall support preventive health supports and services in regions with high health care access and outcome disparities. The department shall use the funds appropriated under this section to provide for all of the following: (a) Financial support for the operation of community-based health clinics. A community-based health clinic shall provide preventive health supports and services, be established in communities with high social vulnerability and health disparities, and be operated in cooperation with trusted community partners with demonstrated experience in serving as an access point for preventive health supports and services. (b) Financial support for the operation of healthy community zones. The healthy community zones must utilize long-term strategies to address access to healthy food, affordable housing, and safety networks. (c) Financial support for the operation of mobile health units to provide preventive health supports and services for individuals 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 residing in areas with high disparities in health care outcomes and access. (2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit to the standard report recipients a report on the outcome of the community health programs described in subsection (1). The report must include, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) The list of communities served. (b) The types of health services offered by grant recipients. (c) A spending report from the grant recipients. FAMILY HEALTH SERVICES Sec. 1301. (1) Not later than April 1 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit to the standard report recipients a report on planned allocations from the amounts appropriated in part 1 for local MCH services, prenatal care outreach and service delivery support, family planning local agreements, and pregnancy prevention programs. Using applicable federal definitions, the report must include information on all of the following: (a) The funding allocations. (b) The actual number of women, children, and adolescents served and the amounts expended for each group for the previous fiscal year. (c) A breakdown of the expenditure of the funds between urban and rural communities. (2) The department shall ensure that the distribution of funds through the programs described in subsection (1) takes into account the needs of rural communities. (3) As used in this section, "rural community" means any of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the following: (a) A county, city, village, or township with a population of 30,000 or less. (b) A county, city, village, or township described in subdivision (a), if it is located within a metropolitan statistical area. Sec. 1302. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for special projects, the department shall allocate $500,000.00 of TANF revenue to purchase child restraint systems for newborn children who are TANF eligible. The child restraint systems must meet the standards of all applicable federal law and the laws of this state, be purchased in volume by this state, and be distributed through maternal infant health program providers. Sec. 1303. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for prenatal care outreach and service delivery support, the department shall allocate $1,600,000.00 to local health departments in counties currently without home visiting programs to support pregnant mothers and their families. Sec. 1306. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for the drinking water declaration of emergency, the department shall allocate funds to address needs in a city in which a declaration of emergency was issued because of drinking water contamination. The funds allocated under this section may be used to support any of the following activities: (a) Nutrition assistance, nutritional and community education, food bank resources, and food inspections. (b) Epidemiological analysis and case management of individuals at risk of elevated blood lead levels. (c) Support for child and adolescent health centers, and the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 children's health care access program. (d) Nursing services, breastfeeding education, evidence-based home visiting programs, intensive services, and outreach for children exposed to lead coordinated through local community mental health organizations. (e) Department local office operations costs. (f) Lead poisoning surveillance, investigations, treatment, and abatement. (g) Nutritional incentives provided to local residents through the double up food bucks expansion program. (h) Genesee County health department food inspectors to perform water testing at local food service establishments. (i) Transportation related to health care delivery. (j) Senior initiatives. (k) Lead abatement contractor workforce development. (l) Any other activity that the department considers appropriate. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for the drinking water declaration of emergency, the department shall allocate $500,000.00 for rides to wellness through the Flint mass transportation authority. Sec. 1308. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for prenatal care outreach and service delivery support, the department shall allocate not less than $500,000.00 for evidence-based programs to reduce infant mortality. The funds must be used for enhanced support and education to nursing teams or other teams of health professionals that the department considers qualified, client recruitment in areas designated as underserved for obstetrical and gynecological services and in other high-need communities, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 strategic planning to expand and sustain programs, and marketing and communications of programs to raise awareness, engage stakeholders, and recruit nurses. Sec. 1311. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for prenatal care outreach and service delivery support, the department shall allocate not less than $2,750,000.00 of state general fund/general purpose revenue for a rural home visit program. The department shall give equal consideration to all eligible evidence-based providers in all regions in contracting for rural home visitation services. Sec. 1313. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall continue developing an outreach program on fetal alcohol syndrome services, targeting health promotion, prevention, and intervention. (2) The department shall explore federal grant funding to address prevention services for fetal alcohol syndrome and to reduce alcohol consumption among pregnant women. (3) The department shall explore federal grant funding to address prevention services to reduce marihuana use among pregnant women. Sec. 1314. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall enhance the department's education and outreach efforts that encourage women of childbearing age to seek the confirmation of a pregnancy at the earliest indication of a possible pregnancy and to initiate continuous and routine prenatal care on the confirmation of a pregnancy. The department shall ensure that the department's programs, policies, and practices promote prenatal and obstetrical care by doing all of the following: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) Supporting access to care. (b) Reducing and eliminating barriers to care. (c) Supporting recommendations for best practices. (d) Encouraging optimal prenatal habits, including, but not limited to, prenatal medical visits, use of prenatal vitamins, and the cessation of tobacco use, alcohol use, marihuana use, or other drug use. (e) Tracking birth outcomes to study improvements in prevalence of neonatal substance exposure, marihuana exposure, fetal alcohol syndrome, and other preventable neonatal disease. (f) Tracking maternal increase in healthy behaviors following childbirth. Sec. 1315. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for dental programs, $200,000.00 is allocated to the entity that received funds under section 1315 of article 6 of 2025 PA 22, for the administration of a volunteer dental program that provides dental services to the uninsured. Sec. 1316. The department shall use revenue from permit fees for mobile dental facilities that the department receives under section 21605 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.21605, to offset the costs of processing and issuing permits for mobile dental facilities. Sec. 1317. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for the smoking prevention program, $4,100,000.00 of revenue from the Healthy Michigan fund created in section 5953 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.5953, must be allocated to fund an awareness campaign to provide information to the public on the dangers of using substances, such as marihuana and tobacco, during pregnancy. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 1325. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for prenatal care outreach and service delivery support, the department shall allocate $5,000,000.00 to support grants to local collaboratives to enhance the ability of local collaboratives to coordinate and improve maternal and infant health outcomes. To receive a grant under this section, a local collaborative must be a part of a perinatal quality collaborative. Sec. 1341. The department shall use income eligibility and verification guidelines established by the Food and Nutrition Service agency of the United States Department of Agriculture to determine eligibility of individuals for the special supplemental nutrition program for women, infants, and children (WIC) as stated in current WIC policy. Sec. 1343. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for dental programs, the department shall allocate $4,260,000.00 of state and local funds, plus any private contributions received to support the program, to establish and maintain the dental oral assessment program described in section 9316 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.9316. (2) Not later than December 31 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that provides a summary of the dental reports the department receives from principals and administrators under section 9316 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.9316. Sec. 1349. Subject to federal approval, from the funds appropriated in part 1 for immunization program, the department shall allocate all of the following funds to support a statewide media campaign for improving this state's immunization rates: (a) $740,000.00 of general fund/general purpose revenue. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) Any available work project funds. (c) Any available federal match through a contract administered by the department with oversight from the behavioral and physical health and aging services administration and the public health administration. Sec. 1350. The department shall make available on its website the nonmedical waiver form for the public to access and submit for the purposes of exempting a child from the immunization requirements of part 92 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.9201 to 333.9229. The department shall not require individuals to schedule in-person appointments with a local health department to receive a nonmedical waiver form. The department shall allow individuals to receive virtual education on vaccines. The department shall provide notice to the public within 45 days of this section taking effect. Aging services Sec. 1402. The department may encourage the Food Bank Council of Michigan to collaborate directly with each area agency on aging and any other organization that provides senior nutrition services to secure the food access of older adults. Sec. 1404. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for community services, the department shall allocate $658,000.00 to area agencies on aging for home and community-based services. Sec. 1417. Not later than March 31 of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit to the standard report recipients a report that contains all of the following information: (a) The total allocation of state resources made to each area agency on aging by individual program and administration. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) Detailed expenditures by each area agency on aging by individual program and administration, including both state-funded resources and locally funded resources. Sec. 1421. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for community services, $1,100,000.00 is allocated for locally determined needs that are provided by area agencies on aging. ARTICLE 7 DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES part 1 line-item appropriations FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of insurance and financial services for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, from the following funds: DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 390.5 ï¿½ï¿½ Full-time employees 339.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Limited-term employees 21.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Noncareer/per diem employees 2.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Part-time employees 2.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Permanent-intermittent employees 0.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Seasonal employees 0.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 73,271,400 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 778,600 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 72,492,800 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 250,000 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 72,242,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 21.5 Unclassified salaries--FTEs 6.0 $ 235,600 Administrative hearings 40,100 Department services--FTEs 16.0 3,681,400 Executive director programs--FTEs 5.5 638,600 Property management 1,156,300 Worker's compensation 1,900 Departmentwide employee economic adjustments 1,061,400 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 6,815,300 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from MDLARA, for debt management 8,200 Special revenue funds: Captive insurance regulatory and supervision fund 49,300 Consumer finance fees 334,200 Continuing education fund 31,600 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Credit union regulatory fund 802,300 Deferred presentment service transaction fees 138,700 Insurance bureau fund 3,083,800 Insurance licensing and regulation fees 1,178,200 MBLSLA fund 694,800 Multiple employer welfare arrangement 100 State bank regulatory fund 494,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 103. INSURANCE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES REGULATION Full-time equated classified positions 369.0 Consumer services and protection--FTEs 106.0 $ 18,023,900 Financial institutions evaluation--FTEs 132.0 24,679,800 Insurance evaluation--FTEs 131.0 21,946,100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 64,649,800 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from MDLARA, for debt management 770,400 Federal revenues: Federal revenues 250,000 Special revenue funds: Captive insurance regulatory and supervision fund 645,300 Consumer finance fees 2,439,500 Continuing education fund 548,900 Credit union regulatory fund 8,545,500 Deferred presentment service transaction fees 3,767,500 Insurance bureau fund 26,875,500 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Insurance licensing and regulation fees 8,124,600 MBLSLA fund 5,999,400 Multiple employer welfare arrangement 35,400 State bank regulatory fund 6,647,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 104. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY Information technology services and projects $ 1,806,300 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,806,300 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Captive insurance regulatory and supervision fund 11,500 Consumer finance fees 93,400 Continuing education fund 7,900 Credit union regulatory fund 218,000 Deferred presentment service transaction fees 40,300 Insurance bureau fund 855,400 Insurance licensing and regulation fees 240,600 MBLSLA fund 195,200 State bank regulatory fund 144,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations for fiscal year 2026-2027 general sections Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 $72,242,800.00 and total state spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $0.00. Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1: (a) "Department" means the department of insurance and financial services. (b) "Director" means the director of the department. (c) "FTE" means full-time equated position in the classified service of this state. (d) "IDG" means interdepartmental grant. (e) "MBLSLA fund" means the restricted account established under section 8 of the mortgage brokers, lenders, and servicers licensing act, 1987 PA 173, MCL 445.1658. (f) "MDLARA" means the Michigan department of licensing and regulatory affairs. (g) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house appropriations committees, the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on licensing and regulatory affairs and insurance and financial services, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office. Sec. 204. If the state administrative board, acting under section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount appropriated under part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and serving in each house, intertransfer funds within part 1 for the particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution. Sec. 205. (1) The department shall use the internet to fulfill 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the reporting requirements of this part and shall make each report readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each required report in a single archivable location on the department's website not later than the due date required for each report. (2) In addition to placing all reports required in the current fiscal year on the department's website, the department shall maintain on its website all reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years posted by fiscal year in the same single archivable location. (3) The department shall transmit all required reports for the current fiscal year to the standard report recipients and any other required recipients by email. The email shall include a copy of the report and a link to access the report online. Sec. 206. The department shall receive and retain copies of all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department shall follow federal and state law and guidelines for short-term and long-term retention of records. The department shall electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required by federal and state guidelines. Sec. 207. (1) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to maintain a searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following for the department: (a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category. (b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit. (c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor, including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and payment description. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (2) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to update the searchable website on a quarterly basis. Sec. 208. Not later than December 15, the state budget office shall prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses by major departmental program or program areas. Sec. 209. Not later than 14 days after the release of the executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate with the state budget office to provide an annual report on estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the previous 2 fiscal years. Sec. 210. Not later than November 15, the department shall report on private and other third-party funds received by the department in the previous fiscal year. The report must include the amount of funding received, the specific source of funding received, the purpose for which funding was expended, and the amount of any remaining funds. Sec. 211. Consistent with section 217 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, the department shall prepare a report on out-of-state travel expenses by not later than January 1. The report must list all travel outside this state by classified and unclassified employees in the previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or in part with funds appropriated in the department's budget. The report must include all of the following information: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) The dates of each travel occurrence. (b) The total transportation and related costs of each travel occurrence and the proportions funded with state general fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal revenues, local revenues, and private revenues, including specific sources of state restricted, federal, local, and private revenues. (c) The destination of each travel occurrence. (d) The specific purpose and description of each travel occurrence, including the specific name of the event or meeting. Sec. 212. On a quarterly basis, the department shall report on all of the following: (a) The number of full-time equated positions in pay status by civil service classification. (b) A comparison by line item of the number of full-time equated positions authorized from funds appropriated in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated positions employed by the department at the end of the reporting period. (c) The number of active employees in each of the following statuses: (i) Full-time salary. (ii) Full-time hourly. (iii) Part-time. (iv) Permanent-intermittent. (v) Limited-term. (vi) Seasonal. (vii) Worker's compensation. (viii) Noncareer/per diem. (ix) Job share. (x) Special personal services/contractual. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (d) The number of overtime hours worked by employees, by classifications. Sec. 213. Not later than April 1, the department shall report on each specific policy change made to implement a public act affecting the department that took effect during the previous calendar year. The report must include reference to the public act that necessitates the policy change. The department shall submit the report to the standard report recipients, to the senate and house standing committees responsible for addressing issues affected by the public acts, and to the joint committee on administrative rules. Sec. 214. (1) The department shall maintain, on a publicly accessible website, a department scorecard that identifies, tracks, and updates on a quarterly basis key metrics that are used to monitor and improve the department's performance. (2) The department shall notify the standard report recipients when the quarterly updates to the department scorecard are available on a publicly accessible website. Sec. 215. (1) Unless specifically authorized elsewhere in this part or part 1, funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to pay for a state obligation that exceeds $200,000.00 for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim without prior legislative approval. (2) If a state obligation for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim results in a change from current statute, the department shall notify the legislature. (3) This section does not apply to compensation and other relief to individuals wrongfully imprisoned as required under the wrongful imprisonment compensation act, 2016 PA 343, MCL 691.1751 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 to 691.1757. Sec. 216. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $200,000.00 for federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,000,000.00 for state restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 217. Total authorized appropriations from all sources under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 are estimated at $5,008,800.00. From this amount, total appropriations for pension-related legacy costs for the department are estimated at $5,008,800.00. Total appropriations for retiree health care legacy costs for the department are estimated at $0.00. Sec. 218. To the extent possible, the department shall not expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted. Sec. 219. The department shall submit reports that summarize all work project accounts not later than December 31, March 30, June 30, and September 30. The reports must include all of the following: (a) A list of all work project accounts. (b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 account. (c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously designated work project accounts, the name and description of the work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed amounts. Sec. 220. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1: (a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are available. (b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. (c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. Sec. 221. The department shall not take disciplinary action against an employee of the department because the employee communicates with a member of the legislature or legislative staff unless the communication is prohibited by law and the department is exercising its authority as provided by law. Sec. 222. (1) The department shall maximize the efficiency of the state workforce and utilization and occupancy of office space, leased or owned, for each division within the department. Employees with job responsibilities that require employees to serve in their capacities outside of an office shall be monitored each pay period 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 to ensure all work hours reported on timesheets are actually worked. (2) The department shall comply with requirements set forth by the office of the state employer on in-person work and utilization and occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure at least 80% of employees are in person and building occupancy and utilization rates are at least 80% or higher. (3) The department shall submit reports not later than January 15 and April 15 on all of the following: (a) Remote work policy by division. (b) Building occupancy by address. (c) Whether the building is state-owned or leased. (d) Aggregate badge scanning information by employee. (4) As used in this section, "occupancy" means the actual number of employees physically present in a workplace. Sec. 223. (1) The department shall require as a condition of each contract or subcontract that the prequalified contractor or prequalified subcontractor agree to use the E-Verify system to verify that all persons hired during the contract term by the contractor or subcontractor are legally present and authorized to work in the United States. (2) The department may verify this information directly or may require contractors and subcontractors to verify the information and submit a certification to the department. The department shall submit a report not later than March 1 that describes the processes it has developed and implemented under this section. (3) The department shall not contract with any foreign entities that are known or suspected to be enemies of the United States or known foreign adversaries. Foreign adversaries include 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 all of the following: (a) The People's Republic of China. (b) The Russian Federation. (c) The Islamic Republic of Iran. (d) The Democratic People's Republic of Korea. (e) The Republic of Cuba. (f) The Venezuelan regime of Nicolï¿½s Maduro. (g) The Syrian Arab Republic. (h) An agency or other entity under significant control of a country described in subdivisions (a) to (g). (4) As used in this section, "E-Verify" means an internet-based system operated by the Department of Homeland Security, United States Citizenship and Immigration Services in partnership with the Social Security Administration. Sec. 224. (1) Within 30 days of enactment of this act, the state budget office shall post a list of legislatively directed spending items funded in part 1 as defined in sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and MCL 18.1364a. The list must include all information and documents pertaining to the funded items as publicly disclosed in accordance with sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. (2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency administering the grant shall submit a report not later than November 1. The department or agency shall update the report and shall submit updated reports not later than March 15 and September 15 of the current fiscal year. The department or agency shall include in the report the most comprehensive information the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department or agency has available at the time of posting for grants awarded, including, but not limited to, project milestones, percent completed, funding expended, and funding encumbered. (3) Before executing a grant agreement, all grant recipients must provide a spending plan that specifies the scope of service, the program goals, the measurement for meeting program goals, and how all grant funds will be used, and must indicate if any grant funds will be provided to a third party or subrecipient. (4) Each department or agency responsible for awarding or disbursing grant funds must annually audit the entity's use of the grant funds for each fiscal year in which the grant is active. Each entity must submit information requested by the department or agency to confirm compliance. (5) Each department or agency shall work with the office of the auditor general to conduct an audit of the grant according to generally accepted accounting practices and audit standards. The office of the auditor general must be given access to all internal and external records. All contracts or agreements between a department or agency and a grant recipient or between a grant recipient and a third party must include a clause granting the office of the auditor general access to all internal and external records. (6) Grant recipients and their immediate family members are prohibited from being employed by the executive branch or legislative branch of this state. In addition, grant recipients are prohibited from serving on any state board that has direct or indirect responsibility for approving or auditing grant funds awarded or disbursed by any department or agency. (7) Full and complete audits of grant funds issued by the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department or an agency of this state, without redaction unless required by law, must be posted to the department's or agency's website in a conspicuous place for public review. (8) On a quarterly basis, the department or agency shall submit a report on legislatively sponsored grant funds that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) The name of each grant recipient and the status of each grant. (b) The amount distributed to each grant recipient. (c) Any changes to scope or costs of program. (9) The report under subsection (8) must include the following statements made by the department or agency: (a) A statement that confirms the department or agency reviewed and affirmed compliance by each grant recipient with program scope and expenditure of grant funding. (b) A statement that confirms the department or agency reviewed applicable program reports and requests for reimbursement. Sec. 225. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall do the following: (a) Report on any amounts of severance pay for a department director, deputy director, or other high-ranking department official not later than 14 days after a severance agreement with the director, deputy director, or official is signed. The name of the director, deputy director, or official and the amount of severance pay must be included in the report required by this subdivision. (b) Not later than February 1, report on the total amount of severance pay remitted to former department employees during the previous fiscal year and the total number of former department 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 employees that were remitted severance pay during the previous fiscal year. (2) As used in this section, "severance pay" means compensation to which both of the following apply: (a) The compensation is payable or paid upon the termination of employment. (b) The compensation is paid in addition to wages or benefits earned during the course of employment or generally applicable retirement benefits. Sec. 226. Funds appropriated in part 1 from state or federal sources are prohibited from being used to provide services, grants, or programming to an individual who is not a citizen of the United States unless the individual is a qualified alien as that term is defined in 8 USC 1641. This section does not prohibit the department, political subdivision, state university, or other state agency from expending funds for the purpose of detaining individuals who are not citizens of the United States, including any costs associated with housing such individuals in county jails or state correctional facilities. Sec. 227. State funds must not be used for diversity, equity, and inclusion, or diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives or programs, as outlined in federal Executive Order No. 14151, 90 Fed. Reg. 8339 (January 29, 2025) "Ending Radical and Wasteful Government DEI Programs and Preferencing", federal Executive Order No. 14168, 90 Fed. Reg. 8615 (January 30, 2025) "Defending Women from Gender Ideology Extremism and Restoring Biological Truth to the Federal Government", or federal Executive Order No. 14173, 90 Fed. Reg. 8633 (January 31, 2025) "Ending Illegal Discrimination and Restoring Merit-Based Opportunity". 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 228. The department shall use the same precontract risk assessment program utilized by the department of technology, management, and budget to evaluate financial compliance, security risks, and insurance requirements prior to contract execution. Sec. 250. Unless prohibited by law, the department may accept credit card or other electronic means of payment for licenses, fees, or permits. Not later than February 1, the department shall report on fees collected from credit card payments for licenses, fees, and permits in the previous year. Sec. 251. Funds appropriated in part 1 must not be expended to support any legislative participation in insurance activities coordinated by insurance and legislative associations. Sec. 252. The department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients by September 30 detailing any expenditure of funds for a television or radio production that was made to a third-party vendor in the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026. The report must include all of the following information for each expenditure: (a) Total amount of the expenditure. (b) Fund source for the expenditure. (c) Name of any vendor that created the production and the amount paid to each vendor. (d) Purpose of the production. INSURANCE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES REGULATION Sec. 301. The annual health insurance rate change report prepared pursuant to 45 CFR 154.301(b) shall be transmitted electronically to the standard report recipients and must include the following: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) The number that are approved by the department. (b) The number of denials issued by the department. (c) The number of objections issued by the department. (d) The percentage of rate filings processed within the applicable statutory time frames. (e) The average number of calendar days to process rate filings. Sec. 302. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the funds collected by the department in connection with a conservatorship under section 32 of the mortgage brokers, lenders, and servicers licensing act, 1987 PA 173, MCL 445.1682, and funds collected by the department from corporations being liquidated under the insurance code of 1956, 1956 PA 218, MCL 500.100 to 500.8302, must be appropriated for all expenses necessary to provide for the required services. Funds are available for expenditure when they are received by the department of treasury and must not lapse to the general fund at the end of the fiscal year. The total amount appropriated under this section and section 303 must not exceed $600,000.00. Sec. 303. The department may make available to interested entities customized listings of nonconfidential information in its possession. The department may establish and collect a reasonable charge to provide this service. The revenue from this service is appropriated when received and must be used to offset expenses to provide the service. Any balance of this revenue collected and unexpended at the end of the fiscal year must lapse to the appropriate restricted fund. The total amount appropriated under this section and section 302 must not exceed $600,000.00. Sec. 304. The department must electronically transmit the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 annual report prepared under section 238 of the insurance code of 1956, 1956 PA 218, MCL 500.238, and section 2108 of the banking code of 1999, 1999 PA 276, MCL 487.12108, to the standard report recipients at the time of the publication of the report. Sec. 305. The department shall update examination manuals and letters of guidance to state-chartered financial institutions as necessary to reflect how the department will evaluate institutions that provide banking or other financial services to marihuana-related businesses or businesses that transport, test, grow, process, or sell marihuana, based on state statute and guidance. The department may also include guidance or information on how federal law and regulations may impact state-chartered institutions. ARTICLE 8 JUDICIARY part 1 line-item appropriations FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the judiciary for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, from the following funds: JUDICIARY APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated exempted positions 643.5 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 371,833,300 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 1,902,300 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 369,931,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 7,323,000 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 1,912,900 Total other state restricted revenues 96,695,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 264,000,000 Sec. 102. SUPREME COURT Full-time equated exempted positions 306.0 Community dispute resolution--FTEs 3.0 $ 3,388,800 Drug treatment courts--FTEs 2.0 13,266,700 Foster care review board--FTEs 10.0 1,445,600 Jail reform advisory support--FTE 1.0 160,100 Judicial information systems--FTEs 91.0 14,124,000 Judicial institute--FTEs 17.0 2,906,500 Justice for all--FTEs 2.0 1,539,700 Mental health courts and diversion services--FTE 1.0 5,779,400 Michigan legal help 1,000,000 Next generation Michigan court system 4,116,000 Other federal grants 275,100 State court administrative office--FTEs 83.0 15,690,000 Supreme court administration--FTEs 96.0 9,138,600 Supreme court unit economic adjustments 1,118,900 Swift and sure sanctions program 1,537,600 Veterans courts 1,061,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 76,548,200 Appropriated from: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from department of corrections 52,300 IDG from department of state police 1,500,000 IDG from department of state police, Michigan justice training fund 100,000 Federal revenues: DOJ, drug court training and evaluation 300,000 DOT, National Highway Traffic Safety Administration 2,358,700 Federal funds 275,100 HHS, access and visitation grant 508,000 HHS, children's justice grant 259,800 HHS, court improvement project 1,019,000 HHS, safe access for victims economic security grant 420,000 HHS, state opioid response grant 352,200 HHS, title IV-D child support program 912,800 HHS, title IV-E foster care program 333,600 Special revenue funds: Interest on lawyers trust accounts 414,400 Private funds 501,100 State justice institute 529,000 Community dispute resolution fund 2,435,500 Court of appeals filing/motion fees 1,450,000 Drug treatment court fund 1,920,500 Justice system fund 657,100 Law exam fees 808,700 Miscellaneous revenue 249,400 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 State court fund 422,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 58,768,200 Sec. 103. COURT OF APPEALS Full-time equated exempted positions 179.0 Court of appeals operations--FTEs 179.0 $ 28,391,900 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 28,391,900 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 28,391,900 Sec. 104. BRANCHWIDE APPROPRIATIONS Full-time equated exempted positions 6.0 Branchwide appropriations--FTEs 6.0 $ 10,657,400 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 10,657,400 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 10,657,400 Sec. 105. JUSTICES' AND JUDGES' COMPENSATION Judge positions--591.0 justices and judges Supreme court justices' salaries--7.0 justices $ 1,270,500 Circuit court judges' state base salaries--223.0 judges 32,563,500 Circuit court judicial salary standardization 10,196,800 Court of appeals judges' salaries--25.0 judges 5,188,500 District court judges' state base salaries--232.0 judges 33,877,700 District court judicial salary standardization 10,608,600 Probate court judges' state base salaries--104.0 judges 15,060,600 Probate court judicial salary standardization 4,715,300 Judges' retirement system defined contributions 9,734,600 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 OASI, Social Security 8,661,600 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 131,877,700 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Court fee fund 3,119,300 State general fund/general purpose $ 128,758,400 Sec. 106. JUDICIAL AGENCIES Full-time equated exempted positions 14.0 Judicial tenure commission--FTEs 14.0 $ 2,995,100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,995,100 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 2,995,100 Sec. 107. INDIGENT DEFENSE - CRIMINAL Full-time equated exempted positions 112.5 Appellate public defender program--FTEs 94.0 $ 17,198,300 Juvenile life resentencing--FTEs 18.5 3,121,500 Michigan appellate assigned counsel system roster attorney compensation grants 3,208,100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 23,527,900 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from department of state police 250,000 Federal revenues: Federal funds 583,800 Special revenue funds: Interest on lawyers trust accounts 88,400 Michigan justice fund 380,000 Miscellaneous revenue 172,400 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 State general fund/general purpose $ 22,053,300 Sec. 108. INDIGENT CIVIL LEGAL ASSISTANCE Indigent civil legal assistance $ 7,937,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 7,937,000 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: State court fund 7,937,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 109. TRIAL COURT OPERATIONS Full-time equated exempted positions 26.0 Court equity fund reimbursements $ 60,815,700 Drug case-flow program 250,000 Drunk driving case-flow program 3,300,000 Judicial technology improvement fund 4,815,000 Juror compensation reimbursement--FTE 1.0 6,619,900 Statewide e-file system--FTEs 25.0 12,097,500 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 87,898,100 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Court equity fund 50,440,000 Drug case information management fund 250,000 Drunk driving case-flow assistance fund 3,300,000 Judicial electronic filing fund 12,097,500 Judicial technology improvement fund 4,815,000 Juror compensation fund 6,619,900 State general fund/general purpose $ 10,375,700 Sec. 110. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Juvenile life resentencing $ 2,000,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,000,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 2,000,000 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations for fiscal year 2026-2027 general sections Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is $360,695,100.00 and total state spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $162,355,300.00. The following itemized statement identifies appropriations from which spending to local units of government will occur: JUDICIARY SUPREME COURT Drug treatment courts $ 9,216,700 Judicial information systems 10,449,100 Mental health courts and diversion services 5,779,400 Next generation Michigan court system 4,116,000 State court administrative office 200,000 Swift and sure sanctions program 1,537,600 Veterans courts 1,061,200 JUSTICES' AND JUDGES' COMPENSATION Circuit court judicial salary standardization $ 10,196,800 District court judicial salary standardization 10,608,600 OASI, Social Security 1,515,900 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Probate court judges' state base salaries 15,060,600 Probate court judicial salary standardization 4,715,300 TRIAL COURT OPERATIONS Court equity fund reimbursements $ 60,815,700 Drug case-flow program 250,000 Drunk driving case-flow program 3,300,000 Judicial technology improvement fund 4,815,000 Juror compensation reimbursement 6,619,900 Statewide e-file system 12,097,500 TOTAL $ 162,355,300 Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1: (a) "DOJ" means the United States Department of Justice. (b) "DOT" means the United States Department of Transportation. (c) "FTE" means full-time equated exempted positions. (d) "HHS" means the United States Department of Health and Human Services. (e) "IDG" means interdepartmental grant. (f) "OASI" means old age survivor's insurance. (g) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house appropriations committees, the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on corrections and judiciary, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office. (h) "Title IV-D" means the part of the federal social security act, 42 USC 301 to 1397mm, pertaining to the child support 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 enforcement program. (i) "Title IV-E" means the part of the federal social security act, 42 USC 301 to 1397mm, pertaining to the foster care program. Sec. 205. (1) The judicial branch shall use the internet to fulfill the reporting requirements of this part and shall make each report readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each required report in a single archivable location on the judicial branch's website not later than the due date required for each report. (2) In addition to placing all reports required in the current fiscal year on the judicial branch's website, the judicial branch shall maintain on its website all reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years posted by fiscal year in the same single archivable location. (3) The judicial branch shall transmit all required reports for the current fiscal year to the standard report recipients and any other required recipients by email. The email shall include a copy of the report and a link to access the report online. Sec. 206. The judicial branch shall receive and retain copies of all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The judicial branch shall follow federal and state law and guidelines for short-term and long-term retention of records. The judicial branch shall electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required by federal and state guidelines. Sec. 207. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the judicial branch shall maintain a searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that posts all of the expenditures made by the judicial branch within a fiscal year. A post must include the purpose of the expenditure. The judicial branch shall not provide financial 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 information on the public website that would violate a federal or state law, rule, regulation, or guideline that establishes privacy or security standards applicable to that financial information. Sec. 208. Not later than December 15, the judicial branch shall cooperate with the state budget office to prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses by major judicial program or program areas. Sec. 209. Not later than 14 days after the release of the executive budget recommendation, the judicial branch shall cooperate with the state budget office to provide an annual report on estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the previous 2 fiscal years. Sec. 210. Not later than November 15, the judicial branch shall report on private and other third-party funds received by the judicial branch in the previous fiscal year. The report must include the amount of funding received, the specific source of funding received, the purpose for which funding was expended, and the amount of any remaining funds. Sec. 211. The state court administrative office shall prepare a report on out-of-state travel expenses by not later than January 1. The report must list all travel outside this state by judicial branch employees in the previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or in part with funds appropriated in the judicial branch's budget. The report must include all of the following information: (a) The dates of each travel occurrence. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) The total transportation and related expenses of each travel occurrence and the proportions funded with state general fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal revenues, local revenues, and private revenues, including specific sources of state restricted, federal, local, and private revenues. (c) The destination of each travel occurrence. (d) The specific purpose and description of each travel occurrence, including the specific name of the event or meeting. Sec. 217. Total authorized appropriations from all sources under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 are estimated at $9,414,300.00 for the judicial branch. From this amount, total appropriations for pension-related legacy costs for the judicial branch are estimated at $9,414,300.00. Total appropriations for retiree health care legacy costs for the judicial branch are estimated at $0.00. Sec. 218. To the extent possible, the judicial branch shall not expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted. Sec. 219. The judicial branch shall submit reports that summarize all work project accounts not later than December 31, March 30, June 30, and September 30. The reports must include all of the following: (a) A list of all work project accounts. (b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each account. (c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously designated work project accounts, the name and description of the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed amounts. Sec. 220. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1: (a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are available. (b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. (c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. Sec. 221. The judicial branch shall not take disciplinary action against an employee of the judicial branch because the employee communicates with a member of the legislature or legislative staff, unless the communication is prohibited by law and the judicial branch is exercising its authority as provided by law. Sec. 230. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 to an entity in the judicial branch must not be expended or transferred to another account without written approval of the authorized agent of the judicial entity. If the authorized agent of the judicial entity notifies the state budget director of its approval of an expenditure or transfer, the state budget director shall immediately make the expenditure or transfer. The authorized 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 judicial entity agent shall be designated by the chief justice of the supreme court. (2) Funds appropriated to the judicial branch must not be expended by a component in the judicial branch without the approval of the supreme court. JUDICIAL BRANCH Sec. 301. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for the judicial branch, $711,900.00 is allocated for circuit court reimbursement under section 3 of 1978 PA 16, MCL 800.453, and for costs associated with the court of claims. Sec. 302. A member of the legislature may request a report or data from the data collected in the judicial data warehouse. The report must be made available to the public upon request, unless disclosure is prohibited by court order or state or federal law. If data is provided under this section, the data must be public and nonidentifying information, as determined by the state court administrative office. As used in this section, "nonidentifying information" means information that does not include personal information that, if released, would be considered invasion of privacy. Sec. 303. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for community dispute resolution, community dispute resolution centers shall provide dispute resolution services specified in the community dispute resolution act, 1988 PA 260, MCL 691.1551 to 691.1564, help reduce suspensions and truancy, and improve school environment. The funds appropriated in part 1 for community dispute resolution may be used to develop or expand juvenile diversion services in coordination with local prosecutors. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 304. If funds in the court fee fund are insufficient to pay judges' compensation, the difference between the appropriated amount from that fund for judges' compensation and the actual amount available after the amount appropriated for trial court reimbursement is made is appropriated from the state general fund for judges' compensation. If an appropriation from the state general fund is necessary under this section, not later than 14 days after the appropriation, the state court administrative office shall submit a report. Sec. 305. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the state court administrative office shall submit a report on drug treatment, mental health, and veterans court programs in this state not later than March 1. The report must include all of the following information for each individual court, by program: (a) The number of each type of program. (b) The number of program participants. (c) The impact of the programs on offender criminal involvement and recidivism. (d) An accounting of previous fiscal year expenditures, including grant amounts requested, grant amounts awarded, and grant amounts expended. Sec. 306. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for drug treatment courts must be administered by the state court administrative office to operate drug treatment court programs. A drug treatment court shall use all available county and state personnel involved in the disposition of cases, including, but not limited to, parole and probation agents, prosecuting attorneys, defense attorneys, and community corrections providers. The funds may be used in connection with other federal, state, and local 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 funding sources. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the chief justice shall allocate sufficient funds for the Michigan judicial institute to provide in-state training for those identified in subsection (1) and new drug treatment court judges. (3) The state court administrative office may prioritize funding for courts that have a higher number of filed substance use disorder cases. (4) To assist the department of corrections and avoid prison bed space growth for nonviolent offenders, the judicial branch shall receive $1,500,000.00 in Byrne formula grant funding through an interdepartmental grant from the department of state police to be used to support drug treatment court costs consistent with Byrne grant program criteria. Sec. 307. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for swift and sure sanctions programs, the state court administrative office shall administer a program to distribute grants to qualifying courts in accordance with the objectives and requirements of the probation swift and sure sanctions act, chapter XIA of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 771A.1 to 771A.8. Courts interested in participating in the swift and sure sanctions program may apply to the state court administrative office for a portion of the funds appropriated in part 1 under this section. (2) Not later than March 1, the state court administrative office, in coordination with the department of corrections, shall submit a report on the swift and sure sanctions program that includes all of the following information for each individual court, by program: (a) A list of courts that participate in the program. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) The number of offenders who participate in the program. (c) The criminal history of offenders who participate in the program. (d) The recidivism rate of offenders who participate in the program, including the rate of return to jail, prison, or both. (e) A detailed description of the establishment and parameters of the program. (f) An accounting of previous fiscal year expenditures, including, but not limited to, grant amounts requested by the courts, grant amounts awarded to the courts, and grant amounts expended by the courts. Sec. 308. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the judicial branch shall support a statewide legal self-help internet website and local nonprofit self-help centers that use the statewide website to provide assistance to individuals who represent themselves in civil legal proceedings. The state court administrative office shall summarize the costs to maintain the website, provide statistics on the number of individuals who visit the website, and provide information on content usage, form completion, and user feedback not later than March 1 for the previous fiscal year. Sec. 309. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the state court administrative office shall submit a report on the statewide judicial case management system not later than March 1. The report must provide a status update on development and implementation of the statewide judicial case management system and must include all appropriation and expenditure data for all previous and the current fiscal years. Sec. 311. (1) If Byrne formula grant funding is awarded to the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 state appellate defender office in excess of the amount appropriated in part 1, the state appellate defender office may receive and expend not more than $250,000.00 of Byrne formula grant funds as an interdepartmental grant from the department of state police. (2) If the state appellate defender office receives federal grant funding from the United States Department of Justice in excess of the amount appropriated in part 1, the state appellate defender office may receive and expend not more than $300,000.00 in federal grant funds. Sec. 312. As prescribed in section 23 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, all financial records, accountings, audit reports, and other reports of public moneys shall be public records and open to inspection. Not later than October 1, 2026, the state court administrative office shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to authorize access by the senate and house fiscal agencies to financial information for the judicial branch that is contained within statewide integrated governmental management applications. Sec. 313. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the state appellate defender office shall operate the program to ensure this state's compliance with Montgomery v Louisiana, 577 US 190 (2016), People v Parks, 510 Mich 225 (2022), People v Stovall, 510 Mich 301 (2022), People v Poole, ___ Mich App ___; ___ NW2d ___ (2024) (COA #352589, January 18, 2024), People v Czarnecki, Mich (2025), and People v Taylor, Mich (2025). The purpose of the program is to ensure competent, resourced, and supervised counsel in cases that involve resentencing individuals who are serving a life sentence for an offense committed when the individuals were 20 years of age 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 or younger. (2) The state appellate defender office shall submit a report not later than March 1 on the number of cases investigated and prepared by the state appellate defender office under subsection (1). The report must include a calculation of the hours spent and the incremental costs associated with the investigation and robust examination of each case. Sec. 314. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for Michigan appellate assigned counsel system roster attorney compensation grants must be deposited into the restricted Michigan appellate assigned counsel system attorney compensation fund created in subsection (2). (2) The Michigan appellate assigned counsel system attorney compensation fund is created in the state treasury. The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source to deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the fund and credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. Unexpended funds at the close of the fiscal year must remain in the fund and shall not lapse to the general fund. The judicial branch shall be the administrator of the fund for auditing purposes. The judicial branch shall expend money from the fund to provide payments to indigent defense systems as provided under section 8a of the appellate defender act, 1978 PA 620, MCL 780.718a. (3) All funds available in the Michigan appellate assigned counsel system attorney compensation fund are appropriated and available for expenditure as provided by law. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 401. From the one-time funds appropriated in part 1 for juvenile life resentencing, the state appellate defender office may hire up to 14.0 limited term employees to support the financial impact of recent supreme court decisions that require resentencing of individuals who were sentenced to life without parole for crimes they committed at ages 19 and 20. aRTICLE 9 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY part 1 line-item appropriations FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of labor and economic opportunity for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, from the following funds: DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 34.5 Full-time equated classified positions 2,403.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Full-time employees 2,304.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Limited-term employees 173.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Noncareer/per diem employees 25.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Part-time employees 3.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Permanent-intermittent employees 1.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Seasonal employees 0.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,458,314,400 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,458,314,400 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 871,575,800 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 5,650,000 Total private revenues 6,483,900 Total other state restricted revenues 472,183,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 102,420,900 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Full-time equated unclassified positions 34.5 Full-time equated classified positions 66.0 Unclassified salaries--FTEs 34.5 $ 4,869,600 Departmentwide employee economic adjustments 5,534,300 Executive direction and operations--FTEs 66.0 3,665,100 Property management 6,275,500 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 20,344,500 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: DED, vocational rehabilitation and independent living 4,781,200 DOL, federal funds 267,000 DOL-ETA, unemployment insurance 1,629,400 DOL, occupational safety and health 874,000 Federal funds 50,000 Special revenue funds: Private funds 9,000 Asbestos abatement fund 69,600 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Contingent fund, penalty and interest 32,300 Corporation fees 2,554,400 Defaulted loan collection 2,500 Distance education fund 6,000 Land bank fast track fund 17,500 Michigan state housing development authority fees and charges 1,444,200 Private occupational school license fees 58,600 Radiological health fees 259,400 Safety education and training fund 1,218,400 Second injury fund 205,800 Securities fees 2,447,800 Self-insurers security fund 128,300 Silicosis and dust disease fund 86,300 State brownfield redevelopment fund 3,300 State historic preservation office fees and charges 2,000 Workers' compensation administrative revolving fund 27,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 4,169,800 Sec. 103. WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT Full-time equated classified positions 172.0 23+ high school diploma program $ 2,000,000 At-risk youth grants 5,184,500 Federal work requirements support 15,000,000 Going pro 30,000,000 High school equivalency-to-school program 250,000 Michigan high-speed internet office--FTE 1.0 100,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 MiSTEM advisory council--FTEs 3.0 665,300 Workforce development--FTEs 168.0 285,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 338,199,800 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: DAG, employment and training 4,560,400 DED-OESE, GEAR-UP 5,500,000 DED-OVAE, adult education 19,000,000 DED-OVAE, basic grants to states 19,000,000 DOL, federal funds 38,000,000 DOL-ETA, workforce investment act 111,000,000 Federal funds 9,524,200 Social security act, temporary assistance for needy families 63,698,800 Special revenue funds: Local funds 300,000 Private funds 4,893,800 21st century jobs trust fund 8,099,800 Contingent fund, penalty and interest 1,985,000 Corporation fees 30,000,000 Defaulted loan collection 166,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 22,471,700 Sec. 104. REHABILITATION SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 669.0 Bureau of services for blind persons--FTEs 116.0 $ 26,301,100 Centers for independent living 10,767,000 Michigan rehabilitation services--FTEs 553.0 150,520,000 Subregional libraries state aid 451,800 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 188,039,900 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: DED, vocational rehabilitation and independent living 135,640,300 Federal funds 700,000 Supplemental security income 4,821,300 Special revenue funds: Local - blind services 100,000 Local - vocational rehabilitation match 5,250,000 Private - blind services 20,000 Private - gifts, bequests, and donations 160,000 Michigan business enterprise program fund 350,000 Rehabilitation service fees 100,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 40,898,300 Sec. 105. EMPLOYMENT SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 337.0 Bureau of employment relations--FTEs 15.0 $ 3,106,600 Compensation supplement fund 820,000 First responder presumed coverage claims 3,850,000 Insurance funds administration--FTEs 13.0 3,500,000 Michigan occupational safety and health administration--FTEs 191.0 38,972,300 Private and occupational distance learning--FTEs 3.0 979,100 Radiation safety section--FTEs 22.0 3,600,000 Wage and hour program--FTEs 30.0 4,682,200 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Workers' compensation board of magistrates--FTEs 9.0 2,316,000 Workers' disability compensation agency--FTEs 53.0 7,481,300 Workers' disability compensation appeals commission--FTE 1.0 359,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 69,666,700 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: DOL, occupational safety and health 16,433,600 HHS, mammography quality standards 500,000 Special revenue funds: Asbestos abatement fund 870,100 Corporation fees 12,303,600 Distance education fund 480,400 First responder presumed coverage fund 3,850,000 Private occupational school license fees 498,700 Radiological health fees 3,100,000 Safety education and training fund 11,739,000 Second injury fund 2,200,000 Securities fees 11,238,200 Self-insurers security fund 900,000 Silicosis and dust disease fund 400,000 Workers' compensation administrative revolving fund 2,436,600 State general fund/general purpose $ 2,716,500 Sec. 106. UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE AGENCY Full-time equated classified positions 700.0 Unemployment insurance agency--FTEs 690.0 $ 200,000,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Unemployment insurance agency - advocacy assistance 1,500,000 Unemployment insurance appeals commission--FTEs 10.0 4,430,600 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 205,930,600 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: DOL-ETA, unemployment insurance 186,000,600 Special revenue funds: Contingent fund, penalty and interest 19,930,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 107. COMMISSIONS Full-time equated classified positions 19.0 Asian Pacific American affairs commission--FTE 1.0 $ 224,500 Commission on Middle Eastern American affairs--FTE 1.0 215,100 Hispanic/Latino commission of Michigan--FTE 1.0 298,500 Michigan community service commission--FTEs 14.0 16,345,000 Michigan women's commission--FTEs 2.0 1,545,100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 18,628,200 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 14,980,900 Special revenue funds: Private funds 1,201,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 2,446,200 Sec. 108. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY Information technology services and projects $ 15,375,500 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 15,375,500 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: DED, vocational rehabilitation and independent living 1,596,600 DOL-ETA, unemployment insurance 11,501,600 DOL, occupational safety and health 186,200 Federal funds 296,400 Special revenue funds: Asbestos abatement fund 17,700 Corporation fees 242,000 Distance education fund 10,400 Private occupational school license fees 41,200 Radiological health fees 78,000 Safety education and training fund 201,700 Second injury fund 90,400 Securities fees 603,000 Self-insurers security fund 62,800 Silicosis and dust disease fund 22,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 425,000 Sec. 109. MICHIGAN STRATEGIC FUND Full-time equated classified positions 130.0 Community college skilled trades equipment program $ 3,017,500 Entrepreneurship ecosystem 2,475,000 Facility for rare isotope beams 7,300,000 Job creation services--FTEs 130.0 28,169,600 Lighthouse preservation program 125,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Michigan office of defense and aerospace innovation 4,000,000 Pure Michigan 20,000,000 Research institution grant 1,500,000 Rural jobs and capital investment 7,500,000 Small business supports 40,425,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 114,512,300 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 1,500,000 State historic preservation, national park service grants 1,900,000 Special revenue funds: Private - special project advances 200,000 21st century jobs trust fund 66,900,200 Contingent fund, penalty and interest 3,017,500 Michigan lighthouse preservation fund 125,000 Michigan state housing development authority fees and charges 4,811,300 Rural jobs and capital investment creation fund 7,500,000 State brownfield redevelopment fund 1,092,300 State historic preservation office fees and charges 200,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 27,266,000 Sec. 110. MICHIGAN STATE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY Full-time equated classified positions 301.0 Community development block grants $ 47,000,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Housing and rental assistance--FTEs 301.0 52,120,800 Michigan housing and community development program 50,000,000 MSHDA technology services and projects 1,880,500 Payments on behalf of tenants 166,860,000 Property management 3,343,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 321,204,500 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: HUD, lower income housing assistance 166,860,000 HUD-CPD, community development block grant 49,773,300 Special revenue funds: Michigan housing and community development fund 50,000,000 Michigan state housing development authority fees and charges 54,571,200 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 111. STATE LAND BANK AUTHORITY Full-time equated classified positions 9.0 State land bank authority--FTEs 9.0 $ 6,412,400 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 6,412,400 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 1,000,000 Special revenue funds: Land bank fast track fund 3,385,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 2,027,400 Sec. 112. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Going pro $ 10,000,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Legislatively directed spending items 150,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 160,000,000 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Corporation fees 10,000,000 Legislative spending transparency fund 150,000,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations for fiscal year 2026-2027 general sections Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is $574,604,700.00 and total state spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $31,459,500.00. The following itemized statement identifies appropriations from which spending to local units of government will occur: DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY At-risk youth grants $ 5,184,500 Michigan rehabilitation services 275,000 Workforce development programs 26,000,000 TOTAL $ 31,459,500 Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1: (a) "Department" means the department of labor and economic 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 opportunity and entities contained within its organization, including, but not limited to, the fund. (b) "Director" means the director of the department. (c) "FTE" means full-time equated. (d) "Fund", unless the context clearly implies a different meaning, means the Michigan strategic fund. (e) "MEDC" means the Michigan economic development corporation, which is the public body corporate created under section 28 of article VII of the state constitution of 1963 and the urban cooperation act of 1967, 1967 (Ex Sess) PA 7, MCL 124.501 to 124.512, by contractual interlocal agreement effective April 5, 1999, between local participating economic development corporations formed under the economic development corporations act, 1974 PA 338, MCL 125.1601 to 125.1636, and the fund. (f) "MEGA" means the Michigan economic growth authority. (g) "MiSTEM" means Michigan science, technology, engineering, and mathematics. (h) "MSHDA" means the Michigan state housing development authority. (i) "PATH" means Partnership. Accountability. Training. Hope. (j) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house appropriations committees, the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on labor and economic opportunity, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office. (k) "STEM" means science, technology, engineering, and mathematics. (l) "USDOL" means the United States Department of Labor. Sec. 204. If the state administrative board, acting under 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount appropriated under part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and serving in each house, intertransfer funds within part 1 for the particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution. Sec. 205. (1) The department shall use the internet to fulfill the reporting requirements of this part and shall make each report readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each required report in a single archivable location on the department's website not later than the due date required for each report. (2) In addition to placing all reports required in the current fiscal year on the department's website, the department shall maintain on its website all reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years posted by fiscal year in the same single archivable location. (3) The department shall transmit all required reports for the current fiscal year to the standard report recipients and any other required recipients by email. The email shall include a copy of the report and a link to access the report online. Sec. 206. The department shall receive and retain copies of all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department shall follow federal and state law and guidelines for short-term and long-term retention of records. The department shall electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required by federal and state guidelines. Sec. 207. (1) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to maintain a searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following for the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department: (a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category. (b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit. (c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor, including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and payment description. (2) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to update the searchable website on a quarterly basis. Sec. 208. Not later than December 15, the state budget office shall prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses by major departmental program or program areas. Sec. 209. Not later than 14 days after the release of the executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate with the state budget office to provide an annual report on estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the previous 2 fiscal years. Sec. 210. Not later than November 15, the department shall report on private and other third-party funds received by the department in the previous fiscal year. The report must include the amount of funding received, the specific source of funding received, the purpose for which funding was expended, and the amount of any remaining funds. Sec. 211. Consistent with section 217 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, the department shall prepare 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 a report on out-of-state travel expenses by not later than January 1. The report must list all travel outside this state by classified and unclassified employees in the previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or in part with funds appropriated in the department's budget. The report must include all of the following information: (a) The dates of each travel occurrence. (b) The total transportation and related costs of each travel occurrence and the proportions funded with state general fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal revenues, local revenues, and private revenues, including specific sources of state restricted, federal, local, and private revenues. (c) The destination of each travel occurrence. (d) The specific purpose and description of each travel occurrence, including the specific name of the event or meeting. Sec. 212. On a quarterly basis, the department shall report on all of the following: (a) The number of full-time equated positions in pay status by civil service classification. (b) A comparison by line item of the number of full-time equated positions authorized from funds appropriated in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated positions employed by the department at the end of the reporting period. (c) The number of active employees in each of the following statuses: (i) Full-time salary. (ii) Full-time hourly. (iii) Part-time. (iv) Permanent-intermittent. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (v) Limited-term. (vi) Seasonal. (vii) Worker's compensation. (viii) Noncareer/per diem. (ix) Job share. (x) Special personal services/contractual. (d) The number of overtime hours worked by employees, by classifications. Sec. 213. Not later than April 1, the department shall report on each specific policy change made to implement a public act affecting the department that took effect during the previous calendar year. The report must include reference to the public act that necessitates the policy change. The department shall submit the report to the standard report recipients, to the senate and house standing committees responsible for addressing issues affected by the public acts, and to the joint committee on administrative rules. Sec. 214. (1) Not later than April 1, the department shall maintain, on a publicly accessible website, a department scorecard that identifies, tracks, and updates on a quarterly basis key metrics that are used to monitor and improve the department's performance. (2) The department shall notify the standard report recipients when the quarterly updates to the department scorecard are available on a publicly accessible website. Sec. 215. (1) Unless specifically authorized elsewhere in this part or part 1, funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to pay for a state obligation that exceeds $200,000.00 for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim without prior 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 legislative approval. (2) If a state obligation for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim results in a change from current statute, the department shall notify the legislature. (3) This section does not apply to compensation and other relief to individuals wrongfully imprisoned as required under the wrongful imprisonment compensation act, 2016 PA 343, MCL 691.1751 to 691.1757. Sec. 216. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $15,000,000.00 for federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $5,000,000.00 for state restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,000,000.00 for local contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,000,000.00 for private contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 217. Total authorized appropriations from all sources under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 are estimated at $29,919,000.00. From this amount, total appropriations for pension-related legacy costs for the department are estimated at $29,919,000.00. Total appropriations for retiree health care legacy costs for the department are estimated at $0.00. Sec. 218. To the extent possible, the department shall not expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted. Sec. 219. The department shall submit reports that summarize all work project accounts not later than December 31, March 30, June 30, and September 30. The reports must include all of the following: (a) A list of all work project accounts. (b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each account. (c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously designated work project accounts, the name and description of the work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed amounts. Sec. 220. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1: (a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are available. (b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. (c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. Sec. 221. The department shall not take disciplinary action against an employee of the department because the employee communicates with a member of the legislature or legislative staff unless the communication is prohibited by law and the department is exercising its authority as provided by law. Sec. 222. (1) The department shall maximize the efficiency of the state workforce and utilization and occupancy of office space, leased or owned, for each division within the department. Employees with job responsibilities that require employees to serve in their capacities outside of an office shall be monitored each pay period to ensure all work hours reported on timesheets are actually worked. (2) The department shall comply with requirements set forth by the office of the state employer on in-person work and utilization and occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure at least 80% of employees are in person and building occupancy and utilization rates are at least 80% or higher. (3) The department shall submit reports not later than January 15 and April 15 on all of the following: (a) Remote work policy by division. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) Building occupancy by address. (c) Whether the building is state-owned or leased. (d) Aggregate badge scanning information by employee. (4) As used in this section, "occupancy" means the actual number of employees physically present in a workplace. Sec. 223. (1) The department shall require as a condition of each contract or subcontract that the prequalified contractor or prequalified subcontractor agree to use the E-Verify system to verify that all persons hired during the contract term by the contractor or subcontractor are legally present and authorized to work in the United States. (2) The department may verify this information directly or may require contractors and subcontractors to verify the information and submit a certification to the department. The department shall submit a report not later than March 1 that describes the processes it has developed and implemented under this section. (3) The department shall not contract with any foreign entities that are known or suspected to be enemies of the United States or known foreign adversaries. Foreign adversaries include all of the following: (a) The People's Republic of China. (b) The Russian Federation. (c) The Islamic Republic of Iran. (d) The Democratic People's Republic of Korea. (e) The Republic of Cuba. (f) The Venezuelan regime of Nicolï¿½s Maduro. (g) The Syrian Arab Republic. (h) An agency or other entity under significant control of a country described in subdivisions (a) to (g). 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (4) As used in this section, "E-Verify" means an internet-based system operated by the Department of Homeland Security, United States Citizenship and Immigration Services in partnership with the Social Security Administration. Sec. 224. (1) Within 30 days of enactment of this act, the state budget office shall post a list of legislatively directed spending items funded in part 1 as defined in sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. The list must include all information and documents pertaining to the funded items as publicly disclosed in accordance with sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. (2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency administering the grant shall submit a report not later than November 1. The department or agency shall update the report and shall submit updated reports not later than March 15 and September 15 of the current fiscal year. The department or agency shall include in the report the most comprehensive information the department or agency has available at the time of posting for grants awarded, including, but not limited to, project milestones, percent completed, funding expended, and funding encumbered. (3) Before executing a grant agreement, all grant recipients must provide a spending plan that specifies the scope of service, the program goals, the measurement for meeting program goals, and how all grant funds will be used, and must indicate if any grant funds will be provided to a third party or subrecipient. (4) Each department or agency responsible for awarding or disbursing grant funds must annually audit the entity's use of the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 grant funds for each fiscal year in which the grant is active. Each entity must submit information requested by the department or agency to confirm compliance. (5) Each department or agency shall work with the office of the auditor general to conduct an audit of the grant according to generally accepted accounting practices and audit standards. The office of the auditor general must be given access to all internal and external records. All contracts or agreements between a department or agency and a grant recipient or between a grant recipient and a third party must include a clause granting the office of the auditor general access to all internal and external records. (6) Grant recipients and their immediate family members are prohibited from being employed by the executive branch or legislative branch of this state. In addition, grant recipients are prohibited from serving on any state board that has direct or indirect responsibility for approving or auditing grant funds awarded or disbursed by any department or agency. (7) Full and complete audits of grant funds issued by the department or an agency of this state, without redaction unless required by law, must be posted to the department's or agency's website in a conspicuous place for public review. (8) On a quarterly basis, the department or agency shall submit a report on legislatively sponsored grant funds that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) The name of each grant recipient and the status of each grant. (b) The amount distributed to each grant recipient. (c) Any changes to scope or costs of program. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (9) The report under subsection (8) must include the following statements made by the department or agency: (a) A statement that confirms the department or agency reviewed and affirmed compliance by each grant recipient with program scope and expenditure of grant funding. (b) A statement that confirms the department or agency reviewed applicable program reports and requests for reimbursement. Sec. 225. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall do the following: (a) Report on any amounts of severance pay for a department director, deputy director, or other high-ranking department official not later than 14 days after a severance agreement with the director, deputy director, or official is signed. The name of the director, deputy director, or official and the amount of severance pay must be included in the report required by this subdivision. (b) Not later than February 1, report on the total amount of severance pay remitted to former department employees during the previous fiscal year and the total number of former department employees that were remitted severance pay during the previous fiscal year. (2) As used in this section, "severance pay" means compensation to which both of the following apply: (a) The compensation is payable or paid upon the termination of employment. (b) The compensation is paid in addition to wages or benefits earned during the course of employment or generally applicable retirement benefits. Sec. 226. Funds appropriated in part 1 from state or federal 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 sources are prohibited from being used to provide services, grants, or programming to an individual who is not a citizen of the United States unless the individual is a qualified alien as that term is defined in 8 USC 1641. This section does not prohibit the department, political subdivision, state university, or other state agency from expending funds for the purpose of detaining individuals who are not citizens of the United States, including any costs associated with housing such individuals in county jails or state correctional facilities. Sec. 227. State funds must not be used for diversity, equity, and inclusion, or diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives or programs, as outlined in federal Executive Order No. 14151, 90 Fed. Reg. 8339 (January 29, 2025) "Ending Radical and Wasteful Government DEI Programs and Preferencing", federal Executive Order No. 14168, 90 Fed. Reg. 8615 (January 30, 2025) "Defending Women from Gender Ideology Extremism and Restoring Biological Truth to the Federal Government", or federal Executive Order No. 14173, 90 Fed. Reg. 8633 (January 31, 2025) "Ending Illegal Discrimination and Restoring Merit-Based Opportunity". Sec. 228. The department shall use the same precontract risk assessment program utilized by the department of technology, management, and budget to evaluate financial compliance, security risks, and insurance requirements prior to contract execution. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY Sec. 301. General fund appropriations in part 1 must not be expended for items in cases where federal funding or private grant funding is available for the same expenditures. Sec. 302. Federal pass-through funds to local institutions and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 governments that are received in amounts in addition to those included in part 1 and that do not require additional state matching funds are appropriated for the purposes intended. The department may carry forward into the succeeding fiscal year unexpended federal pass-through funds to local institutions and governments that do not require additional state matching funds. The department shall report the amount and source of the funds not later than 10 business days after receiving any additional pass-through funds. Sec. 303. Requirements under this part applicable to the fund and the fund's activities apply regardless of whether the fund delegates its functions and authority to the MEDC. Sec. 304. (1) Grants supported with private revenues received by the department are appropriated upon receipt and are available for expenditure by the department for purposes specified within the grant agreement and as permitted under state and federal law. (2) Not later than 10 days after the receipt of a private grant appropriated in subsection (1), the department shall notify the standard report recipients of the receipt of the grant, including the fund source, purpose, and amount of the grant. (3) The amount appropriated under subsection (1) must not exceed $1,500,000.00. (4) Not later than March 15, the department shall report the amount of private revenue generated in the previous fiscal year and the amount of private revenue carried forward into the current fiscal year. Sec. 305. (1) The department may charge registration fees to attendees of informational, training, or special events that are sponsored by the department and related to activities that are 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 under the department's purview. (2) The fees under subsection (1) must reflect the costs for the department to sponsor the informational, training, or special events. (3) Revenue generated by the registration fees under subsection (1) is appropriated upon receipt and available for expenditure to cover the department's costs of sponsoring informational, training, or special events. (4) Revenue generated by registration fees under this section in excess of the department's costs of sponsoring informational, training, or special events must carry forward to the subsequent fiscal year and not lapse to the general fund. (5) The amount appropriated under subsection (3) must not exceed $500,000.00. (6) Not later than March 15, the department shall report the amount of registration fees generated in the previous fiscal year and the amount of registration fees carried forward into the current fiscal year. Sec. 306. (1) The department may sell documents at a price not to exceed the cost of production and distribution. Money received from the sale of these documents must revert to the department. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, these funds are available for expenditure when they are received by the department of treasury. This subsection applies only to R 418.10101 to R 418.101503 of the Michigan Administrative Code. (2) Unexpended funds at the end of the fiscal year must carry forward to the subsequent fiscal year and not lapse to the general fund. The money carried forward under this section must be used as the first source of funds in the subsequent fiscal year. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (3) Not later than March 15, the department shall report the amount of revenue generated from the sale of documents produced and distributed by the department in the previous fiscal year and the amount of revenue generated from the sale of documents produced and distributed by the department carried forward into the current fiscal year. Sec. 307. (1) If the revenue collected by the department for radiological health administration and projects from fees and collections exceeds the amount appropriated in part 1, the revenue must be carried forward into the subsequent fiscal year. The revenue carried forward under this section must be used as the first source of funds in the subsequent fiscal year. (2) Not later than March 15, the department shall report the total amount of revenue from fees and collections for any radiological health administration and projects that was carried forward from the previous fiscal year. MICHIGAN STATE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY Sec. 401. (1) Not later than March 15, MSHDA shall submit a report on the status of the authority's housing production goals under all financing programs established or administered by the authority. The report must include all of the following: (a) Information on efforts to raise affordable multifamily and single-family housing production goals. (b) A summary of each MSHDA program that is intended to increase the supply of affordable multifamily and single-family housing. (c) An explanation of how programs summarized in subdivision (b) are utilized by the citizens of this state. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (d) MSHDA's status in obtaining its multifamily and single-family housing production goals. (2) MSHDA shall not restrict eligibility in any financing program for housing units without a permanent foundation unless this restriction is required by the funding source. Sec. 402. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for the Michigan housing and community development program must be expended for projects as described in sections 58b and 58c of the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1458b and 125.1458c. (2) MSHDA shall transmit the annual report required under section 58b of the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1458b, to the standard report recipients at the time the report is produced. Sec. 403. Not later than March 15, the department shall report on the work that MSHDA has undertaken with the department, the fund, and the department of health and human services and any other department. state LAND BANK AUTHORITY Sec. 451. (1) In addition to the amounts appropriated in part 1, the state land bank authority may expend revenues received under the land bank fast track act, 2003 PA 258, MCL 124.751 to 124.774, for the purposes authorized by the act, including, but not limited to, the acquisition, lease, management, demolition, maintenance, or rehabilitation of real or personal property, payment of debt service for notes or bonds issued by the authority, and other expenses to clear or quiet title property held by the authority. The state land bank authority may establish partnerships with local 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 land bank authorities. (2) Not later than March 15, the state land bank authority shall submit a report on the number of real properties acquired, leased, managed, demolished, maintained, or rehabilitated in the previous fiscal year and list any partnerships that the state land bank authority has with any local land bank authorities. The report must also include a list of any properties sold by or otherwise transferred from the state land bank authority in the previous fiscal year. MICHIGAN STRATEGIC FUND Sec. 501. The report required under section 9 of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2009, must be transmitted not later than March 15. Sec. 502. In addition to the appropriations in part 1, Travel Michigan may receive and expend private revenue related to the use of "Pure Michigan" and all other copyrighted slogans and images. This revenue may come from the direct licensing of the name and image or from the royalty payments from various merchandise sales. Revenue collected is appropriated for the marketing of this state as a travel destination. The funds are available for expenditure when they are received by the department of treasury. If the fund receives revenues from the use of "Pure Michigan", the fund shall provide a report that lists the revenues by source received from the use of "Pure Michigan" and all other copyrighted slogans and images. The report must provide a detailed list of expenditures of revenues received under this section. The report must be provided not later than March 15. Sec. 503. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for Pure Michigan 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 must be used for the following purposes: (a) Conduction of market research regionally, nationally, and internationally for use in marketing campaigns. (b) Production of advertisements that promote Michigan as a travel and tourism destination. (c) Placement of advertisements that have a diverse representation in regional, national, and international marketing campaigns to promote Michigan as a state that welcomes all individuals and families. (d) Not more than 4.0% of the appropriation for administration of the program. (2) Subject to the approval of the Michigan strategic fund board, the fund may contract any of the activities under subsection (1). (3) The fund may work in cooperation with local units of government, nonprofit entities, and private entities on Pure Michigan promotion campaigns. The fund shall include agreements prior to undertaking cooperative marketing campaigns. (4) The department shall provide an annual report not later than March 15 on the utilization of funds for eligible activities in subsection (1), including a breakdown by eligible use, efforts taken to broaden the scope of marketing activities to diverse populations, a breakdown of funds spent within this state and outside of this state, and how much was expended on market research. (5) As prescribed by the legislature, funds appropriated to Pure Michigan must be used only for this state to market itself as a travel and tourist destination with the sole purpose of attracting new visitors and retaining former visitors. All of the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 following apply to marketing under this subsection: (a) Promotion may be made by print, television, radio, and social media. (b) The purpose of the advertisements under subdivision (a) must be to attract tourism and leisure travelers to this state. (c) Advertisements that incorporate the Pure Michigan Byways campaign satisfy the requirement under subdivision (b). (6) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for Pure Michigan, $3,000,000.00 must be used by the fund for special events. Sec. 506. As a condition of receiving funds appropriated in part 1 and not later than March 15, the fund must provide a report of all approved amendments to projects for the immediately preceding year under sections 88r and 90b of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2088r and 125.2090b. The report must provide a description of each amendment, by award, that includes, but is not limited to, the following: (a) The amended award amount relative to the prior award amount. (b) The amended number of committed jobs relative to the prior number of committed jobs. (c) The amended amount of qualified investment committed relative to the prior amount of qualified investment committed. (d) A description of any change in scope of the project. (e) A description of any change in project benchmarks, deadlines, or completion dates. (f) The reason or justification for the amendment approval. Sec. 507. (1) As a condition of receiving funds appropriated in part 1, the fund must request the following information from the MEDC: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) Approved budget from the MEDC executive committee for the current fiscal year and actual budget expenditures for the previous fiscal years. (b) Expenditures and revenues as part of the current and previous year budgets, including the available fund balance for the current and previous fiscal years. (c) The total number of FTEs, by state and corporate status and whether the position is currently filled or unfilled. (d) A reporting of activities, programs, and grants consistent with the previous fiscal year budget. (e) A description of all subprograms funded with the small business supports line item. (2) Information received by the fund under this section must be posted online and distributed to the standard report recipients not later than March 15. Sec. 508. As a condition of receiving funds under part 1, any interlocal agreement entered into by the fund must include language that states that if a local unit of government has a contract or memorandum of understanding with a private economic development agency, the MEDC will work cooperatively with that private organization in that local area. Sec. 509. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall notify the standard report recipients not later than 45 days after the purchase of land or options on land and include in the notification the location of the land, information on the entity that sold the land, and the purchase price of the land or option on land. (2) If land or options on land are purchased under subsection (1), the fund shall provide a report not later than March 15 that 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 provides a list of all properties purchased, all options on land purchased, the location of the land purchased, and the purchase price. Sec. 510. As a condition for receiving funds in part 1, not later than March 15, the fund shall provide a report for the previous fiscal year on the jobs for Michigan investment fund, created in section 88h of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2088h. The report must include, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) A detailed listing of revenues, by fund source, to the jobs for Michigan investment fund. The listing must include the manner and reason for which the funds were appropriated to the jobs for Michigan investment fund. (b) A detailed listing of expenditures, by project, from the jobs for Michigan investment fund. (c) A fiscal year-end balance of the jobs for Michigan investment fund. Sec. 511. (1) From the appropriations in part 1 to the fund and granted or transferred to the MEDC, any unexpended or unencumbered balance must be disposed of in accordance with the requirements in the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594, unless carryforward authorization has been otherwise provided for. (2) Any encumbered funds, including encumbered funds subsequently unobligated, must be used for the same purposes for which funding was originally appropriated in this part and part 1. (3) For funds appropriated in part 1 to the fund, any carryforward authorization subsequently created through a work project must be preserved until a cash or accrued expenditure has 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 been executed or the allowable work project time period has expired. Sec. 512. (1) As a condition of receiving funds under part 1, the fund must ensure that the MEDC and the fund comply with all of the following: (a) The freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (b) The open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. (c) Annual audits of all financial records by the auditor general or the auditor general's designee. (d) All reports required by law to be submitted to the legislature. (2) If the MEDC is unable for any reason to perform duties under this part, the fund may exercise those duties. Sec. 513. As a condition for receiving the appropriations in part 1, any staff of the MEDC involved in private fund-raising activities must not be party to any decisions regarding the awarding of grants, incentives, or tax abatements from the fund, the critical industry program, the Michigan strategic site readiness program, the MEDC, or the MEGA. Sec. 514. All of the funds appropriated in part 1 for small business supports must be used to provide support to small businesses, as defined by the United States Small Business Administration. These supports must include all of the following activities: (a) Grants to support small business and community incubators. (b) Grants to small business development centers. (c) Grants to support community development financial institutions. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (d) Grants to small business service providers. (e) Grants for technical assistance for small businesses. (f) Grants for manufacturing and automation support services for small businesses. (g) Grants for early stage funding and venture capital for new and startup companies. Sec. 515. (1) The fund shall report on the status of the film incentives at the same time as it submits the annual report required under section 455 of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1455. The department of treasury shall provide the fund with the data necessary to prepare the report. Incentives included in the report shall include all of the following: (a) The tax credit provided under section 455 of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1455. (b) The tax credit provided under section 457 of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1457. (c) The tax credit provided under section 459 of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1459. (d) The amount of any tax credit claimed under former section 367 of the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281. (e) Any tax credits provided for film and digital media production under the Michigan economic growth authority act, 1995 PA 24, MCL 207.801 to 207.810. (f) Loans to an eligible production company or film and digital media private equity fund authorized under section 88d(3), (4), and (5) of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2088d. (2) The report must include all of the following information: (a) For each tax credit, the number of contracts signed, the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 projected expenditures qualifying for the credit, and the estimated value of the credits. For loans, the number of loans made under each section, the interest rate of those loans, the loan amount, the percent of the projected budget of each production financed by those loans, and the estimated interest earnings from the loan. (b) For credits authorized under section 455 of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1455, for productions completed by December 31, the expenditures of each production eligible for the credit that has filed a request for certificate of completion with the film office, broken down into expenditures for goods, services, or salaries and wages and showing separately expenditures in each local unit of government, including expenditures for personnel, whether or not they were made to a Michigan entity, and whether or not they were taxable under the laws of this state. (c) For loans, the report must include the number of loans that have been fully repaid, with principal and interest shown separately, and the number of loans that are delinquent or in default, and the amount of principal that is delinquent or is in default. (d) For each of the tax credit incentives and loan incentives listed in subsection (1), a breakdown for each project or production showing each of the following: (i) The number of temporary jobs created. (ii) The number of permanent jobs created. (iii) The number of persons employed in Michigan as a result of the incentive, on a full-time equated basis. (3) For any information not included in the report due to the provisions of section 455(6), 457(6), or 459(6) of the Michigan 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1455, 208.1457, and 208.1459, the report shall do all of the following: (a) Indicate how the information would describe the commercial and financial operations or intellectual property of the company. (b) Attest that the information has not been publicly disseminated at any time. (c) Describe how disclosure of the information may put the company at a competitive disadvantage. (4) Any information not disclosed due to the provisions of section 455(6), 457(6), or 459(6) of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1455, 208.1457, and 208.1459, must be presented at the lowest level of aggregation that would no longer describe the commercial and financial operations or intellectual property of the company. (5) As a condition of receiving funds in part 1, not later than March 15, the fund shall provide a report on the activities of the Michigan film and digital media office for the previous fiscal year. The report must include, but is not limited to, a listing of all projects the Michigan film and digital media office provided assistance on, a listing of the services provided for each project, and an estimate of investment leveraged. Sec. 516. As a condition of receiving an award from the fund, each business incubator or accelerator that received an award from the fund must maintain and update a dashboard of indicators to measure the effectiveness of the business incubator and accelerator programs. Indicators must include the direct jobs created, new companies launched as a direct result of business incubator or accelerator involvement, businesses expanded as a direct result of business incubator or accelerator involvement, direct investment in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 client companies, private equity financing obtained by client companies, grant funding obtained by client companies, and other measures developed by the recipient business incubators and accelerators in conjunction with the MEDC. Dashboard indicators must be reported for the previous fiscal year and cumulatively, if available. Each recipient shall submit a copy of their dashboard indicators to the fund by March 1. The fund shall transmit the local reports not later than March 15. Sec. 519. For the funds appropriated in part 1 for small business supports, the fund shall report quarterly on the amount of funds considered appropriated, pre-encumbered, encumbered, and expended by current fiscal year appropriation and each work project for any previous fiscal years. The report must also include a listing of all previous appropriations for business attraction and community revitalization, or a predecessor, that were considered appropriated, pre-encumbered, encumbered, or expended that have lapsed back to the fund for any purpose. Sec. 520. (1) The fund, in conjunction with the department of treasury, shall report not later than November 1 on the annual cost of the MEGA tax credits. The report must include for each year the board-approved credit amount, adjusted for credit amendments where applicable, and the actual and projected value of tax credits for each year from 1995 to the expiration of the credit program. For years for which credit claims are complete, the report must include the total of actual certificated credit amounts. For years that claims are still pending or not yet submitted, the report must include a combination of actual credits where available and projected credits. Credit projections must be based on updated estimates of employees, wages, and benefits for eligible companies. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (2) In addition to the report under subsection (1), the fund, in conjunction with the department of treasury, shall report not later than November 1 on the annual cost of all other certificated credits by program, for each year until the credits expire or can no longer be collected. The report must include estimates on the brownfield redevelopment credit, film credits, MEGA photovoltaic technology credit, MEGA polycrystalline silicon manufacturing credit, MEGA vehicle battery credit, and other certificated credits. Sec. 521. As a condition of receiving appropriations in part 1, prior to authorizing the transfer of any previously authorized tax credit that would increase the liability to this state, the fund, on behalf of the fund's board, must notify the standard report recipients of the transfer of any previously authorized tax credit that would increase the liability to this state not fewer than 30 days prior to the authorization of the tax credit transfer. Sec. 523. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the funds collected by state historic preservation programs for document reproduction and services and application fees are appropriated for all expenses necessary to provide the required services. These funds are available for expenditure when they are received and may be carried forward into the succeeding fiscal year. Sec. 524. Tax capture revenues collected in accordance with written agreements under the good jobs for Michigan program and transferred from the general fund for deposit into the good jobs for Michigan fund, and for both calculated payments from the good jobs for Michigan fund to authorized businesses and distributions to the fund for administrative expenses, are appropriated under the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 provisions of chapter 8D of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2090g to 125.2090j. Sec. 525. The department shall provide a report not later than March 15 that includes, but is not limited to, fiscal year-to-date expenditures by division and program unit within the job creation services line item. The report must contain detailed information on expenditures and programs within the state historic preservation office, including a list of any entities that receive financial support from the state historic preservation office. Sec. 526. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for Michigan office of defense and aerospace innovation shall be used by the Michigan strategic fund to protect and grow the defense and homeland security industry in this state by protecting this state's current department of defense missions, infrastructure, and industry, including securing new missions and increasing defense and homeland security spending in this state. These funds may be used for, but are not limited to, the following activities: (a) Helping businesses in this state identify federal defense contract opportunities. (b) Providing technical assistance for bid responses to federal defense contracts. (c) Strengthening cybersecurity compliance at businesses in this state to qualify for federal defense contracts. (2) Not later than March 15, the Michigan office of defense and aerospace innovation shall provide an annual report. The report must include, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) A strategic plan for the organization. (b) An overview of the defense industry in this state, including identification of recent accomplishments and services 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 provided to businesses in this state in the most recent year. (c) A list of expenditures used to fund memberships in organizations and costs associated with attending conferences and expositions in the previous fiscal year. (d) The most recent annual figures on direct domestic defense-related contracts and grants awarded to Michigan-based entities in the previous fiscal year. (e) A summary of contracts or defense industry business with international clients. Sec. 527. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for rural jobs and capital investment, the fund, in conjunction with the MEDC and the department, shall make grants, loans, or other types of economic assistance available to rural jobs and capital investment funds in this state as provided under section 90n of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2090n. Sec. 528. From the funds appropriated in research institution grant, a grant of not less than $1,500,000.00 must be awarded through a competitive grant process to an independent research institution not affiliated with a university or hospital that does basic research in the areas of cancer and Parkinsonï¿½s Disease that also receives grants from the National Institutes of Health. Dollars awarded must go 100% to basic research and not for costs associated with administering the grant. EMPLOYMENT SERVICES Sec. 602. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, all funds necessary to pay approved claims and administrative costs incurred during this fiscal year, as allowed in the Christopher R. Slezak first responder presumed coverage fund created in section 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 405 of the worker's disability compensation act of 1969, 1969 PA 317, MCL 418.405, are appropriated for the purposes authorized under section 405 of the worker's disability compensation act of 1969, 1969 PA 317, MCL 418.405. (2) The department shall provide a year-end report to the Michigan gaming control board, the department of treasury, and the standard report recipients that includes, but is not limited to, the total of all approved claims and administrative costs incurred as of September 30 of the current fiscal year. WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT Sec. 701. The department shall administer the PATH training program in accordance with the requirements of section 407(d) of title IV of the social security act, 42 USC 607, the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.1 to 400.119b, and all other applicable laws and regulations. Sec. 702. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for workforce development, the department may allocate funding for grants to nonprofit organizations that offer programs under the workforce innovation and opportunity act, 29 USC 3101 to 3361, for eligible youth that focus on apprenticeship readiness, pre-apprenticeship and apprenticeship activities, entrepreneurship, work-readiness skills, job shadowing, or financial literacy. Additionally, programs eligible for funding under this section must include the participation of local business partners. The department shall develop other appropriate eligibility requirements to ensure compliance with applicable federal rules and regulations. (2) Not later than March 15, the department shall report at least all of the following: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) Total grants expended under this section in the previous fiscal year. (b) The total number of students served from the grants appropriated under this section. (c) A list of all organizations and the amount each organization received from the funding appropriated under this section. Sec. 703. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall make available, in person or by telephone, 1 disabled veterans outreach program specialist or local veterans employment representative to Michigan works service centers, as resources permit, during hours of operation, and shall continue to make the appropriate placement of veterans and disabled veterans a priority. Sec. 704. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, any unencumbered and unrestricted funds allocated under the federal workforce innovation and opportunity act, 29 USC 3101 to 3361, or trade adjustment assistance funds available from previous fiscal years are appropriated for the purposes originally intended. (2) The department shall report not later than March 15 on the amount, by fiscal year, of funds allocated under the federal workforce innovation and opportunity act, 29 USC 3101 to 3361, appropriated under this section. Sec. 705. (1) The department shall publish data and reports on April 30 and October 30 on the department website concerning the status of Going pro funded in part 1. The report must include the following: (a) The number of awardees participating in the program and the names of those awardees organized by major industry group. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) The amount of funding received by each awardee under the program. (c) The amount of funding leveraged from each awardee. (d) The training models established by each awardee. (e) The number of individuals enrolled in classroom training, on-the-job training, or new USDOL registered apprentices. (f) The number of qualified employees who completed the approved training. (g) The number of applications received and the number of grants awarded for each region. (h) The number of individuals hired and trained, the number of incumbent workers trained, and the number of USDOL registered apprentices. (i) Going pro expenditures by fiscal year. Active fiscal years must display projected expenditure data and closed fiscal years must display final expenditure data. (2) The department shall expand workforce training and reemployment services to better connect workers to in-demand jobs and identify specific outcomes with performance metrics for this initiative, including, but not limited to, new apprenticeships, individuals to be hired and trained, current employees trained, training completed, employment retention rate at 6 months, and hourly wage at 6 months. Sec. 706. (1) To the extent consistent with sections 7 and 9 of the Going pro talent fund act, 2018 PA 260, MCL 408.157 and 408.159, the department shall administer the program as follows: (a) The department shall work cooperatively with grantees to maximize the amount of funds from part 1 that are available for direct training. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) The department, workforce development partners, including regional Michigan works agencies, and employers shall collaborate and work cooperatively to prioritize and streamline the expenditure of the funds appropriated in part 1. The department shall ensure that Going pro provides a collaborative statewide network of workforce and employee skill development partners that addresses the employee talent needs throughout this state. (c) The department shall do all of the following: (i) Develop program goals and detailed guidance for prospective participants to follow to qualify under the program. (ii) Post the program goals and detailed guidance on the department's website and distribute the program goals and detailed guidance to workforce development partners, including local Michigan works agencies, not later than October 1. (iii) Conduct periodic assessments of employer and employee needs that are evaluated on a regional basis. (iv) Identify solutions and goals to be implemented to satisfy employer and employee needs. (v) Add scoring criteria that incentivize awards to new program applicants. (d) The department shall use not more than 2% of the total Going pro appropriation for administration of the program. (e) Not less than 5% of available funding must be reserved for businesses in talent fund priority industry sectors that submit competitive applications. (f) Allow the MiSTEM council to assist in processing grant applications. (2) The department shall, to the extent possible, distribute not less than 50% of the Going pro appropriation to first-time 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 grant recipients and to grant recipients who did not receive an award under the program in the previous fiscal year. Sec. 707. The funds appropriated in part 1 for MiSTEM advisory council must be used to support the staff for the MiSTEM network, and for administrative, training, and travel costs related to the MiSTEM council. The MiSTEM network may receive funds from private sources. If the MiSTEM network receives funds from a private source, those funds are appropriated and must be expended in alignment with the statewide STEM strategy. If the MiSTEM network receives funds from a private source, not later than 10 days after receipt of the funds, the department shall report to the standard report recipients the name of the private source and the amount of the funds the private source provided to the MiSTEM network. The staff for the MiSTEM network shall do all of the following: (a) Serve as a liaison among and between the department, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, the department of education, the MiSTEM council, the governor's workforce development board, the MiSTEM regions, and any other relevant organization or entity in a manner that creates a robust statewide STEM culture, empowers STEM teachers, integrates business and education into the STEM network, and ensures high-quality STEM experiences for pupils. (b) Coordinate the implementation of a marketing campaign, including, but not limited to, a website that includes dashboards of outcomes, to build STEM awareness and communicate STEM needs and opportunities to pupils, parents, educators, and the business community. (c) Work with the department of education and the MiSTEM council to coordinate, award, and monitor MiSTEM state and federal 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 grants to the MiSTEM network regions and conduct reviews of grant recipients, including, but not limited to, pupil experience and feedback. (d) Report to the governor, the legislature, and the MiSTEM council annually on the activities and performance of the MiSTEM network regions. (e) Coordinate recurring discussions and work with regional staff to ensure that a network or loop of feedback and best practices are shared, including funding, programming, professional learning opportunities, discussion of MiSTEM strategic vision, and regional objectives. (f) Coordinate major grant application efforts with the MiSTEM council to assist regional staff with grant applications on a local level. The MiSTEM council shall leverage private and nonprofit relationships to coordinate and align private funds in addition to funds appropriated under this section. (g) Train state and regional staff in the STEMworks rating system, in collaboration with the MiSTEM council and the Michigan department of education. (h) Hire MiSTEM network region staff in collaboration with the network region fiscal agent. Sec. 708. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for workforce development, the department shall provide a report on the status of workforce development not later than March 15. The report must include the following: (a) The amount of funding allocated to each Michigan works agency and the total funding allocated to the workforce training programs statewide by fund source. (b) The number of participants enrolled in education or 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 training programs by each Michigan works agency. (c) The average duration of training for training program participants by each Michigan works agency. (d) The number of participants enrolled in remedial education programs and the number of participants enrolled in literacy programs. (e) The number of participants enrolled in programs at 2-year institutions. (f) The number of participants enrolled in programs at 4-year institutions. (g) The number of participants enrolled in proprietary schools or other technical training programs. (h) The number of participants who completed an education or training program. (i) The number of participants who completed a training program and secured employment in a field related to their training. (j) The average wage earned by participants who completed a training program and secured employment within 1 year. (k) The actual revenues received by the fund source and fund appropriated for each discrete workforce development program area. (l) The average cost of training per individual served, with an average provided for participants at 2-year institutions, participants at 4-year institutions, and participants at proprietary schools and other technical training programs. (2) Data collection for the report must be for the previous state fiscal year. Sec. 709. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for federal work requirements support, $15,000,000.00 is allocated for 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the purpose of assisting individuals who must comply with both of the following: (a) The supplemental nutrition assistance program (SNAP) work requirements under section 10102 of Public Law 119-21. (b) The Medicaid community engagement requirements under section 71119 of Public Law 119-21. (2) For the purpose of counting qualifying hours for community service activities, the department shall permit only community service activities that are the performance of voluntary work or duties that are a public benefit and serve to improve quality of life, enhance resident self-sufficiency, or increase resident self-responsibility in the community. A community service activity is not employment and must not include political activities. (3) On a quarterly basis, the department shall provide a report on all of the following outcomes related to compliance with the SNAP work requirements and the Medicaid community engagement requirements under sections 10102 and 71119 of Public Law 119-21, with monthly data provided as available: (a) The number of individuals receiving SNAP or Medicaid who were referred to Michigan works agencies. (b) The number of individuals receiving SNAP or Medicaid who were referred to Michigan works agencies and who were compliant with the work and community engagement requirements. (c) The number of individuals receiving SNAP or Medicaid who were referred to Michigan works agencies and who were not compliant with the work and community engagement requirements. (d) The total number of hours worked for all of the following qualifying activities by the individuals receiving SNAP or Medicaid who were referred to Michigan works agencies: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (i) Paid employment. (ii) Community service activities. (iii) A qualifying work program. (iv) An educational program. (v) Any other qualifying activity. (e) The number of individuals who no longer participate or receive SNAP or Medicaid benefits due to full employment. Sec. 710. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for 23+ high school diploma program must be awarded for a program to assist Michigan residents who are 23 years of age or older in obtaining high school diplomas and placement in career training programs. (2) For purposes of this section, an eligible program provider may be a public, nonprofit, or private accredited diploma-granting institution, but must have not less than 2 years of experience providing dropout recovery services in this state. (3) The department shall issue a request for qualifications for eligible program providers to participate in the program. To be considered a qualified program provider, the institution must offer all of the following: (a) Dropout reengagement services. (b) Academic intake assessments. (c) An integrated learning plan. (d) A course catalog that includes all graduation requirements. (e) Remediation coursework. (f) Academic resilience assessment and intervention. (g) Employability skills development such as WorkKeys preparation. (h) Industry recognized credentials. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (i) Credit for on-the-job training. (j) A robust support framework, including technology, social support, and academic support. (4) The department shall announce qualified program providers not later than January 1 of the current fiscal year. Qualified program providers must start providing programming by February 1 of the current fiscal year. (5) The department shall reimburse qualified program providers for each month of satisfactory monthly progress as described in section 23a of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1623a, at a rate of $500.00 per month. A payment shall be made to a qualified program provider for the completion of the following by an eligible participant: (a) $500.00 for the completion of an employability skills program equal to at least 1 unit of high school credit obtained through classroom or online instruction. (b) $250.00 for the attainment of an industry-recognized credential requiring up to 50 hours of training. (c) $500.00 for the attainment of an industry-recognized credential requiring 50 to 100 hours of training. (d) $750.00 for the attainment of an industry-recognized credential requiring more than 100 hours of training. (e) $1,000.00 for the attainment of a high school diploma awarded for satisfying Michigan merit curriculum requirements or an approved personal curriculum, as defined by the Michigan department of education. (f) $2,500.00 for placement in a job in an in-demand career pathway. (6) The department shall develop policies and guidelines to 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 implement this section. The department may prioritize funding for previously qualified program providers based on all of the following criteria: (a) The highest number of students served by a previously qualified program provider during the previous fiscal year. (b) The highest number of graduates in a previously qualified program during the previous fiscal year. (c) The previously qualified program provider's ability to offer statewide access during the previous fiscal year. Sec. 711. The funds appropriated in part 1 for at-risk youth grants must be awarded to the Michigan franchise holder of the national Jobs for America's Graduates program for the administration of the Jobs for Michigan's Graduates program. Sec. 712. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for the high school equivalency-to-school program must be used to purchase and distribute vouchers that cover the cost of high school equivalency testing and certification under this section. The department shall administer a Michigan high school equivalency-to-school program that covers the cost of taking a high school equivalency test free of charge for individuals who meet all of the following requirements: (a) The individual has not previously been administered a high school equivalency test free of charge under this section. (b) The individual meets at least 1 of the following requirements: (i) Prior to taking the high school equivalency test, the individual successfully completed a department-approved high school equivalency preparation program. (ii) Prior to taking the high school equivalency test, the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 individual completed the official high school equivalency practice test and the individual's score indicated that the individual is likely to pass. (2) A department-approved high school equivalency preparation program must include all of the following: (a) Instructional and tutorial assistances. (b) High school equivalency test practice. (c) Required attendance at program instructional sessions. (d) A curriculum that prepares students for opportunities in postsecondary education and the job market. (e) Information on potential postsecondary and career pathways. (f) Counseling on preparing for and applying to college. (g) Personal and job readiness skills development. (h) Comprehensive information on college costs and financial aid. (i) College and career assessments. (j) Computer-based instruction, practice, or remediation. (3) The department shall post online an announcement of the Michigan high school equivalency-to-school program, minimum standards for high school equivalency preparation program approval, and approval procedures. (4) The department shall do all of the following: (a) Develop procedures consistent with this section under which individuals can take the high school equivalency test without charge. (b) Provide program information for educators and students on the department website, including explanations of the procedures developed under subparagraph (a), and contact information for 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 questions about the program. (c) Provide an estimate of the full-year cost of the program to the standard report recipients. (5) Not later than September 30, the department shall report on utilization of the high school equivalency incentive program, including numbers of high school equivalency certifications issued by location, year-to-date expenditures, and numbers of participants qualifying under subsection (1)(b)(i) or (ii), or both. Sec. 713. (1) The department shall provide reporting regarding the interagency agreement with the department of health and human services, which concerns TANF funding to provide job readiness and welfare-to-work programming. The reporting must include specific outcome and performance reporting requirements, as described in this section. TANF funding provided to the department in the current fiscal year is contingent on compliance with the data and reporting requirements described in this section. The department shall provide all of the following items for the previous year not later than January 1 of the current fiscal year: (a) An itemized spending report on TANF funding, including all of the following: (i) Direct services to clients. (ii) Administrative expenditures. (b) The number of family independence program clients served through the TANF funding, including all of the following: (i) The number and percentage who obtained employment through Michigan Works!. (ii) The number and percentage who fulfilled their TANF work requirement through other job readiness programming. (iii) Average TANF spending per client. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (iv) The number and percentage of clients who were referred to Michigan Works! but did not receive a job or job readiness placement and the reasons why. (2) Not later than March 15 of the current fiscal year, the department shall provide to the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on health and human services and the standard report recipients an annual report on the following matters itemized by Michigan works agency: (a) The number of referrals to Michigan works job readiness programs. (b) The number of referrals to Michigan works job readiness programs who became a participant in the Michigan works job readiness programs. (c) The number of participants who obtained employment. (d) The cost per participant case. (3) As used in this section, "TANF" means temporary assistance for needy families as described in 42 USC 601 to 619. Sec. 718. Not later than December 31, the Michigan high-speed internet office shall report to the legislature on any impediments to grantees of the federal broadband grant programs administered by the Michigan high-speed internet office, including utilization of utility pole attachments and public railroad crossings. Sec. 719. (1) Each regional Michigan works agency shall increase the number of employers within its respective region that the Michigan works agency collaborates with in order to increase the number of employers that participate within the Michigan works ecosystem. (2) On a quarterly basis, the department shall provide a report that contains monthly data on the number of added and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 removed employers, categorized by industry sector, in each Michigan works region. UNEMPLOYMENT Sec. 801. The unemployment insurance agency shall provide a report updated at least quarterly that includes, but is not limited to, fiscal year-to-date expenditures by division and program unit. The unemployment insurance agency shall transmit each quarterly report no later than 60 days after the end of each quarter. Sec. 802. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department, on behalf of the unemployment insurance agency, shall provide a quarterly report not later than 60 days after the end of each quarter that includes, but is not limited to, the following: (a) The average number of unique claimants for the quarter. (b) The average number of eligible claimants with certification for the quarter. (c) The average number of claims paid for the quarter. (d) The total amount of standard unemployment insurance payments paid for the quarter. (e) The total amount of unemployment insurance tax generated for the quarter. (f) The balance of the Michigan unemployment trust fund at the end of the quarter. (2) The department shall include the same information required in subsection (1) for the previous 12 months. The department shall include the most recent quarterly report on the department's website. Sec. 803. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall provide a quarterly report not later than 60 days 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 after the end of each quarter that includes, but is not limited to, the following: (a) The number of new fraudulent and noncompliant cases that have been identified or issued by the unemployment insurance agency, classified by employer or claimant, during the quarter. (b) The total amount of penalties and interest issued on fraudulent and noncompliant cases during the quarter. (c) The total amount of penalties and interest dollars received during the quarter by employer or claimant. (d) The total amount of collectible penalties and interest still owed to this state by employer or claimant. (e) The number of fraudulent and noncompliant cases that have been appealed by an employer or claimant during the quarter. Sec. 804. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for unemployment insurance agency must be used to staff unemployment insurance agency branch offices for in-person appointments for unemployment insurance agency claimant services. (2) The department shall provide a biannual report not later than March 15 and September 30 that includes all of the following: (a) The number and location of in-person offices. (b) The average number of staff at each location over the previous 6 months. (c) The volume of in-person claimants served at each location in the previous 6 months. (d) For the previous 6 months, the average number of staff at each location where the unemployment insurance agency offers in-person appointments, the average number of staff assigned to offering virtual appointments, and the average number of staff assigned to offering telephone appointments. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (e) For the previous 6 months, the volume of in-person claimants served at each location, the volume of claimants served through virtual appointments, and the volume of claimants served through telephone appointments. Sec. 806. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for unemployment insurance agency, the department shall maintain customer service standards for employers and claimants making use of the various means by which they can access the system. (2) The department shall identify specific outcomes and performance metrics for this initiative, including, but not limited to, the following: (a) Unemployment benefit fund balance. (b) Process improvement - fiscal integrity. (c) Process improvement - determination timeliness. (d) Process improvement - determination quality. Sec. 807. Funds earned or authorized by the USDOL in addition to the appropriation in part 1 for the unemployment insurance agency are appropriated and may be expended for staffing and related expenses incurred in the operation of its programs. These funds may be spent after the department notifies the standard report recipients of the purpose and amount of each grant award. REHABILITATION SERVICES Sec. 901. The Michigan rehabilitation services and bureau of services for blind persons shall work collaboratively with service organizations and government entities to identify allowable match dollars to secure available federal vocational rehabilitation funds. Sec. 902. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department shall provide an annual report on efforts taken to improve the Michigan rehabilitation services not later than March 15. The report must include all of the following items: (a) Changes in administrative costs and staffing, service delivery plans and implementation steps achieved, and reorganization plans and implementation steps achieved. (b) For the previous fiscal year, the number of individuals with disabilities served and the number of students with disabilities served. (c) The number of services provided in each allowable vocational rehabilitation service category. (d) Plans to integrate Michigan rehabilitative services programs into other services provided by the department. (e) Quarterly expenditures by major spending category. (f) Employment and job retention rates from both Michigan rehabilitation services and its nonprofit partners. (g) Success rate in achieving the program goals, by geographic region, in a manner determined by the department. (h) An explanation of each program goal that is set for Michigan rehabilitation services. Sec. 903. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for Michigan rehabilitation services, the department shall allocate funding along with available federal match to support the provision of vocational rehabilitation services to eligible agricultural workers with disabilities. Authorized services shall assist agricultural workers with disabilities in acquiring or maintaining quality employment and independence. (2) Not later than March 15, the department shall report on the total number of clients served and the total amount of federal 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 matching funds obtained throughout the duration of the program. Sec. 904. If the department is at risk of entering into an order of selection for services, the department shall notify the standard report recipients within 2 weeks of receiving notification. Sec. 905. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for independent living must be used to support the general operations of centers for independent living in delivering mandated independent living services in compliance with federal rules and regulations, including 2 CFR 200, by existing centers for independent living to serve underserved areas, and for projects to build the capacity of centers for independent living to deliver independent living services. Applications for the funds must be reviewed in accordance with criteria and procedures established by the department. Funds must be used in a manner consistent with the state plan for independent living. Services provided should assist people with disabilities to move toward self-sufficiency, including, but not limited to, support for accessing transportation and health care, obtaining employment, community living, nursing home transition, information and referral services, education, youth transition services, veterans, and stigma reduction activities and community education. This includes the independent living guide services that specifically focus on economic self-sufficiency. (2) Not later than March 15 and in partnership with service providers, the department shall provide a report on direct customer and system outcomes and performance measures. Sec. 906. Federal workforce innovation and opportunity vocational rehabilitation funds from prior years that are received in amounts in addition to those included in part 1 and that have 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 already met state matching requirements are appropriated for the purposes intended. The department may carry forward into the succeeding fiscal year unexpended federal workforce innovation and opportunity vocational rehabilitation funds that do not require additional state matching funds. Sec. 907. (1) The appropriation in part 1 for bureau of services for blind persons includes funds for case services. These funds may be used for tuition payments for blind clients. (2) Revenue collected by the bureau of services for blind persons and from private and local sources that is unexpended at the end of the fiscal year must carry forward to the subsequent fiscal year. Sec. 908. The bureau of services for blind persons may provide and enter into agreements to provide general services, training, meetings, information, special equipment, software, facility use, and technical consulting services to other principal executive departments, state agencies, local units of government, the judicial branch of government, other organizations, and patrons of department facilities. The department may charge fees for these services that are reasonably related to the cost of providing the services. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, funds collected by the department for these services are appropriated for all expenses necessary. The funds appropriated under this section are allotted for expenditure when they are received by the department of treasury. Sec. 909. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for a regional or subregional library must not be released until a budget for that regional or subregional library has been approved by the department for expenditures for library services directly serving the blind 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 and persons with disabilities. (2) To receive subregional state aid appropriated in part 1, a regional or subregional library's fiscal agency must agree to maintain local funding support at the same level in the current fiscal year as in the fiscal agency's previous fiscal year. If a reduction in expenditures equally affects all agencies in a local unit of government that includes the regional or subregional library's fiscal agency, the reduction must not be interpreted as a reduction in local support and must not disqualify a regional or subregional library from receiving state aid under part 1. If a reduction in income affects a library cooperative or district library that includes a regional or subregional library's fiscal agency or a reduction in expenditures for the regional or subregional library's fiscal agency, a reduction in expenditures for the regional or subregional library must not be interpreted as a reduction in local support and must not disqualify a regional or subregional library from receiving state aid under part 1. COMMISSIONS Sec. 951. Any commission established in statute or by executive order that receives appropriations in part 1 must produce a report by January 31. The report must include, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) Total number of people with whom the commission directly interacts through programming. (b) Total number of public events that the commission conducted. (c) A description of the activities that the commission initiated to promote cooperation with other commissions. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (d) The programmatic costs of the commission. (e) A list of all grant recipients. (f) The amount each grant recipient received. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Sec. 1001. (1) The legislative spending transparency fund is created in the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the legislative spending transparency fund. Expenditures from the legislative spending transparency fund shall be made only to support items that are appropriated in compliance with sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. (3) Interest and earnings from the investment of money deposited into the legislative spending transparency fund must be deposited into the general fund. (4) From the unexpended and unencumbered funds remaining in the strategic outreach and attraction reserve fund and in work project accounts for the strategic outreach and attraction reserve fund, the critical industry program, and the Michigan strategic site readiness program, the Michigan strategic fund shall work with the state budget director to lapse a total of $150,000,000.00. This money is appropriated to and must be deposited in the legislative spending transparency fund. (5) From the unexpended and unencumbered funds remaining in the strategic outreach and attraction reserve fund and in work project accounts for the strategic outreach and attraction reserve fund, the critical industry program, and the Michigan strategic site readiness program, the Michigan strategic fund shall work with 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the state budget director to lapse a total of $206,722,900.00. This money is appropriated to and must be deposited in the general fund. (6) As used in this section: (a) "Critical industry program" means the critical industry program created under section 88s of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2088s. (b) "Michigan strategic site readiness program" means the Michigan strategic site readiness program created under section 88t of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2088t. (c) "Strategic outreach and attraction reserve fund" means the strategic outreach and attraction reserve fund created in section 4 of the Michigan trust fund act, 2000 PA 489, MCL 12.254. Sec. 1002. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $1,000,000.00 must be awarded to the village of Carsonville in Sanilac County for construction of new municipal wells and associated infrastructure. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $2,500,000.00 must be awarded to the city of Mount Clemens in Macomb County for a housing development project. (3) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $3,500,000.00 must be awarded to the Macomb County department of roads for construction on Rivergate Drive. (4) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $15,000,000.00 must be awarded to the city of Owosso in Shiawassee County for replacement of nitrification towers at the Owosso wastewater treatment plant. (5) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $600,000.00 must be awarded to Bangor Charter Township in Bay County for improvements to the municipal water distribution system. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (6) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $1,995,000.00 must be awarded to the city of Bay City in Bay County for the Lafayette Bridge replacement and reconstruction project. (7) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $1,500,000.00 must be awarded to Denmark Township in Tuscola County for replacement of the townshipï¿½s sewer lagoon liner. (8) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $500,000.00 must be awarded to 906 Adventure Team in Marquette County for development and construction of Gluski Park. (9) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $682,000.00 must be awarded to the Baraga County road commission for flood damage recovery. (10) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $700,000.00 must be awarded to the city of Negaunee in Marquette County for the purchase of an apparatus fire truck. (11) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $1,400,000.00 must be awarded to Superior Central Schools for creation of safe parking and drop-off sites. (12) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $35,000.00 must be awarded to United Way of Marquette County for expansion of the volunteer income tax assistance program. (13) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $1,000,000.00 must be awarded to Waucedah Township in Dickinson County for the replacement of Waucedah Road. (14) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $2,500,000.00 must be awarded to the Mason- 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Griffith Founders Chapter of Trout Unlimited for infrastructure and river restoration on the Au Sable River and the upper Manistee River. (15) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $25,000.00 must be awarded to Bedford Township in Monroe County for a veterans memorial. (16) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $5,000,000.00 must be awarded to the Michigan Research Institute to deploy infrastructure at Camp Grayling to support its creation as a national contested logistics training center and manufacturing capabilities at Selfridge Air National Guard Base. (17) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $1,500,000.00 must be awarded to Target Alpena Development Corporation for development of workforce housing, grant assistance, and small business infrastructure. (18) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $1,700,000.00 must be awarded to Holland Hospital in Ottawa County to expand services and to offer advanced endoscopy. (19) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $100,000.00 must be awarded to Holland Tulip Time Festival Inc. for festival programming. (20) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $4,250,000.00 must be awarded to the city of Algonac in St. Clair County to support canal siphon crossing replacements, sewer line replacements, and other infrastructure projects. (21) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $600,500.00 must be awarded to the city of St. Clair in St. Clair County to address failing soil stabilization. (22) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $1,000,000.00 must be awarded to Lake Superior 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 State University for electrical and data system upgrades. (23) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $600,000.00 must be awarded to Michigan Technological University for an analysis of Mackinac Bridge conditions and closures. (24) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $2,500,000.00 must be awarded to North Central Michigan College to support the purchase of a facility for a new dental hygiene program. (25) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $56,000.00 must be awarded to the Albion department of public safety in Calhoun County to support purchases of public safety equipment. (26) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $950,000.00 must be awarded to Bedford Charter Township in Calhoun County for rebuilding the townshipï¿½s fire station 1. (27) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $845,000.00 must be awarded to the Clarence Township fire department in Calhoun County for the purchase of a fire truck. (28) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $500,000.00 must be awarded to Greater Kingdom International in Calhoun County to support the revitalization and redevelopment of Orchard Park. (29) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $300,000.00 must be awarded to Haven of Rest Ministries in Calhoun County for life recovery programs. (30) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $250,000.00 must be awarded to Lee Township in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Calhoun County to support construction of a township maintenance building to house first responder equipment and vehicles. (31) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $85,000.00 must be awarded to the Michigan Sheriffsï¿½ Association for victim support and trainings. (32) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $750,000.00 must be awarded to Washington Heights United Methodist Church and Community in Calhoun County to support the healthy homes and homeownership stabilization project. (33) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $750,000.00 must be awarded to Watertown Township in Tuscola County for the purchase of a fire truck. (34) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $2,827,500.00 must be awarded to the Lapeer County road commission for reconstruction of Bowers Road from M-53 to Wilder Road. (35) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $2,000,000.00 must be awarded to the Waterford Charter Township regional fire department in Oakland County for construction of a modern regional fire station. (36) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $834,400.00 must be awarded to the city of the Village of Clarkston in Oakland County to improve walkability and pedestrian safety. (37) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $2,200,000.00 must be awarded to the city of Rose City in Ogemaw County for improvements to the public water supply system. (38) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $300,000.00 must be awarded to Northern Bay 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Ambulance in Bay County for the purchase of an ambulance. (39) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $350,000.00 must be awarded to Adrian Charter Township in Lenawee County for a consolidated public safety facility for the township. (40) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $1,500,000.00 must be awarded to the Lenawee Now Foundation for a career pilot program. (41) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $1,200,000.00 must be awarded to Ronald Township in Ionia County for construction of a township community center and fire station. (42) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $910,000.00 must be awarded to the Elsie Area fire department in Clinton County for a dedicated permanent fire station. (43) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $500,000.00 must be awarded to the village of Maple Rapids in Clinton County for design and engineering costs associated with the Maple Rapids Bridge. (44) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $800,000.00 must be awarded to the village of Breckenridge in Gratiot County for rehabilitation of gravity sewer mains and manhole protection. (45) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $1,000,000.00 must be awarded to Veterans of Foreign Wars post 4037 and American Legion post 167 in Oakland County for a comprehensive building remodel. (46) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 directed spending items, $3,000,000.00 must be awarded to the Center for Behavioral Health and Justice at Wayne State University to enhance collaboration, cooperation, and interoperability between 911, 988, law enforcement, community mental health, and other community resources. (47) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $1,012,900.00 must be awarded to the city of Riverview fire department in Wayne County for the purchase of a fire truck and associated equipment. (48) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $6,500,000.00 must be awarded to the city of Southgate in Wayne County to rehabilitate the cityï¿½s aging water distribution system. (49) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $222,000.00 must be awarded to the city of Southgate in Wayne County for upgrading police radios. (50) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $1,900,000.00 must be awarded to the city of Wyandotte in Wayne County for the purchase of an aerial ladder truck. (51) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $600,000.00 must be awarded to Bessemer Area Schools to bring elevators into compliance with code. (52) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $600,000.00 must be awarded to Gogebic Community College to replace three elevators. (53) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $2,000,000.00 must be awarded to Families and Children Together in Genesee County for program expansion. (54) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $950,000.00 must be awarded to Groveland Township 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 in Oakland County for the installation of ten high-capacity wells. (55) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $3,300,000.00 must be awarded to the Muskegon County road commission to repair Blackmer Road in Ravenna Township. (56) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $4,170,100.00 must be awarded to the city of Linden in Genesee County to support the final phase of a drinking water source infrastructure project. (57) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $1,000,000.00 must be awarded to the village of Shepherd in Isabella County to support a sanitary sewer lining and manhole rehabilitation project. (58) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $500,000.00 must be awarded to IM Kids 3rd Meal in Ionia County to secure and equip a facility to serve as a permanent location for the program. (59) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $3,000,000.00 must be awarded to the city of Buchanan in Berrien County and to Bertrand Township in Berrien County for the extension of water and sewer lines to Bertrand Crossing Industrial Park. (60) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $344,800.00 must be awarded to the St. Clair County road commission for the repair and maintenance of Airport Drive. (61) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $1,000,000.00 must be awarded to Kidsï¿½ Food Basket in west Michigan for operational support. (62) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $350,000.00 must be awarded to the city of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Escanaba in Delta County for the purchase of a ladder truck. (63) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $3,730,000.00 must be awarded to the city of Utica in Macomb County for water main replacement projects. (64) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $8,000,000.00 must be awarded to Construction Education Trust in Macomb County to support the purchase, construction, renovation, and equipping of training and education facilities, curriculum development, and marketing. (65) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $2,000,000.00 must be awarded to Macomb County public works to complete the daylighting of the Sterling Relief Drain. (66) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $3,000,000.00 must be awarded to Munson Healthcare for initial startup and operational costs for an adult crisis residential unit in the Grand Traverse Mental Health Crisis and Access Center. (67) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $167,100.00 must be awarded to the city of Jackson police department for the purchase and equipping of traffic unit vehicles. (68) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $300,000.00 must be awarded to Jackson County for the creation of a federally certified aviation maintenance technician trade school. (69) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $1,185,100.00 must be awarded to the Jackson County sheriffï¿½s office to remodel a portion of the Chanter Road Facility 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 for services for female inmates. (70) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $212,300.00 must be awarded to Jackson Hillsdale community mental health board to purchase an innovative mobile mental health crisis unit. (71) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $99,500.00 must be awarded to the Jackson School of the Arts in Jackson County for enrollment stabilization. (72) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $750,000.00 must be awarded to Michiganï¿½s Military Heritage Museum based in Jackson County for facility expansion, modernization of exhibits, and introduction of new features. (73) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $200,000.00 must be awarded to Save Our Youth Help Them Prosper based in Jackson County to support a youth career mentorship program. (74) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $200,000.00 must be awarded to the Shop Rat Foundation based in Jackson County to equip the advanced manufacturing training center with computer numerical control machinery. (75) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $450,000.00 must be awarded to the city of Beaverton in Gladwin County for installation of water mains. (76) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $650,000.00 must be awarded to the city of Coleman in Midland County for improvements to the existing sanitary sewer lift station that serves the industrial district. (77) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $1,100,000.00 must be awarded to Georgetown 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Charter Township in Ottawa County for the purchase of a fire truck. (78) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $500,000.00 must be awarded to Ottawa County for a groundwater feasibility study. (79) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $1,000,000.00 must be awarded to the Allegan County drain commissioner for improvements to the Bates Drain. (80) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $2,000,000.00 must be awarded to Macomb County public works for stormwater infrastructure improvements and repairs. (81) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $450,000.00 must be awarded to the city of Auburn Hills in Oakland County for the purchase of an advanced life support ambulance. (82) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $6,000,000.00 must be awarded to the Capuchin Soup Kitchen in Wayne County for construction of a new mixed-use building. (83) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $700,000.00 must be awarded to Berlin Charter Township in Monroe County to connect subdivision septic systems to the Flat Rock municipal septic system. (84) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $1,520,000.00 must be awarded to the Brownstown fire department in Wayne County for the purchase of a ladder truck. (85) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $80,000.00 must be awarded to the city of Rockwood in Wayne County to purchase and equip a new police patrol vehicle. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (86) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $1,400,000.00 must be awarded to the city of Rochester in Oakland County for expansion and renovation of the Rochester Community House. (87) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $405,000.00 must be awarded to Common Ground Crisis Center, headquartered in the village of Bingham Farms, to support and expand the mass violence and disaster response and recovery program. (88) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $500,000.00 must be awarded to Communities Overcoming Violent Encounters to support a building campaign to strengthen and modernize an emergency shelter and advocacy center. (89) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $1,300,000.00 must be awarded to Access Health, headquartered in the city of Muskegon, to sustain the impact of Access Healthï¿½s model. (90) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $2,100,000.00 must be awarded to the Tri-Cities Family YMCA, headquartered in the city of Grand Haven, for essential infrastructure improvements and upgrades. (91) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $800,000.00 must be awarded to the Van Buren County road commission for the total replacement of a structurally deficient bridge that carries CR 657 over the east branch of the Paw Paw River. (92) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $6,000,000.00 must be awarded to the city of Howell in Livingston County for infrastructure improvements to D-19 and the I-96 interchange. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (93) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $250,000.00 must be awarded to Crime Stoppers of Michigan to support the organizationï¿½s programs. (94) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $300,000.00 must be awarded to Veterans of Foreign Wars post 6464 in Livingston County for facility modernization and repairs. (95) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $60,000.00 must be awarded to the city of Hudson in Lenawee County for targeted rehabilitation and equipment upgrades at the cityï¿½s senior center. (96) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $44,300.00 must be awarded to the Sherwood Township fire department for construction of a new well. (97) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for legislatively directed spending items, $3,000,000.00 must be awarded to Shelby Township in Macomb County to complete reconstruction of the Schoenherr Road Bridge over the middle branch of the Clinton River. Sec. 1003. From the unexpended and unencumbered funds remaining in the strategic outreach and attraction reserve fund and in work project accounts for the strategic outreach and attraction reserve fund, the critical industry program, and the Michigan strategic site readiness program, the Michigan strategic fund shall work with the state budget director to lapse a total of $300,000,000.00. This money is appropriated to and must be deposited in the countercyclical budget and economic stabilization fund. ARTICLE 10 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING AND REGULATORY AFFAIRS part 1 line-item appropriations FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of licensing and regulatory affairs for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, from the following funds: DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING AND REGULATORY AFFAIRS APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 20.0 Full-time equated classified positions 1,806.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Full-time employees 1,576.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Limited-term employees 31.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Noncareer/per diem employees 27.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Part-time employees 3.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Permanent-intermittent employees 2.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Seasonal employees 0.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 589,772,400 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 27,184,700 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 562,587,700 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 29,928,800 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 272,224,900 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 State general fund/general purpose $ 260,434,000 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Full-time equated unclassified positions 20.0 Full-time equated classified positions 97.0 Unclassified salaries--FTEs 20.0 $ 2,599,600 Executive director programs--FTEs 19.0 3,407,500 Financial operations--FTEs 67.0 8,320,700 Property management 4,406,100 Regulatory effectiveness office--FTEs 11.0 1,700,200 Worker's compensation 13,200 Departmentwide employee economic adjustments 4,532,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 24,979,500 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from MDIFS, accounting services 150,000 IDG revenues, administrative hearings and rules 318,800 Federal revenues: DOJ 700 DOT, gas pipeline safety 33,100 EPA, underground storage tanks 39,900 HHS-Medicaid, certification of health care providers and suppliers 423,400 HHS-Medicare, certification of health care providers and suppliers 678,000 Special revenue funds: Aboveground storage tank fees 94,300 Accountancy enforcement fund 33,100 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Adult foster care facilities licenses fund 8,800 Boiler inspection fund 318,300 Builder enforcement fund 83,200 Construction code fund 1,011,800 Corporation fees 5,480,900 Direct shipper enforcement revolving fund 3,600 Elevator fees 391,800 Fire alarm fees 7,400 Fire safety standard and enforcement fund 3,600 Fire service fees 324,300 Fireworks safety fund 64,000 Health professions regulatory fund 2,134,800 Health systems fees 215,000 Industrial hemp licensing and registration fund 300 Licensing and regulation fund 771,000 Liquor license revenue 342,300 Liquor purchase revolving fund 3,119,700 Marihuana registry fund 195,200 Marihuana regulation fund 1,604,100 Marihuana regulatory fund 734,700 Michigan unarmed combat fund 5,800 Mobile home code fund 253,900 Nurse aide and medication aide registration fund 20,700 Nurse professional fund 42,800 PMECSEMA fund 62,700 Property development fees 7,800 Public utility assessments 3,450,200 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Real estate appraiser education fund 2,900 Real estate education fund 15,600 Real estate enforcement fund 19,300 Refined petroleum fund 139,800 Securities fees 1,437,800 Securities investor education and training fund 10,100 Security business fund 9,100 Survey and remonumentation fund 79,600 Tax tribunal fund 81,700 Utility consumer representation fund 55,200 State general fund/general purpose $ 698,400 Sec. 103. PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION Full-time equated classified positions 222.0 Public service commission--FTEs 222.0 $ 37,575,300 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 37,575,300 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: DOT, gas pipeline safety 2,363,300 Special revenue funds: Civil fines, excavation, and blasting fund 500,000 Public utility assessments 34,712,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 104. LIQUOR CONTROL COMMISSION Full-time equated classified positions 146.0 Liquor licensing and enforcement--FTEs 117.0 $ 18,176,300 Management support services--FTEs 29.0 4,984,900 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 23,161,200 Appropriated from: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 Special revenue funds: Direct shipper enforcement revolving fund 317,900 Liquor control enforcement and license investigation revolving fund 175,000 Liquor license fee enhancement fund 76,400 Liquor license revenue 8,514,300 Liquor purchase revolving fund 14,077,600 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 105. OCCUPATIONAL REGULATION Full-time equated classified positions 912.0 Bureau of community and health systems--FTEs 162.0 $ 26,602,500 Bureau of construction codes--FTEs 188.0 29,516,800 Bureau of fire services--FTEs 86.0 14,102,300 Bureau of professional licensing--FTEs 198.0 38,329,400 Bureau of survey and certification--FTEs 173.0 26,917,200 Corporations, securities, and commercial licensing bureau--FTEs 105.0 17,171,400 Urban search and rescue 1,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 153,639,600 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: DHS, fire training systems 528,000 DOT, hazardous materials training and planning 20,000 EPA, underground storage tanks 820,600 Federal revenues 109,000 HHS-Medicaid, certification of health care providers and suppliers 9,201,600 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 HHS-Medicare, certification of health care providers and suppliers 14,808,100 Special revenue funds: Aboveground storage tank fees 343,700 Accountancy enforcement fund 1,146,300 Adult foster care facilities licenses fund 373,600 Boiler inspection fund 2,827,300 Builder enforcement fund 597,700 Construction code fund 12,772,700 Corporation fees 9,953,700 Division on deafness fund 73,400 Elevator fees 7,900,500 Fire alarm fees 138,400 Fire safety standard and enforcement fund 32,300 Fire service fees 3,160,900 Fireworks safety fund 1,259,100 Health professions regulatory fund 24,981,400 Health systems fees 4,204,300 Licensing and regulation fund 11,193,200 Liquor purchase revolving fund 225,000 Marihuana regulatory fund 500,000 Mobile home code fund 1,987,300 Nurse aide and medication aide registration fund 1,692,400 Nurse professional fund 1,855,100 PMECSEMA fund 1,450,200 Property development fees 178,700 Real estate appraiser education fund 5,800 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 Real estate education fund 569,300 Real estate enforcement fund 708,400 Refined petroleum fund 2,602,400 Securities fees 5,266,900 Securities investor education and training fund 491,000 Security business fund 178,000 Survey and remonumentation fund 845,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 28,638,200 Sec. 106. CANNABIS REGULATORY AGENCY Full-time equated classified positions 182.0 Cannabis regulatory agency--FTEs 182.0 $ 27,576,400 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 27,576,400 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Industrial hemp licensing and registration fund 264,200 Marihuana registry fund 2,006,200 Marihuana regulation fund 18,832,100 Marihuana regulatory fund 6,473,900 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 107. MICHIGAN OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS AND RULES Full-time equated classified positions 168.0 Michigan office of administrative hearings and rules--FTEs 168.0 $ 33,135,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 33,135,000 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 IDG revenues - administrative hearings and rules 25,950,900 Special revenue funds: Construction code fund 25,100 Corporation fees 913,800 Health professions regulatory fund 806,700 Health systems fees 151,400 Licensing and regulation fund 836,500 Liquor purchase revolving fund 451,200 Marihuana regulation fund 231,900 Marihuana regulatory fund 90,500 Public utility assessments 2,717,700 Securities fees 959,300 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 108. COMMISSIONS Full-time equated classified positions 38.0 Michigan indigent defense commission--FTEs 18.0 $ 3,323,700 Michigan tax tribunal--FTEs 20.0 4,213,900 Michigan unarmed combat commission 126,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 7,663,800 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Corporation fees 3,391,800 Michigan unarmed combat fund 126,200 Tax tribunal fund 822,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 3,323,700 Sec. 109. GRANTS Firefighter training grants $ 2,300,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Liquor law enforcement grants 8,923,900 Marihuana operation and oversight grants 2,555,100 Michigan indigent defense commission grants 211,799,900 Remonumentation grants 5,654,800 Utility consumer representation 2,043,900 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 233,277,600 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Fireworks safety fund 2,300,000 Liquor license revenue 8,923,900 Local indigent defense reimbursement 300,000 Marihuana regulation fund 2,555,100 Survey and remonumentation fund 5,654,800 Utility consumer representation fund 2,043,900 State general fund/general purpose $ 211,499,900 Sec. 110. PROSECUTING ATTORNEYS COORDINATING COUNCIL Full-time equated classified positions 14.0 Prosecuting attorneys coordinating council--FTEs 14.0 $ 2,655,100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,655,100 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Prosecuting attorneys training fees 455,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 2,200,000 Sec. 111. MICHIGAN COMMISSION ON LAW ENFORCEMENT STANDARDS Full-time equated classified positions 27.0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 In-service training--FTEs 7.0 $ 13,271,100 Justice training grants--FTEs 3.0 10,000,000 Public safety officers benefit fund--FTE 1.0 303,000 Standards and training--FTEs 16.0 4,060,800 Training only to local units 855,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 28,489,900 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: DOJ 280,200 Special revenue funds: Law enforcement officers training fund 25,300 Marihuana regulatory fund 3,390,100 Michigan justice training fund 10,000,000 Private security licensing fees 5,000 Retired law enforcement officer safety fund 25,000 Secondary road patrol and training fund 855,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 13,909,300 Sec. 112. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY Information technology services and projects $ 16,659,700 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 16,659,700 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG revenues - administrative hearings and rules 765,000 Federal revenues: DOT, gas pipeline safety 80,600 HHS-Medicaid, certification of health care providers and suppliers 203,400 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 HHS-Medicare, certification of health care providers and suppliers 338,900 Special revenue funds: Aboveground storage tank fees 18,300 Accountancy enforcement fund 13,800 Boiler inspection fund 204,600 Construction code fund 741,400 Corporation fees 2,658,000 Elevator fees 348,900 Fire safety standard and enforcement fund 1,300 Fire service fees 286,600 Fireworks safety fund 112,500 Health professions regulatory fund 2,162,500 Health systems fees 190,000 Industrial hemp licensing and registration fund 2,100 Licensing and regulation fund 344,000 Liquor license revenue 188,900 Liquor purchase revolving fund 2,954,400 Marihuana regulation fund 1,737,700 Marihuana regulatory fund 690,300 Mobile home code fund 145,000 Nurse aide and medication aide registration fund 75,700 PMECSEMA fund 523,500 Public utility assessments 1,183,600 Real estate appraiser education fund 500 Real estate education fund 2,500 Real estate enforcement fund 3,900 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Refined petroleum fund 124,200 Securities fees 240,000 Securities investor education and training fund 3,200 Survey and remonumentation fund 39,800 Tax tribunal fund 110,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 164,500 Sec. 113. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Accounting continuing education $ 200,000 Real estate continuing education 400,000 Tax tribunal - small claims 359,300 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 959,300 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Accountancy enforcement fund 200,000 Corporation fees 359,300 Real estate education fund 400,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations for fiscal year 2026-2027 general sections Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, total state spending from state sources under part 1 is $532,658,900.00 and state spending from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $255,359,800.00. The itemized statement below identifies appropriations from which spending to local units of government will occur: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING AND REGULATORY AFFAIRS Firefighter training grants $ 2,300,000 In-service training 13,271,100 Justice training grants 10,000,000 Liquor law enforcement grants 8,923,900 Marihuana operation and oversight grants 2,555,100 Michigan indigent defense commission grants 211,799,900 Remonumentation grants 5,654,800 Training only to local units 855,000 TOTAL $ 255,359,800 Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1: (a) "Department" means the department of licensing and regulatory affairs. (b) "DHS" means the United States Department of Homeland Security. (c) "Director" means the director of the department. (d) "DOT" means the United States Department of Transportation. (e) "EPA" means the United States Environmental Protection Agency. (f) "FOIA" means the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (g) "FTE" means full-time equated position in the classified service of this state. (h) "HHS" means the United States Department of Health and Human Services. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (i) "IDG" means interdepartmental grant. (j) "MDIFS" means the Michigan department of insurance and financial services. (k) "PMECSEMA" means pain management education and controlled substances electronic monitoring and antidiversion. (l) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house appropriations committees, the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on licensing and regulatory affairs and insurance and financial services, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office. Sec. 204. If the state administrative board, acting under section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount appropriated under part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and serving in each house, intertransfer funds within part 1 for the particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution. Sec. 205. (1) The department shall use the internet to fulfill the reporting requirements of this part and shall make each report readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each required report in a single archivable location on the department's website not later than the due date required for each report. (2) In addition to placing all reports required in the current fiscal year on the department's website, the department shall maintain on its website all reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years posted by fiscal year in the same single archivable location. (3) The department shall transmit all required reports for the current fiscal year to the standard report recipients and any other required recipients by email. The email shall include a copy of the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 report and a link to access the report online. Sec. 206. The department shall receive and retain copies of all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department shall follow federal and state law and guidelines for short-term and long-term retention of records. The department shall electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required by federal and state guidelines. Sec. 207. (1) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to maintain a searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following for the department: (a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category. (b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit. (c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor, including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and payment description. (2) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to update the searchable website on a quarterly basis. Sec. 208. Not later than December 15, the state budget office shall prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses by major departmental program or program areas. Sec. 209. Not later than 14 days after the release of the executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate with the state budget office to provide an annual report on 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the previous 2 fiscal years. Sec. 210. Not later than November 15, the department shall report on private and other third-party funds received by the department in the previous fiscal year. The report must include the amount of funding received, the specific source of funding received, the purpose for which funding was expended, and the amount of any remaining funds. Sec. 211. Consistent with section 217 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, the department shall prepare a report on out-of-state travel expenses by not later than January 1. The report must list all travel outside this state by classified and unclassified employees in the previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or in part with funds appropriated in the department's budget. The report must include all of the following information: (a) The dates of each travel occurrence. (b) The total transportation and related costs of each travel occurrence and the proportions funded with state general fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal revenues, local revenues, and private revenues, including specific sources of state restricted, federal, local, and private revenues. (c) The destination of each travel occurrence. (d) The specific purpose and description of each travel occurrence, including the specific name of the event or meeting. Sec. 212. On a quarterly basis, the department shall report on all of the following: (a) The number of full-time equated positions in pay status by 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 civil service classification. (b) A comparison by line item of the number of full-time equated positions authorized from funds appropriated in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated positions employed by the department at the end of the reporting period. (c) The number of active employees in each of the following statuses: (i) Full-time salary. (ii) Full-time hourly. (iii) Part-time. (iv) Permanent-intermittent. (v) Limited-term. (vi) Seasonal. (vii) Worker's compensation. (viii) Noncareer/per diem. (ix) Job share. (x) Special personal services/contractual. (d) The number of overtime hours worked by employees, by classifications. Sec. 213. Not later than April 1, the department shall report on each specific policy change made to implement a public act affecting the department that took effect during the previous calendar year. The report must include reference to the public act that necessitates the policy change. The department shall submit the report to the standard report recipients, to the senate and house standing committees responsible for addressing issues affected by the public acts, and to the joint committee on administrative rules. Sec. 214. (1) The department shall maintain, on a publicly 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 accessible website, a department scorecard that identifies, tracks, and updates on a quarterly basis key metrics that are used to monitor and improve the department's performance. (2) The department shall notify the standard report recipients when the quarterly updates to the department scorecard are available on a publicly accessible website. Sec. 215. (1) Unless specifically authorized elsewhere in this part or part 1, funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to pay for a state obligation that exceeds $200,000.00 for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim without prior legislative approval. (2) If a state obligation for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim results in a change from current statute, the department shall notify the legislature. (3) This section does not apply to compensation and other relief to individuals wrongfully imprisoned as required under the wrongful imprisonment compensation act, 2016 PA 343, MCL 691.1751 to 691.1757. Sec. 216. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,000,000.00 for federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,500,000.00 for state restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $200,000.00 for local contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $100,000.00 for private contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 217. Total authorized appropriations from all sources under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 are estimated at $21,488,800.00. From this amount, total appropriations for pension-related legacy costs for the department are estimated at $21,488,800.00. Total appropriations for retiree health care legacy costs for the department are estimated at $0.00. Sec. 218. To the extent possible, the department shall not expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted. Sec. 219. The department shall submit reports that summarize all work project accounts not later than December 31, March 30, June 30, and September 30. The reports must include all of the following: (a) A list of all work project accounts. (b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 account. (c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously designated work project accounts, the name and description of the work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed amounts. Sec. 220. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1: (a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are available. (b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. (c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. Sec. 221. The department shall not take disciplinary action against an employee of the department because the employee communicates with a member of the legislature or legislative staff unless the communication is prohibited by law and the department is exercising its authority as provided by law. Sec. 222. (1) The department shall maximize the efficiency of the state workforce and utilization and occupancy of office space, leased or owned, for each division within the department. Employees with job responsibilities that require employees to serve in their capacities outside of an office shall be monitored each pay period 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 to ensure all work hours reported on timesheets are actually worked. (2) The department shall comply with requirements set forth by the office of the state employer on in-person work and utilization and occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure at least 80% of employees are in person and building occupancy and utilization rates are at least 80% or higher. (3) The department shall submit reports not later than January 15 and April 15 on all of the following: (a) Remote work policy by division. (b) Building occupancy by address. (c) Whether the building is state-owned or leased. (d) Aggregate badge scanning information by employee. (4) As used in this section, "occupancy" means the actual number of employees physically present in a workplace. Sec. 223. (1) The department shall require as a condition of each contract or subcontract that the prequalified contractor or prequalified subcontractor agree to use the E-Verify system to verify that all persons hired during the contract term by the contractor or subcontractor are legally present and authorized to work in the United States. (2) The department may verify this information directly or may require contractors and subcontractors to verify the information and submit a certification to the department. The department shall submit a report not later than March 1 that describes the processes it has developed and implemented under this section. (3) The department shall not contract with any foreign entities that are known or suspected to be enemies of the United States or known foreign adversaries. Foreign adversaries include 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 all of the following: (a) The People's Republic of China. (b) The Russian Federation. (c) The Islamic Republic of Iran. (d) The Democratic People's Republic of Korea. (e) The Republic of Cuba. (f) The Venezuelan regime of Nicolï¿½s Maduro. (g) The Syrian Arab Republic. (h) An agency or other entity under significant control of a country described in subdivisions (a) to (g). (4) As used in this section, "E-Verify" means an internet-based system operated by the Department of Homeland Security, United States Citizenship and Immigration Services in partnership with the Social Security Administration. Sec. 224. (1) Within 30 days of enactment of this act, the state budget office shall post a list of legislatively directed spending items funded in part 1 as defined in sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. The list must include all information and documents pertaining to the funded items as publicly disclosed in accordance with sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. (2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency administering the grant shall submit a report not later than November 1. The department or agency shall update the report and shall submit updated reports not later than March 15 and September 15 of the current fiscal year. The department or agency shall include in the report the most comprehensive information the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department or agency has available at the time of posting for grants awarded, including, but not limited to, project milestones, percent completed, funding expended, and funding encumbered. (3) Before executing a grant agreement, all grant recipients must provide a spending plan that specifies the scope of service, the program goals, the measurement for meeting program goals, and how all grant funds will be used, and must indicate if any grant funds will be provided to a third party or subrecipient. (4) Each department or agency responsible for awarding or disbursing grant funds must annually audit the entity's use of the grant funds for each fiscal year in which the grant is active. Each entity must submit information requested by the department or agency to confirm compliance. (5) Each department or agency shall work with the office of the auditor general to conduct an audit of the grant according to generally accepted accounting practices and audit standards. The office of the auditor general must be given access to all internal and external records. All contracts or agreements between a department or agency and a grant recipient or between a grant recipient and a third party must include a clause granting the office of the auditor general access to all internal and external records. (6) Grant recipients and their immediate family members are prohibited from being employed by the executive branch or legislative branch of this state. In addition, grant recipients are prohibited from serving on any state board that has direct or indirect responsibility for approving or auditing grant funds awarded or disbursed by any department or agency. (7) Full and complete audits of grant funds issued by the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department or an agency of this state, without redaction unless required by law, must be posted to the department's or agency's website in a conspicuous place for public review. (8) On a quarterly basis, the department or agency shall submit a report on legislatively sponsored grant funds that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) The name of each grant recipient and the status of each grant. (b) The amount distributed to each grant recipient. (c) Any changes to scope or costs of program. (9) The report under subsection (8) must include the following statements made by the department or agency: (a) A statement that confirms the department or agency reviewed and affirmed compliance by each grant recipient with program scope and expenditure of grant funding. (b) A statement that confirms the department or agency reviewed applicable program reports and requests for reimbursement. Sec. 225. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall do the following: (a) Report on any amounts of severance pay for a department director, deputy director, or other high-ranking department official not later than 14 days after a severance agreement with the director, deputy director, or official is signed. The name of the director, deputy director, or official and the amount of severance pay must be included in the report required by this subdivision. (b) Not later than February 1, report on the total amount of severance pay remitted to former department employees during the previous fiscal year and the total number of former department 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 employees that were remitted severance pay during the previous fiscal year. (2) As used in this section, "severance pay" means compensation to which both of the following apply: (a) The compensation is payable or paid upon the termination of employment. (b) The compensation is paid in addition to wages or benefits earned during the course of employment or generally applicable retirement benefits. Sec. 226. Funds appropriated in part 1 from state or federal sources are prohibited from being used to provide services, grants, or programming to an individual who is not a citizen of the United States unless the individual is a qualified alien as that term is defined in 8 USC 1641. This section does not prohibit the department, political subdivision, state university, or other state agency from expending funds for the purpose of detaining individuals who are not citizens of the United States, including any costs associated with housing such individuals in county jails or state correctional facilities. Sec. 227. State funds must not be used for diversity, equity, and inclusion, or diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives or programs, as outlined in federal Executive Order No. 14151, 90 Fed. Reg. 8339 (January 29, 2025) "Ending Radical and Wasteful Government DEI Programs and Preferencing", federal Executive Order No. 14168, 90 Fed. Reg. 8615 (January 30, 2025) "Defending Women from Gender Ideology Extremism and Restoring Biological Truth to the Federal Government", or federal Executive Order No. 14173, 90 Fed. Reg. 8633 (January 31, 2025) "Ending Illegal Discrimination and Restoring Merit-Based Opportunity". 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 228. The department shall use the same precontract risk assessment program utilized by the department of technology, management, and budget to evaluate financial compliance, security risks, and insurance requirements prior to contract execution. Sec. 250. The department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients by September 30 detailing any expenditure of funds for a television or radio production that was made to a third-party vendor in the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026. The report must include the following information for each expenditure: (a) Total amount of the expenditure. (b) Fund source for the expenditure. (c) Name of any vendor that created the production and the amount paid to each vendor. (d) Purpose of the production. Sec. 251. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall post on a publicly accessible website a report describing materials that department employees and contractors are required to review or complete as part of their mandatory training, including mandatory examinations, surveys, audio or visual recordings, and reading materials. Sec. 252. (1) The department may charge registration fees to attendees of informational, training, or special events that are sponsored by the department and related to activities under the department's purview. (2) The registration fees must reflect the costs for the department to sponsor the informational, training, or special events. (3) Revenue generated by the registration fees is appropriated 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 on receipt and may be expended by the department to cover the department's costs of sponsoring informational, training, or special events. (4) Revenue generated by registration fees in excess of the department's costs of sponsoring informational, training, or special events carries forward to the subsequent fiscal year and does not lapse to the general fund. (5) The amount appropriated under subsection (3) must not exceed $1,000,000.00. Sec. 253. The department may provide to interested entities otherwise unavailable customized listings of nonconfidential information, such as the names and addresses of licensees, in the department's possession. The department may establish and collect a reasonable fee to provide this service. Revenue generated from this service is appropriated on receipt and must be used to offset the expenses of the service. Any balance of this revenue collected and unexpended at the end of the fiscal year lapses to the appropriate restricted fund. Sec. 254. (1) The department shall sell documents at a price not to exceed the cost of production and distribution. Money received from the sale of these documents reverts to the department. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, funds received by the department under this subsection may be expended by the department upon receipt by the department of treasury. This subsection applies for only the following: (a) Corporation and securities division documents, reports, and papers required or permitted by law in accordance with section 1060(6) of the business corporation act, 1972 PA 284, MCL 450.2060. (b) The Michigan liquor control code of 1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 436.1101 to 436.2303. (c) The mobile home commission act, 1987 PA 96, MCL 125.2301 to 125.2350; the business corporation act, 1972 PA 284, MCL 450.1101 to 450.2098; the nonprofit corporation act, 1982 PA 162, MCL 450.2101 to 450.3192; and the uniform securities act (2002), 2008 PA 551, MCL 451.2101 to 451.2703. (d) Construction code manuals. (e) Copies of transcripts from administrative law hearings. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, funds appropriated for the department under sections 57, 58, and 59 of the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.257, 24.258, and 24.259, and section 203 of the legislative council act, 1986 PA 268, MCL 4.1203, are appropriated for all expenses necessary to provide for the cost of publication and distribution. (3) Unexpended funds at the end of the fiscal year carry forward to the subsequent fiscal year and do not lapse to the general fund. Sec. 255. (1) Grants supported with private revenues received by the department are appropriated on receipt and may be expended by the department for the purposes specified within the grant agreement and as permitted under state and federal law. (2) Not later than 10 days after the receipt of a private grant appropriated in subsection (1), the department shall notify the chairpersons of the subcommittees, the senate and house fiscal agencies, and the state budget office of the receipt of the grant, including the fund source, purpose, and amount of the grant. (3) The amount appropriated under subsection (1) must not exceed $4,000,000.00. Sec. 256. Unless prohibited by law, the department may accept 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 credit card or other electronic means of payment for licenses, fees, or permits. Not later than February 1, the department shall report on fees collected from credit card payments for licenses, fees, and permits in the previous year. Sec. 257. The department may carry into the succeeding fiscal year unexpended federal pass-through funds to local institutions and governments that do not require additional state matching funds. Federal pass-through funds to local institutions and governments that are received in amounts in addition to those included in part 1 and that do not require additional state matching funds are appropriated for the purposes intended for the federal pass-through funds. Not later than 14 days after the receipt of federal pass-through funds, the department shall notify the chairpersons of the subcommittees, the senate and house fiscal agencies, and the state budget office of pass-through funds appropriated under this section. Sec. 258. (1) Not later than December 31, the department shall submit a report that pertains to licensing and regulatory programs overseen by the following agencies: (a) Liquor control commission. (b) Bureau of fire services. (c) Corporations, securities, and commercial licensing bureau. (d) Bureau of professional licensing. (2) The report under subsection (1) must be in a format that is consistent between the agencies listed in subsection (1) and must provide, but is not limited to, the following information for the previous fiscal year, as applicable, for each agency: (a) Revenue generated by and expenditures disbursed for each regulatory product. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) Revenue generated, by regulatory product or regulated activity. (c) The renewal cycle and amount of each fee charged. (d) Number of initial applications. (e) Number of initial applications denied. (f) Number of license renewals. (g) Average amount of time to approve or deny completed applications. (h) Number of examinations proctored for initial applications. (i) A description of the types of complaints received. (j) A description of the process used to resolve complaints. (k) Number of complaints received. (l) Number of complaints investigated. (m) Number of complaints closed with no action. (n) Number of complaints resulting in administrative actions or citations. (o) Average amount of time to complete investigations. (p) Number of enforcement actions, including license revocations, suspensions, and fines. (q) A description of the types of enforcement actions taken against licensees. (r) Number of administrative hearing adjudications. (3) An agency listed in subsection (1)(a) or (b) shall report by regulated activity and an agency listed in subsection (1)(c) or (d) shall report by regulatory product or regulated activity, or both. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Regulated activity" means the particular activities, entities, facilities, and industries regulated by the agencies 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 specified in subsection (1). (b) "Regulatory product" means each occupation, profession, trade, or program, which includes licensure, certification, registration, inspection, review, permitting, approval, or any other regulatory service provided by the agencies specified in subsection (1) for each regulated activity. Sec. 259. Pending litigation related to a licensee must not delay investigations and licensing actions taken by the department toward that licensee under its statutory authority, unless otherwise prohibited by law. Sec. 260. It is the intent of the legislature that the department establish an employee performance monitoring process that is consistent throughout the department, in addition to current civil service commission evaluations. The department shall submit quarterly reports to the subcommittees, the senate and house fiscal agencies, and the state budget office on changes to the employee performance monitoring process that are planned or implemented, as well as the number of employee evaluations performed. Sec. 261. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for administrative services, the department shall expend not less than $250,000.00 to provide 1 hour of customer service and business ethics training to each classified employee and 2 hours of customer service and business ethics training to each unclassified employee. The training must include, but is not limited to, instruction in customer service professionalism, consumer support, and ethics in business. (2) Not later than November 3, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients containing all of the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 following information: (a) The number of classified and unclassified employees that received the customer service and business ethics training. (b) A copy of the material that was presented in the customer service and business ethics training. (c) Information on the entity that provided the customer service and business ethics training. Sec. 262. The department shall allow the chairs, majority vice chairs, and minority vice chairs of the senate and house appropriations committees and the chairs, majority vice chairs, and minority vice chairs of the senate and house subcommittees on licensing and regulatory affairs and insurance and financial services access to all facilities managed by the department at any time Monday through Friday, 8 a.m. to 5 p.m. Sec. 280. (1) The attorney general support fund is created within the department of treasury. (2) Any unexpended funds in the attorney general support fund created in this section shall be carried forward and are available for expenditure under this section. (3) Funds may be spent from the attorney general support fund only on appropriation, or legislative transfer pursuant to section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (4) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the attorney general support fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the attorney general support fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the attorney general support fund interest and earnings from the attorney general support fund. (5) Funds in the attorney general support fund at the close of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the fiscal year remain in the attorney general support fund and do not lapse to the general fund. (6) The department is the administrator of the fund for auditing purposes. (7) From fees authorized under section 1060 of the business corporation act, 1972 PA 284, MCL 450.2060, $8,112,200.00 is appropriated to the attorney general support fund. (8) From the attorney general support fund created in subsection (1), $8,112,200.00 is appropriated. PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION Sec. 301. (1) The public service commission administers the low-income energy assistance grant program on behalf of the Michigan department of health and human services via an interagency agreement. Funds supporting the grant program are appropriated to the department on the awarding of grants and may be expended for grant payments and administrative-related expenses incurred in the operation of the grant program. (2) No later than March 30, the public service commission shall submit a report to the standard report recipients based on the grants administered, including: (a) Median annual household income for recipients of the grant. (b) Number of grants administered in each county of this state. Sec. 302. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the Michigan public service commission shall conduct at least 4 public hearings in this state. Subject to the requirements of this section, if there is a city in this state with a population between 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 195,000 and 700,000 according to the most recent federal decennial census, a public hearing required under this section must be conducted in that city. (2) Not later than September 30, the Michigan public service commission shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that details the outcomes of the public hearings required under this section and summarizes the public comments that were received during the public hearings. Sec. 303. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for the Michigan public service commission, the department shall designate 1 FTE to assist consumers with utility issues, utility disruption, or outages. (2) On a monthly basis, the commission shall make the following available on its website: (a) The average electric rates for commission-regulated electric utilities. (b) A comparison of monthly residential electric bills for commission-regulated electric utilities. (c) The power supply cost recovery factors for all commission-regulated electric utilities. (d) The natural gas rates for commission-regulated natural gas utilities. (e) The gas cost recovery factors for commission-regulated natural gas utilities. (f) Monthly reliability data for commission-rate-regulated electric utilities. (g) The number of utility consumers assisted by the commission for utility disruption, outages, and other utility issues. (h) The number of formal complaints received in the month. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 304. The Michigan public service commission shall publish all documents pertaining to each rate case on a single page on the commission's website. For each rate increase approval, the commission shall submit a report to the senate and house appropriations committees and senate and house standing committees on energy that summarizes the commission's decision and justification for the rate increase approval. The report shall include a breakdown of the specific costs that the rate increase is intended to recover for the utility. LIQUOR CONTROL COMMISSION Sec. 401. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 from the direct shipper enforcement revolving fund, the liquor control commission shall expend the funds as required under section 203(11) of the Michigan liquor control code of 1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL 436.1203, to investigate and audit unlawful direct shipments of wine by unlicensed wineries and retailers, with priority directed toward unlicensed out-of-state retailers and third-party marketers. In addition to other investigative methods, the commission shall use shipping records available to the commission under section 203(21) of the Michigan liquor control code of 1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL 436.1203, to assist with the effort to investigate and audit unlawful direct shipments of wine by unlicensed wineries and retailers. The liquor control commission shall refer all identified unlicensed out-of-state retailers and third-party marketers to the attorney general. (2) Not later than February 1, the liquor control commission shall provide a report to the legislature and the standard report recipients that details the commission's activities to investigate 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 and audit the illegal shipping of wine and the results of the activities. The report must include all of the following: (a) Work hours spent, specific actions performed, and the number of full-time equated positions dedicated to identifying and stopping unlicensed out-of-state retailers, third-party marketers, and wineries that ship illegally in Michigan. (b) General overview of expenditures associated with efforts to identify and stop unlicensed out-of-state retailers, third-party marketers, and wineries that ship illegally in this state. (c) Number of out-of-state entities found to have illegally shipped wine into this state and total number of 750 ml bottles, number of cases with 750 ml bottles, number of liters, number of gallons, or weight of illegally shipped wine. These items must be itemized by total number of retailers and total number of wineries. (d) Suggested areas of focus on how to address direct shipper enforcement and illegal importation in the future. (e) Number of unlicensed out-of-state entities found to have illegally shipped wine into this state that were identified with the shipping records described in subsection (1). (f) Number of notices sent under subsection (3). (3) From the funds appropriated in part 1 from the direct shipper enforcement revolving fund, the liquor control commission shall send a notice to each unlicensed out-of-state entity found to have illegally shipped wine into this state. The notice must include all of the following statements: (a) That shipping wine into this state by unlicensed out-of-state retailers and third-party marketers is illegal, and wineries shipping into this state must obtain a direct shipper license. (b) That under section 909 of the Michigan liquor control code 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 of 1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL 436.1909, making unlawful shipments of wine into this state may be a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 4 years or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both. (c) That the matter has been referred to the attorney general. OCCUPATIONAL REGULATION Sec. 501. The department shall not expend the funds appropriated under this part and part 1 for the bureau of fire services unless, in accordance with section 2c of the fire prevention code, 1941 PA 207, MCL 29.2c, inspection and plan review fees are charged according to the following fee schedule: Operation and maintenance inspection fee Facility type Facility size Fee Hospitals Any $8.00 per bed Facility type Facility size Fee Nursing Homes Any $5.00 per bed Facility type Facility size Fee Homes for the Aged Any $5.00 per bed Facility type Facility size Fee Adult Foster Care Greater than 6 residents $5.00 per bed Plan review and construction inspection fees for hospitals and schools Project cost range Fee $101,000.00 or less minimum fee of $155.00 $101,001.00 to $1,500,000.00 $1.60 per $1,000.00 $1,500,001.00 to $10,000,000.00 $1.30 per $1,000.00 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 $10,000,001.00 or more $1.10 per $1,000.00 or a maximum fee of $60,000.00. Sec. 502. The funds collected by the department for licenses, permits, and other elevator regulation fees under the Michigan Administrative Code and as determined under section 8 of 1976 PA 333, MCL 338.2158, and section 16 of 1967 PA 227, MCL 408.816, that are unexpended at the end of the fiscal year carry forward to the subsequent fiscal year. Sec. 503. Not later than February 15, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that provides all of the following information: (a) The number of veterans who were separated from service in the Armed Forces of the United States with an honorable character of service or under honorable conditions (general) character of service, individually or if the veteran holds a majority interest of a corporation or limited liability company, that were exempted from paying licensure, registration, filing, or any other fees collected under each licensure or regulatory program administered by the bureau of construction codes, the bureau of professional licensing, and the corporations, securities, and commercial licensing bureau during the previous fiscal year. (b) The specific fees and total amount of revenue exempted under each licensure or regulatory program administered by the bureau of construction codes, the bureau of professional licensing, and the corporations, securities, and commercial licensing bureau during the previous fiscal year. (c) The actual costs of providing licensing and other regulatory services to veterans exempted from paying licensure, registration, filing, or any other fees during the previous fiscal 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 year and a description of how the actual costs were calculated. (d) The estimated amount of revenue that will be exempted under each licensure or regulatory program administered by the bureau of construction codes, the bureau of professional licensing, and the corporations, securities, and commercial licensing bureau in both the current and subsequent fiscal years and a description of how the exempted revenue was estimated. Sec. 504. Revenue collected by the department for the bureau of community and health systems from fees and collections that exceeds the amount appropriated in part 1, the revenue must be carried forward into the subsequent fiscal year. The revenue carried forward under this section must be used as the first source of funds in the subsequent fiscal year. Sec. 505. (1) To defray the costs associated with responding to false final inspection appointments and to discourage the practice of calling for final inspections when a project is incomplete or noncompliant with a plan of correction previously provided by the bureau of fire services, the bureau of fire services may assess a fee of not more than $500.00 for responding to a second or subsequent confirmed false inspection appointment. Fees collected under this section must be deposited into the restricted account described in section 2c of the fire prevention code, 1941 PA 207, MCL 29.2c, and explicitly identified within the statewide integrated governmental management applications system. (2) Not later than September 30, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that provides all of the following: (a) The amount of the fee assessed under subsection (1). (b) The number of fees assessed and issued per region. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (c) The cost allocation for the work performed and reduced as a result of this section. (d) Any recommendations for consideration by the legislature. Sec. 506. Not later than November 30, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on the Michigan automated prescription system. The report must include, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) The total number of licensed health professionals registered to the Michigan automated prescription system. (b) The total number of dispensers registered to the Michigan automated prescription system. (c) The total number of prescribers using the Michigan automated prescription system. (d) The total number of dispensers using the Michigan automated prescription system. (e) The total number of cases related to overprescribing, overdispensing, and drug diversion where the department took administrative action because of information and data generated from the Michigan automated prescription system. (f) The total number of hospitals, doctor's offices, pharmacies, and other health facilities that have integrated the Michigan automated prescription system into the facility's electronic health records systems. (g) The total number of delegate users registered to the Michigan automated prescription system. (h) The department's recommendations for electronic health integration and optimizing data interpretation for the purpose of advancing utilization practices. Sec. 507. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for bureau 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 of construction codes, not less than $900,000.00 must be allocated for additional inspections and enforcement activities related to the carnival-amusement safety act of 1966, 1966 PA 225, MCL 408.651 to 408.670, and the ski area safety act of 1962, 1962 PA 199, MCL 408.321 to 408.344. (2) Not later than March 30, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that details the allocation of funds under this section. The report must include an itemized listing of how the funds were used. Sec. 508. (1) Funds remaining in the homeowner construction lien recovery fund are appropriated to the department for payment of court-ordered homeowner construction lien recovery fund judgments entered before August 23, 2010. Subject to available funds, the payment of final judgments must be made in the order in which the final judgments were entered and began accruing interest. (2) No later than September 30, the department shall transmit a report to the standard report recipients that details the revenue sources for the fund. Sec. 509. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for the bureau of fire services, in accordance with the requirements under section 21c of the fire prevention code, 1941 PA 207, MCL 29.21c, the bureau shall perform or work in cooperation with local units of government to perform inspections at places of public assembly that pose the highest risk to occupants for injury or fatality based on the size, density, or the nature of activities performed within the facility. Sec. 510. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for bureau of survey and certification, the department shall submit a report pertaining to bureau activities, including surveys and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 investigations of nursing homes, hospitals, and acute continuing care providers to the standard report recipients not later than March 30. Sec. 511. From the amount appropriated in part 1 for bureau of community and health systems administration, on receipt of the order of suspension of a licensed adult foster care home, home for the aged, or nursing home, the department shall serve the facility and provide contemporaneous notice to the offices of legislators representing a district where the licensed facility is situated and to the senate and house subcommittees on health and human services. Sec. 512. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for corporations, securities, and commercial licensing bureau, the department shall make the necessary changes to the MiBusiness Registry Portal to allow each entity to opt in to a primary user authentication system that would permit only the designated primary user to submit filings for the entity. (2) If amendments to the Michigan limited liability company act, 1993 PA 23, MCL 450.4101 to 450.5200, the business corporation act, 1972 PA 284, MCL 450.1101 to 450.2098, and the nonprofit corporation act, 1982 PA 162, MCL 450.2101 to 450.3192, are enacted that would allow the department to implement a process for entities to opt in to a primary user authentication system, then this section will go into effect. Cannabis regulatory agency Sec. 601. Not later than January 31, the department shall submit a comprehensive report to the standard report recipients for all marihuana programs administered by the cannabis regulatory agency. This report must include, but is not limited to, all of the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 following information for the previous fiscal year regarding the marihuana programs under the Michigan Medical Marihuana Act, 2008 IL 1, MCL 333.26421 to 333.26430, the medical marihuana facilities licensing act, 2016 PA 281, MCL 333.27101 to 333.27801, and the Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27951 to 333.27967: (a) The number of initial applications received, by license category. (b) The number of initial applications approved and the number of initial applications denied, by license category. (c) The average amount of time, from receipt to approval or denial, to process an initial application, by license category. (d) The number of renewal applications approved, by license category and by county. (e) The number of renewal applications received, by license category and by county, if applicable. (f) The number of renewal applications denied, by license category and by county. (g) The average amount of time, from receipt to approval or denial, to process a renewal application, by license category, if applicable. (h) The percentage of initial applications not approved or denied within the time requirements established in the respective act, by license category, if applicable. (i) The percentage of renewal applications not approved or denied within the time requirements established in the respective act, by license category, if applicable. (j) The total amount collected from application fees or established regulatory assessment and the specific fund the amount 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 is deposited into, by license category. (k) The registered names and addresses of all facilities licensed under each act, by license category and by county. (l) The number of complaints received pertaining to each act, by license type or regulatory activity. (m) A description of the types of complaints received. (n) A description of the process used to resolve complaints. (o) The number of investigations opened pertaining to each license category. (p) The number of investigations closed pertaining to each license category. (q) The average amount of time to complete investigations pertaining to each license category. (r) The number of enforcement actions pertaining to each license category. (s) A description of the types of enforcement actions taken against licensees. (t) The number of administrative-hearing adjudications pertaining to each license type. (u) A list of the fees charged for license applications, license renewals, and registry cards. (v) The costs of administering the licensing program under each act. Sec. 602. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the cannabis regulatory agency shall post on a publicly accessible website a list of all of the following: (a) The number of investigative reports that identify violations of the Michigan Medical Marihuana Act, 2008 IL 1, MCL 333.26421 to 333.26430, the medical marihuana facilities licensing 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 act, 2016 PA 281, MCL 333.27101 to 333.27801, or the Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27951 to 333.27967, or violations of administrative rules promulgated under the Michigan Medical Marihuana Act, 2008 IL 1, MCL 333.26421 to 333.26430, the medical marihuana facilities licensing act, 2016 PA 281, MCL 333.27101 to 333.27801, or the Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27951 to 333.27967. (b) The number of investigative reports that identify suspected marihuana product that does not have the tracking numbers assigned by the statewide monitoring system affixed, tagged, or labeled as required by law. (c) The number of complaints filed by the public with the agency that concern either of the following: (i) Marihuana product that does not have the tracking numbers assigned by the statewide monitoring system affixed, tagged, or labeled as required by law. (ii) Unlicensed commercial production or sale of delta-8 THC. (d) The number and outcome of all agency disciplinary proceedings initiated against any licensee subject to the reports or complaints in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c). (e) The number of reports the agency referred to the department of state police or other appropriate law enforcement agency. (f) For any licensee subject to disciplinary proceedings initiated by the agency: (i) Name of the licensee. (ii) Description of the allegation. (iii) Complaint type. (iv) Process used to resolve the allegation. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (v) Name of the law enforcement agency the allegation was referred to, including the date of the referral. (vi) Current license status and whether or not the license was suspended, surrendered, or revoked. (vii) Fines or other penalties issued. (g) The number of licenses suspended, surrendered, or revoked. Sec. 603. (1) Not later than January 31, the department shall submit a comprehensive report to the standard report recipients for all hemp programs administered by the cannabis regulatory agency. The report must include, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) The total amount of fees collected by the cannabis regulatory agency from regulatory and licensing activities related to hemp and hemp processor-handlers. (b) The total cost of administering hemp regulatory and licensing programs. (c) The total number of hemp processor-handlers licensed in this state, by county. (d) A list and description of any fees that the cannabis regulatory agency assesses on hemp processor-handler licensees. (2) Not later than January 31, the department shall submit a comprehensive report to the standard report recipients for all hemp programs administered by the cannabis regulatory agency. The report must include, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) The total amount of fees collected by the cannabis regulatory agency from regulatory and licensing activities related to hemp and hemp processor-handlers. (b) The total cost of administering hemp regulatory and licensing programs. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (c) The total number of hemp processor-handlers in this state, by county. (d) A list and description of any fees that the cannabis regulatory agency assesses on hemp processor-handler licensees. (e) The number of inspections conducted per year and the result of each inspection. (f) The number of hemp license applications and hemp license approvals per year. Sec. 604. The cannabis regulatory agency shall not exhibit undue partiality toward or bias against any licensee. COMMISSIONS Sec. 801. If Byrne formula grant funding is awarded to the Michigan indigent defense commission created under section 5 of the Michigan indigent defense commission act, 2013 PA 93, MCL 780.985, the Michigan indigent defense commission may receive and expend Byrne formula grant funds as an interdepartmental grant from the department of state police. The Michigan indigent defense commission may receive and expend federal grant funds from the United States Department of Justice. Sec. 802. From the funds appropriated in part 1, not later than March 1, the Michigan indigent defense commission shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on all of the following information: (a) The incremental costs associated with the standard development process, the compliance plan process, and the collection of data from all indigent defense systems and attorneys providing indigent defense. The Michigan indigent defense commission shall place particular emphasis on the costs that may be 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 avoided after standards are developed and compliance plans are in place. (b) A detailed explanation of the total cost calculation for each indigent defense standard and juvenile indigent defense standard for which grant recipients are receiving state grant funding. This explanation must include a comprehensive itemization of the types of costs included for each standard. (c) An itemized listing of how much funding each grant recipient is receiving for each indigent defense standard and juvenile indigent defense standard. (d) An explanation of the specific causal factors associated with any increase or decrease of Michigan indigent defense commission grant funding from the fiscal year 2023-2024 level. Sec. 803. If Senate Bill No. 81 of the 103rd Legislature or House Bill No. 4070 of the 103rd Legislature are enacted, then the Michigan indigent defense commission shall utilize available funding to begin the development and implementation of minimum standards for youth defense services in accordance with the Michigan indigent defense commission act, 2013 PA 93, MCL 780.981 to 780.1003. Sec. 804. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the Michigan indigent defense commission shall notify the standard report recipients not more than 60 days after the adoption of any new indigent defense standard. The notification must include an estimated cost projection to fund the adopted indigent defense standard for the initial and subsequent fiscal years. Sec. 805. A grant distributed by the Michigan indigent defense commission must not be used by an indigent defense system to support any construction expenses for a new structure. This section 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 does not prohibit expenditures for renovations to existing structures, if such a renovation is part of an indigent criminal defense system's approved compliance plan. Sec. 806. A grant distributed by the Michigan indigent defense commission must not be used to provide criminal defense services to individuals who are not citizens of the United States, unless the individual is a qualified alien as that term is defined under 8 USC section 1641. GRANTS Sec. 901. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for marihuana operation and oversight grants, the department shall expend the funds for grants to counties for education and outreach programs that relate to the Michigan medical marihuana program and the adult-use marihuana program, in accordance with section 6(l) of the Michigan Medical Marihuana Act, 2008 IL 1, MCL 333.26426, and section 14 of the Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27964. The grant funds may be generated from application and license fees authorized under section 8(1)(b) of the Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27958. The grants must be distributed proportionately based on the number of registry identification cards issued to or renewed for the residents of each county that applied for a grant under subsection (2). For the purposes of this subsection, operation and oversight grants are for education, communication, and outreach regarding the Michigan Medical Marihuana Act, 2008 IL 1, MCL 333.26421 to 333.26430, and the Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27951 to 333.27967. Grants provided under this section must not be used for law 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 enforcement purposes. (2) Not later than December 1, the department shall post a listing of potential grant funds available to each county on the department's website. In addition, the department shall work collaboratively with counties regarding the availability of the grant funds. A county that requests grant funds shall apply on a form developed by the department and available on the department's website. The form must contain the county's specific projected plan for use of the grant funds and its agreement to maintain all records and to submit documentation to the department to support the use of the grant funds. (3) To be eligible to receive a grant under subsection (1), a county shall apply not later than January 1 and submit a report to the department not later than September 15 on how the grant was expended. The department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients not later than October 15 of the subsequent fiscal year that details the grant amounts by recipient and the reported uses of the grants in the previous fiscal year and details the calculation for the amount for which each county was eligible. Sec. 902. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for firefighter training grants must be expended only for payments to counties to reimburse organized fire departments for firefighter training and other activities required under the firefighters training council act, 1966 PA 291, MCL 29.361 to 29.377. (2) If the funds appropriated in part 1 for firefighter training grants are expended by the firefighters training council created under section 3 of the firefighters training council act, 1966 PA 291, MCL 29.363, for payments to counties under section 14 of the firefighters training council act, 1966 PA 291, MCL 29.374, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 all of the following apply to the extent otherwise permissible by law: (a) The funds appropriated in part 1 for firefighter training grants must be allocated in accordance with section 14(2) of the firefighters training council act, 1966 PA 291, MCL 29.374. (b) If the funds allocated to any county under subdivision (a) are less than $5,000.00, the funds allocated to each county under subdivision (a) must be adjusted to provide for a minimum payment of $5,000.00 to each county. (3) Not later than February 1, the department shall submit a financial report to the standard report recipients that identifies all of the following information for the previous fiscal year: (a) The amount of the payments that would be made to each county if the distribution formula described in section 14(2) of the firefighters training council act, 1966 PA 291, MCL 29.374, would have been utilized to allocate the total amount appropriated in part 1 for firefighter training grants. (b) The amount of the payments approved by the firefighters training council for allocation to each county. (c) The amount of the payments actually expended or encumbered within each county. (d) A description of any other payments or expenditures made under the authority of the firefighters training council. (e) The amount of payments approved for allocations to counties that was not expended or encumbered and lapsed back to the fireworks safety fund. MICHIGAN COMMISSION ON LAW ENFORCEMENT STANDARDS Sec. 1001. (1) MCOLES shall establish standards for the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 selection, employment, training, education, licensing, and licensure revocation of all law enforcement officers and provide the basic law enforcement training curriculum for law enforcement training academy programs statewide. (2) MCOLES shall maintain staffing and resources necessary to update law enforcement standards within 120 days of the enactment date of any new legislation. (3) From the funds appropriated in part 1, MCOLES, by March 1, shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes a summary of MCOLES activities during the prior calendar year. The report required under this subsection must include, but is not limited to, both of the following information: (a) An account of the distribution of training funds administered by MCOLES. (b) A list of recipients that received training funds under subdivision (a) and the amount received by each recipient and for what purpose it was used. (4) As used in this section, "MCOLES" means the Michigan commission on law enforcement standards created under section 3 of the Michigan commission on law enforcement standards act, 1965 PA 203, MCL 28.603. Sec. 1002. The general fund/general purpose funds appropriated in part 1 for the public safety officers benefit fund must be deposited into the public safety officers benefit fund created in section 3 of the public safety officers benefit act, 2004 PA 46, MCL 28.633. All funds in the public safety officers benefit fund are appropriated and available for expenditure in accordance with section 3 of the public safety officers benefit act, 2004 PA 46, MCL 28.633. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 1003. Funds appropriated in part 1 for in-service training must be deposited into the law enforcement officers training fund created in section 11(7) of the Michigan commission on law enforcement standards act, 1965 PA 203, MCL 28.611. All funds in the law enforcement officers training fund are appropriated and available for expenditure to support the implementation of required annual in service training standards for all licensed law enforcement officers, in accordance with rules promulgated under section 11(2) of the Michigan commission on law enforcement standards act, 1965 PA 203, MCL 28.611. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Sec. 1101. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for accounting continuing education, the bureau of professional licensing must expend not less than $200,000.00 for grants to the Michigan Association of CPAs to support the maintenance and operation of the continuing professional education tracker and web portal. Sec. 1102. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for real estate continuing education, the bureau of professional licensing must expend not less than $400,000.00 for grants to the Michigan Realtors Association to support the approval and tracking of real estate continuing education in this state. Sec. 1103. (1) From the one-time funds appropriated in part 1 for tax tribunal ï¿½ small claims, the department of licensing and regulatory affairs may hire up to 2.0 limited-term employees to support a backlog in small claims cases within the Michigan Tax Tribunal. (2) Unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for tax tribunal ï¿½ 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 small claims are designated as a work project appropriation. Unencumbered or unallotted funds must not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and must be available for expenditures under this section until the project has been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to support a backlog in small claims cases within the Michigan Tax Tribunal. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees, contracting with vendors, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $359,300.00. (d) The estimated completion date is September 30, 2029. ARTICLE 11 DEPARTMENT OF LIFELONG EDUCATION, ADVANCEMENT, AND POTENTIAL part 1 line-item appropriations FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, from the following funds: DEPARTMENT OF LIFELONG EDUCATION, ADVANCEMENT, AND POTENTIAL APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 322.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Full-time employees 285.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Limited-term employees 30.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Noncareer/per diem employees 8.0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 ï¿½ï¿½ Part-time employees 0.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Permanent-intermittent employees 10.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Seasonal employees 0.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 629,852,800 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 629,852,800 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 417,418,700 Special revenue funds: Total private revenues 1,000,000 Total other state restricted revenues 1,897,300 State general fund/general purpose $ 209,536,800 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 37.0 Unclassified salaries--FTEs 6.0 $ 958,100 Executive direction and operations--FTEs 37.0 6,352,200 Property management 255,400 Worker's compensation 3,000 Departmentwide employee economic adjustments 884,400 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 8,453,100 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal revenues 1,773,000 Adult foster care facilities licenses fund 1,300 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Michigan merit award trust fund 16,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 6,662,800 Sec. 103. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY Information technology services and projects $ 502,100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 502,100 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal revenues 111,900 State general fund/general purpose $ 390,200 Sec. 104. OFFICE OF EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATION Full-time equated classified positions 219.0 Child care licensing and regulation--FTEs 157.0 $ 28,487,600 Child development and care contracted services 22,900,000 Child development and care external support 11,074,100 Child development and care public assistance 523,812,000 Head start collaboration office--FTE 1.0 226,600 Office of great start operations--FTEs 61.0 17,218,500 Tri-share child care program 2,096,700 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 605,815,500 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal revenues 414,813,100 Special revenue funds: Private foundations 1,000,000 Certification fees 64,600 Child care home and center licenses fund 501,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 189,436,100 Sec. 105. OFFICE OF EDUCATION PARTNERSHIPS 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Full-time equated classified positions 21.0 Before- and after-school administration--FTEs 2.0 $ 341,200 Camp licensing unit--FTEs 7.0 700,300 Family and community engagement--FTEs 12.0 1,183,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,224,700 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal revenues 720,700 Special revenue funds: Adult foster care facilities licenses fund 42,900 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,461,100 Sec. 106. OFFICE OF HIGHER EDUCATION Full-time equated classified positions 45.0 Dual enrollment payments $ 3,500,000 Michigan Indian tuition waiver--FTE 1.0 159,700 Student financial assistance programs--FTEs 44.0 8,697,700 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 12,357,400 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Michigan merit award trust fund 1,270,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 11,086,600 Sec. 107. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Michigan center for adult college success $ 500,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 500,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 500,000 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 for fiscal year 2026-2027 general sections Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is $211,434,100.00 and total state spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $0.00. Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1: (a) "Department" means the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (b) "DHHS" means the Michigan department of health and human services. (c) "Director" means the director of the department. (d) "FTE" means full-time equated position in the classified service of this state. (e) "IDG" means interdepartmental grant. (f) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house appropriations committees, the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on the department, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office. Sec. 204. If the state administrative board, acting under section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount appropriated under part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and serving in each house, intertransfer funds within part 1 for the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution. Sec. 205. (1) The department shall use the internet to fulfill the reporting requirements of this part and shall make each report readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each required report in a single archivable location on the department's website not later than the due date required for each report. (2) In addition to placing all reports required in the current fiscal year on the department's website, the department shall maintain on its website all reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years posted by fiscal year in the same single archivable location. (3) The department shall transmit all required reports for the current fiscal year to the standard report recipients and any other required recipients by email. The email shall include a copy of the report and a link to access the report online. Sec. 206. The department shall receive and retain copies of all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department shall follow federal and state law and guidelines for short-term and long-term retention of records. The department shall electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required by federal and state guidelines. Sec. 207. (1) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to maintain a searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following for the department: (a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category. (b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit. (c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and payment description. (2) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to update the searchable website on a quarterly basis. Sec. 208. Not later than December 15, the state budget office shall prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses by major departmental program or program areas. Sec. 209. Not later than 14 days after the release of the executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate with the state budget office to provide an annual report on estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the previous 2 fiscal years. Sec. 210. Not later than November 15, the department shall report on private and other third-party funds received by the department in the previous fiscal year. The report must include the amount of funding received, the specific source of funding received, the purpose for which funding was expended, and the amount of any remaining funds. Sec. 211. Consistent with section 217 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, the department shall prepare a report on out-of-state travel expenses by not later than January 1. The report must list all travel outside this state by classified and unclassified employees in the previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or in part with funds appropriated in the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department's budget. The report must include all of the following information: (a) The dates of each travel occurrence. (b) The total transportation and related costs of each travel occurrence and the proportions funded with state general fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal revenues, local revenues, and private revenues, including specific sources of state restricted, federal, local, and private revenues. (c) The destination of each travel occurrence. (d) The specific purpose and description of each travel occurrence, including the specific name of the event or meeting. Sec. 212. On a quarterly basis, the department shall report on all of the following: (a) The number of full-time equated positions in pay status by civil service classification. (b) A comparison by line item of the number of full-time equated positions authorized from funds appropriated in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated positions employed by the department at the end of the reporting period. (c) The number of active employees in each of the following statuses: (i) Full-time salary. (ii) Full-time hourly. (iii) Part-time. (iv) Permanent-intermittent. (v) Limited-term. (vi) Seasonal. (vii) Worker's compensation. (viii) Noncareer/per diem. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (ix) Job share. (x) Special personal services/contractual. (d) The number of overtime hours worked by employees, by classifications. Sec. 213. Not later than April 1, the department shall report on each specific policy change made to implement a public act affecting the department that took effect during the previous calendar year. The report must include reference to the public act that necessitates the policy change. The department shall submit the report to the standard report recipients, to the senate and house standing committees responsible for addressing issues affected by the public acts, and to the joint committee on administrative rules. Sec. 214. (1) The department shall maintain, on a publicly accessible website, a department scorecard that identifies, tracks, and updates on a quarterly basis key metrics that are used to monitor and improve the department's performance. (2) The department shall notify the standard report recipients when the quarterly updates to the department scorecard are available on a publicly accessible website. Sec. 215. (1) Unless specifically authorized elsewhere in this part or part 1, funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to pay for a state obligation that exceeds $200,000.00 for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim without prior legislative approval. (2) If a state obligation for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim results in a change from current statute, the department shall notify the legislature. (3) This section does not apply to compensation and other 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 relief to individuals wrongfully imprisoned as required under the wrongful imprisonment compensation act, 2016 PA 343, MCL 691.1751 to 691.1757. Sec. 216. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $10,000,000.00 for federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $500,000.00 for state restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $350,000.00 for local contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $2,000,000.00 for private contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 217. Total authorized appropriations from all sources under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 30, 2027 are estimated at $4,108,800.00. From this amount, total appropriations for pension-related legacy costs for the department are estimated at $4,108,800.00. Total appropriations for retiree health care legacy costs for the department are estimated at $0.00. Sec. 218. To the extent possible, the department shall not expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted. Sec. 219. The department shall submit reports that summarize all work project accounts not later than December 31, March 30, June 30, and September 30. The reports must include all of the following: (a) A list of all work project accounts. (b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each account. (c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously designated work project accounts, the name and description of the work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed amounts. Sec. 220. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1: (a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are available. (b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. Sec. 221. The department shall not take disciplinary action against an employee of the department because the employee communicates with a member of the legislature or legislative staff unless the communication is prohibited by law and the department is exercising its authority as provided by law. Sec. 222. (1) The department shall maximize the efficiency of the state workforce and utilization and occupancy of office space, leased or owned, for each division within the department. Employees with job responsibilities that require employees to serve in their capacities outside of an office shall be monitored each pay period to ensure all work hours reported on timesheets are actually worked. (2) The department shall comply with requirements set forth by the office of the state employer on in-person work and utilization and occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure at least 80% of employees are in person and building occupancy and utilization rates are at least 80% or higher. (3) The department shall submit reports not later than January 15 and April 15 on all of the following: (a) Remote work policy by division. (b) Building occupancy by address. (c) Whether the building is state-owned or leased. (d) Aggregate badge scanning information by employee. (4) As used in this section, "occupancy" means the actual number of employees physically present in a workplace. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 223. (1) The department shall require as a condition of each contract or subcontract that the prequalified contractor or prequalified subcontractor agree to use the E-Verify system to verify that all persons hired during the contract term by the contractor or subcontractor are legally present and authorized to work in the United States. (2) The department may verify this information directly or may require contractors and subcontractors to verify the information and submit a certification to the department. The department shall submit a report not later than March 1 that describes the processes it has developed and implemented under this section. (3) The department shall not contract with any foreign entities that are known or suspected to be enemies of the United States or known foreign adversaries. Foreign adversaries include all of the following: (a) The People's Republic of China. (b) The Russian Federation. (c) The Islamic Republic of Iran. (d) The Democratic People's Republic of Korea. (e) The Republic of Cuba. (f) The Venezuelan regime of Nicolï¿½s Maduro. (g) The Syrian Arab Republic. (h) An agency or other entity under significant control of a country described in subdivisions (a) to (g). (4) As used in this section, "E-Verify" means an internet-based system operated by the Department of Homeland Security, United States Citizenship and Immigration Services in partnership with the Social Security Administration. Sec. 224. (1) Within 30 days of enactment of this act, the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 state budget office shall post a list of legislatively directed spending items funded in part 1 as defined in sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. The list must include all information and documents pertaining to the funded items as publicly disclosed in accordance with sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. (2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency administering the grant shall submit a report not later than November 1. The department or agency shall update the report and shall submit updated reports not later than March 15 and September 15 of the current fiscal year. The department or agency shall include in the report the most comprehensive information the department or agency has available at the time of posting for grants awarded, including, but not limited to, project milestones, percent completed, funding expended, and funding encumbered. (3) Before executing a grant agreement, all grant recipients must provide a spending plan that specifies the scope of service, the program goals, the measurement for meeting program goals, and how all grant funds will be used, and must indicate if any grant funds will be provided to a third party or subrecipient. (4) Each department or agency responsible for awarding or disbursing grant funds must annually audit the entity's use of the grant funds for each fiscal year in which the grant is active. Each entity must submit information requested by the department or agency to confirm compliance. (5) Each department or agency shall work with the office of the auditor general to conduct an audit of the grant according to 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 generally accepted accounting practices and audit standards. The office of the auditor general must be given access to all internal and external records. All contracts or agreements between a department or agency and a grant recipient or between a grant recipient and a third party must include a clause granting the office of the auditor general access to all internal and external records. (6) Grant recipients and their immediate family members are prohibited from being employed by the executive branch or legislative branch of this state. In addition, grant recipients are prohibited from serving on any state board that has direct or indirect responsibility for approving or auditing grant funds awarded or disbursed by any department or agency. (7) Full and complete audits of grant funds issued by the department or an agency of this state, without redaction unless required by law, must be posted to the department's or agency's website in a conspicuous place for public review. (8) On a quarterly basis, the department or agency shall submit a report on legislatively sponsored grant funds that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) The name of each grant recipient and the status of each grant. (b) The amount distributed to each grant recipient. (c) Any changes to scope or costs of program. (9) The report under subsection (8) must include the following statements made by the department or agency: (a) A statement that confirms the department or agency reviewed and affirmed compliance by each grant recipient with program scope and expenditure of grant funding. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) A statement that confirms the department or agency reviewed applicable program reports and requests for reimbursement. Sec. 225. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall do the following: (a) Report on any amounts of severance pay for a department director, deputy director, or other high-ranking department official not later than 14 days after a severance agreement with the director, deputy director, or official is signed. The name of the director, deputy director, or official and the amount of severance pay must be included in the report required by this subdivision. (b) Not later than February 1, report on the total amount of severance pay remitted to former department employees during the previous fiscal year and the total number of former department employees that were remitted severance pay during the previous fiscal year. (2) As used in this section, "severance pay" means compensation to which both of the following apply: (a) The compensation is payable or paid upon the termination of employment. (b) The compensation is paid in addition to wages or benefits earned during the course of employment or generally applicable retirement benefits. Sec. 226. Funds appropriated in part 1 from state or federal sources are prohibited from being used to provide services, grants, or programming to an individual who is not a citizen of the United States unless the individual is a qualified alien as that term is defined in 8 USC 1641. This section does not prohibit the department, political subdivision, state university, or other state 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 agency from expending funds for the purpose of detaining individuals who are not citizens of the United States, including any costs associated with housing such individuals in county jails or state correctional facilities. Sec. 227. State funds must not be used for diversity, equity, and inclusion, or diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives or programs, as outlined in federal Executive Order No. 14151, 90 Fed. Reg. 8339 (January 29, 2025) "Ending Radical and Wasteful Government DEI Programs and Preferencing", federal Executive Order No. 14168, 90 Fed. Reg. 8615 (January 30, 2025) "Defending Women from Gender Ideology Extremism and Restoring Biological Truth to the Federal Government", or federal Executive Order No. 14173, 90 Fed. Reg. 8633 (January 31, 2025) "Ending Illegal Discrimination and Restoring Merit-Based Opportunity". Sec. 228. The department shall use the same precontract risk assessment program utilized by the department of technology, management, and budget to evaluate financial compliance, security risks, and insurance requirements prior to contract execution. OFFICE OF EDUCATION PARTNERSHIPS Sec. 401. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for family and community engagement, the department shall, at a minimum, do all of the following: (a) Establish or partner with family engagement centers across this state to increase parent and guardian involvement in their child's education. (b) Ensure translation and interpretation services are available and implemented pursuant to department guidance. (c) Partner with intermediate school districts to assist in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 getting information and resources to their constituent districts. (d) Develop an early literacy engagement plan to help parents or guardians become involved in their child's education. OFFICE OF HIGHER EDUCATION Sec. 701. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, in addition to other statutorily required duties, the department shall do all of the following: (a) Review and evaluate all state financial aid programs. The department shall prioritize improving postsecondary educational outcomes, including student completion rates, and improving affordability of postsecondary programs in this state. (b) Serve as the coordinating office for all agencies of the executive branch of government that are responsible for financial aid programs administered by this state. (c) Survey stakeholders, including public, tribal, and private not-for-profit colleges and universities, state departments and agencies, and statewide postsecondary education associations on student financial aid policy to improve this state's administration of programs. (d) Collaborate with the center for educational performance and information and individual colleges and universities to ensure streamlined and coordinated collection of data analyzing the following: (i) Postsecondary education costs, including a comparison to national and regional averages. (ii) Student enrollment. (iii) Degree completion. (e) Provide access to higher education institutional data 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 inventory on an accessible, public facing dashboard to assist students, prospective students, and their families in making decisions on postsecondary education. (f) Coordinate with other state agencies and school districts to increase utilization and awareness of postsecondary opportunities, including, but not limited to, early and middle college, dual enrollment, and private skills training scholarships. (g) Promote, track, and provide resources to increase completion of the free application for federal student aid. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall meet, at a minimum, the following transparency requirements: (a) Collect data necessary to complete all statutory reporting requirements. The department shall notify the chairs of the house and senate appropriations committees within 10 days if an entity receiving funds from part 1 fails to comply with data collection requirements. (b) Maintain a link on the department's website to find data submitted by postsecondary institutions through higher education institutional data inventory. (c) Maintain a link on the department's website to the center for educational performance and information's MI School Data page on postsecondary enrollment and completion tracking. (3) As used in this section, "center for educational performance and information" means the center for educational performance and information created in section 94a of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1694a. Sec. 705. The funds appropriated in part 1 for dual enrollment payments for an eligible student enrolled in a state-approved nonpublic school shall be distributed as provided under the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 postsecondary enrollment options act, 1996 PA 160, MCL 388.511 to 388.524, and the career and technical preparation act, 2000 PA 258, MCL 388.1901 to 388.1913, in a form and manner as determined by the department. OFFICE OF EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATION Sec. 1002. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall ensure that the final child development and care provider reimbursement rates are published on the department and Great Start to Quality webpages. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, upon receiving approval from the state budget director, the department may receive and expend federal child care development block grant funds that are at risk of lapsing back to the federal government. The department may do this only if all of the following criteria are met: (a) The funds are at risk of lapsing back to the federal government by the end of the current fiscal year. (b) The department plans to expend the funds through a 1-time rate increase to providers. (c) The department makes the request to receive and expend the grant funds to the state budget director not less than 30 days before the expenditure of the funds. (3) If the average cases over a 3-month period in the child development and care program result in the current projected fiscal year caseloads falling below the caseload agreement from the May consensus revenue estimating conference, the department may increase the hourly reimbursement rate to child care providers if the following conditions are met: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) The level of expenditures for the remainder of the year is estimated to be significantly below the level estimated from the May consensus revenue estimating conference. (b) The department plans to expend the funds through an ongoing rate increase to providers for the remainder of the fiscal year. (c) The department makes this request to the state budget director not less than 30 days before the expenditure of the funds that includes the rate increase. (4) Upon receiving approval from the state budget director under subsection (2) or (3), the department must notify the senate and house fiscal agencies of the amount being appropriated, the estimated rate increase to providers, and if the rate increase to providers is 1-time or ongoing in nature. (5) The department may withdraw the intent to expend the funds under subsection (2) or (3) by notifying the state budget director in writing. Sec. 1003. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for child development and care contracted services, the department shall create a report on all funding appropriated to contracts for the early childhood comprehensive systems planning by this state during the previous fiscal year. The report required under this section is due by April 1 and must contain at least all of the following information: (a) Total funding appropriated to contracts for the early childhood comprehensive systems planning by this state during the previous fiscal year. (b) The amount of funding for each grant awarded. (c) The grant recipients. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (d) The activities funded by each grant. (e) An analysis of each grant recipient's success in addressing the development of a comprehensive system of early childhood services and supports. (2) All department contracts for early childhood comprehensive systems planning must be bid out through a statewide request-for-proposal process. Sec. 1007. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for child development and care ï¿½ external support, child development and care contracted services, and child care licensing and regulation, the department shall create a joint report that includes, but is not limited to, the following: (a) The affordability of child care in this state, including, but not limited to, the number of children eligible for and participating in the child development and care program, the number of children eligible for and participating in the child development and care program for the last 5 years, and key takeaways from the most recent market rate survey. (b) The availability of child care in this state by county, including, but not limited to, the number of licensed child care providers, the change in the number of licensed child care providers and slots over time, and the estimated demand for care. (c) The health and safety of child care, including, but not limited to, the 10 most common rule violations, the number of licenses revoked and summarily suspended, and the number of license violations for incomplete health and safety training and safe sleep training. (d) Any actions taken to strengthen health and safety of care, including, but not limited to, the number of licensing consultants, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 their average caseload, the number of on-site visits they complete by provider type and region, the types of activities that are intended to improve health and safety in licensed care, and the number of times those activities are performed by licensing consultants. (e) Information on the child care licensing process, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (i) The number of initial applications, initial applications denied, license renewals, and licenses allowed to expire, aggregated by license type. (ii) The average amount of time to approve or deny completed applications and a description of the most common reasons applications are denied. (iii) A description of the types of complaints received, a description of the process used to resolve complaints, the average amount of time to complete investigations, and the percentage of investigations completed on time. (iv) The number of complaints received, investigated, determined to be unsubstantiated, and that result in disciplinary action or rule violations. (v) The number of administrative hearing adjudications. (f) The quality of child care, including, but not limited to, the number of licensed providers participating in the Great Start to Quality program and the workforce registry, the number of new participants and how participation has changed over the last 5 years, and the number of children participating in the child development and care program enrolled in an enhancing quality level or higher program. (g) Any actions taken to improve child care quality, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 including, but not limited to, the number of quality consultants, the average caseload, the number of on-site visits completed by region, the types of activities that are intended to improve quality and the number of times those activities are performed, and the number of providers that have improved the provider's quality rating since the start of the current fiscal year compared to the same time period in the preceding fiscal year, reported as the number of providers in each region. (h) The child care workforce, including, but not limited to, the number of child care professionals, average wages by role, the number of individuals participating in the TEACH scholarship and earning a credential, and the level of demand for staff. (2) The department must post the joint report on the department website and send the joint report to the state budget director, the house and senate subcommittees that oversee the department budget, and the house and senate fiscal agencies by April 1 of the current fiscal year reflecting data for the previous fiscal year. Sec. 1008. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for office of early childhood education, the department shall ensure efficient service provision to coordinate services provided to families for home visits, reduce duplication of state services and spending, increase efficiencies, including, if a new section 32p is added to the school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, the home visits funded under that section, and work with the DHHS as necessary. Sec. 1009. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for child development and care public assistance, the income entrance eligibility threshold for the child development and care program is 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 set to not more than 200% of the federal poverty guidelines. Sec. 1011. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for child development and care public assistance, for eligible children in the child development and care program, the department shall implement payments to providers based on attendance rather than based on enrollment. This shall be done in a manner determined by the department. Sec. 1012. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for child development and care contracted services, $1,500,000.00 must be for the department to work in collaboration with DHHS to continue the network of infant and early childhood mental health consultation, which provides mental health consultation to child care providers. Sec. 1030. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for the tri-share child care program must be awarded for the continuation of the child care facilitator program originally initiated and funded as a pilot project in section 1047(31) of article 5 of 2020 PA 166, and as continued and modified in successive appropriations. (2) The department shall establish and support tri-share regional facilitator hubs and statewide services. (3) The department must create benchmarks for regional facilitator hubs receiving appropriated funding. (4) Any child care facilitator receiving funds under this section must be a nonprofit, limited liability company, C-corporation, S-corporation, or a sole proprietor. (5) Child care facilitator hubs may use funds to enroll in the tri-share child care program families living in Wisconsin but who have a parent or caregiver who are employed in Michigan. A child care provider providing care for a family described in this subsection must be licensed in Michigan. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (6) The department shall innovate program and administration options to attract Michigan employer program participation. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Sec. 1103. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the Michigan Center for Adult College Success must continue to improve adult postsecondary enrollment and completion under the Michigan reconnect grant act, 2020 PA 84, MCL 390.1701 to 390.1709. ARTICLE 12 DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS part 1 line-item appropriations FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of military and veterans affairs for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, from the following funds: DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 8.0 Full-time equated classified positions 918.5 ï¿½ï¿½ Full-time employees 733.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Limited-term employees 14.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Noncareer/per diem employees 24.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Part-time employees 24.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Permanent-intermittent employees 38.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Seasonal employees 2.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 256,513,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 101,800 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 256,411,200 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 154,412,200 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 100,000 Total other state restricted revenues 12,973,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 88,925,900 Sec. 102. MILITARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 8.0 Full-time equated classified positions 385.0 Unclassified salaries--FTEs 8.0 $ 1,728,100 Headquarters and armories--FTEs 93.0 22,556,200 Michigan youth challeNGe academy--FTEs 56.0 9,041,800 Military family relief fund 150,000 Military retirement 2,585,600 Military training sites and support facilities--FTEs 232.0 45,333,200 National Guard operations 600,500 Michigan National Guard member benefit fund--FTEs 4.0 10,119,800 Starbase grant 2,322,000 Departmentwide employee economic adjustments 2,371,700 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 96,808,900 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 IDG - state police 101,800 Federal revenues: DOD - DOA - NGB 66,615,100 Federal counternarcotics revenues 100,000 HHS - HCFA, Medicare, hospital insurance 100 HHS - HCFA, title XIX, Medicaid 36,300 USDVA - VHA 380,400 Special revenue funds: Private donations 90,000 Billeting fund 1,378,500 Income and assessments 6,900 Michigan veterans trust fund 11,800 Military family relief fund 150,000 Morale, welfare, and recreation fund 100,000 National Guard facilities rental fund 187,700 National Guard test projects fund 100,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 27,550,300 Sec. 103. MICHIGAN VETERANS AFFAIRS AGENCY Full-time equated classified positions 57.0 County veteran service grants--FTEs 2.0 $ 4,255,500 Michigan veterans affairs agency administration--FTEs 46.0 7,931,300 Veterans trust fund administration--FTEs 8.0 1,185,200 Veterans trust fund grants 2,500,000 Veterans service grants--FTE 1.0 4,105,500 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 19,977,500 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 USDVA - VHA 753,400 Special revenue funds: Private donations 10,000 Michigan veterans trust fund 3,685,200 Michigan veterans engagement fund 50,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 15,478,900 Sec. 104. MICHIGAN VETERANS' FACILITY AUTHORITY Full-time equated classified positions 476.5 Chesterfield Township home for veterans--FTEs 110.0 $ 34,663,700 D.J. Jacobetti home for veterans--FTEs 179.0 26,342,500 Grand Rapids home for veterans--FTEs 176.0 39,801,000 Information technology services and projects 1,738,100 Michigan veteran homes administration--FTEs 11.0 3,870,500 Veterans cemetery--FTEs 0.5 133,100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 106,548,900 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: HHS - HCFA, Medicare, hospital insurance 1,345,300 HHS - HCFA, title XIX, Medicaid 8,745,000 USDVA - VHA 46,278,700 Special revenue funds: Income and assessments 6,303,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 43,876,900 Sec. 105. CAPITAL OUTLAY Armory maintenance $ 1,000,000 Land and acquisitions 1,000,000 Special maintenance - National Guard 30,000,000 Special maintenance - veterans facilities 500,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 32,500,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: DOD - DOA - NGB 30,000,000 Special revenue funds: Michigan National Guard construction fund 1,000,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,500,000 Sec. 106. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY Information technology services and projects $ 677,700 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 677,700 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: DOD - DOA - NGB 157,900 State general fund/general purpose $ 519,800 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations for fiscal year 2026-2027 general sections Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is $101,899,000.00 and state spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $4,088,000.00. The following itemized statement identifies appropriations from which spending to local units of government will occur: DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS County veteran service grants $ 4,041,500 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Military training sites and support facilities 46,500 TOTAL $ 4,088,000 Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1: (a) "CMS" means the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. (b) "Department" means the department of military and veterans affairs. (c) "DHHS" means the department of health and human services. (d) "Director" means the director of the department. (e) "FTE" means full-time equated position in the classified service of this state. (f) "IDG" means interdepartmental grant. (g) "MVAA" means the Michigan veterans affairs agency created by Executive Reorganization Order No. 2013-2, MCL 32.92. (h) "MVFA" means the Michigan veterans' facility authority created under section 3 of the Michigan veterans' facility authority act, 2016 PA 560, MCL 36.103. (i) "MVH" means the Michigan veteran homes as that term is defined in section 2 of the Michigan veterans' facility authority act, 2016 PA 560, MCL 36.102. (j) "MYCA" means the Michigan youth challeNGe academy. (k) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house appropriations committees, the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on military and veterans affairs, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (l) "USDVA" means the United States Department of Veterans Affairs. (m) "USDVA-VHA" means the USDVA Veterans Health Administration. (n) "VSO" means veterans service organization. (o) "Veterans' facility" means that term as defined in section 2 of the Michigan veterans' facility authority act, 2016 PA 560, MCL 36.102. (p) "Work project" means that term as defined in section 404 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1404, and that meets the criteria in section 451a(1) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a. Sec. 204. If the state administrative board, acting under section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount appropriated under part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and serving in each house, intertransfer funds within part 1 for the particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution. Sec. 205. (1) The department shall use the internet to fulfill the reporting requirements of this part and shall make each report readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each required report in a single archivable location on the department's website not later than the due date required for each report. (2) In addition to placing all reports required in the current fiscal year on the department's website, the department shall maintain on its website all reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years posted by fiscal year in the same single archivable location. (3) The department shall transmit all required reports for the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 current fiscal year to the standard report recipients and any other required recipients by email. The email shall include a copy of the report and a link to access the report online. Sec. 206. The department shall receive and retain copies of all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department shall follow federal and state law and guidelines for short-term and long-term retention of records. The department shall electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required by federal and state guidelines. Sec. 207. (1) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to maintain a searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following for the department: (a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category. (b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit. (c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor, including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and payment description. (2) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to update the searchable website on a quarterly basis. Sec. 208. Not later than December 15, the state budget office shall prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses by major departmental program or program areas. Sec. 209. Not later than 14 days after the release of the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate with the state budget office to provide an annual report on estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the previous 2 fiscal years. Sec. 210. Not later than November 15, the department shall report on private and other third-party funds received by the department in the previous fiscal year. The report must include the amount of funding received, the specific source of funding received, the purpose for which funding was expended, and the amount of any remaining funds. Sec. 211. Consistent with section 217 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, the department shall prepare a report on out-of-state travel expenses by not later than January 1. The report must list all travel outside this state by classified and unclassified employees in the previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or in part with funds appropriated in the department's budget. The report must include all of the following information: (a) The dates of each travel occurrence. (b) The total transportation and related costs of each travel occurrence and the proportions funded with state general fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal revenues, local revenues, and private revenues, including specific sources of state restricted, federal, local, and private revenues. (c) The destination of each travel occurrence. (d) The specific purpose and description of each travel occurrence, including the specific name of the event or meeting. Sec. 212. On a quarterly basis, the department shall report on 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 all of the following: (a) The number of full-time equated positions in pay status by civil service classification. (b) A comparison by line item of the number of full-time equated positions authorized from funds appropriated in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated positions employed by the department at the end of the reporting period. (c) The number of active employees in each of the following statuses: (i) Full-time salary. (ii) Full-time hourly. (iii) Part-time. (iv) Permanent-intermittent. (v) Limited-term. (vi) Seasonal. (vii) Worker's compensation. (viii) Noncareer/per diem. (ix) Job share. (x) Special personal services/contractual. (d) The number of overtime hours worked by employees, by classifications. Sec. 213. Not later than April 1, the department shall report on each specific policy change made to implement a public act affecting the department that took effect during the previous calendar year. The report must include reference to the public act that necessitates the policy change. The department shall submit the report to the standard report recipients, to the senate and house standing committees responsible for addressing issues affected by the public acts, and to the joint committee on 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 administrative rules. Sec. 214. (1) Not later than April 1, the department shall maintain, on a publicly accessible website, a department scorecard that identifies, tracks, and updates on a quarterly basis key metrics that are used to monitor and improve the department's performance. (2) The department shall notify the standard report recipients when the quarterly updates to the department scorecard are available on a publicly accessible website. Sec. 215. (1) Unless specifically authorized elsewhere in this part or part 1, funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to pay for a state obligation that exceeds $200,000.00 for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim without prior legislative approval. (2) If a state obligation for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim results in a change from current statute, the department shall notify the legislature. (3) This section does not apply to compensation and other relief to individuals wrongfully imprisoned as required under the wrongful imprisonment compensation act, 2016 PA 343, MCL 691.1751 to 691.1757. Sec. 216. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $8,600,000.00 for federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,100,000.00 for state 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $250,000.00 for local contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $100,000.00 for private contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 217. Total authorized appropriations from all sources under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 are estimated at $9,082,500.00. From this amount, total appropriations for pension-related legacy costs for the department are estimated at $9,082,500.00. Total appropriations for retiree health care legacy costs for the department are estimated at $0.00. Sec. 218. To the extent possible, the department shall not expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted. Sec. 219. The department shall submit reports that summarize all work project accounts not later than December 31, March 30, June 30, and September 30. The reports must include all of the following: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) A list of all work project accounts. (b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each account. (c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously designated work project accounts, the name and description of the work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed amounts. Sec. 220. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1: (a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are available. (b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. (c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. Sec. 221. The department shall not take disciplinary action against an employee of the department because the employee communicates with a member of the legislature or legislative staff unless the communication is prohibited by law and the department is exercising its authority as provided by law. Sec. 222. (1) The department shall maximize the efficiency of the state workforce and utilization and occupancy of office space, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 leased or owned, for each division within the department. Employees with job responsibilities that require employees to serve in their capacities outside of an office shall be monitored each pay period to ensure all work hours reported on timesheets are actually worked. (2) The department shall comply with requirements set forth by the office of the state employer on in-person work and utilization and occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure at least 80% of employees are in person and building occupancy and utilization rates are at least 80% or higher. (3) The department shall submit reports not later than January 15 and April 15 on all of the following: (a) Remote work policy by division. (b) Building occupancy by address. (c) Whether the building is state-owned or leased. (d) Aggregate badge scanning information by employee. (4) As used in this section, "occupancy" means the actual number of employees physically present in a workplace. Sec. 223. (1) The department shall require as a condition of each contract or subcontract that the prequalified contractor or prequalified subcontractor agree to use the E-Verify system to verify that all persons hired during the contract term by the contractor or subcontractor are legally present and authorized to work in the United States. (2) The department may verify this information directly or may require contractors and subcontractors to verify the information and submit a certification to the department. The department shall submit a report not later than March 1 that describes the processes it has developed and implemented under this section. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (3) The department shall not contract with any foreign entities that are known or suspected to be enemies of the United States or known foreign adversaries. Foreign adversaries include all of the following: (a) The People's Republic of China. (b) The Russian Federation. (c) The Islamic Republic of Iran. (d) The Democratic People's Republic of Korea. (e) The Republic of Cuba. (f) The Venezuelan regime of Nicolï¿½s Maduro. (g) The Syrian Arab Republic. (h) An agency or other entity under significant control of a country described in subdivisions (a) to (g). (4) As used in this section, "E-Verify" means an internet-based system operated by the Department of Homeland Security, United States Citizenship and Immigration Services in partnership with the Social Security Administration. Sec. 224. (1) Within 30 days of enactment of this act, the state budget office shall post a list of legislatively directed spending items funded in part 1 as defined in sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. The list must include all information and documents pertaining to the funded items as publicly disclosed in accordance with sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. (2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency administering the grant shall submit a report not later than November 1. The department or agency shall update the report and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 shall submit updated reports not later than March 15 and September 15 of the current fiscal year. The department or agency shall include in the report the most comprehensive information the department or agency has available at the time of posting for grants awarded, including, but not limited to, project milestones, percent completed, funding expended, and funding encumbered. (3) Before executing a grant agreement, all grant recipients must provide a spending plan that specifies the scope of service, the program goals, the measurement for meeting program goals, and how all grant funds will be used, and must indicate if any grant funds will be provided to a third party or subrecipient. (4) Each department or agency responsible for awarding or disbursing grant funds must annually audit the entity's use of the grant funds for each fiscal year in which the grant is active. Each entity must submit information requested by the department or agency to confirm compliance. (5) Each department or agency shall work with the office of the auditor general to conduct an audit of the grant according to generally accepted accounting practices and audit standards. The office of the auditor general must be given access to all internal and external records. All contracts or agreements between a department or agency and a grant recipient or between a grant recipient and a third party must include a clause granting the office of the auditor general access to all internal and external records. (6) Grant recipients and their immediate family members are prohibited from being employed by the executive branch or legislative branch of this state. In addition, grant recipients are prohibited from serving on any state board that has direct or 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 indirect responsibility for approving or auditing grant funds awarded or disbursed by any department or agency. (7) Full and complete audits of grant funds issued by the department or an agency of this state, without redaction unless required by law, must be posted to the department's or agency's website in a conspicuous place for public review. (8) On a quarterly basis, the department or agency shall submit a report on legislatively sponsored grant funds that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) The name of each grant recipient and the status of each grant. (b) The amount distributed to each grant recipient. (c) Any changes to scope or costs of program. (9) The report under subsection (8) must include the following statements made by the department or agency: (a) A statement that confirms the department or agency reviewed and affirmed compliance by each grant recipient with program scope and expenditure of grant funding. (b) A statement that confirms the department or agency reviewed applicable program reports and requests for reimbursement. Sec. 225. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall do the following: (a) Report on any amounts of severance pay for a department director, deputy director, or other high-ranking department official not later than 14 days after a severance agreement with the director, deputy director, or official is signed. The name of the director, deputy director, or official and the amount of severance pay must be included in the report required by this subdivision. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) Not later than February 1, report on the total amount of severance pay remitted to former department employees during the previous fiscal year and the total number of former department employees that were remitted severance pay during the previous fiscal year. (2) As used in this section, "severance pay" means compensation to which both of the following apply: (a) The compensation is payable or paid upon the termination of employment. (b) The compensation is paid in addition to wages or benefits earned during the course of employment or generally applicable retirement benefits. Sec. 226. Funds appropriated in part 1 from state or federal sources are prohibited from being used to provide services, grants, or programming to an individual who is not a citizen of the United States unless the individual is a qualified alien as that term is defined in 8 USC 1641. This section does not prohibit the department, political subdivision, state university, or other state agency from expending funds for the purpose of detaining individuals who are not citizens of the United States, including any costs associated with housing such individuals in county jails or state correctional facilities. Sec. 227. State funds must not be used for diversity, equity, and inclusion, or diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives or programs, as outlined in federal Executive Order No. 14151, 90 Fed. Reg. 8339 (January 29, 2025) "Ending Radical and Wasteful Government DEI Programs and Preferencing", federal Executive Order No. 14168, 90 Fed. Reg. 8615 (January 30, 2025) "Defending Women from Gender Ideology Extremism and Restoring Biological Truth to 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the Federal Government", or federal Executive Order No. 14173, 90 Fed. Reg. 8633 (January 31, 2025) "Ending Illegal Discrimination and Restoring Merit-Based Opportunity". Sec. 228. The department shall use the same precontract risk assessment program utilized by the department of technology, management, and budget to evaluate financial compliance, security risks, and insurance requirements prior to contract execution. Sec. 250. Funds appropriated in part 1 for capital outlay must be carried forward at the end of the fiscal year consistent with section 248 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1248. Sec. 251. If the department intends to sell any department real property, the department shall submit notification of that intent to the standard report recipients 60 days before the public announcement of that intention. Sec. 252. The department shall provide biannual reports that include the following data: (a) A list of all major work projects, including a status report of each project. (b) The department's financial status, featuring a report of budgeted versus actual expenditures by part 1 line item, including a year-end projection of budget requirements. (c) The number of active employees at the close of the reporting period by job classification and departmental branch of service. Sec. 253. Not later than April 1, the department shall provide to the standard report recipients a copy of its annual strategic plan prepared in compliance with section 363 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1363. The plan must include the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 mission, vision, goals, strategies, and performance measures of the department. Sec. 254. (1) Money privately donated to the department in excess of the appropriation in part 1 is appropriated and available for expenditure for departmental operations and for the purpose designated by the private source, if specified. (2) Any unexpended and unencumbered private donations to support the department at the close of this fiscal year do not lapse to the general fund and must be carried forward to the subsequent fiscal year. (3) Not later than January 15, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that provides an itemized listing of private donations received by the department, the MVAA, the MVFA, the MVH, or a veterans facility. The report required under this subsection must include information about the purpose for which the private donations will be, or were, expended, if known. In addition to the report required under this subsection, if the department, the MVAA, the MVFA, the MVH, or a veterans facility receives a private donation that is $10,000.00 or greater, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients within 14 calendar days after receiving that donation providing the amount of the donation and the purpose for which the funds are to be expended, if known. MILITARY Sec. 301. (1) Not later than October 30, the department shall report a list of the current unclassified positions, which shall include the official titles and responsibilities of each position. (2) Upon the department being granted a request for an 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 additional unclassified employee position from the civil service commission, or for any substantive changes to the duties of an existing unclassified employee position, the department shall report on these changes within 15 days. Sec. 302. (1) The department shall operate and maintain National Guard armories and implement a system to measure the condition and adequacy of those armories. (2) Not later than January 15, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on the status of the armories that includes the following information: (a) An assessment of the grounds and facilities of each armory to objectively measure and determine the current facility condition and capability to support authorized manpower, unit training, and operations. (b) Recommendations for the placement of new armories, the relocation or consolidation of existing armories, or a change in the mission of units assigned to armories to ideally position the National Guard in current or projected population centers. (c) Recommendations for the enhanced use of armories to facilitate family support programs during deployments. (d) An analysis of the feasibility, potential costs, and benefits of use of armories shared with other local, state, or federal agencies to improve responses to local emergencies as well as the community support provided to armories. (e) An investment strategy and proposed funding amounts in a prioritized project list to correct the most critical facility shortfalls across the inventory of armories in this state. (f) A review of the status of construction activities and expenditures of the armory modernization project funded in section 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 107 of article 10 of 2022 PA 166 and section 104 of 2022 PA 194. Sec. 303. (1) The department shall maintain the MYCA to provide values, skills, education, and self-discipline instruction for at-risk youth as provided under 32 USC 509. (2) The department shall take steps to recruit candidates to the MYCA from economically disadvantaged areas, including those with low-income and high-unemployment backgrounds. (3) The department shall partner with the DHHS to identify youth who may be eligible for MYCA from those youth served by DHHS services programs. The department shall give these eligible youth priority for enrollment. (4) The department shall maintain the MYCA to graduate at least the target number of graduates consistent with the state's cooperative agreement with the National Guard Bureau regarding program operations. (5) The department shall monitor individual academic success as measured by the number of individuals who have received a general equivalency diploma, high school diploma, or high school credit recovery or by the improvement of tests of adult basic education scores, or both. (6) Any unexpended and unencumbered private donations to support the MYCA at the close of this fiscal year do not lapse to the general fund and must be carried forward to the subsequent fiscal year. Sec. 304. (1) Not later than January 15, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on the revenues, expenditures, and fund balance of the military family relief fund. The report must itemize expenditures by purpose, including, but not limited to, for advertising and assistance and include information 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 on the number of applications for assistance received, approved, and denied for the previous fiscal year. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall provide outreach to the Michigan families of members of the reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States called into active duty on the availability of assistance through the military family relief fund. (3) As used in this section, "military family relief fund" means the military family relief fund created in section 3 of the military family relief fund act, 2004 PA 363, MCL 35.1213. Sec. 305. (1) The department shall do all of the following: (a) Provide Army and Air National Guard forces, when directed, for state and local emergencies and in support of national military requirements. (b) Operate and maintain Army National Guard training facilities, including Fort Custer and Camp Grayling. (c) Maintain a system that measures the condition and adequacy of air facilities using both quality and functionality criteria. (d) Operate and maintain Air National Guard air bases, including Selfridge Air National Guard base, Battle Creek Air National Guard base, and Alpena combat readiness training center. (2) Not later than March 1, the department shall report the following information for the previous calendar year: (a) The apportioned and assigned strength of the Michigan Army National Guard. (b) The apportioned and assigned strength of the Michigan Air National Guard. (c) Recruiting, retention, and attrition data, including measurement against stated performance goals, for the Michigan Army 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 National Guard. (d) Recruiting, retention, and attrition data, including measurement against stated performance goals, for the Michigan Air National Guard. Sec. 306. (1) The billeting fund is created within the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets received from any source into the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the fund. (3) All of the fees and other revenues generated from the operation of the chargeable transient quarters program must be deposited in the fund. (4) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the fund and does not lapse to the general fund. (5) The department is the administrator of the fund for auditing purposes. (6) The department shall expend money from the fund to support program operations and the maintenance and operations of the chargeable transient quarters program as appropriated in part 1. (7) Not later than January 15, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on the operations, revenues, and expenditures of the fund for the previous fiscal year. Sec. 307. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for Michigan National Guard member benefit fund, the department shall maintain a Michigan National Guard tuition assistance program as provided under the Michigan National Guard tuition assistance act, 2014 PA 259, MCL 32.431 to 32.434. The Michigan National Guard 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 tuition assistance program must do all of the following: (a) Bolster military readiness by increasing recruitment and retention of Michigan Army and Air National Guard members. (b) Fill federally authorized strength levels for the state. (c) Improve the Michigan Army and Air National Guard's competitive draw from other military enlistment options in the state. (d) Enhance the ability of the Michigan Army and Air National Guard to compete for guard members and federal dollars with surrounding states. (e) Increase the pool of eligible candidates within the Michigan Army and Air National Guard to become commissioned officers. (2) The department shall make efforts to increase the number of National Guard members who have received a credential or are still enrolled in the Michigan National Guard tuition assistance program after their initial term of enlistment. To evaluate the effectiveness of the program, the department shall monitor the number of new recruits and new reenlistments and the percentage of those who become participants in the program to determine whether the percentage of authorized Michigan Army and Air National Guard strength obtained and retained is competitive in comparison with the neighboring army and air national guards from Illinois, Indiana, Ohio, and Wisconsin. (3) Not later than March 1, the department shall provide a report on the Michigan National Guard tuition assistance program. The report must include, but is not limited to, the following information for the previous fiscal year: (a) The number of guard members, spouses, children, and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 dependents that received tuition assistance, broken down by the number of each type of recipient. (b) The educational institutions from which those guard members, spouses, children, and dependents received education or training under the program, broken down by the number of each type of recipient and each type of educational or training program for which tuition assistance was received. (c) The total amount of financial assistance received by each educational institution. (d) The total funds expended on the program for financial assistance for each type of recipient and each type of educational or training program. (e) The total funds expended on the program for administrative costs of the department. (f) For each FTE position appropriated in part 1 for the Michigan National Guard tuition assistance program, a description of the position's functions, assigned responsibilities, and, if applicable, the length of time that the position has been vacant. (g) The total number of applications for tuition assistance approved and denied. (h) The number of guard members, spouses, children, and dependents receiving tuition assistance who successfully completed an educational or training program for which tuition assistance was received. (i) A description of each educational or training program offered through the Michigan National Guard tuition assistance program. (j) A list of any educational institutions and training programs removed from eligibility and the rationale for that 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 removal. (k) An explanation of any identified barriers to the successful utilization of the program, or other unmet needs of the program and applicable proposals for legislative action to address those barriers and needs. Sec. 308. The department shall maintain the starbase program at Air National Guard facilities, as provided under 10 USC 2193b, to improve the knowledge, skills, and interest of students, primarily in the fifth grade, in math, science, and technology. The starbase program is to specifically target minority and at-risk students for participation. Sec. 309. (1) The National Guard test projects fund is created within the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets received from any source into the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the fund. (3) All of the fees and other revenues generated from the operation of the test projects program shall be deposited in the fund. (4) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the fund and does not lapse to the general fund. (5) The department is the administrator of the fund for auditing purposes. (6) Money in the fund shall be available for expenditure for the support of program operations as appropriated in part 1. Sec. 310. (1) The morale, welfare, and recreation fund is created within the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 received from any source into the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the fund and shall credit interest and earnings from the investments to the fund. (3) The department is the administrator of the fund for auditing purposes. (4) All of the fees and other revenues generated from the operation of the morale, welfare, and recreation program must be deposited in the morale, welfare, and recreation fund. Money in the fund is available for expenditure for the support of program operations as appropriated in part 1. (5) Money remaining in the fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the fund and does not lapse to the general fund. Sec. 311. (1) The National Guard facilities rental fund is created in the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets received from any source into the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the fund and shall credit interest and earnings from the investments to the fund. (3) All of the fees and other revenues generated from the operation of the National Guard facilities rental program must be deposited in the fund. (4) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the fund and does not lapse to the general fund. (5) The department is the administrator of the fund for auditing purposes. (6) Money in the fund is available for expenditure for the support of program operations as appropriated in part 1. Sec. 312. Not later than February 1, the department shall provide the report required under section 251(7) of the Michigan 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 military act, 1967 PA 150, MCL 32.651. Sec. 313. The Michigan Army National Guard and Air National Guard shall work to provide a culture that is free of sexual assault, through an environment of prevention, education and training, response capability, victim support, reporting procedures, and appropriate accountability that enhances the safety and well-being of all guard members. Sec. 314. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for Michigan National Guard member benefit fund, the department shall create and administer a Tricare premium reimbursement program, as provided under the Tricare premium reimbursement program act, 2025 PA 36, MCL 32.471 to 32.475. (2) Not later than March 1, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on the Tricare premium reimbursement program that includes, but is not limited to, the following information: (a) The number of eligible members receiving assistance under the program, broken down by service branch and including the amount of the assistance issued, and the total number of National Guard members by service branch. (b) The total funds expended on Tricare premium reimbursements. (c) The total funds expended on the program for administrative costs of the department. (d) Any other pertinent information, as determined by the department, on the program's operations and administration. Sec. 315. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for Michigan National Guard member benefit fund, the department shall create and administer a child care assistance program as provided 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 under the Michigan National Guard child care assistance act, 2025 PA 37, MCL 32.451 to 32.455. (2) Not later than March 1, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on the Michigan National Guard child care assistance program that includes, but is not limited to, the following information: (a) The number of eligible members receiving child care assistance under the program, broken down by service branch and including the amount of the stipend issued, and the total number of National Guard members by service branch. (b) The number of children for whom a stipend was paid and the associated number of hours paid broken down by service branch. (c) The hourly rate paid. (d) The total funds expended on the program for child care stipends. (e) The total funds expended on the program for administrative costs of the department. (f) Any other pertinent information, as determined by the department, on the program's operations and administration. Sec. 316. (1) The general fund/general purpose funds appropriated in part 1 for the Michigan National Guard member benefit fund must be deposited into the Michigan National Guard member benefit fund. All funds in the Michigan National Guard member benefit fund are appropriated and available for expenditure to support the Michigan National Guard's tuition assistance program, Tricare premium reimbursement program, and childcare assistance program. (2) As used in this section, "Michigan National Guard member benefit fund" means the Michigan National Guard member benefit fund 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 created in section 3 of the Michigan National Guard member benefit fund act, 2025 PA 31, MCL 32.493. MICHIGAN VETERANS AFFAIRS AGENCY Sec. 405. (1) The Michigan veterans' trust fund board together with the MVAA shall provide emergency grants for disbursement from the Michigan veterans' trust fund. (2) Not later than January 15, the MVAA shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on the Michigan veterans' trust fund that includes, for the previous fiscal year, the following information: (a) A description of the methodology of allocations and the selection of emergency grant program authorized agents. (b) A description of how the emergency grant program is administered in each county. (c) Expenditures for state operating costs and administrative costs. (d) The number of approved emergency grant applications, by category of assistance, and the number of denied applications, by reason of denial. (e) A description of the MVAA's efforts to reduce program administrative costs and maintain the Michigan veterans' trust fund corpus at or above its original amount of $50,000,000.00. (f) The financial status of the Michigan veterans' trust fund, including revenues, beginning and year-end balances, and a breakdown of expenditures for state and local purposes, grants, and other program partnerships and initiatives, including details by county and organization. (g) Expenditures for program partnerships, delineated by 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 organization, and expenditures for any other program initiatives. Sec. 406. The MVAA shall do all of the following: (a) Provide outreach services to Michigan veterans to advise them on the benefits to which they are entitled or eligible, as provided under Executive Reorganization Order No. 2013-2, MCL 32.92, including the military family relief fund created in section 3 of the military family relief fund act, 2004 PA 363, MCL 35.1213, the Michigan veterans' trust fund, and USDVA health, financial, and memorial benefits. (b) Fulfill requests for military discharge certificates (DD-214) upon request. (c) Not later than March 1, submit a report to the standard report recipients on the activities and outcomes of its outreach services, including the percentage of Michigan veterans contacted through its outreach programs, with a goal of 90%, and report that percentage on the status of outreach. Sec. 408. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the MVAA shall provide for the regional coordination of services and do all of the following: (a) Coordinate with veteran benefit counselors throughout a specified region. (b) Coordinate services with all state departments and agencies. (c) Coordinate with regional workforce and economic development agencies. (d) Coordinate activities among local foundations, nonprofit organizations, and community groups to improve accessibility, enrollment, and utilization of the array of health care, education, employment assistance, and quality of life services provided at the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 local level. (e) Work with MVAA service officers, county veteran counselors, VSO service officers, and other service providers to increase awareness of available mental health care resources and support services veterans may be eligible to receive. (f) Coordinate with the DHHS to identify Medicaid recipients who are veterans and who may be eligible for federal veterans health care benefits or other benefits, to the extent that the identification does not violate applicable confidentiality requirements. (g) Collaborate with the department of corrections to create and maintain a process by which prisoners can obtain a copy of their DD-214 form or other military discharge documentation if necessary. (h) Ensure that all MVAA service officers and VSO service officers receive appropriate training in processing applications for benefits payable to veterans due to military sexual trauma, post-traumatic stress disorder, depression, anxiety, substance use disorder, or other mental health issues. Sec. 410. (1) The MVAA shall do all of the following: (a) Provide claims processing services to Michigan veterans in support of benefit claims submitted to the USDVA for the health, financial, and memorial benefits for which they are eligible and report annually on the number of benefit claims, by type, submitted to the USDVA by MVAA. (b) Develop and implement a process to ensure that all county veterans counselors receive the training and accreditation necessary to provide quality services to veterans. Not later than March 1, the MVAA shall provide a report to the standard report 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 recipients for the previous fiscal year that includes the number and percentage of county veterans counselors trained by the MVAA and the number and percentage who received funding from the MVAA to attend training and a description of the training provided. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for MVAA, the MVAA is authorized to expend up to $100,000.00 to hire legal services to represent veterans benefit cases before federal court to maintain accreditation under 38 CFR 14.628(d)(1)(iv). Sec. 411. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for veterans service grants must be deposited into the veterans service fund created in this part. All funds available in the veterans service fund are appropriated and available for expenditure as provided under this section. (2) The MVAA shall establish, administer, and award competitive grants to 1 or more congressionally chartered VSOs or a coalition of VSOs. The MVAA shall award grants to support efforts to connect veterans and their dependents with federal compensation and pension benefits and state veterans' benefits, including emergency grants through the Michigan veterans' trust fund and other local or nonprofit assistance that may be available to veterans and their dependents. The MVAA shall establish a competitive grant process that satisfies the following: (a) Utilizes a service provision model to provide services across the state and can be tracked regionally to ensure that veterans and their dependents in this state, including those within tribal communities, are provided with services, advocacy, and outreach as close to the communities in which they live as possible. (b) Ensures that grantees are providing adequate veteran 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 services and advocacy, through in-person and virtual meetings, that enables the organization to meet performance goals established in the grant agreement. (c) Fosters innovative and transformative approaches and techniques for the grantee to use when providing services, advocacy, and outreach for veterans and their dependents. (d) Requires grantees to use an MVAA-designated internet-based claims data system to manage caseloads. License fees associated with the claims data system described in this subdivision are considered an allowable expenditure and may be reimbursed with grant funds. (e) Requires grantees, in coordination with the MVAA, to provide services to incarcerated veterans who are within 1 year of their earliest release date. (f) Ensures that each grantee is issued performance goals. (g) Ensures that each grantee expends grant awards as prescribed in the grant agreement. (h) Requires each grantee to report not less than quarterly on all of the following: (i) An accounting for all grant fund expenditures. (ii) The number and type of claims originated and submitted by the grantee to the USDVA. (iii) The number and type of claims originated by an organization other than the grantee and submitted by the grantee to the USDVA. (iv) The services provided to veterans and their dependents. (v) Progress in achieving monthly performance benchmark goals. (i) Ensures that each grantee is issued monthly performance benchmark goals that each grantee must aim to achieve and require 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 each grantee to report to the MVAA, in order to ensure that benchmark goals are being achieved, or on target to be achieved, in the fiscal year. (3) The MVAA shall do all of the following: (a) Follow all generally accepted accounting principles in accordance with sections 141 and 485 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1141 and 18.1485. (b) When establishing, modifying, or amending the competitive grant process described in subsection (1), consult and collaborate with congressionally chartered VSOs in the state, or a coalition of VSOs, and other stakeholders to ensure a comprehensive approach to providing services, advocacy, and outreach to veterans and their dependents. (c) Provide notice to current grantees of any MVAA-proposed modifications or amendments to the competitive grant process and provide those grantees with an opportunity to respond through written communication. (d) Assess the accuracy rate of claims reported by grantees. (e) Review and audit grantees' expenditure of grant funds to ensure compliance with the grant agreement, as provided under section 470 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1470. (4) Not later than January 15, the MVAA shall provide a report summarizing grant activities for the previous fiscal year, including the amount of expenditures, number of service and advocacy hours, number of claims for benefits submitted by type of claim, and other information deemed appropriate by the MVAA. (5) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for veterans service grants, $214,000.00 must be allocated to cover necessary 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 administrative and implementation costs incurred by the MVAA. Sec. 412. (1) The veterans service fund is created in the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets received from any source into the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the fund. (3) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the fund and does not lapse to the general fund. (4) The department is the administrator of the fund for auditing purposes. (5) The department shall expend money in the fund, as provided by law. Sec. 413. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for county veteran service grants must be deposited into the restricted county veteran service fund created in section 3a of 1953 PA 192, MCL 35.623a. All available funds in the restricted county veteran service fund are appropriated and available for expenditure as provided by law. (2) From the restricted county veteran service fund created in section 3a of 1953 PA 192, MCL 35.623a, $214,000.00 must be allocated to the MVAA to cover necessary administrative and implementation costs incurred by the MVAA. (3) The MVAA shall provide a report not later than January 15 that includes the following information for the previous fiscal year: (a) A list of counties that received a grant under this section and details concerning the methodology of allocations, including, but not limited to, all program information distributed 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 by the MVAA to counties and any applicable timelines and deadlines imposed by the MVAA. (b) The base, per capita, and total amounts of grant funding each county received under section 3a(6) of 1953 PA 192, MCL 35.623a, including any amount of funding provided under the emergent need relief program pursuant to section 3a(10) of 1953 PA 192, MCL 35.623a. (c) A summary of each county's expenditures of grant funding. (d) The amount of any unexpended grant funding disbursed to the counties that has been recovered and returned to the county veteran service fund. (e) The balance of the county veteran service fund at the close of the fiscal year. (f) A list of counties that have requested funds in the current fiscal year, the amount requested by each county, and the total of these amounts. (g) A list of counties that did not request funds in the current fiscal year. (h) The amount of any funds recovered by the MVAA through the MVAA's finding of misused grant funds. (i) An explanation of any obstacles or reasons for counties not applying for or spending their eligible amount of grant funding. (j) The amount expended by the MVAA for grant administration and implementation costs. (k) Details concerning the methodology of allocations and the selection of emergency grant program authorized agents. (4) The MVAA shall notify the legislature not later than 30 days after any changes, alterations, or modifications are made to 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the amount of grant funding awarded to a county under section 3a of 1953 PA 192, MCL 35.623a. (5) On a quarterly and annual basis, but not more than quarterly, a county that receives grant funding under section 3a of 1953 PA 192, MCL 35.623a, shall submit a report to the MVAA that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) A line-item accounting of all expenditures made using grant funds, including, but not limited to, salaries, training, outreach, equipment, transportation, and operational expenses. (b) A breakdown of the number of veterans served using grant funds, including the number of veterans assisted, the types of services provided, and the number and types of claims submitted. (c) A comparison of the costs associated with delivering services or products to veterans to the amount of grant funding spent on delivering those services or products. (d) A verification of county match funding, including documentation that the county has maintained at least 70% of the funding level from the previous fiscal year for veteran services. (e) A description of how county expenditures align with the intended outcomes of the county veteran service grant program, including any challenges or deviations from planned activities. (f) A certification, signed by the county veteran service officer and a county fiscal officer, affirming that all expenditures comply with county veteran service grant conditions and applicable law. Sec. 415. Not later than January 15, the MVAA shall submit a report that includes all of the following: (a) An analysis on the scope of homelessness among the state's veteran population, including the estimated number of homeless 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 veterans, by county. (b) Challenges to securing housing for homeless veterans. (c) Recommendations for future long-term partnerships between the Michigan state housing development authority, the MVAA, local units of government, and nonprofit organizations that could assist in eliminating homelessness among veterans in this state. Recommendations under this subdivision must minimize additional costs to local units of government. (d) Activities of the MVAA in the previous fiscal year to support homeless veterans or eliminate homelessness among veterans. Sec. 416. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department may partner with the DHHS to facilitate and administer a program to contract with or provide grants to local health care providers to accelerate the clinical research and deployment of promising investigational treatments for suicide prevention that have been granted breakthrough therapy designation by the United States Food and Drug Administration and are eligible for expanded access as defined by the United States Food and Drug Administration, specifically for the treatment of post-traumatic stress disorder, major depressive disorder, or treatment-resistant depression in veterans of the United States military and first responders. MICHIGAN VETERANS' facility authority Sec. 502. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the MVH and the MVFA shall provide compassionate and quality nursing care services at each veterans' facility in this state so that resident members can achieve their highest potential of wellness, independence, self-worth, and dignity. The MVFA and the MVH shall 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 provide nursing care services to veterans in accordance with federal standards and report the results of the annual USDVA and CMS surveys and certification as proof of compliance. (2) Appropriations in part 1 for a veterans' facility shall not be used for any purpose other than expenses related to the operations of the veterans' facility. Sec. 503. All contractors providing health care services at a veterans' facility shall provide services in a manner that complies with applicable USDVA and CMS regulations for state veterans' homes and skilled nursing facilities, any rules governing the operation of nursing homes licensed in this state, and any training and education requirements associated with staff licensure or certification. Sec. 504. (1) The MVFA shall report and investigate all complaints of abuse or neglect at a veterans' facility in compliance with USDVA and CMS regulations for state veterans' homes and skilled nursing facilities. The MVFA shall report on a bimonthly basis the following information: (a) A description of the process by which resident members and others may file complaints of alleged abuse or neglect at a veterans' facility. (b) Summary statistics on the number and general nature of complaints of abuse or neglect. (c) Summary statistics on the final disposition of complaints of abuse or neglect received. (2) The MVFA shall display in high-traffic areas throughout the veterans' facility the process by which visitors, resident members, and staff of the veterans' facility may register complaints. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 505. The MVH shall do the following regarding member care: (a) Provide board-certified psychiatric care for all resident members with mental health disorders in order to ensure that those resident members receive needed services in a professional and timely manner. (b) Provide all resident members and staff a safe and secure environment. (c) Ensure that the veterans' facility effectively develops, executes, and monitors all comprehensive care plans in accordance with federal regulations and the veterans' facility's internal policies, with a goal that a comprehensive care plan is fully developed for all resident members. Sec. 506. The MVH shall establish and implement internal controls regarding all of the following: (a) The use and management of food, maintenance, and pharmaceutical and medical supply inventories. (b) Calculating resident member maintenance assessments in order to accurately calculate resident member maintenance assessments for each billing cycle and ensure that all past due resident member maintenance assessments are addressed within 30 days. (c) Monetary donations and donated goods. (d) The handling of resident member funds to ensure the release of funds within 15 calendar days upon the resident member leaving the home and to ensure that a representative of a resident member is provided a full accounting of that resident member's funds within 30 calendar days after the death of that resident member. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (e) Financial reporting and accounting. Sec. 507. (1) The MVH shall post on its website the following: (a) All policies adopted by the MVFA and the veterans' facility related to the administrative operations of the veterans' facility. (b) The agenda and minutes of public meetings of the MVFA board. (2) The MVH shall provide a report that includes statistics and information that demonstrates the performance of MVH compared to available state and national veterans' homes or nursing homes. (3) Not later than January 15, the MVH shall provide a report on the following: (a) Census data for each veterans' facility, including information on level of care, service era of its resident members, payer source, and average income and assessment rate. (b) Per patient daily care hours provided by each veterans' facility, by level of care. (4) The MVH shall provide a bimonthly report on the financial status of each veterans' facility and central MVFA/MVH administration. Information shall include, but not be limited to, actual year-to-date and projected year-end revenues and expenditures, by fund source. (5) The MVH shall provide a report on the results of any annual or for-cause survey conducted by any entity with oversight over the veterans' facility and any corresponding corrective action plan. This information shall also be made available publicly through the MVH website. (6) In addition to the information required under section 12(1) of the Michigan veterans' facility authority act, 2016 PA 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 560, MCL 36.112, not later than January 31, the MVFA shall provide a report detailing the strategies and actions taken to maximize revenues from non-general fund sources and cost savings strategies. Sec. 508. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, private revenues held by the MVH on a nonfiduciary basis for a resident member of a veterans' facility are appropriated to pay medical expenses, member assessments, and other expenses incurred by that resident member. Any unexpended or unencumbered private revenues held on a nonfiduciary basis by the MVH at the close of the fiscal year do not lapse to the general fund and must be carried forward into the subsequent fiscal year. Sec. 509. Not later than January 15 , the MVFA shall provide a report on the construction, operation, and finances of the new Marquette veterans home funded in article 14 of 2022 PA 166. Sec. 510. Except as otherwise provided by law, any unexpended and unencumbered federal revenues received by the MVFA do not lapse to the state general fund and must be carried forward into the subsequent fiscal year. Sec. 511. The department, with the approval of the state budget office, is authorized to realign federal revenues sources of the MVFA. This realignment of federal fund sourcing must not produce a gross increase or decrease in the total authorization for the individual MVFA line-item appropriations. The department shall provide a quarterly report to the standard report recipients on actions taken under this section. CAPITAL OUTLAY Sec. 601. (1) The department shall provide for the acquisition and disposition of National Guard armories, facilities, and lands 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 as provided under sections 368, 382, and 382a of the Michigan military act, 1967 PA 150, MCL 32.768, 32.782, and 32.782a. (2) The department shall provide a listing of property sales and acquisitions annually. Sec. 602. (1) The appropriations for armory maintenance and special maintenance - National Guard must be expended in accordance with the requirements of sections 302 and 305 and must be expended according to the maintenance priorities of the department to repair and modernize military training sites and support facilities, including armories. (2) Not later than January 15, the department shall provide a report providing information on the status, projected costs, and projected completion date of current and planned special maintenance projects at the armories and other National Guard facilities funded from capital outlay appropriations made in part 1 and in previous fiscal years. Sec. 603. (1) The appropriations for special maintenance ï¿½ veterans' facility must be expended in accordance with the requirements of section 502 and must be expended according to the maintenance priorities of the MVFA to repair and modernize the state's veterans' facility, which may include physical plant expansions, renovations, or enhancements, and other projects designed to enhance the quality of life and medical care of resident members. (2) Not later than January 15, the MVH shall provide a report providing information on the status, projected costs, and projected completion date of current and planned special maintenance projects at each veterans' facility funded from capital outlay appropriations made in part 1 and in previous fiscal years. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 ARTICLE 13 DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES part 1 line-item appropriations FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of natural resources for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, from the following funds: DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 2,281.2 ï¿½ï¿½ Full-time employees 1,618.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Limited-term employees 27.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Noncareer/per diem employees 1,088.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Part-time employees 1.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Permanent-intermittent employees 31.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Seasonal employees 267.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 506,870,300 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 208,300 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 506,662,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 96,019,200 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Total private revenues 8,330,900 Total other state restricted revenues 365,601,900 State general fund/general purpose $ 36,710,000 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 143.4 Unclassified salaries--FTEs 6.0 $ 689,500 Accounting service center 1,574,400 Departmentwide employee economic adjustments 5,551,100 Executive direction--FTEs 11.6 2,240,900 Finance and operations--FTEs 107.8 17,853,900 Gifts and pass-through transactions 5,003,600 Legal services--FTEs 4.0 714,900 Minerals management--FTEs 16.0 2,819,600 Natural resources commission 49,000 Office of public lands--FTEs 4.0 1,364,900 Property management 3,392,300 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 41,254,100 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG, land acquisition services-to-work orders 208,300 Federal revenues: Federal funds 1,441,600 Federal national forest timber fund 32,900 Michigan state waterways fund, federal 42,700 Special revenue funds: Private funds 5,003,600 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Deer habitat reserve 170,400 Fisheries settlement 2,000 Forest development fund 5,226,000 Forest land user charges 12,800 Forest recreation account 108,000 Game and fish protection account 7,253,700 Land exchange facilitation and management fund 4,566,000 Local public recreation facilities fund 231,400 Mackinac Island State Park fund 25,200 Mackinac Island State Park operation fund 1,500 MacMullan Conference Center account 12,500 Marine safety fund 938,200 Michigan natural resources trust fund 1,717,500 Michigan state parks endowment fund 4,365,100 Nongame wildlife fund 14,700 Off-road vehicle safety education fund 900 Off-road vehicle trail improvement fund 328,700 Public use and replacement deed fees 30,800 Recreation improvement account 100,100 Recreation passport fees 6,900 Snowmobile registration fee revenue 51,300 Snowmobile trail improvement fund 170,000 Sportsmen against hunger fund 500 State park improvement account 3,698,100 Turkey permit fees 83,700 Waterfowl fees 3,400 Waterways account 1,224,200 Wildlife resource protection fund 65,300 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Youth hunting and fishing education and outreach fund 800 State general fund/general purpose $ 4,115,300 Sec. 103. DEPARTMENT INITIATIVES Full-time equated classified positions 12.4 Great Lakes restoration initiative $ 2,904,500 Invasive species prevention and control--FTEs 12.4 5,943,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 8,848,300 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 2,904,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 5,943,800 Sec. 104. COMMUNICATION AND CUSTOMER SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 115.1 Cultural resource management--FTEs 5.0 $ 867,700 Marketing and outreach--FTEs 74.5 17,723,400 Michigan historical center--FTEs 35.6 5,982,100 Michigan wildlife council 1,400,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 25,973,200 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 3,369,200 State park improvement, federal 322,200 Special revenue funds: Forest development fund 176,100 Forest recreation account 18,800 Game and fish protection account 9,202,800 Land exchange facilitation and management fund 52,200 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Marine safety fund 40,400 Michigan historical center operations fund 365,400 Michigan state parks endowment fund 121,800 Nongame wildlife fund 12,200 Off-road vehicle trail improvement fund 120,200 Recreation passport fees 667,300 Snowmobile registration fee revenue 21,500 Snowmobile trail improvement fund 106,700 Sportsmen against hunger fund 300,000 State park improvement account 4,362,500 Waterways account 166,400 Wildlife management public education fund 1,400,000 Youth hunting and fishing education and outreach fund 45,200 State general fund/general purpose $ 5,102,300 Sec. 105. WILDLIFE MANAGEMENT Full-time equated classified positions 175.2 Natural resources heritage--FTEs 2.2 $ 653,200 Wildlife management--FTEs 173.0 42,259,600 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 42,912,800 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 26,642,700 Special revenue funds: Nongame wildlife fund, private 150,000 Private funds 315,700 Cervidae licensing and inspection fees 85,100 Deer habitat reserve 1,824,600 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Forest development fund 280,800 Game and fish protection account 11,931,100 Nongame wildlife fund 293,900 Pheasant hunting license fees 175,000 Turkey permit fees 1,099,800 Waterfowl fees 114,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 106. FISHERIES MANAGEMENT Full-time equated classified positions 182.9 Aquatic resource mitigation--FTEs 1.1 $ 737,200 Cormorant population management 150,000 Fish production--FTEs 49.4 11,173,300 Fisheries resource management--FTEs 132.4 24,605,600 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 36,666,100 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 12,315,800 Special revenue funds: Private funds 136,700 Fisheries settlement 737,100 Game and fish protection account 22,248,000 Invasive species fund 100 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,228,400 Sec. 107. LAW ENFORCEMENT Full-time equated classified positions 282.0 Body cameras for conservation officers--FTEs 5.0 $ 517,500 General law enforcement--FTEs 277.0 37,377,700 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 37,895,200 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 8,365,800 Special revenue funds: Cervidae licensing and inspection fees 53,400 Forest development fund 45,400 Forest recreation account 72,800 Game and fish protection account 21,815,700 Marine safety fund 1,398,900 Michigan state parks endowment fund 71,400 Off-road vehicle safety education fund 175,400 Off-road vehicle trail improvement fund 3,380,900 Snowmobile registration fee revenue 726,800 State park improvement account 72,800 Waterways account 21,700 Wildlife resource protection fund 1,176,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 517,500 Sec. 108. PARKS AND RECREATION DIVISION Full-time equated classified positions 1,053.8 Forest recreation and trails--FTEs 67.0 $ 9,665,700 MacMullan Conference Center--FTEs 15.0 1,367,800 Michigan conservation corps 500,100 Recreational boating--FTEs 163.8 25,047,600 State parks--FTEs 808.0 104,062,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 140,643,200 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 144,200 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Michigan state waterways fund, federal 2,129,600 Special revenue funds: Private funds 1,000,000 Forest recreation account 4,181,600 MacMullan Conference Center account 1,367,800 Michigan state parks endowment fund 11,496,300 Off-road vehicle safety education fund 8,000 Off-road vehicle trail improvement fund 3,087,000 Pure Michigan trails fund 100 Recreation improvement account 590,700 Recreation passport fees 220,300 Snowmobile registration fee revenue 17,200 Snowmobile trail improvement fund 2,050,000 State park improvement account 86,660,700 State park improvement account - Belle Isle subaccount 875,000 Waterways account 22,944,600 State general fund/general purpose $ 3,870,100 Sec. 109. MACKINAC ISLAND STATE PARK COMMISSION Full-time equated classified positions 10.8 Historical facilities system--FTEs 9.8 $ 1,204,900 Mackinac Island State Park operations--FTE 1.0 137,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,342,700 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Mackinac Island State Park fund 1,199,100 Mackinac Island State Park operation fund 137,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 5,800 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Sec. 110. FOREST RESOURCES DIVISION Full-time equated classified positions 305.6 Forest management and timber market development--FTEs 216.0 $ 41,012,100 Wildfire protection--FTEs 89.6 19,792,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 60,804,900 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 6,101,100 Federal national forest timber fund 9,114,700 Special revenue funds: Private funds 1,624,900 Commercial forest fund 26,000 Fire equipment fund 668,700 Forest development fund 29,884,000 Forest land user charges 247,500 Game and fish protection account 842,300 Waterways account 55,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 12,240,700 Sec. 111. GRANTS Dam management grant program $ 350,000 Deer habitat improvement partnership initiative 154,200 Federal - clean vessel act grants 10,000 Federal - forest stewardship grants 1,990,900 Federal - rural community fire protection 542,300 Federal - urban forestry grants 278,900 Grants to communities - federal oil, gas, and timber payments 2,668,700 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Grants to counties - marine safety 2,930,000 National recreational trails 41,600 Nonmotorized trail development and maintenance grants 200,000 Off-road vehicle safety training grants 28,800 Off-road vehicle trail improvement grants 4,512,900 Recreation improvement fund grants 916,800 Recreation passport local grants 3,831,400 Snowmobile law enforcement grants 339,600 Snowmobile local grants program 9,549,400 Trail easements 11,600 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 28,357,100 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 7,099,800 Special revenue funds: Private funds 100,000 Deer habitat reserve 154,200 Local public recreation facilities fund 3,831,400 Marine safety fund 1,262,600 Off-road vehicle safety education fund 28,800 Off-road vehicle trail improvement fund 5,437,900 Permanent snowmobile trail easement fund 11,600 Recreation improvement account 916,800 Snowmobile registration fee revenue 339,600 Snowmobile trail improvement fund 8,624,400 State general fund/general purpose $ 550,000 Sec. 112. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 Information technology services and projects $ 5,355,300 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,355,300 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Commercial forest fund 1,100 Deer habitat reserve 30,800 Forest development fund 783,900 Forest land user charges 12,000 Forest recreation account 22,000 Game and fish protection account 1,928,900 Land exchange facilitation and management fund 15,300 Marine safety fund 82,600 Michigan natural resources trust fund 12,300 Michigan state parks endowment fund 678,800 Nongame wildlife fund 15,300 Off-road vehicle safety education fund 5,200 Off-road vehicle trail improvement fund 9,800 Pure Michigan trails fund 100 Recreation improvement account 24,600 Snowmobile registration fee revenue 5,800 Snowmobile trail improvement fund 37,800 Sportsmen against hunger fund 300 State park improvement account 758,100 Turkey permit fees 16,900 Waterfowl fees 1,700 Waterways account 253,800 Wildlife resource protection fund 21,100 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Youth hunting and fishing education and outreach fund 1,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 636,100 Sec. 113. CAPITAL OUTLAYï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ (1) RECREATIONAL LANDS AND INFRASTRUCTURE Federal - land and water conservation fund payments $ 12,900,000 Off-road vehicle trail development and maintenance 1,000,000 Recreational trail repairs and improvements 1,100,000 Snowmobile trail development and maintenance 2,800,000 State game and wildlife area infrastructure 1,500,000 State parks repair and maintenance 30,450,000 Wetland restoration, enhancement and acquisition 2,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 51,750,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 14,025,000 Special revenue funds: Game and fish protection account 375,000 Michigan state parks endowment fund 12,600,000 Off-road vehicle trail improvement fund 1,000,000 Recreation improvement account 1,100,000 Recreation passport fees 16,350,000 Snowmobile trail improvement fund 2,800,000 Waterfowl hunt stamp 1,000,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 2,500,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 (2) WATERWAYS BOATING PROGRAM Local boating infrastructure maintenance and improvements $ 5,000,000 State boating infrastructure maintenance 20,067,400 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 25,067,400 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 1,667,400 Michigan state waterways fund, federal 300,000 Special revenue funds: Waterways account 23,100,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations for fiscal year 2026-2027 general sections Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, total state spending from state sources under part 1 is $402,911,900.00 and total state spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $12,232,400.00. The following itemized statement identifies appropriations from which spending to local units of government will occur: DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES Dam management grant program $ 175,000 Fisheries resource management 125,000 Grants to counties ï¿½ marine safety 1,407,300 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Invasive species prevention and control 2,385,200 Local boating infrastructure maintenance and improvements 3,400,000 Nonmotorized trail development and maintenance grants 100,000 Off-road vehicle safety training grants 28,800 Off-road vehicle trail improvement grants 1,204,400 Recreation improvement fund grants 916,800 Recreation passport local grants 2,000,000 Snowmobile law enforcement grants 339,600 Wildlife habitat improvement grants 150,300 TOTAL $ 12,232, 400 Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1: (a) "Department" means the department of natural resources. (b) "Director" means the director of the department. (c) "FTE" means full-time equated. (d) "IDG" means interdepartmental grant. (e) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house appropriations committees, the senate and house appropriations subcommittee on agriculture and rural development and natural resources, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office. Sec. 204. If the state administrative board, acting under section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount appropriated under this part, the legislature may, by a concurrent resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 serving in each house, intertransfer funds within part 1 for the particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution. Sec. 205. (1) The department shall use the internet to fulfill the reporting requirements of this part and shall make each report readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each required report in a single archivable location on the department's website not later than the due date required for each report. (2) In addition to placing all reports required in the current fiscal year on the department's website, the department shall maintain on its website all reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years posted by fiscal year in the same single archivable location. (3) The department shall transmit all required reports for the current fiscal year to the standard report recipients and any other required recipients by email. The email shall include a copy of the report and a link to access the report online. Sec. 206. The department shall receive and retain copies of all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department shall follow federal and state law and guidelines for short-term and long-term retention of records. The department shall electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required by federal and state guidelines. Sec. 207. (1) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to maintain a searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following for the department: (a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category. (b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor, including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and payment description. (2) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to update the searchable website on a quarterly basis. Sec. 208. Not later than December 15, the state budget office shall prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses by major departmental program or program areas. Sec. 209. Not later than 14 days after the release of the executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate with the state budget office to provide an annual report on the estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the previous 2 fiscal years. Sec. 210. Not later than November 15, the department shall report on private and other third-party funds received by the department in the previous fiscal year. The report must include the amount of funding received, the specific source of funding received, the purpose for which funding was expended, and the amount of any remaining funds, if any. Sec. 211. Consistent with section 217 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, the department shall prepare a report on out-of-state travel expenses by not later than January 1. The report must list all travel outside this state by classified and unclassified employees in the previous fiscal year that was 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 funded in whole or in part with funds appropriated in the department's budget. The report must include all of the following information: (a) The dates of each travel occurrence. (b) The total transportation and related costs of each travel occurrence and the proportions funded with state general fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal revenues, local revenues, and private revenues, including specific sources of state restricted, federal, local, and private revenues, including specific sources of state restricted, federal, local, and private revenues. (c) The destination of each travel occurrence. (d) The specific purpose and description of each travel occurrence, including the specific name of the event or meeting. Sec. 212. On a quarterly basis, the department shall report on all of the following: (a) The number of full-time equated positions in pay status by civil service classification. (b) A comparison by line item of the number of full-time equated positions authorized from funds appropriated in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated positions employed by the department at the end of the reporting period. (c) The number of active employees in each of the following statuses: (i) Full-time salary. (ii) Full-time hourly. (iii) Part-time. (iv) Permanent-intermittent. (v) Limited-term. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (vi) Seasonal. (vii) Worker's compensation. (viii) Noncareer/per diem. (ix) Job share. (x) Special personal services/contractual. (d) The number of overtime hours worked by employees, by classifications. Sec. 213. Not later than April 1, the department shall report on each specific policy change made to implement a public act affecting the department that took effect during the previous calendar year. The report must include reference to the public act that necessitates the policy change. The department shall submit the report to the standard report recipients, to the senate and house standing committees responsible for addressing issues affected by the public acts, and to the joint committee on administrative rules. Sec. 214. (1) Not later than April 1, the department shall maintain, on a publicly accessible website, a department scorecard that identifies, tracks, and updates on a quarterly basis key metrics that are used to monitor and improve the department's performance. (2) The department shall notify the standard report recipients when the quarterly updates to the department scorecard are available on a publicly accessible website. Sec. 215. (1) Unless specifically authorized elsewhere in this part or part 1, funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to pay for a state obligation that exceeds $200,000.00 for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim without prior legislative approval. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (2) If a state obligation for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim results in a change from current statute, the department shall notify the legislature. (3) This section does not apply to compensation and other relief to individuals wrongfully imprisoned as required under the wrongful imprisonment compensation act, 2016 PA 343, MCL 691.1751 to 691.1757. Sec. 216. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $5,000,000.00 for state restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 217. Total authorized appropriations from all sources under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 are estimated at $23,478,400.00. From this amount, total department appropriations for pension-related legacy costs are estimated at $23,478,400.00. Total department appropriations for retiree health care legacy costs for the department are estimated at $0.00. Sec. 218. To the extent possible, the department shall not expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted. Sec. 219. The department shall submit reports that summarize all work project accounts not later than December 31, March 30, June 30, and September 30. The reports must include all of the following: (a) A list of all work project accounts. (b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each account. (c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously designated work project accounts, the name and description of the work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed amounts. Sec. 220. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1: (a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are available. (b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. (c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. Sec. 221. The department shall not take disciplinary action against an employee of the department because the employee communicates with a member of the legislature or legislative staff unless the communication is prohibited by law and the department is exercising its authority as provided by law. Sec. 222. (1) The department shall maximize the efficiency of the state workforce and utilization and occupancy of office space, leased or owned, for each division within the department. Employees with job responsibilities that require employees to serve in their 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 capacities outside of an office shall be monitored each pay period to ensure all work hours reported on timesheets are actually worked. (2) The department shall comply with requirements set forth by the office of the state employer on in-person work and utilization and occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure at least 80% of employees are in person and building occupancy and utilization rates are at least 80% or higher. (3) The department shall submit reports not later than January 15 and April 15 on all of the following: (a) Remote work policy by division. (b) Building occupancy by address. (c) Whether the building is state-owned or leased. (d) Aggregate badge scanning information by employee. (4) As used in this section, "occupancy" means the actual number of employees physically present in a workplace. Sec. 223. (1) The department shall require as a condition of each contract or subcontract that the prequalified contractor or prequalified subcontractor agree to use the E-Verify system to verify that all persons hired during the contract term by the contractor or subcontractor are legally present and authorized to work in the United States. (2) The department may verify this information directly or may require contractors and subcontractors to verify the information and submit a certification to the department. The department shall submit a report not later than March 1 that describes the processes it has developed and implemented under this section. (3) The department shall not contract with any foreign entities that are known or suspected to be enemies of the United 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 States or known foreign adversaries. Foreign adversaries include all of the following: (a) The People's Republic of China. (b) The Russian Federation. (c) The Islamic Republic of Iran. (d) The Democratic People's Republic of Korea. (e) The Republic of Cuba. (f) The Venezuelan regime of Nicolï¿½s Maduro. (g) The Syrian Arab Republic. (h) An agency or other entity under significant control of a country described in subdivisions (a) to (g). (4) As used in this section, "E-Verify" means an internet-based system operated by the Department of Homeland Security, United States Citizenship and Immigration Services in partnership with the Social Security Administration. Sec. 224. (1) Within 30 days of enactment of this act, the state budget office shall post a list of legislatively directed spending items funded in part 1 as defined in sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. The list must include all information and documents pertaining to the funded items as publicly disclosed in accordance with sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. (2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency administering the grant shall submit a report not later than November 1. The department or agency shall update the report and shall submit updated reports not later than March 15 and September 15 of the current fiscal year. The department or agency shall 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 include in the report the most comprehensive information the department or agency has available at the time of posting for grants awarded, including, but not limited to, project milestones, percent completed, funding expended, and funding encumbered. (3) Before executing a grant agreement, all grant recipients must provide a spending plan that specifies the scope of service, the program goals, the measurement for meeting program goals, and how all grant funds will be used, and must indicate if any grant funds will be provided to a third party or subrecipient. (4) Each department or agency responsible for awarding or disbursing grant funds must annually audit the entity's use of the grant funds for each fiscal year in which the grant is active. Each entity must submit information requested by the department or agency to confirm compliance. (5) Each department or agency shall work with the office of the auditor general to conduct an audit of the grant according to generally accepted accounting practices and audit standards. The office of the auditor general must be given access to all internal and external records. All contracts or agreements between a department or agency and a grant recipient or between a grant recipient and a third party must include a clause granting the office of the auditor general access to all internal and external records. (6) Grant recipients and their immediate family members are prohibited from being employed by the executive branch or legislative branch of this state. In addition, grant recipients are prohibited from serving on any state board that has direct or indirect responsibility for approving or auditing grant funds awarded or disbursed by any department or agency. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (7) Full and complete audits of grant funds issued by the department or an agency of this state, without redaction unless required by law, must be posted to the department's or agency's website in a conspicuous place for public review. (8) On a quarterly basis, the department or agency shall submit a report on legislatively sponsored grant funds that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) The name of each grant recipient and the status of each grant. (b) The amount distributed to each grant recipient. (c) Any changes to scope or costs of program. (9) The report under subsection (8) must include the following statements made by the department or agency: (a) A statement that confirms the department or agency reviewed and affirmed compliance by each grant recipient with program scope and expenditure of grant funding. (b) A statement that confirms the department or agency reviewed applicable program reports and requests for reimbursement. Sec. 225. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall do the following: (a) Report on any amounts of severance pay for a department director, deputy director, or other high-ranking department official not later than 14 days after a severance agreement with the director, deputy director, or official is signed. The name of the director, deputy director, or official and the amount of severance pay must be included in the report required by this subdivision. (b) Not later than February 1, report on the total amount of severance pay remitted to former department employees during the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 previous fiscal year and the total number of former department employees that were remitted severance pay during the previous fiscal year. (2) As used in this section, "severance pay" means compensation to which both of the following apply: (a) The compensation is payable or paid upon the termination of employment. (b) The compensation is paid in addition to wages or benefits earned during the course of employment or generally applicable retirement benefits. Sec. 226. Funds appropriated in part 1 from state or federal sources are prohibited from being used to provide services, grants, or programming to an individual who is not a citizen of the United States unless the individual is a qualified alien as that term is defined in 8 USC 1641. This section does not prohibit the department, political subdivision, state university, or other state agency from expending funds for the purpose of detaining individuals who are not citizens of the United States, including any costs associated with housing such individuals in county jails or state correctional facilities. Sec. 227. State funds must not be used for diversity, equity, and inclusion, or diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives or programs, as outlined in federal Executive Order No. 14151, 90 Fed. Reg. 8339 (January 29, 2025) "Ending Radical and Wasteful Government DEI Programs and Preferencing", federal Executive Order No. 14168, 90 Fed. Reg. 8615 (January 30, 2025) "Defending Women from Gender Ideology Extremism and Restoring Biological Truth to the Federal Government", or federal Executive Order No. 14173, 90 Fed. Reg. 8633 (January 31, 2025) "Ending Illegal Discrimination 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 and Restoring Merit-Based Opportunity". Sec. 228. The department shall use the same precontract risk assessment program utilized by the department of technology, management, and budget to evaluate financial compliance, security risks, and insurance requirements prior to contract execution. Sec. 250. (1) In addition to the money appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated, from the following state restricted funds and accounts of the Michigan conservation and recreation legacy fund, the following amounts to the following departments and officers: (a) Department of technology, management, and budget: Game and fish protection account $ 659,600 Waterways account 177,200 State park improvement account 158,300 Forest development fund 354,600 (b) Department of attorney general: Game and fish protection account $ 693,300 Waterways account 156,300 (c) Legislative auditor general: Game and fish protection account $ 39,800 Waterways account 14,300 (d) Department of treasury: Game and fish protection account $ 3,846,300 Waterways account 524,800 Michigan natural resources trust fund 3,618,700 (2) In addition to the money appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated from the following state restricted funds to the civil service commission the amount calculated for each fund pursuant to section 5 of article XI of the state constitution of 1963: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) Michigan conservation and recreation legacy fund. (b) Forest development fund. (c) Michigan natural resources trust fund. (d) Michigan state parks endowment fund. (e) Michigan nongame fish and wildlife trust fund. Sec. 251. Pursuant to section 43703(3) of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.43703, there is appropriated from the Michigan game and fish protection trust fund to the game and fish protection account of the Michigan conservation and recreation legacy fund, $6,000,000.00 for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027. Sec. 252. The department may contract with or provide grants to local units of government, institutions of higher education, or nonprofit organizations to support activities authorized by appropriations in part 1. As used in this section, contracts and grants include, but are not limited to, contracts and grants for research, wildlife and fisheries management, forest management, invasive species monitoring and control, and natural-resource-related programs. Sec. 253. (1) The department may accept monetary and nonmonetary gifts, bequests, donations, contributions, or grants from any private or public source to support, in whole or in part, a departmental function or program. The department shall expend or use such gifts, bequests, donations, contributions, or grants for the purposes designated by the private or public source, if the purpose is specified. (2) Amounts remaining from revenue collected by the department under this section that are unexpended and unencumbered must not lapse to the general fund but must be carried forward to the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 subsequent fiscal year. Sec. 254. Funds appropriated in part 1 must not be expended for utility scale solar or wind development projects. DEPARTMENT INITIATIVES Sec. 281. From the amounts appropriated in part 1 for invasive species prevention and control, the department shall allocate not less than $2,400,000.00 for grants for the prevention, detection, eradication, and control of invasive species. Sec. 282. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, revenue deposited in the invasive species fund created in section 41311 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.41311, is appropriated and may be expended for invasive species immediate response efforts. (2) The department shall annually notify the house of representatives and senate appropriations subcommittees on natural resources and the house of representatives and senate fiscal agencies of any expenditure of funds appropriated under subsection (1). Sec. 283. The department shall not utilize any funding in part 1 on legal services against hunting operations concerning swine. Sec. 284. The department shall not prohibit an individual from feeding birds or wildlife within 300 feet of a residence if feed quantity totals less than 2 gallons. Sec. 285. State lands managed by the department shall be identified as department-managed public lands or publicly owned lands. Sec. 287. The department shall prioritize right-of-way permits or easements for construction or maintenance of broadband 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 facilities on state land and shall not require a centerline survey as a condition of the road right-of-way permit or easement if the applicant can provide detailed engineering plans and if the broadband facilities are contained completely in the right-of-way. If the broadband provider secures a road right-of-way permit to construct or maintain broadband facilities required by the municipal, county, or state entity that owns or controls the public road, the department shall not require the broadband provider to obtain a permit or easement if the broadband facility is contained completely within the road right-of-way. If installation of broadband facilities cannot be contained completely within the right-of-way and requires placement of the infrastructure on public lands, an easement will be required, and a certified survey may be required. If installation of broadband facilities being placed in the road right-of-way requires utilization of public lands, a permit may be required. DEPARTMENT SUPPORT SERVICES Sec. 302. The department may charge land acquisition projects appropriated for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, and for prior fiscal years, a standard percentage fee to recover actual costs, and may use the revenue derived to fund the land acquisition service charges provided for in part 1. Sec. 303. As appropriated in part 1, the department may charge both application fees and transaction fees related to the exchange or sale of state-owned land or rights in land authorized by part 21 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.2101 to 324.2165. To the extent consistent with part 21, fees shall be set by the director at a rate that allows the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department to recover its costs for providing these services. Sec. 305. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 from the snowmobile trail improvement fund and the off-road vehicle trail improvement fund, the department shall expend revenues from those funds for administrative purposes only to the extent that those administrative expenditures directly aid or benefit the statewide snowmobile program or the statewide off-road vehicle program, respectively. (2) Administrative expenditures that directly aid or benefit the statewide snowmobile program or the statewide off-road vehicle program include salaries and fringes for program-specific field and grant staff, trail inspections, contract and grant management, law enforcement activities directly related to snowmobile or off-road vehicle program operations, marketing and outreach activities directly related to trail signage and public safety, information technology services directly supporting trail operations or groomer or ORV management systems, and accounting functions directly related to the administration and payment of snowmobile or off-road vehicle local grants. (3) Administrative expenditures that do not directly aid or benefit the statewide snowmobile program or the statewide off-road vehicle program must not be charged to the snowmobile trail improvement fund or the off-road vehicle trail improvement fund. Prohibited expenditures include, but are not limited to, central support services, executive direction, departmental administration, legal services, indirect cost recoveries, statewide cost allocation charges, accounting service center charges unrelated to snowmobile or off-road vehicle grant payments, property management charges unrelated to trail easements or leases, information technology 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 services or projects not directly supporting field operations or groomer or ORV management systems, treasury fees, civil service assessments, or any other departmental or statewide overhead costs. (4) The department shall not charge or assess indirect costs, internal service charges, or other administrative overhead to the snowmobile trail improvement fund or the off-road vehicle trail improvement fund except as permitted under subsection (2). (5) Nothing in this section prohibits the expenditure of funds from the snowmobile trail improvement fund or the off-road vehicle trail improvement fund for grooming, equipment, trail development and maintenance, signage, local grants, or any other purpose authorized under part 811 or 821 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.81101 to 324.81151 and 324.82101 to 324.82161, respectively. COMMUNICATION AND CUSTOMER SERVICES Sec. 401. In addition to supporting the existing archeological responsibilities of the department within the Michigan History Center, the funds appropriated in part 1 for cultural resource management shall be utilized to continue the ongoing process of increased consultation with known lineal descendants and officials of Native American tribes on whose aboriginal lands a planned archeological activity will occur or an inadvertent discovery has been made. The consultation shall address the identification, treatment, and disposition of Native American cultural items. Sec. 408. Not later than December 1, the department shall submit to the senate and house of representatives appropriations subcommittees on natural resources a report on all land transactions completed by the department in the prior fiscal year. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 For each land transaction, the report must include the size of the parcel, or for subdivided parcels, the number of parcels, the county and municipality in which the parcel is located, the dollar amount of the transaction, the fund source or sources affected by the transaction, and the transaction type. FISHERIES MANAGEMENT Sec. 501. Funds appropriated in part 1 for fisheries resource management must not be used to designate the Little Manistee River as a natural river, as defined in part 305 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.30501 to 324.30515. WILDLIFE MANAGEMENT Sec. 601. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall develop, in conjunction with Allegan County, and implement a plan that expands public use in the Allegan state game area. This expanded public use must include, but is not limited to, the development of a bicycle and off-road vehicle trail. To ensure maximum safety, the plan should not use existing road rights-of-way unless needed to connect portions of the trail. PARKS AND RECREATION DIVISION Sec. 701. The department must provide the choice to opt in to purchasing a recreation passport. FOREST RESOURCES DIVISION Sec. 802. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall, by January 1, prepare and submit to the senate 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 appropriations subcommittee on agriculture and natural resources, the house of representatives appropriations subcommittee on agriculture and rural development and natural resources, and the standing committees of the senate and house of representatives with primary responsibility for natural resources issues a report on all of the following: (a) The number of acres of state forestland prepared for timber harvesting in the prior fiscal year. (b) The number of acres of state forestland timber sold for harvest in the prior fiscal year. (c) The amount of revenue generated from state forest timber sale receipts in the prior fiscal year. Sec. 803. In addition to the money appropriated in part 1, the department may receive and expend money from federal sources to provide response to wildfires and hazard incidents as required by a compact with the federal government. If additional expenditure authorization is required, the department shall so notify the state budget office. The department shall notify the senate appropriations subcommittee on agriculture and natural resources, the house appropriations subcommittees subcommittee on agriculture and rural development and natural resources, and the house and senate fiscal agencies by November 15 of the expenditures under this section during the prior fiscal year. Sec. 807. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated from the disaster and emergency contingency fund up to $800,000.00 to cover department costs related to any disaster, as that term is defined in section 2 of the emergency management act, 1976 PA 390, MCL 30.402. (2) Funds appropriated under subsection (1) must not be 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 expended unless the state budget director recommends the expenditure and the department notifies the house and senate committees on appropriations. Not later than December 1 each year, the department shall provide a report to the senate and house fiscal agencies and the state budget office on the use of the disaster and emergency contingency fund during the prior fiscal year. (3) If Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) reimbursement is approved for costs paid from the disaster and emergency contingency fund, the federal revenue shall be deposited into the disaster and emergency contingency fund. GRANTS Sec. 1001. Federal pass-through funds to local institutions and governments that are received in amounts in addition to those included in part 1 for grants to communities - federal oil, gas, and timber payments and that do not require additional state matching funds are appropriated for the purposes intended. By November 30, the department shall report to the senate appropriations subcommittee on agriculture and natural resources, the house of representatives appropriations subcommittee on agriculture and rural development and natural resources, the senate and house of representatives fiscal agencies, and the state budget director on all amounts appropriated under this section during the prior fiscal year. CAPITAL OUTLAY Sec. 1103. The appropriations in part 1 for capital outlay shall be carried forward at the end of the fiscal year consistent 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 with section 248 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1248. ARTICLE 14 DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE part 1 line-item appropriations FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of state police for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, from the following funds: DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 3.0 Full-time equated classified positions 3,238.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Full-time employees 3,013.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Limited-term employees 77.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Noncareer/per diem employees 57.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Part-time employees 5.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Permanent-intermittent employees 6.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Seasonal employees 0.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 919,460,200 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 20,539,900 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 898,920,300 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 97,321,400 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 4,612,900 Total private revenues 35,000 Total other state restricted revenues 201,992,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 594,958,200 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Full-time equated unclassified positions 3.0 Full-time equated classified positions 135.0 Unclassified salaries--FTEs 3.0 $ 1,433,800 Department services--FTEs 39.0 10,561,900 Departmentwide 48,311,000 Executive direction--FTEs 57.0 11,164,500 Mobile office and system support--FTEs 39.0 6,511,700 Departmentwide employee economic adjustments 643,300 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 78,626,200 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from department of state 9,800 IDG from department of transportation, state trunkline fund 189,500 IDG from department of treasury, casino gaming fees 417,700 IDG, training academy charges 248,000 IDT, auto theft funds 1,500 IDT, truck safety funds 123,500 Federal revenues: DHS 233,200 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 DOJ 61,800 DOJ, interest bearing 21,300 DOT 609,900 Federal indirect funds 2,789,000 Special revenue funds: Local funds - AFIS fees 100 Local funds - LEIN fees 800 Local funds - reimbursed services 300 Local funds - school bus revenue 62,100 Auto theft prevention fund 35,700 Bottle bill enforcement fund 1,500 Criminal justice information center service fees 3,936,500 Drunk driving prevention and training fund 9,100 Forensic science reimbursement fees 61,900 Hazardous materials training center fees 46,800 Highway safety fund 257,800 Marihuana regulation fund 1,200 Marihuana regulatory fund 242,800 Michigan justice training fund 3,700 Michigan merit award trust fund 23,100 Motor carrier fees 614,500 Narcotics-related forfeiture revenue 6,100 Nuclear plant emergency planning reimbursement 42,000 Reimbursed services 38,200 Sex offenders registration fund 2,500 State forensic laboratory fund 90,400 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 State police administrator and coordinator 911 fund 41,000 State police service fees 400 State services fee fund 435,700 Tobacco tax revenue 86,100 Traffic crash revenue 4,100 Traffic law enforcement and safety fund 569,900 Truck driver safety fund 4,200 Vehicle sales proceeds 650,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 66,652,500 Sec. 103. LAW ENFORCEMENT SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 589.0 Biometrics and identification--FTEs 56.0 $ 12,967,700 Criminal justice information center--FTEs 154.0 34,506,500 Forensic science--FTEs 281.0 49,379,700 Grants and community services--FTEs 25.0 22,779,800 Office of school safety--FTEs 6.0 1,240,900 State 911 administration--FTEs 5.0 966,500 Training operations--FTEs 62.0 8,611,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 130,452,300 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from department of state 418,900 IDG from department of transportation, state trunkline fund 776,400 IDG, training academy charges 1,213,000 Intradepartmental transfers 1,000,000 Federal revenues: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 DOJ 14,784,900 DOJ, interest bearing 4,018,100 DOT 1,659,600 Special revenue funds: Local funds - SRMS fees 919,200 Private donations 20,000 Auto theft prevention fund 9,008,800 Criminal justice information center service fees 30,792,300 Drunk driving prevention and training fund 620,100 Forensic science reimbursement fees 1,098,700 Michigan set aside fund 600,000 Motor carrier fees 145,600 Precision driving track fees 316,900 Sex offenders registration fund 696,100 State forensic laboratory fund 892,600 State police administrator and coordinator 911 fund 966,500 State services fee fund 9,614,300 Student safety fund 98,100 Traffic crash revenue 588,300 State general fund/general purpose $ 50,203,900 Sec. 104. FIELD SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 1,975.0 Investigative services--FTEs 102.0 $ 38,344,600 Post operations--FTEs 1,873.0 473,909,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 512,254,400 Appropriated from: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from department of treasury, casino gaming fees 4,907,500 IDT, auto theft funds 909,800 Federal revenues: DOJ 4,689,000 DOT 2,152,000 Forfeiture revenue 544,100 Reimbursed services, federal investigations 4,031,800 Special revenue funds: Local funds - reimbursed services 1,259,000 Bottle bill enforcement fund 536,100 Highway safety fund 10,522,300 Marihuana regulation fund 2,946,800 Marihuana regulatory fund 2,403,300 Michigan merit award trust fund 701,100 Narcotics-related forfeiture revenue 1,348,400 Nonnarcotic forfeiture revenue 50,600 State police service fees 6,285,200 State services fee fund 1,028,600 Tobacco tax revenue 4,087,700 Traffic law enforcement and safety fund 61,459,400 Trooper school recruitment fund 5,069,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 397,322,000 Sec. 105. SPECIALIZED SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 539.0 Commercial vehicle enforcement--FTEs 164.0 $ 32,741,900 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Emergency management and homeland security--FTEs 57.0 20,799,800 Hazardous materials programs--FTEs 19.0 22,612,800 Highway safety planning--FTEs 22.0 19,813,300 Intelligence operations--FTEs 201.0 36,638,600 Secondary road patrol program--FTE 1.0 18,003,200 Special operations--FTEs 75.0 20,988,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 171,598,400 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from department of transportation, state trunkline fund 8,053,800 IDG from department of treasury, public safety answer point training 911 fund 100,000 Intradepartmental transfers 2,051,900 Federal revenues: DHS 31,437,700 DOT 30,158,500 Special revenue funds: Local funds - school bus revenue 1,895,600 Private donations 15,000 Bottle bill enforcement fund 230,000 Criminal justice information center service fees 320,600 Hazardous materials training center fees 717,500 Marihuana regulation fund 257,100 Marihuana regulatory fund 709,800 Motor carrier fees 6,548,500 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 Nuclear plant emergency planning reimbursement 2,298,800 Reimbursed services 1,855,100 Rental of department aircraft 52,400 Secondary road patrol and training fund 18,003,200 State police dispatch operator 911 fund 681,900 Truck driver safety fund 4,570,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 61,640,300 Sec. 106. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY Information technology services and projects $ 15,028,900 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 15,028,900 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from department of transportation, state trunkline fund 62,100 IDG from department of treasury, casino gaming fees 40,000 IDG, training academy charges 5,700 Intradepartmental transfers 10,800 Federal revenues: DHS 32,500 DOJ 65,500 DOT 32,500 Special revenue funds: Local funds - AFIS fees 40,000 Local funds - LEIN fees 425,600 Local funds - school bus revenue 10,200 Auto theft prevention fund 3,100 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Criminal justice information center service fees 5,719,900 Drunk driving prevention and training fund 1,800 Forensic science reimbursement fees 38,200 Highway safety fund 46,200 Marihuana regulatory fund 386,800 Michigan merit award trust fund 1,700 Motor carrier fees 85,200 Nuclear plant emergency planning reimbursement 6,400 Sex offenders registration fund 114,200 State forensic laboratory fund 25,000 State services fee fund 42,200 Tobacco tax revenue 10,700 Traffic crash revenue 123,400 Traffic law enforcement and safety fund 59,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 7,639,500 Sec. 107. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Cold case investigations $ 1,000,000 Law enforcement training for communicating with limited English speaking communities and those deaf and hard of hearing 500,000 Trooper recruit schools 10,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 11,500,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 11,500,000 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations for fiscal year 2026-2027 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 general sections Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is $796,951,000.00 and total state spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $15,500,000.00. The following itemized statement identifies appropriations from which spending to local units of government will occur: DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE Law enforcement communication training $ 500,000 Secondary road patrol program 15,000,000 TOTAL $ 15,500,000 Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1: (a) "AFIS" means the automated fingerprint identification system. (b) "CJIS" means Criminal Justice Information Systems. (c) "Department" means the department of state police. (d) "DHS" means the United States Department of Homeland Security. (e) "Director" means the director of the department. (f) "DNA" means deoxyribonucleic acid. (g) "DOJ" means the United States Department of Justice. (h) "DOT" means the United States Department of Transportation. (i) "FTE" means full-time equated position in the classified service of this state. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (j) "IDG" means interdepartmental grant. (k) "IDT" means intradepartmental transfer. (l) "LEIN" means the law enforcement information network. (m) "MCOLES" means the Michigan commission on law enforcement standards created in section 3 of the Michigan commission on law enforcement standards act, 1965 PA 203, MCL 28.603. (n) "SIGMA" means the statewide integrated governmental management application. (o) "SRMS" means the state records management system. (p) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house appropriations committees, the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on state police, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office. Sec. 204. If the state administrative board, acting under section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount appropriated under part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and serving in each house, intertransfer funds within part 1 for the particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution. Sec. 205. (1) The department shall use the internet to fulfill the reporting requirements of this part and shall make each report readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each required report in a single archivable location on the department's website not later than the due date required for each report. (2) In addition to placing all reports required in the current fiscal year on the department's website, the department shall maintain on its website all reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years posted by fiscal year in the same single 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 archivable location. (3) The department shall transmit all required reports for the current fiscal year to the standard report recipients and any other required recipients by email. The email shall include a copy of the report and a link to access the report online. Sec. 206. The department shall receive and retain copies of all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department shall follow federal and state law and guidelines for short-term and long-term retention of records. The department shall electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required by federal and state guidelines. Sec. 207. (1) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to maintain a searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following for the department: (a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category. (b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit. (c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor, including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and payment description. (2) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to update the searchable website on a quarterly basis. Sec. 208. Not later than December 15, the state budget office shall prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 lapses by major departmental program or program areas. Sec. 209. Not later than 14 days after the release of the executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate with the state budget office to provide an annual report on estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the previous 2 fiscal years. Sec. 210. Not later than November 15, the department shall report on private and other third-party funds received by the department in the previous fiscal year. The report must include the amount of funding received, the specific source of funding received, the purpose for which funding was expended, and the amount of any remaining funds. Sec. 211. Consistent with section 217 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, the department shall prepare a report on out-of-state travel expenses by not later than January 1. The report must list all travel outside this state by classified and unclassified employees in the previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or in part with funds appropriated in the department's budget. The report must include all of the following information: (a) The dates of each travel occurrence. (b) The total transportation and related costs of each travel occurrence and the proportions funded with state general fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal revenues, local revenues, and private revenues, including specific sources of state restricted, federal, local, and private revenues. (c) The destination of each travel occurrence. (d) The specific purpose and description of each travel 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 occurrence, including the specific name of the event or meeting. Sec. 212. On a quarterly basis, the department shall report on all of the following: (a) The number of full-time equated positions in pay status by civil service classification. (b) A comparison by line item of the number of full-time equated positions authorized from funds appropriated in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated positions employed by the department at the end of the reporting period. (c) The number of active employees in each of the following statuses: (i) Full-time salary. (ii) Full-time hourly. (iii) Part-time. (iv) Permanent-intermittent. (v) Limited-term. (vi) Seasonal. (vii) Worker's compensation. (viii) Noncareer/per diem. (ix) Job share. (x) Special personal services/contractual. (d) The number of overtime hours worked by employees, by classifications. Sec. 213. Not later than April 1, the department shall report on each specific policy change made to implement a public act affecting the department that took effect during the previous calendar year. The report must include reference to the public act that necessitates the policy change. The department shall submit the report to the standard report recipients, to the senate and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 house standing committees responsible for addressing issues affected by the public acts, and to the joint committee on administrative rules. Sec. 214. (1) Not later than April 1, the department shall maintain, on a publicly accessible website, a department scorecard that identifies, tracks, and updates on a quarterly basis key metrics that are used to monitor and improve the department's performance. (2) The department shall notify the standard report recipients when the quarterly updates to the department scorecard are available on a publicly accessible website. Sec. 215. (1) Unless specifically authorized elsewhere in this part or part 1, funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to pay for a state obligation that exceeds $200,000.00 for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim without prior legislative approval. (2) If a state obligation for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim results in a change from current statute, the department shall notify the legislature. (3) This section does not apply to compensation and other relief to individuals wrongfully imprisoned as required under the wrongful imprisonment compensation act, 2016 PA 343, MCL 691.1751 to 691.1757. Sec. 216. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $2,000,000.00 for federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $4,000,000.00 for state restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 217. Total authorized appropriations from all sources under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 are estimated at $126,492,400.00. From this amount, total appropriations for pension-related legacy costs for the department are estimated at $99,258,100.00. Total appropriations for retiree health care legacy costs for the department are estimated at $27,234,300.00. Sec. 218. To the extent possible, the department shall not expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted. Sec. 219. The department shall submit reports that summarize all work project accounts not later than December 31, March 30, June 30, and September 30. The reports must include all of the following: (a) A list of all work project accounts. (b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each account. (c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously designated work project accounts, the name and description of the work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed amounts. Sec. 220. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1: (a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are available. (b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. (c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. Sec. 221. The department shall not take disciplinary action against an employee of the department because the employee communicates with a member of the legislature or legislative staff unless the communication is prohibited by law and the department is exercising its authority as provided by law. Sec. 222. (1) The department shall maximize the efficiency of the state workforce and utilization and occupancy of office space, leased or owned, for each division within the department. Employees with job responsibilities that require employees to serve in their capacities outside of an office shall be monitored each pay period to ensure all work hours reported on timesheets are actually worked. (2) The department shall comply with requirements set forth by the office of the state employer on in-person work and utilization and occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure at least 80% of employees are in person and building occupancy and utilization 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 rates are at least 80% or higher. (3) The department shall submit reports not later than January 15 and April 15 on all of the following: (a) Remote work policy by division. (b) Building occupancy by address. (c) Whether the building is state-owned or leased. (d) Aggregate badge scanning information by employee. (4) As used in this section, "occupancy" means the actual number of employees physically present in a workplace. Sec. 223. (1) The department shall require as a condition of each contract or subcontract that the prequalified contractor or prequalified subcontractor agree to use the E-Verify system to verify that all persons hired during the contract term by the contractor or subcontractor are legally present and authorized to work in the United States. (2) The department may verify this information directly or may require contractors and subcontractors to verify the information and submit a certification to the department. The department shall submit a report not later than March 1 that describes the processes it has developed and implemented under this section. (3) The department shall not contract with any foreign entities that are known or suspected to be enemies of the United States or known foreign adversaries. Foreign adversaries include all of the following: (a) The People's Republic of China. (b) The Russian Federation. (c) The Islamic Republic of Iran. (d) The Democratic People's Republic of Korea. (e) The Republic of Cuba. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (f) The Venezuelan regime of Nicolï¿½s Maduro. (g) The Syrian Arab Republic. (h) An agency or other entity under significant control of a country described in subdivisions (a) to (g). (4) As used in this section, "E-Verify" means an internet-based system operated by the Department of Homeland Security, United States Citizenship and Immigration Services in partnership with the Social Security Administration. Sec. 224. (1) Within 30 days of enactment of this act, the state budget office shall post a list of legislatively directed spending items funded in part 1 as defined in sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. The list must include all information and documents pertaining to the funded items as publicly disclosed in accordance with sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. (2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency administering the grant shall submit a report not later than November 1. The department or agency shall update the report and shall submit updated reports not later than March 15 and September 15 of the current fiscal year. The department or agency shall include in the report the most comprehensive information the department or agency has available at the time of posting for grants awarded, including, but not limited to, project milestones, percent completed, funding expended, and funding encumbered. (3) Before executing a grant agreement, all grant recipients must provide a spending plan that specifies the scope of service, the program goals, the measurement for meeting program goals, and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 how all grant funds will be used, and must indicate if any grant funds will be provided to a third party or subrecipient. (4) Each department or agency responsible for awarding or disbursing grant funds must annually audit the entity's use of the grant funds for each fiscal year in which the grant is active. Each entity must submit information requested by the department or agency to confirm compliance. (5) Each department or agency shall work with the office of the auditor general to conduct an audit of the grant according to generally accepted accounting practices and audit standards. The office of the auditor general must be given access to all internal and external records. All contracts or agreements between a department or agency and a grant recipient or between a grant recipient and a third party must include a clause granting the office of the auditor general access to all internal and external records. (6) Grant recipients and their immediate family members are prohibited from being employed by the executive branch or legislative branch of this state. In addition, grant recipients are prohibited from serving on any state board that has direct or indirect responsibility for approving or auditing grant funds awarded or disbursed by any department or agency. (7) Full and complete audits of grant funds issued by the department or an agency of this state, without redaction unless required by law, must be posted to the department's or agency's website in a conspicuous place for public review. (8) On a quarterly basis, the department or agency shall submit a report on legislatively sponsored grant funds that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) The name of each grant recipient and the status of each grant. (b) The amount distributed to each grant recipient. (c) Any changes to scope or costs of program. (9) The report under subsection (8) must include the following statements made by the department or agency: (a) A statement that confirms the department or agency reviewed and affirmed compliance by each grant recipient with program scope and expenditure of grant funding. (b) A statement that confirms the department or agency reviewed applicable program reports and requests for reimbursement. Sec. 225. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall do the following: (a) Report on any amounts of severance pay for a department director, deputy director, or other high-ranking department official not later than 14 days after a severance agreement with the director, deputy director, or official is signed. The name of the director, deputy director, or official and the amount of severance pay must be included in the report required by this subdivision. (b) Not later than February 1, report on the total amount of severance pay remitted to former department employees during the previous fiscal year and the total number of former department employees that were remitted severance pay during the previous fiscal year. (2) As used in this section, "severance pay" means compensation to which both of the following apply: (a) The compensation is payable or paid upon the termination of employment. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) The compensation is paid in addition to wages or benefits earned during the course of employment or generally applicable retirement benefits. Sec. 226. Funds appropriated in part 1 from state or federal sources are prohibited from being used to provide services, grants, or programming to an individual who is not a citizen of the United States unless the individual is a qualified alien as that term is defined in 8 USC 1641. This section does not prohibit the department, political subdivision, state university, or other state agency from expending funds for the purpose of detaining individuals who are not citizens of the United States, including any costs associated with housing such individuals in county jails or state correctional facilities. Sec. 227. State funds must not be used for diversity, equity, and inclusion, or diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives or programs, as outlined in federal Executive Order No. 14151, 90 Fed. Reg. 8339 (January 29, 2025) "Ending Radical and Wasteful Government DEI Programs and Preferencing", federal Executive Order No. 14168, 90 Fed. Reg. 8615 (January 30, 2025) "Defending Women from Gender Ideology Extremism and Restoring Biological Truth to the Federal Government", or federal Executive Order No. 14173, 90 Fed. Reg. 8633 (January 31, 2025) "Ending Illegal Discrimination and Restoring Merit-Based Opportunity". Sec. 228. The department shall use the same precontract risk assessment program utilized by the department of technology, management, and budget to evaluate financial compliance, security risks, and insurance requirements prior to contract execution. Sec. 250. The department shall submit a biannual report on the performance metrics cited or information required to be reported in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 this part, reasons for nonachievement of metric targets, and proposed corrective actions. Sec. 251. Not later than April 1, the department shall provide to the standard report recipients a copy of its annual strategic plan prepared in compliance with section 363 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1363. The plan must include the mission, vision, goals, strategies, and performance measures of the department. Sec. 252. (1) It is the intent of the legislature that the department shall take all steps necessary to protect the data and privacy of citizens who are not the focus of a departmental investigation and to protect personal information from unauthorized access or misuse. The protection required under this subsection includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) Requiring vendors or service providers to protect data shared with them. (b) Ensuring that when personal data is collected, but no longer utilized by the department, that reasonable steps be taken to securely destroy records containing personal information when it is to be discarded so that the information is rendered indecipherable and is not sold for marketing or other purposes. (2) The department shall provide written notification to any data subject whose sensitive personal information is accessed or acquired by an unauthorized person. Sec. 253. (1) The department may accept monetary and nonmonetary gifts, bequests, donations, contributions, or grants from any private or public source to support, in whole or in part, a departmental function or program. The department shall expend or use the gifts, bequests, donations, contributions, or grants 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 accepted under this subsection for the purposes designated by the private or public source, if the purpose is specified. (2) Revenue collected by the department under this section that is unexpended and unencumbered must not lapse to the general fund but must be carried forward to the subsequent fiscal year. (3) Private revenues received under this section that exceed the appropriations in part 1 are appropriated and may be received and expended by the department for the purposes for which the funds are received. (4) If additional authorization is approved in SIGMA by the state budget office under this section, the department shall notify the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on state police and the senate and house fiscal agencies within 10 days after the approval. The notification must include the amount and funding source of the additional authorization, the date of the approval, and the projected use of the funds to be expended. Sec. 254. (1) Federal revenues authorized by and available from the federal government in excess of the appropriations in part 1 are appropriated and may be received and expended by the department for purposes authorized under state law and subject to federal requirements. The total amount of federal revenues that may be received and expended under this section and section 604(3) must not exceed $750,000,000.00. (2) The department shall notify the standard report recipients before expending federal revenues received and appropriated under subsection (1). (3) If additional authorization is approved in SIGMA by the state budget office under this section, the department shall notify the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on state police 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 and the senate and house fiscal agencies within 10 days after the approval. The notification must include the amount and funding source of the additional authorization, the date of its approval, and the projected use of the funds to be expended. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Sec. 301. The department shall notify the standard report recipients when it recommends to close or consolidate any state police post. The notification must include a local and state impact study of the proposed post closure or consolidation. Sec. 302. If the department presents a plan to the state employer to privatize, the department shall submit a complete project plan to the standard report recipients. The plan must include the criteria under which the privatization initiative will be evaluated. The evaluation must be completed and submitted to the standard report recipients within 30 months after the department's initial submission of the complete project plan. Sec. 303. (1) When the department provides contractual services to a local unit of government, the department shall be reimbursed for all costs incurred in providing the services. (2) The department shall define service cost models for those services requiring reimbursement. (3) Contractual services provided to an entity other than a local unit of government may be provided by department personnel, but only on an overtime basis outside the normal work schedule of the personnel. All costs incurred in providing the services are eligible for reimbursement. (4) This section does not apply to services provided to state agencies. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (5) Revenues received for contractual or reimbursed services in excess of the appropriations in part 1 are appropriated and may be received and expended by the department for the purposes for which the funds are received. (6) If additional authorization is approved in SIGMA by the state budget office under this section, the department shall notify the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on state police and the senate and house fiscal agencies within 10 days after the approval. The notification must include the amount and funding source of the additional authorization, the date of its approval, and the projected use of the funds to be expended. Sec. 304. The department may establish and collect fees for publications, videos, conferences, workshops, and related materials. Fees collected under this section must be used to offset expenditures for costs of the publications, videos, workshops, conferences, and related materials. The department shall not collect fees under this section that exceed the cost of the expenditures. Sec. 305. A law enforcement officer funded under part 1 shall not be required to issue a predetermined or specified number of citations for violations of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923, or of a local ordinance that substantially corresponds to the provisions of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923, including parking or standing violations. A law enforcement officer's performance evaluation system must not require a predetermined or specified number of citations to be issued. Sec. 306. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the director shall establish and maintain local headquarters in various places, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 and may do so by agreement, lease, or otherwise, as provided under section 7 of 1935 PA 59, MCL 28.7. Sec. 307. The department's investigative response team must submit any compiled findings of an investigation of a critical incident to the prosecutor of the county in which the critical incident occurred for review. As used in this section, "critical incident" means either of the following: (a) Any event that results in the death or infliction of great bodily harm to an employee of the department or to any other individual while the individual is in the custody of a law enforcement officer employed by the department or while a law enforcement officer employed by the department is attempting to gain control of the individual. (b) Any accident involving a vehicle owned by the department that was operated by an employee of the department at the time of the accident that results in the death or infliction of great bodily harm to the employee or any other individual involved in the accident. LAW ENFORCEMENT SERVICES Sec. 401. (1) The department shall develop and deliver professional, innovative, and quality training that supports the enforcement and public safety efforts of the criminal justice community. (2) The department shall provide performance data, as provided under section 250, for days of training being conducted by the academy. (3) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for training operations, the department may provide or obtain the following 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 training: (a) Training that directly relates to the individual's job description and role within the department. (b) Professional development training. (c) Training that provides the individual with the ability to seek expanded opportunities within the department. (d) Advanced education training. (4) Not later than January 1, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and to the senate and house appropriations committees that includes the following information about the funds appropriated in part 1 for training operations: (a) The training courses that the department's employees completed. (b) If a training course is developed by the department, a description of that course's curriculum and its purpose. (c) The number of the department's employees who have received and completed training pursuant to this section. (5) The department shall distribute and review course evaluations to ensure that quality training is provided. Sec. 402. (1) In accordance with applicable state and federal laws and regulations, the department shall maintain and ensure compliance with CJIS databases and applications in the support of public safety and law enforcement communities. (2) The department shall improve the accuracy, timeliness, and completeness of criminal history information by conducting a minimum of 30 outreach activities targeted to criminal justice agencies. The department shall report the number of these outreach activities conducted, as provided under section 250. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (3) The department shall provide for the compilation of crime statistics consistent with the uniform crime reporting (UCR) program and the national incident-based report system (NIBRS). (4) The department shall provide for the compilation and evaluation of traffic crash reports and the maintenance of the state accident data collection system. (5) The department shall make individual traffic crash reports available for a fee of $15.00 per incident. The department may also sell an extract of electronic traffic crash data for a fee of $0.25 per incident, provided that the name, address, and any other personal identifying information have been excluded. (6) By March 1, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients detailing the number of traffic crash reports provided, the amount of revenue collected, and all expenditures incurred for activities under subsection (5) in the preceding fiscal year. The report must include an analysis of whether revenue from department activities under subsection (5) is sufficient to offset all costs incurred for those activities and must provide information regarding any deficit or surplus of revenue. (7) In accordance with applicable state and federal laws and regulations, the department shall provide for the maintenance and dissemination of criminal history records and juvenile records, including to the extent necessary to exchange criminal history records information with the Federal Bureau of Investigation and other states through the interstate identification index, the National Crime Information Center, and other federal CJIS databases and indices. (8) The department shall, in accordance with applicable state 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 and federal laws, provide for the maintenance of records, including criminal history records regarding firearms licensure, as provided under 1927 PA 372, MCL 28.421 to 28.435. (9) The department shall provide information on the number of background checks processed through the internet criminal history access tool (ICHAT), as provided in section 250. (10) The following unexpended and unencumbered revenues deposited into the criminal justice information center service fees must not lapse to the general fund, but must be carried forward into the subsequent fiscal year: (a) Fees for fingerprinting and criminal record checks and name-based criminal record checks under 1935 PA 120, MCL 28.271 to 28.274. (b) Fees for application and licensing for initial and renewal concealed pistol licenses under 1927 PA 372, MCL 28.421 to 28.435. (c) Fees for searching, copying, and providing public records under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (d) Revenue from other sources, including, but not limited to, investment and interest earnings. (11) Unexpended and unencumbered revenue generated by state records management system fees must not lapse to the general fund, but must be carried forward into the subsequent fiscal year. Sec. 403. (1) The department shall provide forensic testing and analysis/profiling of DNA evidence to aid in law enforcement investigations in this state. (2) The department shall ensure its ability to maintain accreditation by a federally designated accrediting agency, as provided under 34 USC 12592. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (3) The department shall provide forensic science services with an average turnaround time of 55 days, assuming an annual caseload volume commensurate with the average annual caseload received by the forensic science division during the preceding 5 fiscal years, and shall work to achieve a goal of a 30-day average turnaround time across all forensic science disciplines. (4) The department shall provide the following data as provided in section 250: (a) The average turnaround time for processing forensic evidence across all disciplines. (b) Forensic laboratory staffing levels, including scientists in training, and vacancies. (c) The number of backlogged cases in each discipline. Sec. 404. (1) The biometrics and identification division shall maintain and manage the automated biometric identification system, statewide network of agency photographs, and combined offender DNA index system biometric databases. (2) The department shall provide data on the number of 10-print and palm-print submissions to the database, as provided in section 250. (3) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources necessary to have a 28-day average wait time for scheduling a polygraph examination, assuming an annual caseload received commensurate with the average annual caseload received during the preceding 5 fiscal years, with a goal of achieving a 15-day average wait time. (4) If changes are made to the department's protocol for retaining and purging DNA analysis samples and records, the department shall post a copy of the protocol changes on the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department's website. Sec. 405. Not later than December 1, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following information: (a) Sexual assault kit analysis backlog at the beginning of the previous fiscal year. (b) The number of sexual assault kits collected or submitted for analysis during the previous fiscal year. (c) The number of sexual assault kits analyzed and the number of associated DNA profiles created and uploaded during the previous fiscal year. (d) Sexual assault kit analysis backlog at the end of the previous fiscal year. (e) The average turnaround time to analyze sexual assault kits and to create and upload associated DNA profiles for the previous fiscal year. Sec. 406. The department shall provide administrative support for the following grant and community service programs: (a) The operations of the automobile theft prevention authority. (b) Administration of the Edward Byrne memorial justice assistance grant program and other grant programs, including the department's community policing efforts. (c) Administration of the office of school safety. (d) Administration and outreach of the OK2SAY program. Sec. 407. Not later than March 30, the office of school safety shall provide a school safety report to the legislature and the senate and house fiscal agencies that must include reports of all of the following: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) The incidents of school violence or threats reported to the state police by local law enforcement or local school districts, or received through the Michigan incident crime report (MICR). (b) OK2SAY-based incidences and activities. (c) Based upon an evaluation of school safety incidents and an analysis of school safety grants, if applicable, recommendations on best practices and other safety measures to ensure school safety in this state. Sec. 408. (1) The department shall make an organized, strategic effort to recruit, onboard, train, and outfit trooper school candidates and other new employees using the funds appropriated in part 1. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall organize and operate not fewer than 2 trooper, motor carrier, or state properties security recruit schools in the fiscal year. (3) The department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients within 60 days of the conclusion of any trooper, motor carrier, or state properties security recruit school. The report must include all of the following: (a) The number of veterans and the number of MCOLES-certified police officers who were admitted to and the number who graduated from the recruit school. (b) The total number of recruits who were admitted to the recruit school, the number of recruits who graduated from the recruit school, and the location at which each of these recruits is assigned. (4) The department may use the funds appropriated in part 1 that represent attrition savings to offset the cost of recruiting 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 efforts described under subsection (1). (5) The unexpended and unencumbered general fund/general purpose funds appropriated in part 1 for training operations must not lapse to the general fund at the end of the fiscal year but must be deposited into the trooper recruit school fund created under section 819b of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.819b. Sec. 409. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall, in collaboration with the department of civil rights and MCOLES, provide the following training to local police departments or officers free of charge: (a) Cultural awareness and competency. (b) Conflict management. (c) Use of force on vulnerable individuals, including children, individuals with disabilities, individuals with unmet mental health needs, individuals under the influence of substances, and pregnant individuals. (d) Mental health and wellness for law enforcement officers. (2) The training provided under subsection (1) may be offered online in order to facilitate easy access and may be given by department staff, contractors, or external vendors. (3) On a quarterly basis, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on the number of officers, by police department, that received training under this section. Sec. 410. The department, in collaboration with the department of health and human services and the department of education, shall advise on initiatives in schools and other educational organizations that include, but are not limited to, training for educators, teachers, and other personnel in school settings for all 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 of the following: (a) Utilization of trauma-informed practices. (b) Age-appropriate education and information on human trafficking. (c) Age-appropriate education and information on sexual abuse prevention. Sec. 411. Based on the availability of federal funding and demonstrated need, as indicated by applications submitted to the state court administrative office, the department shall provide $1,500,000.00 in Edward Byrne memorial justice assistance grant program funding to the judiciary by interdepartmental grant. Sec. 412. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for grants and community services, the department shall allocate not less than $85,000.00 to administer a training program for county sheriff's office victim services units. FIELD SERVICES Sec. 501. (1) Department enlisted personnel who are employed to enforce traffic laws as provided in section 629e of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.629e, are not prohibited from responding to crimes in progress or other emergency situations and are responsible for making every effort to protect all residents of this state. (2) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources necessary to continually work to enhance traffic safety throughout this state and shall dedicate a minimum of 455,200 hours to statewide patrol. The department shall work to improve public safety efforts within distressed cities by enhancing data analysis capabilities and identifying crime trends and areas with high 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 occurrence of crime. (3) The department shall report on the number of residence checks of registered sex offenders conducted, as provided under section 250. Sec. 502. (1) The department shall identify and apprehend criminals through criminal investigations in this state. (2) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources necessary to provide a comparable number of hours investigating crimes as the average annual number provided during the preceding 5 fiscal years. (3) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources necessary to annually meet or exceed a case clearance rate of 62%. (4) The department shall provide training opportunities to local law enforcement partners with the goal of increasing their knowledge of gambling laws, legal issues, opioid-related investigations, and other emerging law enforcement issues. (5) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources necessary to investigate the average annual number of opioid-related investigations conducted by multijurisdictional task forces and hometown security teams during the preceding 5 fiscal years. The department shall work to enhance investigative and drug interdiction efforts by enhancing data analysis capabilities and linking investigations among multijurisdictional task forces and hometown security teams. Sec. 503. (1) The department shall provide protection to this state, its economy, welfare, and vital state-sponsored programs through the prevention and suppression of organized smuggling of untaxed tobacco products in this state, through enforcement of the tobacco products tax act, 1993 PA 327, MCL 205.421 to 205.436, and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 other laws pertaining to combating criminal activity in this state, and by maintaining a tobacco tax enforcement unit. (2) The department shall submit an annual report on December 1 to the standard report recipients and to the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on general government that details expenditures and activities related to tobacco tax enforcement for the previous fiscal year. Sec. 504. The department shall provide fire investigation training and investigative assistance to public safety agencies in this state. Sec. 505. The department shall not take disciplinary action against an employee of the department for providing, upon request, assistance or mutual aid to a law enforcement officer employed by a law enforcement agency of this state who is engaged in the fresh pursuit of an individual on a freeway. As used in this section: (a) "Fresh pursuit" means that term as defined in section 5 of the uniform act on fresh pursuit, 1937 PA 189, MCL 780.105. (b) "Freeway" means that term as defined in section 18a of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.18a. Sec. 506. The department shall make every reasonable effort to provide, upon request, assistance or mutual aid to a federal law enforcement agency or a law enforcement agency of this state that is actively responding to any of the following: (a) A public safety emergency. (b) Civil unrest or a riot. (c) One or more law enforcement officers in distress. SPECIALIZED SERVICES Sec. 601. (1) The department shall operate the Michigan 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 intelligence operations center for homeland security as this state's primary federally designated fusion center to receive, analyze, gather, and disseminate threat-related information among federal, state, local, tribal, and private sector partners. (2) The department shall ensure public safety by providing public and private sector partners with timely and accurate information regarding critical information key resource threats, as reported to or discovered by the Michigan intelligence operations center for homeland security, and shall increase public awareness on how to report suspicious activity through website or telephone communications. (3) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources necessary to support the cyber section, including the Michigan cyber command center, the computer crimes unit, and the internet crimes against children task force. The department shall maintain the staffing and resources necessary to complete the average annual number of cases completed by the computer crimes unit during the preceding 5 fiscal years. The computer crimes unit shall pursue process improvement initiatives to effectively utilize staff resources in providing investigatory assistance and evidentiary analysis for law enforcement and criminal justice agencies statewide. The department shall maintain the staffing and resources necessary to complete the average annual casework that the Michigan cyber command center completed during the preceding 5 fiscal years. (4) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources necessary to provide digital forensic analysis services with a goal of decreasing backlogs of digital forensic analysis cases annually until the department maintains a 60-day turnaround time. Sec. 602. (1) The department shall provide specialized 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 services in support of, and to enhance, local, state, and federal law enforcement operations within this state, in accordance with all applicable state and federal laws and regulations. (2) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources necessary to provide training to maintain readiness to respond appropriately to at least the average annual number of requests for specialty services which occurred during the preceding 5 fiscal years. (3) The canine unit shall be available for call out statewide 100% of the time. (4) The bomb squad unit shall be available for call out statewide 100% of the time. (5) The emergency support teams shall be available for call out statewide 100% of the time. (6) The marine services team shall be available for call out statewide 100% of the time. (7) Aviation services shall be available for call out statewide 100% of the time, unless prohibited by weather or unexpected mechanical breakdowns. (8) The department shall maintain the staff and resources necessary to provide security services at the State Capitol Complex facilities, the State Secondary Complex, and other state-owned or leased properties, as provided under section 6c of 1935 PA 59, MCL 28.6c. The department shall also maintain the staff and resources necessary to respond to emergencies at the State Capitol Complex, State Secondary Complex, House Office Building, Binsfeld Office Building, Townsend Parking Ramp, Roosevelt Parking Ramp, and other areas as directed. The department shall maintain a goal of annually conducting 35,000 property inspections of state owned and leased 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 facilities. Sec. 603. (1) The department shall maintain commercial vehicle regulation, school bus inspections, and enforcement activities, including enforcement of requirements concerning size, weight, and load restrictions; operating authority; registration; fuel taxes; transportation of hazardous materials; new entrant operations; commercial driver licenses; and inspections pursuant to the federal motor carrier assistance program. (2) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources necessary to meet inspection goals consistent with the department's federal motor carrier assistance program activities. (3) Revenue collected under the motor carrier act, 1933 PA 254, MCL 475.1 to 479.42, must be expended in accordance with that act. Unexpended and unencumbered revenues must not lapse to the general fund but must be carried forward into the subsequent fiscal year. Sec. 604. (1) The department shall coordinate the mitigation, preparation, response, and recovery activities of municipal, county, state, and federal governments, and other governmental entities, for all hazards, disasters, and emergencies. (2) The state director of emergency management may expend money appropriated under part 1 to call on any agency or department of this state or any resource of this state to protect life or property or to provide for the health or safety of the population in any area of this state in which the governor proclaims a state of emergency or state of disaster under the emergency management act, 1976 PA 390, MCL 30.401 to 30.421. The state director of emergency management may expend the amounts the director considers necessary to accomplish these purposes. The director shall submit 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 to the state budget director, as soon as possible, a complete report of all actions taken under the authority of this section. The report must contain, as a separate item, a statement of all money expended that is not reimbursable from federal funding. The state budget director shall review the expenditures and submit recommendations to the legislature in regard to any possible need for a supplemental appropriation. (3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the department may receive and expend money from local, private, federal, or state sources for the purpose of providing emergency management training to local or private interests and for the purpose of supporting emergency preparedness, response, recovery, and mitigation activity. If additional expenditure authorization in SIGMA is approved by the state budget office under this section, the department and the state budget office shall notify the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on state police and the senate and house fiscal agencies within 10 days after the approval. The notification must include the amount and source of the additional authorization, the date of its approval, and the projected use of the funds to be expended under the authorization. The total amount of federal revenues that may be received and expended under this section and section 254 must not exceed $750,000,000.00. (4) The department shall foster, promote, and maintain partnerships to protect this state and homeland from all hazards. (5) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for emergency management and homeland security, the department shall allocate $1,000,000.00 to support the development or augmentation of facilities, infrastructure, and training programs to support future 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 drone testing and training. The department shall use the funds allocated under this subsection only for the purpose of increasing the department's capacity to regulate government and commercial drone operations at scale. (6) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for emergency management and homeland security, the department shall allocate $2,000,000.00 to create and administer a competitive grant program that provides grants to local units of government to support the following: (a) Airspace security. (b) Drone readiness programs. (c) Drone-as-first-responder programs. (d) Drone operations management systems. (e) Unmanned traffic management systems. (f) The purchase of drones and drone equipment that do not include parts sourced from a foreign country of concern. (7) In addition to any other materials required by the department, a local unit of government shall include all of the following, if applicable, with an application to receive grant funding under subsection (6): (a) A proposed use of grant funds. (b) A description of any current or planned drone readiness program or drone-as-first-responder program. (c) A description of any current or planned drone operations management system or unmanned traffic management system. (8) An individual grant to a local unit of government under subsection (6) must not exceed $150,000.00. In determining a grant allocation to a local unit of government under subsection (6), the department shall consider, but is not limited to considering, the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 following: (a) Whether the local unit of government has or is developing a drone readiness program or a drone-as-first-responder program. (b) Whether the local unit of government currently uses drones. (c) Whether the local unit of government currently maintains a drone operations management system or an unmanned traffic management system. (d) The presence of any critical infrastructure or key facilities within the jurisdiction of the local unit of government, including, but not limited to, military installations. (e) Population, service area, and geographic distribution. (9) A local unit of government shall use grant funds awarded under subsection (6) for only the following allowable expenditures: (a) Drone sensor hardware. (b) Drone operations management systems. (c) Unmanned traffic management systems. (d) Software and other information technology systems necessary to support drone operations. (e) Training and onboarding materials related to any allowable expenditures under this subsection. (10) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for emergency management and homeland security, the department shall allocate $400,000.00 to create and administer a competitive grant program to assist counties in the development of critical incident mapping. An individual grant to a county must not exceed $25,000.00, and a county is eligible to receive only up to 3 individual grants. The department shall make grant payments to counties under this subsection on a schedule as determined by the department. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (11) A county that is awarded a grant under subsection (10) shall use the funds only to implement critical incident mapping that satisfies all of the following: (a) Is compatible with platforms and applications used by local, state, and federal public safety officials. (b) Does not require the purchase of additional software for use. (c) Is provided in a printable format. (d) Is verified for accuracy through a walk-through of a building and grounds. (e) Is oriented true north. (f) Includes accurate floor plan information overlaid on current aerial imagery of a building. (g) Includes site-specific labeling that matches the structure of the building, including room labels, hallway names, external door or stairwell numbers, locations of hazards, key utility locations, key boxes, automated external defibrillators, and trauma kits. (h) Includes site-specific labeling that matches the building grounds, including parking areas, athletic fields, surrounding roads, and neighboring properties. (i) Includes a gridded overlay with x/y coordinates. (j) Includes information that best assists first responders in an emergency, including, but not limited to, the following information: (i) Building numbers. (ii) Floors. (iii) Suite designations. (iv) Room numbers. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (v) Other available relevant location information for each building. (12) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources necessary to do all of the following: (a) Serve approximately 105 local emergency management preparedness programs and 88 local emergency planning committees in this state. (b) Operate and maintain the state's emergency operations center and provide command and control in support of emergency response services. (c) Maintain readiness, including training and equipment to respond to civil disorders and natural disasters commensurate with the capabilities of fiscal year 2010-2011. (d) Perform hazardous materials response training. (13) The department shall conduct a minimum of 3 training sessions to enhance safe response in the event of natural or manmade incidents, emergencies, or disasters. (14) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated from the disaster and emergency contingency fund an amount necessary to cover costs related to any disaster or emergency as defined in the emergency management act, 1976 PA 390, MCL 30.401 to 30.421. Funds must be expended as provided under sections 18 and 19 of the emergency management act, 1976 PA 390, MCL 30.418 and 30.419, and R 30.51 to R 30.61 of the Michigan Administrative Code. (15) If, in a particular month, expenditures are made from the disaster and emergency contingency fund, the department shall submit a report for that month to the senate and house fiscal agencies detailing the purpose of the expenditures. The monthly 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 report required under this subsection must be submitted within 30 days after the end of the month during which funds from the disaster and emergency contingency fund were expended. (16) The department shall track and report on a biannual basis, as provided in section 250 of this part, the status of the department's assessment of critical infrastructure vulnerabilities, including the protection status of critical infrastructure items identified by the assessment. The department is not required to report any information that could compromise the security of any critical infrastructure. (17) Revenue collected by the department under this section for the emergency management and homeland security training center that is unexpended and unencumbered at the end of the fiscal year must not lapse to the general fund, but must be carried forward into the subsequent fiscal year. (18) As used in this section: (a) "Critical infrastructure" means a facility designated as critical infrastructure by this state, or that is part of a critical infrastructure sector identified by the federal Cybersecurity and Infrastructure Security Agency. (b) "Drone" means an unmanned aircraft flown by a remote pilot via a ground control system, or autonomously through use of an onboard computer, communication links, and any additional equipment that is necessary for the unmanned aircraft to operate safely. (c) "Drone-as-first-responder program" means a system that can remotely deploy 1 or more drones from strategic locations to the site of a public safety incident for the purpose of providing real-time information to law enforcement officers. (d) "Drone operations management system" means a centralized 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 platform that is used by a drone operator to manage drone missions, operations, assets, and data. (e) "Drone readiness program" means a program designed to prepare local units of government for the safe, compliant, and efficient operation of drones. (f) "Key facility" means that term as defined in section 552c of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.552c. (g) "Local unit of government" means a county, city, township, or village. (h) "Unmanned traffic management system" means a centralized platform that is used to authorize, coordinate, and monitor low-altitude drone operations conducted by multiple drone operators for the purposes of ensuring airspace safety, deconfliction, and regulatory compliance. Sec. 605. The department shall provide for the planning, administration, and implementation of highway traffic safety programs to save lives and reduce injuries on roads in this state, in partnership with other public and private organizations. Sec. 606. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for the secondary road patrol program must be used to provide grants to sheriffs under the secondary road patrol program described under section 76 of 1846 RS 14, MCL 51.76. (2) The sheriffs' duties under the secondary road patrol program, as outlined in section 76(2) of 1846 RS 14, MCL 51.76, are to do all of the following: (a) Patrol and monitor traffic violations. (b) Enforce the criminal laws of this state, violations of which are observed by or brought to the attention of the sheriff's department while patrolling and monitoring secondary roads. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (c) Investigate accidents involving motor vehicles. (d) Provide emergency assistance to persons on or near a highway or road the sheriff is patrolling and monitoring. Sec. 607. (1) The department shall serve as an active liaison between the department of technology, management, and budget and state, local, regional, and federal public safety agencies on matters pertaining to the Michigan public safety communications system and shall report user issues to the department of technology, management, and budget. (2) Not later than January 15, the department, in cooperation with the department of technology, management, and budget, shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on the status of the Michigan public safety communications system that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following information: (a) Planned or anticipated upgrades or maintenance to the Michigan public safety communications system. (b) Upgrades or maintenance required to be in compliance with applicable federal or state law, including the date by which the upgrades or maintenance is expected to be completed or must be completed under applicable federal or state law. (c) The estimated cost of the upgrades or maintenance projects included in the report under this subsection. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Sec. 701. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for cold case investigations, the department shall create and administer a competitive grant program that provides grants not to exceed $200,000.00 to Michigan universities that operate a cold case program. As used in this section, "cold case program" means an 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 academic program administered by a university that provides, but is not limited to, workforce development training related to criminal investigation tactics, forensic science and law, and review of cold homicide and missing persons cases. (2) The department shall not approve a grant application under this section if a university does not satisfy either of the following: (a) The university has operated a cold case program with the department for over a year as of October 1, 2024. (b) The university will begin a cold case program with the department not later than October 1, 2027. (3) Funds disbursed under this section must be used only for programmatic and operational expenses of the university's cold case program. Sec. 702. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for law enforcement training for communication with limited English speaking communities and those deaf and hard of hearing, the department grants and community services division shall create and administer a block grant program to support training provided by an entity holding an oral transliteration certificate. The oral transliteration certificate must be held by an officer, board member, or principal of the entity and must have been held for not less than 1 year. Any training course provided for under this section must be certified by the International Accreditors for Continuing Education and Training. The certification required under this section may be obtained and maintained through a developer who has current status with the International Accreditors for Continuing Education and Training. The purpose of the grant is to train officers to better assist in their communication with members 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 of the public who experience a language barrier or may be hard of hearing or deaf. (2) The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for law enforcement training for communication with limited English speaking communities and those deaf and hard of hearing are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds must not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and must be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a(1) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.145a: (a) The purpose of the project is the training of law enforcement officers. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing contracts with service providers. (c) The estimated cost of this project is $500,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date for the work project is September 30, 2029. (3) The department may use the funds appropriated in part 1 for law enforcement training for communicating with limited English speaking communities and those deaf and hard of hearing for costs associated with the administration and oversight of the block grant program. ARTICLE 15 STATE TRANSPORTATION DEPARTMENT part 1 line-item appropriations FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the state transportation department for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, from the following funds: DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 2,853.3 ï¿½ï¿½ Full-time employees 2,668.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Limited-term employees 58.8 ï¿½ï¿½ Noncareer/per diem employees 81.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Part-time employees 1.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Permanent-intermittent employees 52.0 ï¿½ï¿½ Seasonal employees 31.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 8,594,461,900 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 4,424,000 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 8,590,037,900 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 2,384,442,300 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 87,448,500 Total private revenues 20,500,000 Total other state restricted revenues 5,997,647,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 100,000,000 Sec. 102. DEBT SERVICE Airport safety and protection plan $ 3,618,300 Blue Water Bridge fund 3,318,400 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Economic development 234,300 Local bridge fund 77,300 State trunkline 333,554,100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 340,802,400 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Blue Water Bridge fund 3,318,400 Economic development fund 234,300 Local bridge fund 77,300 State aeronautics fund 3,618,300 State trunkline fund 333,554,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 103. COLLECTION, ENFORCEMENT, AND OTHER AGENCY SUPPORT SERVICES CTF grant to civil service commission $ 225,300 CTF grant to department of attorney general 111,500 CTF grant to department of technology, management, and budget 40,300 CTF grant to department of treasury 54,900 CTF grant to legislative auditor general 48,500 MTF grant to department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy 2,202,200 MTF grant to department of treasury 3,761,300 MTF grant to legislative auditor general 393,900 SAF grant to civil service commission 140,000 SAF grant to department of attorney general 196,400 SAF grant to department of technology, management, and budget 28,600 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 SAF grant to department of treasury 72,200 SAF grant to legislative auditor general 38,100 STF grant to civil service commission 7,160,100 STF grant to department of attorney general 2,236,500 STF grant to department of state police 13,945,400 STF grant to department of technology, management, and budget 1,235,100 STF grant to department of treasury 167,000 STF grant to legislative auditor general 914,900 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 32,972,200 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Comprehensive transportation fund 480,500 Michigan transportation fund 6,357,400 State aeronautics fund 475,300 State trunkline fund 25,659,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 104. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 272.0 Unclassified salaries--FTEs 6.0 $ 492,800 Asset management council 2,299,900 Business support services--FTEs 71.0 10,241,700 Commission audit and support services--FTEs 23.0 3,659,500 Economic development and enhancement programs--FTEs 9.0 1,455,400 Finance, contracts, and support services--FTEs 169.0 24,551,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Property management 8,616,000 Worker's compensation 1,546,300 Departmentwide economic adjustments 6,470,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 59,333,400 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG for accounting service center user charges 4,424,000 Federal aid ï¿½ transportation programs 163,200 Special revenue funds: Blue Water Bridge fund 105,600 Comprehensive transportation fund 2,014,500 Economic development fund 415,200 Michigan transportation fund 5,645,100 State aeronautics fund 857,700 State trunkline fund 45,708,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 105. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY Information technology services and projects $ 21,150,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 21,150,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal aid ï¿½ transportation programs 520,500 Special revenue funds: Blue Water Bridge fund 58,500 Comprehensive transportation fund 238,200 Economic development fund 39,400 Michigan transportation fund 311,200 State aeronautics fund 185,700 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 State trunkline fund 19,796,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 106. TRANSPORTATION PLANNING Full-time equated classified positions 130.8 Planning services--FTEs 130.8 $ 31,992,900 Grants to regional planning councils 488,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 32,481,700 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal aid ï¿½ transportation programs 20,752,800 Special revenue funds: Comprehensive transportation fund 359,900 Michigan transportation fund 11,338,200 State aeronautics fund 30,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 107. DESIGN AND ENGINEERING SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 1,486.0 Business services--FTEs 31.6 $ 8,636,600 Program development and delivery--FTEs 902.9 99,585,000 System operations management--FTEs 551.5 105,073,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 213,294,600 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal aid ï¿½ transportation programs 23,529,800 Special revenue funds: Comprehensive transportation fund 187,100 Michigan transportation fund 19,624,800 State trunkline fund 169,952,900 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 108. HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE Full-time equated classified positions 804.9 State trunkline operations--FTEs 804.9 $ 481,176,400 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 481,176,400 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: State trunkline fund 481,176,400 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 109. ROAD AND BRIDGE PROGRAM Cities and villages $ 1,112,369,700 Cities and villages - MTF redistribution 4,360,000 Cities and villages - GF/GP 28,000,000 County road commissions 2,012,101,400 County road commissions - MTF redistribution 7,820,000 County road commissions - GF/GP 52,000,000 Grants to local programs 33,000,000 Local agency wetland mitigation bank fund 2,000,000 Local bridge program 126,550,900 Local federal aid and road and bridge construction 428,999,800 Movable bridge 6,504,600 Rail grade crossing 3,000,000 Rail grade crossing - surface improvements 6,000,000 Rail grade separation grant program 40,000,000 State trunkline federal aid and road and bridge construction 2,136,373,900 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,999,080,300 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal aid ï¿½ transportation programs 1,741,778,500 Special revenue funds: Local funds 30,003,500 Private funds 10,000,000 Blue Water Bridge fund 29,026,400 Local bridge fund 26,550,900 Michigan transportation fund 2,423,955,700 Neighborhood roads fund 903,200,000 State trunkline fund 734,565,300 State general fund/general purpose $ 100,000,000 Sec. 110. BLUE WATER BRIDGE Full-time equated classified positions 41.0 Blue Water Bridge operations--FTEs 41.0 $ 7,653,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 7,653,200 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Blue Water Bridge fund 7,653,200 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 111. TRANSPORTATION ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT Forest roads $ 5,000,000 Rural county primary 10,620,800 Rural county urban system 2,500,000 Target industries/economic redevelopment 24,741,600 Urban county congestion 10,620,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 53,483,200 Appropriated from: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Special revenue funds: Economic development fund 53,483,200 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 112. AERONAUTICS SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 43.3 Air service program $ 50,000 Air service - general aviation airports 5,294,700 Aviation services-FTEs 43.3 6,801,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 12,145,700 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: State aeronautics fund 12,145,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 113. PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 36.9 Passenger transportation services--FTEs 36.9 $ 5,672,600 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,672,600 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal aid ï¿½ transportation programs 2,000,000 Special revenue funds: Comprehensive transportation fund 3,672,600 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 114. LOCAL BUS TRANSIT Local bus operating $ 290,000,000 Nonurban operating/capital 41,935,500 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 331,935,500 Appropriated from: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Federal revenues: Federal aid ï¿½ transportation programs 39,935,500 Special revenue funds: Local funds 2,000,000 Comprehensive transportation fund 290,000,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 115. INTERCITY PASSENGER AND FREIGHT Full-time equated classified positions 37.4 Detroit/Wayne County Port Authority $ 700,000 Freight property management 1,300,000 Intercity services 10,189,700 Marine passenger service 22,559,100 Office of rail--FTEs 37.4 5,370,500 Rail operations and infrastructure 219,388,500 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 259,507,800 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal aid ï¿½ transportation programs 124,362,700 Special revenue funds: Local funds 760,000 Private funds 4,500,000 Comprehensive transportation fund 121,329,000 Intercity bus equipment fund 45,400 Michigan transportation fund 1,674,800 Rail freight fund 6,000,000 State trunkline fund 835,900 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 116. PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION DEVELOPMENT 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Full-time equated classified positions 1.0 Infrastructure projects authority fund $ 65,000,000 Maritime and port facility assistance grant program--FTE 1.0 5,294,700 Municipal credit program 2,000,000 Service initiatives 6,300,000 Specialized services 30,342,700 Transit capital 247,793,500 Van pooling 195,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 356,925,900 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal aid ï¿½ transportation programs 161,399,300 Special revenue funds: Local funds 37,185,000 Private funds 4,000,000 Comprehensive transportation fund 84,046,900 Infrastructure projects authority fund 65,000,000 Maritime and port facility assistance fund 5,294,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 117. CAPITAL OUTLAYï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ (1) BUILDINGS AND FACILITIES Salt storage buildings and containment control $ 3,000,000 Special maintenance, remodeling, and additions 5,000,500 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 8,000,500 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: State trunkline fund 8,000,500 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (2) AIRPORT IMPROVEMENT PROGRAMS Airport safety, protection, and improvement program $ 189,045,000 Detroit Metropolitan Wayne County Airport 13,020,000 IIJA airport infrastructure grants 115,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 317,065,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal aid ï¿½ transportation programs 270,000,000 Special revenue funds: Local funds 17,500,000 Private funds 2,000,000 Qualified airport fund 13,020,000 State aeronautics fund 14,545,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 118. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Rail freight/rail economic development $ 23,000,000 Grants to commercial service airports 16,781,500 Maritime and port facility assistance grant program 22,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 61,781,500 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Comprehensive transportation fund 61,781,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 for fiscal year 2026-2027 general sections Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is $6,097,647,100.00 and state spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $3,966,767,600.00. The following itemized statement identifies appropriations from which spending to local units of government will occur: STATE TRANSPORTATION DEPARTMENT Grants to regional planning councils $ 488,800 Cities and villages 1,112,369,700 Cities and villages ï¿½ MTF redistribution 4,360,000 Cities and villages ï¿½ GF/GP 28,000,000 County road commissions 2,012,101,400 County road commissions ï¿½ MTF redistribution 7,820,000 County road commissions ï¿½ GF/GP 52,000,000 Grants to local programs 33,000,000 Local agency wetland mitigation 2,000,000 Local bridge program 126,550,900 Local grade separation program 40,000,000 Movable bridge 6,504,600 Rail grade crossing 1,500,000 Rail grade surface crossing improvements 6,000,000 Forest roads 5,000,000 Rural county primary 10,620,800 Rural county urban system 2,500,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Target industries/economic redevelopment 24,741,600 Urban county congestion 10,620,800 Air service program 50,000 Local bus operating 290,000,000 Detroit/Wayne County Port Authority 700,000 Marine passenger service 4,000,000 Municipal credit program 2,000,000 Service initiatives 1,000,000 Specialized services 13,000,000 Transit capital 67,851,900 Airport safety, protection, and improvement program 14,545,000 Detroit Metropolitan Wayne County Airport 13,020,000 Grants to commercial service airports 16,781,500 Total payments to local units of government $ 3,966,767,600 Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1: (a) "CTF" means comprehensive transportation fund. (b) "Department" means the state transportation department. (c) "DOT-FHWA" means DOT, Federal Highway Administration. (d) "FTE" means full-time equated. (e) "IDG" means interdepartmental grant. (f) "IIJA" means the infrastructure investment and jobs act, 2021, Public Law 117-58. (g) "MTF" means Michigan transportation fund. (h) "SAF" means state aeronautics fund. (i) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 appropriations committees, the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on transportation, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office. (j) "STF" means state trunkline fund. Sec. 204. If the state administrative board, acting under section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount appropriated under part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and serving in each house, intertransfer funds within part 1 for the particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution. Sec. 205. (1) The department shall use the internet to fulfill the reporting requirements of this part and shall make each report readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each required report in a single archivable location on the department's website not later than the due date required for each report. (2) In addition to placing all reports required in the current fiscal year on the department's website, the department shall maintain on its website all reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years posted by fiscal year in the same single archivable location. (3) The department shall transmit all required reports for the current fiscal year to the standard report recipients and any other required recipients by email. The email shall include a copy of the report and a link to access the report online. Sec. 206. The department shall receive and retain copies of all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department shall follow federal and state law and guidelines for short-term and long-term retention of records. The department shall 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required by federal and state guidelines. Sec. 207. (1) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to maintain a searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following for the department: (a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category. (b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit. (c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor, including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and payment description. (2) The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to update the searchable website on a quarterly basis. Sec. 208. Not later than December 15, the state budget office shall prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses by major departmental program or program areas. Sec. 209. Not later than 14 days after the release of the executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate with the state budget office to provide an annual report on estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the previous 2 fiscal years. Sec. 210. Not later than November 15, the department shall report on private and other third-party funds received by the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department in the previous fiscal year. The report must include the amount of funding received, the specific source of funding received, the purpose for which funding was expended, and the amount of any remaining funds. Sec. 211. Consistent with section 217 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, the department shall prepare a report on out-of-state travel expenses by not later than January 1. The report must list all travel outside this state by classified and unclassified employees in the previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or in part with funds appropriated in the department's budget. The report must include all of the following information: (a) The dates of each travel occurrence. (b) The total transportation and related costs of each travel occurrence and the proportions funded with state general fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal revenues, local revenues, and private revenues, including specific sources of state restricted, federal, local, and private revenues. (c) The destination of each travel occurrence. (d) The specific purpose and description of each travel occurrence, including the specific name of the event or meeting. Sec. 212. On a quarterly basis, the department shall report on all of the following: (a) The number of full-time equated positions in pay status by civil service classification. (b) A comparison by line item of the number of full-time equated positions authorized from funds appropriated in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated positions employed by the department at the end of the reporting period. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (c) The number of active employees in each of the following statuses: (i) Full-time salary. (ii) Full-time hourly. (iii) Part-time. (iv) Permanent-intermittent. (v) Limited-term. (vi) Seasonal. (vii) Worker's compensation. (viii) Noncareer/per diem. (ix) Job share. (x) Special personal services/contractual. (d) The number of overtime hours worked by employees, by classifications. Sec. 213. Not later than April 1, the department shall report on each specific policy change made to implement a public act affecting the department that took effect during the previous calendar year. The report must include reference to the public act that necessitates the policy change. The department shall submit the report to the standard report recipients, to the senate and house standing committees responsible for addressing issues affected by the public acts, and to the joint committee on administrative rules. Sec. 214. (1) Not later than April 1, the department shall maintain, on a publicly accessible website, a department scorecard that identifies, tracks, and updates on a quarterly basis key metrics that are used to monitor and improve the department's performance. (2) The department shall notify the standard report recipients 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 when the quarterly updates to the department scorecard are available on a publicly accessible website. Sec. 215. (1) Unless specifically authorized elsewhere in this part or part 1, funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to pay for a state obligation that exceeds $200,000.00 for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim without prior legislative approval. (2) If a state obligation for a court-approved judgment, settlement, award, or claim results in a change from current statute, the department shall notify the legislature. (3) This section does not apply to compensation and other relief to individuals wrongfully imprisoned as required under the wrongful imprisonment compensation act, 2016 PA 343, MCL 691.1751 to 691.1757. Sec. 216. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $40,000,000.00 for federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $5,000,000.00 for state restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,000,000.00 for local contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,000,000.00 for private contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 217. Total authorized appropriations from all sources under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 are estimated at $34,726,300.00. From this amount, total appropriations for pension-related legacy costs for the department are estimated at $34,726,300.00. Total appropriations for retiree health care legacy costs for the department are estimated at $0.00. Sec. 218. To the extent possible, the department shall not expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted. Sec. 219. The department shall submit reports that summarize all work project accounts not later than December 31, March 30, June 30, and September 30. The reports must include all of the following: (a) A list of all work project accounts. (b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each account. (c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously designated work project accounts, the name and description of the work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 amounts. Sec. 220. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1: (a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are available. (b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. (c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. Sec. 221. The department shall not take disciplinary action against an employee of the department because the employee communicates with a member of the legislature or legislative staff unless the communication is prohibited by law and the department is exercising its authority as provided by law. Sec. 222. (1) The department shall maximize the efficiency of the state workforce and utilization and occupancy of office space, leased or owned, for each division within the department. Employees with job responsibilities that require employees to serve in their capacities outside of an office shall be monitored each pay period to ensure all work hours reported on timesheets are actually worked. (2) The department shall comply with requirements set forth by the office of the state employer on in-person work and utilization 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 and occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure at least 80% of employees are in person and building occupancy and utilization rates are at least 80% or higher. (3) The department shall submit reports not later than January 15 and April 15 on all of the following: (a) Remote work policy by division. (b) Building occupancy by address. (c) Whether the building is state-owned or leased. (d) Aggregate badge scanning information by employee. (4) As used in this section, "occupancy" means the actual number of employees physically present in a workplace. Sec. 223. (1) The department shall require as a condition of each contract or subcontract that the prequalified contractor or prequalified subcontractor agree to use the E-Verify system to verify that all persons hired during the contract term by the contractor or subcontractor are legally present and authorized to work in the United States. (2) The department may verify this information directly or may require contractors and subcontractors to verify the information and submit a certification to the department. The department shall submit a report not later than March 1 that describes the processes it has developed and implemented under this section. (3) The department shall not contract with any foreign entities that are known or suspected to be enemies of the United States or known foreign adversaries. Foreign adversaries include all of the following: (a) The People's Republic of China. (b) The Russian Federation. (c) The Islamic Republic of Iran. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (d) The Democratic People's Republic of Korea. (e) The Republic of Cuba. (f) The Venezuelan regime of Nicolï¿½s Maduro. (g) The Syrian Arab Republic. (h) An agency or other entity under significant control of a country described in subdivisions (a) to (g). (4) As used in this section, "E-Verify" means an internet-based system operated by the Department of Homeland Security, United States Citizenship and Immigration Services in partnership with the Social Security Administration. Sec. 224. (1) Within 30 days of enactment of this act, the state budget office shall post a list of legislatively directed spending items funded in part 1 as defined in sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. The list must include all information and documents pertaining to the funded items as publicly disclosed in accordance with sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. (2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency administering the grant shall submit a report not later than November 1. The department or agency shall update the report and shall submit updated reports not later than March 15 and September 15 of the current fiscal year. The department or agency shall include in the report the most comprehensive information the department or agency has available at the time of posting for grants awarded, including, but not limited to, project milestones, percent completed, funding expended, and funding encumbered. (3) Before executing a grant agreement, all grant recipients 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 must provide a spending plan that specifies the scope of service, the program goals, the measurement for meeting program goals, and how all grant funds will be used, and must indicate if any grant funds will be provided to a third party or subrecipient. (4) Each department or agency responsible for awarding or disbursing grant funds must annually audit the entity's use of the grant funds for each fiscal year in which the grant is active. Each entity must submit information requested by the department or agency to confirm compliance. (5) Each department or agency shall work with the office of the auditor general to conduct an audit of the grant according to generally accepted accounting practices and audit standards. The office of the auditor general must be given access to all internal and external records. All contracts or agreements between a department or agency and a grant recipient or between a grant recipient and a third party must include a clause granting the office of the auditor general access to all internal and external records. (6) Grant recipients and their immediate family members are prohibited from being employed by the executive branch or legislative branch of this state. In addition, grant recipients are prohibited from serving on any state board that has direct or indirect responsibility for approving or auditing grant funds awarded or disbursed by any department or agency. (7) Full and complete audits of grant funds issued by the department or an agency of this state, without redaction unless required by law, must be posted to the department's or agency's website in a conspicuous place for public review. (8) On a quarterly basis, the department or agency shall 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 submit a report on legislatively sponsored grant funds that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) The name of each grant recipient and the status of each grant. (b) The amount distributed to each grant recipient. (c) Any changes to scope or costs of program. (9) The report under subsection (8) must include the following statements made by the department or agency: (a) A statement that confirms the department or agency reviewed and affirmed compliance by each grant recipient with program scope and expenditure of grant funding. (b) A statement that confirms the department or agency reviewed applicable program reports and requests for reimbursement. Sec. 225. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall do the following: (a) Report on any amounts of severance pay for a department director, deputy director, or other high-ranking department official not later than 14 days after a severance agreement with the director, deputy director, or official is signed. The name of the director, deputy director, or official and the amount of severance pay must be included in the report required by this subdivision. (b) Not later than February 1, report on the total amount of severance pay remitted to former department employees during the previous fiscal year and the total number of former department employees that were remitted severance pay during the previous fiscal year. (2) As used in this section, "severance pay" means compensation to which both of the following apply: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) The compensation is payable or paid upon the termination of employment. (b) The compensation is paid in addition to wages or benefits earned during the course of employment or generally applicable retirement benefits. Sec. 226. Funds appropriated in part 1 from state or federal sources are prohibited from being used to provide services, grants, or programming to an individual who is not a citizen of the United States unless the individual is a qualified alien as that term is defined in 8 USC 1641. This section does not prohibit the department, political subdivision, state university, or other state agency from expending funds for the purpose of detaining individuals who are not citizens of the United States, including any costs associated with housing such individuals in county jails or state correctional facilities. Sec. 227. State funds must not be used for diversity, equity, and inclusion, or diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives or programs, as outlined in federal Executive Order No. 14151, 90 Fed. Reg. 8339 (January 29, 2025) "Ending Radical and Wasteful Government DEI Programs and Preferencing", federal Executive Order No. 14168, 90 Fed. Reg. 8615 (January 30, 2025) "Defending Women from Gender Ideology Extremism and Restoring Biological Truth to the Federal Government", or federal Executive Order No. 14173, 90 Fed. Reg. 8633 (January 31, 2025) "Ending Illegal Discrimination and Restoring Merit-Based Opportunity". Sec. 228. The department shall use the same precontract risk assessment program utilized by the department of technology, management, and budget to evaluate financial compliance, security risks, and insurance requirements prior to contract execution. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Sec. 301. The department may establish a fee schedule and collect fees sufficient to cover the costs to issue the permits that the department is authorized by law to issue on request, unless otherwise stipulated by law. All permit fees are nonrefundable application fees and must be credited to the appropriate fund to recover the direct and indirect costs of receiving, reviewing, and processing the requests. Sec. 304. If, as a requirement of bidding on a highway project, the department requires a contractor to submit financial or proprietary documentation as to how the bid was calculated, the department shall keep that bid documentation confidential and shall not disclose that bid documentation other than to a department representative without the contractor's written consent. The department may disclose the bid documentation if necessary to address or defend a claim by a contractor. Sec. 306. (1) The amounts appropriated in part 1 to support tax and fee collection, law enforcement, and other program services provided to the department and to transportation funds by other state departments must be expended from transportation funds pursuant to annual contracts between the department and those other state departments. The contracts must be executed before the expenditure or obligation of those funds. The contracts must provide, but are not limited to, the following data applicable to each state department: (a) Estimated costs to be recovered from transportation funds. (b) Description of services provided to the department and/or transportation funds and financed with transportation funds. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (c) Detailed cost allocation methods appropriate to the type of services being provided and the activities financed with transportation funds. (2) Not later than 2 months after publication of the state of Michigan annual comprehensive financial report, each state department receiving funding pursuant to an interdepartment contract with the department shall submit a written report to the department, the state budget director, the senate and house fiscal agencies, and the auditor general stating by spending authorization account the amount of estimated funds contracted with the department, the amount of funds expended, the amount of funds returned to the transportation funds, and any unreimbursed transportation-related costs incurred but not billed to transportation funds. Sec. 307. Before March 1, the department shall provide to the standard report recipients its rolling 5-year plan listing by county or by county road commission all highway construction projects for the fiscal year and all expected projects for the ensuing fiscal years. Sec. 309(1). The department shall conduct a study of the performance of United States manufactured yellow water-based pavement marking paint. The study must be conducted using a sufficient number of pavement marking projects, totaling not less than 150 miles, to represent multiple road surface types.ï¿½ The department shall report on the results of the study to standard report recipients on or before September 30, 2027.ï¿½ The study must include a detailed description and analysis of the outcome of the testing including recommendations, an evaluation of product effectiveness, the basis for the conclusions, and testing protocols 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 used. (2) It is the intent of the legislature to use cement manufactured in the United States according to the rules of origin under the United States-Mexico-Canada agreement, Public Law 116-113. Sec. 310. The department shall post in a timely manner copies of the agenda, approved minutes, and audio recording of state transportation commission meetings. Sec. 311. (1) The department shall prepare a report on all of the following: (a) CRRSAA ï¿½ highway infrastructure ï¿½ local bridge bundling initiative established in section 113(2) of article 14 of 2021 PA 87. (b) Local bridge bundling initiative established in section 118 of article 15 of 2023 PA 119. (2) The report must identify the status of bridge projects selected, funds expended under the program, and funds remaining. (3) The report shall be submitted to the standard report recipients on or before March 30, 2027. Sec. 312. By March 31, the department shall report to the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on transportation, the senate and house fiscal agencies, and the state budget office on the utilization of department properties, including, but not limited to, salt storage facilities, garages, and regional offices. Sec. 313. (1) From funds appropriated in part 1, the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department may increase a state infrastructure bank program and grant or loan funds in accordance with regulations of the state infrastructure bank program of the United States Department of Transportation. The department shall administer the state infrastructure bank for the purpose of providing a revolving, self-sustaining resource for financing transportation infrastructure projects. (2) In addition to funds provided in subsection (1), money received by this state as federal grants, repayment of state infrastructure bank loans, or other reimbursement or revenue received by this state as a result of projects funded by the program and interest earned on that money must be deposited in the revolving state infrastructure bank fund and must be available for transportation infrastructure projects. At the close of the fiscal year, any unencumbered funds remaining in the state infrastructure bank fund remain in the fund and carry forward into the succeeding fiscal year. (3) The department shall prepare a report on the status of the state infrastructure bank and submit the report to the standard report recipients on or before December 31, 2026. The report must include all of the following: (a) The balance in the state infrastructure bank on September 30, 2026, including a breakdown of the balance by cash and cash equivalents, outstanding loans, and balance available for loan to local agencies. (b) A breakdown of the state infrastructure loan balance by amounts originating from federal sources and the amounts originating from nonfederal sources. (c) A list of outstanding loans by agency, original loan 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 amount, project description, loan term, and amount outstanding. Sec. 314. (1) The MI contracting opportunity loan fund is created within the state treasury. (2) Funds deposited into the MI contracting opportunity loan fund originally created in section 1003 of article 15 of 2024 PA 121 or money received by the state as repayment of loans or interest earned on loan funds is appropriated and shall be available for future loans. (3) At the close of the fiscal year, any unencumbered funds remaining in the fund shall be carried forward into the succeeding fiscal year. Sec. 315. The department shall use any additional funds in the moveable bridge fund to cover other costs for any required local federal bridge load analysis, inspection, or other local federal mandate. Sec. 383. (1) The department shall prepare a report on the use of department-owned aircraft during the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026. With respect to each department-owned aircraft, the report must include all of the following: (a) Total hours of usage. (b) Description of specific flights, including dates of travel, names of passengers, including state agency, university, or local government affiliation, travel origin and destination, and total estimated costs associated with the air travel. (2) The department shall submit the report as required under section 205 no later than February 1, 2027. (3) The department shall maintain a system for recovering the cost of operating department-owned aircraft through charges to aircraft users. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 384. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), the department shall not obligate this state to expend any state transportation revenue for construction planning or construction of the Gordie Howe International Crossing or a renamed successor. In addition, except as provided in subsection (2), the department shall not commit this state to any new contract related to the construction planning or construction of the Gordie Howe International Crossing or a renamed successor that would obligate this state to expend any state transportation revenue. An expenditure for staff resources used in connection with project activities that is subject to full and prompt reimbursement from Canada is not considered an expenditure of state transportation revenue. (2) If the legislature enacts specific enabling legislation for the construction of the Gordie Howe International Crossing or a renamed successor, subsection (1) does not apply once the enabling legislation goes into effect. Sec. 385. (1) The department shall submit monthly reports to the standard report recipients, the speaker of the house of representatives, the house of representatives minority leader, the senate majority leader, and the senate minority leader on all of the following: (a) All expenditures made by this state related to the Gordie Howe Bridge. (b) All reimbursements made by Canada under section 384(1) of this part to this state for expenditures for staff resources used in connection with project activities. (c) All eminent domain and condemnation powers used, the related real estate involved in any governmental taking, the price 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 paid for those properties, and the beneficiary's name or associated corporation. (2) The department shall submit the initial report required under subsection (1) on or before December 1. The initial report must cover the prior fiscal year. Sec. 388. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall not expend any state funds or other resources in support of federal United States Department of Transportation grant 693JJ22440000Y430MI24A0815. Sec. 389. (1) Within 30 days after entering into a long-term agreement with a private contractor, a public agency, or a partnership between 1 or more private contractors or public agencies, the department shall notify the state budget director, the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on transportation, and the senate and house fiscal agencies of the agreement, including the subject of the agreement, the term of the agreement, and financial obligations under the agreement. (2) As used in this section, "long-term agreement" means an agreement that obligates the department for a period of 5 years or more and that actually or contingently obligates the department to make payments over the contract period of $10,000,000.00 or more. Sec. 394. The department and local road agencies shall make the preservation of their existing road networks a funding priority. Sec. 395. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for state trunkline federal aid road and bridge construction, the department may expend up to $10,000,000.00 on highway maintenance activities to support safety-related, high-priority, and other deferred routine maintenance needs on the state trunkline network. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 398. The department shall continue to work to eliminate fatalities and serious injuries on the state trunkline network and shall maintain the Toward Zero Deaths statewide safety campaign. Sec. 399. In developing its state trunkline road and bridge construction program, the department shall prioritize spending on capital preventative maintenance. MICHIGAN TRANSPORTATION FUND Sec. 501. The money received under the motor carrier act, 1933 PA 254, MCL 475.1 to 479.42, and not appropriated to the department of licensing and regulatory affairs or the department of state police is deposited in the Michigan transportation fund. Sec. 503. (1) At the close of the fiscal year, funds appropriated in part 1 for the transportation economic development program shall lapse to the transportation economic development fund. (2) At the close of the fiscal year, funds appropriated in part 1 for the local bridge program shall carry forward and are appropriated for the purposes defined in section 10(5) of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.660. (3) Interest earned in the transportation economic development fund and local bridge fund shall remain in the respective funds and shall be allocated to the respective programs based on actual interest earned at the end of each fiscal year. (4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the transportation economic development fund and local bridge fund may receive federal, local, or private funds or restricted source funds such as interest earnings. These funds are appropriated for projects that are consistent with the purposes of the respective 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 funds. (5) None of the funds statutorily dedicated to the transportation economic development fund and local bridge fund shall be diverted to other projects. Sec. 504. Funds from the Michigan transportation fund must be distributed to the comprehensive transportation fund, the economic development fund, the recreation improvement fund, and the state trunkline fund, in accordance with this part and part 1 and part 711 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.71101 to 324.71108, and may only be used as specified in this part and part 1, 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.651 to 247.675, and part 711 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.71101 to 324.71108. Sec. 505. At the close of the fiscal year, any unencumbered and unexpended balance in the movable bridge fund remains in the movable bridge fund and carries forward and is appropriated for the purposes described in section 11g(3)(b) of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.661g. STATE TRUNKLINE FUND Sec. 604. At the close of the fiscal year, any unencumbered and unexpended balance in the state trunkline fund remains in the state trunkline fund and carries forward and is appropriated for federal aid road and bridge programs for projects contained in the annual state transportation program. Sec. 651. Funds from the neighborhood roads fund must be distributed and are appropriated to the local grade separation fund, comprehensive transportation fund, infrastructure projects authority fund, and the state trunkline fund, in accordance with 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 this part and part 1, and section 13c of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.663c. Sec. 652. At the close of the fiscal year, any unencumbered and unexpended balance in the neighborhood roads fund not previously allocated under sections (a) through (e) of section 13c(5) of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.663c, remains in the neighborhood roads fund and carries forward and is appropriated to local road agencies and the state trunkline fund according to section 13c(5) of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.663c. TRANSIT AND RAIL RELATED FUNDS Sec. 701. The department shall establish an intercity bus equipment and facility fund as a subsidiary fund within the comprehensive transportation fund created under section 10b of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.660b. Proceeds received by this state from the sale of state-owned intercity bus equipment must be credited to the intercity bus equipment and facility fund for the purchase and repair of intercity bus equipment, as appropriated. Security deposits not returned to a lessee of state-owned intercity bus equipment under terms of the lease agreement must be credited to the intercity bus equipment and facility fund for the repair of intercity bus equipment, as appropriated. Money received by the department from lease payments for state-owned intercity bus equipment, and facility maintenance charges under terms of leases of state-owned intercity facilities, must be credited to the intercity bus equipment and facility fund for the purchase and repair of intercity bus equipment or for the maintenance and rehabilitation of state-owned intercity facilities, as appropriated. At the close of the fiscal year, any funds remaining in the intercity bus equipment and facility fund remain in the fund 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 and are carried forward into the succeeding fiscal year. Sec. 702. Money that is received by this state as repayment for loans made for rail or water freight capital projects, and as a result of the sale of property or equipment used or projected to be used for rail or water freight projects must be deposited in the rail freight fund created by section 17 of the state transportation preservation act of 1976, 1976 PA 295, MCL 474.67. At the close of the fiscal year, any funds remaining in the rail freight fund remain in the fund and are carried forward into the succeeding fiscal year. Sec. 704. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall prepare and transmit a report that provides detail regarding the department's obligations for programs funded under the appropriation in part 1 for rail operations and infrastructure. The report shall include a breakdown of the appropriation by program, year-to-date obligations under each program itemized by project, and an estimate of future obligations under each program itemized by project for the remainder of the fiscal year. The report shall also include a listing of all active rail related federal grants. The initial report shall be submitted to the standard report recipients on or before March 1. The department also shall update and resubmit a final report on or before September 30. Sec. 705. After receiving notification from a railroad company pursuant to section 8 of the state transportation preservation act of 1976, 1976 PA 295, MCL 474.58, the department shall immediately notify the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on transportation and the state budget office that the railroad company has filed with the appropriate governmental agencies for 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 abandonment of a line. Sec. 706. The Detroit/Wayne County Port Authority shall issue a complete operations assessment and a financial disclosure statement. The operations assessment shall include operational goals for the next 5 years and recommendations to improve land acquisition and development efficiency. The report shall be completed and submitted to the house of representatives and senate appropriations subcommittees on transportation, the state budget director, and the house and senate fiscal agencies by June 30 of each fiscal year for the prior fiscal year. Sec. 707. (1) Before March 1, 2027, the department shall provide to the legislature, the state budget office, and the senate and house fiscal agencies its rail strategic plan. The strategic plan must include, but is not limited to, a rolling 5-year rail plan and a summary of the department's obligations for programs funded under the appropriation in part 1 for rail operations and infrastructure. (2) The rolling 5-year rail plan must include, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) A listing by county of all rail infrastructure projects on rail lines within this state utilizing state funds, and the estimated cost of each project. (b) The actual or projected state expenditures for operation of passenger rail service. (c) The actual or projected state expenditures for maintenance of passenger service rail lines. (3) The period of the rolling 5-year rail plan must include the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 and the immediately following 4 fiscal years. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (4) The summary of the department's obligations for programs funded under the appropriation in part 1 for rail operations and infrastructure must include a breakdown of the appropriation by program, year-to-year obligations under each program itemized by project, and an estimate of future obligations under each program itemized by project for the remainder of the fiscal year. (5) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for rail operation and infrastructure, not less than $20,000,000.00 must be allocated for the support of rail-related economic development projects and rail freight system preservation projects. Sec. 719. The department must allow access to department-owned park and ride facilities by public transit agency-owned vehicles for the purposes of passenger boarding and disembarking from public transportation vehicles. Sec. 721. The part 1 appropriation for maritime and port facility program must be used for grants as provided under section 7 of the maritime and port facility assistance grant program act, 2022 PA 159, MCL 120.157. Priority must be given to projects meeting the allowable uses of section 5(1)(c), (d), and (e) of the maritime and port facility assistance grant program act, 2022 PA 159, MCL 120.155. Sec. 722. In addition to the appropriations in part 1, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, there is appropriated the following: (a) From the comprehensive transportation fund created in section 10b of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.660b, $7,735,200.00 for credit to the state aeronautics fund created in the aeronautics code of the state of Michigan, 1945 PA 327, MCL 259.1 to 259.208. (b) From the comprehensive transportation fund created in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 section 10b of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.660b, $6,585,000.00 for credit to the qualified airport fund created in section 34 of the aeronautics code of the state of Michigan, 1945 PA 327, MCL 259.34. Sec. 724. The part 1 appropriation for air service program ï¿½ general aviation airports must be used for capital improvement grants and air service improvements at general aviation airports in this state. Sec. 735. For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, the appropriation to a street railway pursuant to section 10e(22) of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.660e, is $0.00. AERONAUTICS FUND Sec. 801. Except as otherwise provided in section 903 of this part for capital outlay, at the close of the fiscal year, any unobligated and unexpended balance in the state aeronautics fund created in the aeronautics code of the state of Michigan, 1945 PA 327, MCL 259.1 to 259.208, lapses to the state aeronautics fund and may be appropriated by the legislature in the immediately succeeding fiscal year. Sec. 802. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for aviation services, the department shall retain and maintain air service between Marquette and Lansing with priority service as follows: (a) Emergencies. (b) Routine travel for elected state officials. (c) Other uses. CAPITAL OUTLAY Sec. 901. (1) From federal-state-local project appropriations contained in part 1 for the purpose of assisting political entities 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 and subdivisions of this state in the construction and improvement of publicly used airports and landing fields within this state, the state transportation department may permit the award of contracts on behalf of units of local government for the authorized locations not to exceed the indicated amounts, of which the state allocated portion must not exceed the amount appropriated in part 1. (2) Political entities and subdivisions shall provide not less than 5% of the cost of any project under this section, unless a total nonfederal share less than 10% is otherwise specified in federal law. State money must not be allocated until local money is allocated. State money for any 1 project must not exceed 1/3 of the total appropriation in part 1 from state funds for airport improvement programs. (3) The Michigan aeronautics commission may take those steps necessary to match federal money available for airport construction and improvement within this state and to meet the matching requirements of the federal government. Whether acting alone or jointly with another political subdivision or public agency or with this state, a political subdivision or public agency of this state shall not submit to any agency of the federal government a project application for airport planning or development unless it is authorized in this part and part 1 and the project application is approved by the governing body of each political subdivision or public agency making the application and by the Michigan aeronautics commission. Sec. 903. The appropriations in part 1 for capital outlay are carried forward at the end of the fiscal year consistent with the provisions of section 248 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1248. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Sec. 1001. The part 1 appropriation for rail freight economic development must be used for grants in support of rail freight and rail freight economic development programs in this state. Sec. 1002. The part 1 appropriation for grants to commercial service airports must be used for grants for capital improvements at commercial service airports in this state with fewer than 5,000,000 enplanements each year.